JT,JD,tool_list,skill_list,degree_list,clean
DS,"The app has received high praise in the form of mobile accolades such as the Webby Award for Best Travel App of 2019, the Google Play Award for Standout Startup of 2016 and Apple’s App Store Best of 2015.
THE ROLE
IN THIS ROLE YOU WILL:
Partner with product, business and strategy teams to leverage this user understanding for product improvements and other initiatives
Create advanced dashboards for product experiment tracking and business unit performance analysis using Amplitude and Tableau
Find effective ways to simplify and communicate analyses to a non-technical audience.
A PERFECT CANDIDATE HAS:
A degree in Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering or other quantitative disciplines
Extremely strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven ability to communicate complex technical work to a non-technical audience
A strong passion for and extensive experience in conducting empirical research and answering hard questions with data
Experience with a data visualization tool (Tableau preferred) and project analysis tool such as Amplitude
Experience with relational databases and SQL, especially Hive
Experience working with extremely large data sets
Experience in Pandas, R, SAS or other tools appropriate for large scale data preparation and analysis
Experience with data mining, machine learning, statistical modeling tools and underlying algorithms
Proficiency with Unix/Linux environments
BENEFITS
• Well-funded and proven startup with large ambitions, competitive salary and stock options
• Dynamic and entrepreneurial team where pushing limits is everyday business
• 100% employer paid medical, dental, vision, disability and life insurance plans
","['unix', 'linux', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'hive', 'sa']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'hive', 'sa', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"You have 4+ years of experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst in a similarly-sized organization, with a proven record of analysis and research that positively impacts your team.
You possess excellent communication skills and the ability to clearly communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience
You possess excellent SQL/relational algebra skills, ideally with at least a basic knowledge of how different types of databases (e.g.
: column vs row storage) work.
You have a superior knowledge of statistical analysis methods, such as input selection, logistic and standard regression, etc.
You are comfortable writing Python code, and have good working knowledge of pandas and numpy.
You are comfortable with at least ""medium data"" technologies and how to transcend the ""memory bound"" nature of most analytics tools.
","['excel', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi']","['regress', 'data', 'logist', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Job Brief
The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience.
Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.
Overview
The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience.
Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.
Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion.
This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
M/F/D/V
","['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures.
About the team & opportunity:
Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products.
Accountabilities:
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers.
jsmith@quartethealth.com).
account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email.
Have someone to refer?
","['kera', 'linux', 'git', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'amazon web services', 'python', 'numpi', 'docker', 'scikit']","['probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'account', 'exploratori', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['kera', 'linux', 'git', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'aw', 'python', 'numpi', 'docker', 'scikit', 'probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'account', 'exploratori', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"PulsePoint™, a global programmatic advertising platform with specialized healthcare expertise, fuses the science of programmatic targeting, distribution, and optimization with the art of brand engagement.
Optimize and validate targeting mechanisms for specific health conditions;
Collaborate with internal Health experts to design and support rapid assessment, analysis, and prototyping of ideas for achievable commercialization.
What you'll be working on:
Improve existing or develop new traffic segmentation algorithms and estimations of bid landscapes within each segment;
Optimize real-time bidding strategies to efficiently spend ad budgets delivering campaign targets given various constraints;
Support and enhance the existing work on health user profiling, prediction, and targeting tools;
Improve page contextualizer technology: work with healthcare topics detection algorithms, keywords/phrases extraction, general and aspect-based sentiment analysis;
Contribute on projects relating to patient/physician identity for cross-device tracking, profiling and targeting;
What you need to be successful in this role:
3+ years of full-time experience working as a Statistician/ Machine Learning
Engineer/ Data Scientist;
Advanced knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Hive/Impala and
Spark;
Advanced knowledge of Python using the numpy/scipy/pandas/sklearn stack;
Advanced knowledge of classical ML models (logistic regression, decision trees,
boosting, bagging, SVM, Bayesian methods, etc) and at least basic knowledge in
different Neural Network models (CNN, RNN, auto-encoders, transformers);
Being confident user of Unix-like systems, Dockers, git, bash;
MS/PhD in Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science,
Physics; or BS with several years of applied machine learning experience
Sane work hours
Generous paid vacation/company holidays
Vacation reimbursement, sabbatical, pawternity leave, marriage leave, honeymoon bonus
Comprehensive healthcare with 100%-paid medical, vision, life & disability insurance
$2,000 annual training and development budget
Complimentary annual memberships to One Medical, NY Citi Bike and SF Ford GoBike
Monthly chair massages
Free fitness classes (spin, yoga, boxing)
Gym reimbursement, local gym membership discounts
Onsite flu shots, dental cleanings and vision exams
Paid parental leave and a lot of new parent perks
Emergency childcare credits
401(k) Match and free access to a financial advisor
Volunteer Time Off and Donation Matching, ongoing group volunteer opportunities
Team lunches, Sip & Social Thursdays, Game Nights, Movie Nights
Healthy snacks and drinks
And there's a lot more!
","['unix', 'spark', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'hive', 'docker']","['regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'cnn', 'clean', 'optim', 'neural network', 'svm', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['unix', 'spark', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'hive', 'docker', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'cnn', 'clean', 'optim', 'nn', 'svm', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"More than one million registered users across 1,400 customers and partners access the world's most-used platform for clinical development, commercial, and real-world data.
Discover more at www.medidata.com.
Acorn AI is one of the largest AI companies exclusively dedicated to life sciences.
Your Mission:
In this role, you will research and develop statistical models.
This role will partner heavily with all of the key stakeholder functions including Product, Delivery, Engineering, partnerships and Biostatistics.
Solve some of the most complex problems in healthcare, translating complex data into meaningful insights
Design, develop and validate statistical models for novel medical applications.
Areas of team focus include Clinical Trial analytics
Provide support functions around model-building, including data cleaning and code review
Bring to production developed methods and code for integration with existing/new products
Your Competencies:
Ability to translate business challenges into data pipelines & model framework, owning and driving successful projects
Strong verbal and written communication; collaborative focus
Fluency in statistical tools and programming languages that allow you to be self-sufficient in handling data (R, Python, SQL)
Your Education & Experience:
Bachelors or Masters in Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, Bioinformatics or another quantitative field with a strong foundation in statistical methodology
3-4+ years of experience with statistical analysis in a healthcare related field
Experience with large healthcare datasets, Machine Learning techniques (classification, regressions, feature selection etc.)
Experience using Git version control
#LI-AS1
","['r', 'git', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'clean', 'pipelin', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'git', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'clean', 'pipelin', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']"
DS,"What you’ll do
You will have the opportunity to work in a highly collegial environment that emphasizes teaching and learning as a team.
In this role, you will:
Tackle the challenges of featurizing and modeling large and unstructured data using machine learning and statistical techniques
Manage all aspects of the research and execution process including methodology selection, data collection and quality, modeling and analysis, and performance monitoring
Deliver research findings to investment teams, portfolio managers, and other internal clients
Work within a team to help drive technical innovation through a collaborative R&D process
What’s required
Other requirements include:
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline
3+ years of industry working experience in a role that requires advanced statistical analysis
3+ years of hands-on working experience with varied and complex data sets
Strong programming skills in the following languages: SQL, Python (preferred), R, Scala, Spark
Ability to think creatively and see the big picture as well as finer details
Fully-paid health care benefits
Generous parental and family leave policies
Mental and physical wellness programs
Tuition assistance
A 401(k) savings program with an employer match and more
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python']","['statist', 'research', 'machine learning', 'data']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'statist', 'research', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"You will take on the following responsibilities:
Deliver metrics and analyses to all functions within Alpha Insights including product, design, and business units
Write ETLs to convert structure/unstructured data into stable data assets
Build visualizations to enable team members to extract relevant insights
Own data-driven product components (e.g.
ranking and recommendation algorithms)
You should possess the following qualifications:
3-5 years of experience in data analysis or similar role
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics or related, quantitative field
Experience applying statistical methods (distribution analysis, classification, regression, clustering, etc.).
Application of these methods to user behavior a plus
Demonstrated experience highlighting innovation, creativity, and intuition, e.g.
the ability to laterally identify other sources of useful information and think 'outside the box'
Strong data transformation skills (e.g.
using Pandas, R,)
Software engineering skills in at least one imperative programming language
Communication skills to explain metrics/analyses to members of management, engineering, product and business teams.
Prior experience in finance is not required
You will enjoy the following benefits:
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation, sick days, and paid caregiver leaves
","['r', 'panda']","['regress', 'etl', 'classif', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['r', 'panda', 'regress', 'etl', 'classif', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Duties and Responsibilities
· Support all clients model building needs, including maintaining and improving current modeling/scoring methodology and processes,
· Mine large consumer datasets in the cloud environment to support ad hoc business and statistical analysis,
· Develop and Improve automation capabilities to enable customized delivery of the analytical products to clients,
· Communicate the methodologies and the results to the management, clients and none technical stakeholders.
Basic Qualifications
· Advanced degree in Statistics/Mathematics/Computer Science/Economics or other fields that requires advanced training in data analytics.
· Entrepreneurial, highly self-motivated, collaborative, keen attention to detail, willingness and capable learn quickly, and ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high pressure environment.
· Being flexible to accept different task assignments and able to work on a tight time schedule.
· Excellent command of one or more programming languages; preferably Python, SAS or R
· Great communication skills (verbal, written and presentation)
Preferred Qualifications
· Experience or exposure to large consumer and/or demographic data sets.
· Familiarity with data manipulation and cleaning routines and techniques.
","['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud']","['data', 'clean', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud', 'data', 'clean', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"* Identify actionable metrics to understand the performance of products, develop reporting dashboards to track progress, and ingrain these metrics into teams' day-to-day decision-making.
* Lead experimentation, help teams set strong hypotheses, and deliver robust analysis of experiment results.
* Continually evaluate and refine your technical toolkit; teach what you learn to the team.QualificationsAbout You* 2-3 years experience as an analyst or in a quantitative role in which you extracted meaning from big data sets with little engineering support.
* Understand the principles of A/B testing, and love crafting and analyzing experiments.
* Proficient in SQL and have familiarity with either R or Python.
Bonus points for experience with the Hadoop ecosystem or additional scripting languages (Scala, PHP, Ruby, etc.).
* Experience with Looker, Tableau, or other data visualization software a plus.
* You can communicate your insights verbally, visually, and in writing and care deeply about the quality and integrity of your work.
* You want to play a key role on a cross-functional team.
","['scala', 'looker', 'sql', 'php', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi']","['big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['scala', 'looker', 'sql', 'php', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"Data Scientist/ML Engineer
Become part of the team
Do you crave a collaborative organization where your contributions will make a strong impact?
Do you want to develop products in the latest cloud-based technologies building ecosystems rather than creating client-facing slides?
Are you ready to roll up your sleeves and embrace a work culture that’s insanely passionate and committed to bringing the latest advanced analytics to life?
• 2-5 years professional experience as a data scientist, software engineer or statistical modeler
• Master’s degree from top tier university in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, Mathematics, etc.
• Expertise in machine learning algorithms and methods
• Strong understanding and application of statistical methods
• Experience writing production level code in one of the following: Python, Java, C++, C
Preferred:
• Experience working with database systems (e.g.
SQL, NoSQL, MongoDB, Postgres, ect.)
• Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems (e.g.
S3, EC2, Hadoop/MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Spark, etc)
• Experience building scalable data pipelines and with data engineering/ feature engineering.
• Webscraping leveraging Beautifulsoup, Selenium, Scrapy, etc
• Experience with front end (UI), HTML5, JavaScript, CSS, R Shiny, Tableau
• Experience leveraging ML techniques to build recommender systems, NLP engines, computer vision algorithms, etc..
Benefits
Bringing Ingenuity to Life.
Diversity Statement
VEVRAA Federal Contractor.
Country
United States
New York
Contract Type
Permanent
Working Pattern
Full Time
Become part of the team
Do you crave a collaborative organization where your contributions will make a strong impact?
Do you want to develop products in the latest cloud-based technologies building ecosystems rather than creating client-facing slides?
Are you ready to roll up your sleeves and embrace a work culture that’s insanely passionate and committed to bringing the latest advanced analytics to life?
• 2-5 years professional experience as a data scientist, software engineer or statistical modeler
• Master’s degree from top tier university in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, Mathematics, etc.
• Expertise in machine learning algorithms and methods
• Strong understanding and application of statistical methods
• Experience writing production level code in one of the following: Python, Java, C++, C
Preferred:
• Experience working with database systems (e.g.
SQL, NoSQL, MongoDB, Postgres, ect.)
• Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems (e.g.
S3, EC2, Hadoop/MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Spark, etc)
• Experience building scalable data pipelines and with data engineering/ feature engineering.
• Webscraping leveraging Beautifulsoup, Selenium, Scrapy, etc
• Experience with front end (UI), HTML5, JavaScript, CSS, R Shiny, Tableau
• Experience leveraging ML techniques to build recommender systems, NLP engines, computer vision algorithms, etc..
Benefits
Bringing Ingenuity to Life.
Diversity Statement
VEVRAA Federal Contractor.
Back to list
Send job to a friend
Print this page
","['mapreduc', 's3', 'shini', 'python', 'javascript', 'spark', 'tableau', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'nosql', 'pig', 'ec2', 'r', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'postgr']","['big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 's3', 'shini', 'python', 'javascript', 'spark', 'tableau', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'nosql', 'pig', 'ec2', 'r', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Learning new skills and techniques is not only a requirement but a perk of the job!
These groups are focused are enhancing their areas of the core shopping experience to connect more buyers with sellers offering just the items they need.
About the Role
Transform raw data into impactful analysis characterized by strong data governance/documentation, rigorous techniques, and actionable recommendations.
Identify actionable metrics to understand the performance of products, develop reporting dashboards to track progress, and ingrain these metrics into teams’ day-to-day decision-making.
Lead experimentation, help teams set strong hypotheses, and deliver robust analysis of experiment results.
Continually evaluate and refine your technical toolkit; teach what you learn to the team.
Qualifications
About You
2-3 years experience as an analyst or in a quantitative role in which you extracted meaning from big data sets with little engineering support.
Understand the principles of A/B testing, and love crafting and analyzing experiments.
Proficient in SQL and have familiarity with either R or Python.
Bonus points for experience with the Hadoop ecosystem or additional scripting languages (Scala, PHP, Ruby, etc.).
Experience with Looker, Tableau, or other data visualization software a plus.
You can communicate your insights verbally, visually, and in writing and care deeply about the quality and integrity of your work.
You want to play a key role on a cross-functional team.
You are passionate about subjects such as experimental design, data visualization, and statistical analysis techniques.
Additional Information
","['scala', 'looker', 'sql', 'php', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi']","['big data', 'experimental design', 'dashboard', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']",999.0,"['scala', 'looker', 'sql', 'php', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'big data', 'experimental design', 'dashboard', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"to advance and optimize personalized recommendations.
Use state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning methods to develop algorithms using these models to score and predict the optimal mix of content at the most granular user levels.
* Data Preparation: Process, cleanse and verify the integrity of data used for model building, experimentation evaluation and algorithm performance* Analysis: Perform deep dive analysis on app interactions and events to better understand user consumption behavior as it relates to personalization and recommendation.
* Partnership: Collaborate with business stakeholders to help identify and define personalization opportunities.
Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
",[None],"['deep learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'optim', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",999.0,"['deep learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'optim', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"You will be joining a new Data Science Operations team tasked with accelerating Data Science research and development through improved design and best practice adoption, as well as through tooling and processes.
You are a broad generalist.
You enjoy collaborating with scientists to build software and to improve workflows.
You appreciate all stages of data operations, from ingestion and transformation of data to use in statistical models and machine learning products.
You will work primarily with data science teams to collaboratively build elegant, reusable domain-specific python libraries and services; and you will remove pain points and inefficiencies in development, feature creation, prototyping, and productionalization.
You will also collaborate with Data Engineering and Data Platforms teams in pursuit of Data Science workflow improvements.
You should excel in a culture of teaching and learning.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Advise and enhance data science teams, focusing on software-related concern
Design, develop, refactor, package, harden, and deploy software products
Promote the use of internally built and externally sourced tools through presentation, documentation, and cross-team collaboration
Develop tools and automate workflows
Guide the Data Science Team's adoption of new software and frameworks
Translate unstructured inefficiencies and pain points into concrete business and technical requirements
Identify and implement development metrics and operational metrics; assist teams in setting and achieving goals to improve those metrics.
QUALIFICATIONS
5 or more years of experience in a research software role, either as an engineer or a data scientist
Experience working in a data science team with a strong engineering culture
A deep love of python and of interfaces & boundaries
Experience developing, maintaining, and deploying python services and packages
Experience working with containerized services
Preferred: experience with Docker and Kubernetes
Preferred: experience working with cloud service providers such as AWS, GCP, or Azure
Preferred: experience building robust data pipelines
Preferred: experience supporting business intelligence
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative or logic-driven field
For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.
Benefits & Perks
Health insurance with 100% premium covered for you and your dependent children
Flexible vacation & paid time off
Up to 20 weeks of paid family leave
Retirement benefits with employer match
Fertility and adoption benefits
Free lunch and snacks at all offices
Education reimbursement
Dog-friendly workplace in New York office
","['kubernet', 'aw', 'gcp', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'cloud']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['kubernet', 'aw', 'gcp', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'cloud', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You will build scalable clustering, customer lifetime value, and churn models to help clients maximize long-term profitability
You will build and maintain data pipelines internal and external teams rely on for making key decisions
Requirements
You might be a fit for this role if...
You have professional SQL experience and understand the benefits of columnar storage
You have familiarity with git and the command line
You know how to write object-oriented Python
You have experience building machine learning models for both structured (decision-trees, linear regression, etc) and unstructured data (Computer Vision, NLP)
You understand the benefits of dbt for data transformations
You have the desire to learn Microservice Architecture (Docker and Kubernetes)
You are naturally curious and embrace failure as you learn new technologies
You have an obsession with accuracy
You have excellent listening and collaboration skills
Benefits
Competitive salary dependent on experience
Unlimited vacation policy
Anniversary vacation bonus
401k with match
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Monthly transportation and phone stipends
In-house massages, manicures, and haircuts
Daily lunch
Fully stocked kitchen
Dog-friendly office
","['kubernet', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'python', 'docker']","['regress', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['kubernet', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'python', 'docker', 'regress', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You will join a centralized Economics team of researchers and data scientists to build algorithmic insights and novel research.In addition to possessing a strong technical background, you will be a natural communicator who is equally comfortable explaining complex Economic frameworks to both business, science and engineering teams.
You will also have a strong preference for learning and applying causal inference and other Econometric & Machine Learning statistical techniques.
Accompanying this broad set of responsibilities is exposure to many functional areas, as well as senior management, across Spotify.What you'll do:* Own the building and reporting on Worldwide music industry Economic trends.
* Work closely with PhD level researchers to identify content substitution patterns and build/transition them to internal self-serve data products.
* Communicate data-driven insights and recommendations to key partners through clear visualizations and presentations.Who you are:* Degree in Science/Engineering, Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or a similar quantitative field.
* Ability to communicate complex topics using plain (non-technical) language.
* Prior proven experience analyzing and summarizing complex data via modern SQL dialects* Prior experience with a statistical scripting language (Python (preferred), STATA, or R)* Prior experience visualization and building dashboards (Tableau preferred)* You are comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones.
","['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",3.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"The opportunity:You will have a fantastic team of data engineers to support you, a collaborative environment to encourage your work, and the best technologies for performing data science at high scale in your toolkit.
You will:* Present the latest academic research papers to your team.
* Deploy a new feature to production, instantly affecting customers with your work.
* Mentor other data scientists on your team.
* Explore and find meaning in extremely high volumes of data.
* Investigate and fix a production issue from a service your team owns.
Requirements:* You have 2 + years professional experience* You are fluent with SQL / relational algebra.
* You have mastered working with data in a language such as Python, R, or Julia.
* You've done data science at high scale with tools like Hadoop and Spark.
* You have backend programming experience in one or more languages.
* You have significant experience applying machine learning to real business problems.
* You want to work in a fast, high-growth startup environment and thrive on autonomy.
* You care about code simplicity and performance.
* You have a BS/MS/PhD in a scientific field or equivalent experience.
* You can explain complex ideas and algorithms in understandable ways.
Bonus points:* You've written production data pipelines.
* You're familiar with time series analysis.
","['julia', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['julia', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"As a CVS Health colleague, youll be at the center of it all.
71546
Fundamental Components:
Manages and is responsible for the successful delivery of the algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools to meet business needs.
Develops complex algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes.
Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve multiple and complex business problems.
utilizing advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses and specialized expertise in the organization and/or industry.
Applies analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced statistical techniques.
Manages large and complex analytical projects from data exploration, model building, performance evaluation and testing.
Behaves as mentor to junior team members to provide technical advice.
Collaborates with business partners to develop technical /business approaches and new or enhanced technical tools.
Interacts with internal and external peers and management to share highly complex information related to areas of expertise and/or to gain acceptance of new or enhanced technology / business solutions.
Background Experience:
Strong skills to effectively communicate and negotiate across the business and in the external health care environment
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.
Deep knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
Solid understanding of health care industry, products, and systems.
Demonstrates proficiency in all areas of mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling and advanced in-depth specialization in some areas.
7-10 or more years of progressively complex related experience.
Demonstrates strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to business partners.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related discipline.Masters degree or PhD preferred.
from you via e-mail.
Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter.
",['excel'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"About the opportunity
There are big opportunities for advancing the algorithm, including identifying other predictive implicit signals via regressions, collecting new explicit signals from customers, leveraging collaborative filtering, and more.
This role will own personalization end-to-end.
You'll be joining a team that reports to the VP Product and includes a Product Manager, a Product Designer, a UX Researcher, and a Business Analyst.
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Conduct action-oriented research using statistics and data science methods
Collaborate with Engineering to define, deploy, and report on AB experiments that drive customer retention via personalization
Partner with UX Research to understand user thinking and behavior
Partner with Product and Design to come up with and launch customer-centric ways of collecting new actionable signals
Bring an understanding of best practices in recommendation systems, to both the backend and user-facing frontend
Requirements:
2+ years in data science, product management, research, or related role
Data science toolkit including regressions, predictive modeling, R/Python
SQL querying skills
Experience working with engineers and/or designers
Ability to explain complex concepts clearly
Highly detail-oriented and organized
A love of learning and the ability to keep up with a frequently changing environment
Bonus points for:
Startup experience
D2C and/or subscription business experience
A passion for food
Looker/LookML experience
Additional Information:
Competitive compensation + subsidized health benefits
Unlimited vacation policy
Universal paid parental leave
A working environment filled with passionate, happy, smart people
","['sql', 'r', 'looker', 'python']","['regress', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",999.0,"['sql', 'r', 'looker', 'python', 'regress', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"As a CVS Health colleague, youll be at the center of it all.
The Clinical Products data science team helps supercharge CVS-Aetnas clinical programs to improve member health and lower costs.
The Clinical Products team has three main goals.
Second, the team develops data-driven clinical recommendations that are delivered to members, their providers, and their caregivers.
pricing) better predict member care journeys.
About the position.
A Principal Data Scientist will join the Clinical Products team and will be responsible for leading and providing technical vision for one or (more likely) more projects.
A Principal Data Scientist will build and lead a team that develops predictive models, works with clinical experts (e.g.
doctors) to translate their subject matter expertise into machine learning models, sources data, and presents to technical and non-technical stakeholders.
A Principal Data Scientist will also lead and mentor team members.
Finally, Principal Data Scientist will need to help set the teams coherent, actionable, and inspiring technical visionand she will need to inspire the team to execute on that vision.
68574
Fundamental Components:
Lead team of 2-3 Data Scientists to develop and deliver models that inform CVS-Aetnas clinical programs.
Consults with business partners and clinical leaders to understand problems and goals, understand business value, and translate into business opportunities to be captured through predictive analytics solutions.
Develops and/or uses advanced algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes
Demonstrates superior communication skills, and ability to develop and participate in presentations and consultations to business stakeholders on analytics results and solutions
Supports deployment of insights across multiple channels, i.e., web, mobile app, email, social, call center, Apple watch
Motivates team members and probes into technical detail
Contributes Subject Matter Expertise (SME) through interactions with team members, peers and managers to exchange complex information related to areas of specialization
Mentors others, and champions 360-feedback across team
Background Experience:
7-10 or more years of progressively complex related experience.
Demonstrates proficiency in all areas of mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling and advanced in-depth specialization in some areas.
Solid understanding of health care industry, products, and systems.
Deep knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
Strong skills to effectively communicate and negotiate across the business and in the external health care environment
Demonstrates strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to business partners.
Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.
Comprehensive knowledge of health care industry, products, systems, business strategies and products
Clinically oriented background or professional experience is a plus.
from you via e-mail.
Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter.
",['excel'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",3.0,"['excel', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Python, R, Scala, PySpark?
AWS, S3, EC2, EMR?
Hadoop, Hive, MapR, Spark?
AWS, Google Cloud(GCP), Azure* Experience developing commercial data science solutions leveraging one or more of the following: operations research, Natural Language Processing(NLP), Machine Learning(ML), Deep Learning, video/image/text analysis, or time-series analysis.
* Experience with Structured and Unstructured Data* Experience building recommendation engines - Multi-Algorithm/Multi-ModelDisciplines:?
NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Scikit-learn?
TensorFlow, Keras, Neural Networks, Deep Learning, NLP, Text Analytics
","['scala', 's3', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'spark', 'scipi', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'gcp', 'numpi', 'google cloud', 'kera', 'ec2', 'pyspark', 'r', 'cloud', 'panda', 'aw', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'text analytics', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'research', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",999.0,"['scala', 's3', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'spark', 'scipi', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'gcp', 'numpi', 'google cloud', 'kera', 'ec2', 'pyspark', 'r', 'cloud', 'panda', 'aw', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'data', 'nlp', 'nn', 'research', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"You will identify and scope opportunities, shape priorities, recommend solutions, design experiments, and measure impact.
You will bring a quantitative mindset to decision-making in partnership with product, business, and operations stakeholders throughout the organization.
You will report to a Data Science Manager.
Responsibilities:
Leverage data and analytic frameworks to identify opportunities for growth and efficiency
Partner with product managers, engineers, marketers, designers, and operators to translate data insights into decisions and action
Design and analyze experiments; communicate results and act on launch decisions
Develop analytical frameworks to monitor business and product performance
Experience:
Degree in a quantitative field such as statistics, economics, applied math, operations research or engineering (advanced degrees preferred), or relevant work experience
3+ years of industry experience in a data science or analytics role
Proficiency in SQL - able to write structured and efficient queries on large data sets
Experience in programming, especially with data science and visualization libraries in Python or R
Strong oral and written communication skills, and ability to collaborate with and influence cross-functional partners
Benefits:
Great medical, dental, and vision insurance options
In addition to 11 observed holidays, salaried team members have unlimited paid time off, hourly team members have 15 days paid time off
401(k) plan to help save for your future
18 weeks of paid parental leave.
Biological, adoptive, and foster parents are all eligible
Pre-tax commuter benefits
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Join the INTERACTIVE BROKERS Team!
You will be expected to:
Collect and analyze various telemetry and behavioral data
Produce daily metrics and reports
Clean and prepare data for Machine Learning and A.I.
Assist with designing and running A/B tests
Automate frequently used reporting and data analysis workflows
Work closely with software engineers and architects to extract, transform and standardize data for optimal use for analytic tools
You will need to have:
Bachelor's in computer science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related fields
2+ years' experience in a data science or data analysis role
2+ years of Java coding experience
2+ years mining and analyzing data sets to extract meaningful trends, producing meaningful and actionable reports
Experience using statistical programming languages, machine learning and other toolkits and techniques for analyzing large, complex datasets
Technical proficiency with transforming structured and unstructured data sets
Strong analytical skills, attention to detail and accuracy
Expert problem-solving skills and creative thinking ability
Master's degree in previously listed fields (strongly preferred)
An ambitious and diligent individual
An innovative mindset with a drive to improve upon existing systems
A desire to solve challenging problems
Competitive salary, annual performance-based bonuses, and annual stock grants.
Excellent medical, dental, and vision benefits.
Newly renovated offices with sit/stand desks and multi-monitor setups.
Team outings and dinners.
Education reimbursement and learning opportunities.
Interactive Brokers (""IBKR""), a subsidiary of publicly-traded Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., based in Greenwich, Connecticut (NASDAQ: IBKR) is a low-cost provider of trade execution and clearing services for active traders, institutional investors, financial advisors and introducing brokers.
IBKR's premier technology provides electronic access to stocks, options, futures, forex, bonds, and funds worldwide from a single IBKR Integrated Investment account.
IBKR is one of the largest online brokers by trade volume and is consistently ranked at the top of its field.
IBKR has offices in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Hungary, Estonia, Russia, India, Hong Kong, China, Japan and Australia.
IBKR is a member of NYSE, FINRA, and SIPC.
Interactive Brokers Group brokerage affiliates are regulated by securities and commodities agencies around the world.
For more information, please visit www.ibkr.com/info
","['excel', 'java']","['data', 'account', 'clean', 'optim', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['excel', 'java', 'data', 'account', 'clean', 'optim', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Imagine a world where you can do virtually everything you need to - breeze through the airport, buy a beer at the game, check-in at the doctor's office, access your office building, and more - without ever pulling out your wallet or phone.
As a critical member of the team, you will have a prominent voice in the future of the product from conception to launch, and in some cases IP creation.
You're a deep thinker who is intellectually curious and enjoys solving critical problems.
You are a self starter who can own a solution from end to end.You are technically proficient and have the ability to access and wrangle large amounts of structured and unstructured data, a great business sense, the desire to influence strategic decisions with data-driven analysis.
You think deep, you happily prove your assumptions and you work fast.
Lastly, you have strong written and verbal communication skills to translate the complex to the organization as a whole.This role requires you to have unrestricted work authorization to work in the United States.What You Will Do:* In house subject matter expert for a machine learning related product line, including the creation of algorithms.
* Understand ground truth, create training models, devise new statistical models, using machine learning techniques within the context of domain specific and domain independent data.
* Work collaboratively with the data science and product management teams to evolve current and build new quantitative product features.Who You Are:* Experience taking quantitative features to market.
* Experience modeling risk related problems, particularly those with class imbalances is highly preferred.
* Experience conceiving of new metrics based on synthesis of new and existing data is highly preferred.
* You have a strong desire to work in a highly collaborative, team oriented, intellectually curious environment.
* Comfortable scoping and structuring your work in the face of a variety of different problems types such as deterministic problems, amorphous, ambiguous, and otherwise heuristic ones as well.
* Have at least an M.S.
(preferred) or Bachelors (required) in Computer Science, Operations Research, Computational Economics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Data Science, or related major.
* Demonstrable hands-on experience in Machine learning (Bayesian Analysis, Decision Trees, Random Forests, Boosted Trees, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, etc.)
and Advanced mathematics to create product features.
* 5+ years experience leveraging the Python Data Science stack (scikit-learn, Numpy, Pandas, etc.)
to drive prototyping of large data sets.
Experience with auto model building tools such as DataRobot, AutoML, et al.
is highly desired.
* Skilled in cleaning, transforming and otherwise statistically describing data for the purpose of feature engineering.
Experience with Feature Tools or similar is highly preferred.
* Proficient in leveraging a variety of visualization packages and applications such as Tableau, Looker, matplotlib, Python dash, plotly, et al.
to expose meaningful insights in data.
* Experience working with data warehouses and/or relational databases and SQL in a real-world context.
","['looker', 'dash', 'sql', 'tableau', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['risk', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'econom', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",1.0,"['looker', 'dash', 'sql', 'tableau', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'risk', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'econom', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'svm', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"As a Data Scientist, you will implement machine learning models into critical business processes, forecast industry trends, and build data pipelines.
The Data Science team works closely with engineers, pricing analysts, and the business intelligence team to complement qualitative knowledge of the freight industry with rigor and quantitative insights.
What you'll do:
Build forecasting models for freight market pricing changes using industry indicators
Execute long-term modeling initiatives
Drive adoption of improved, innovative technologies and tools
Act as a mentor for the data science teamHelp drive strategic data-driven analyses, insights, and report on KPIs
Partner with data engineering for system design and infrastructure
About you:
You have a Bachelor's degree in a STEM or quantitative field
You love data and have at least 2+ years experience with conducting in-depth data analyses, building machine learning models, and presenting results to business stakeholders
You have a solid grasp on both theory and application, and you know how to balance methodological purity with practical implementation
You are fluent with programming languages (Python, R)
You are comfortable working in high-paced, impact-driven environments
Price optimization and financial forecasting knowledge is a plus
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
","['r', 'python']","['data', 'kpi', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['r', 'python', 'data', 'kpi', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"With the aim to share the goodness of own-grown produce with everyone, they developed a smart modular farming system, that allows distribution of farms throughout the urban environment, growing fresh produce in any available space and fulfilling any market demand.
Who you are
As the Data Scientist, you contribute to that mission by searching for patterns in financial data that can provide solutions to business problems or create new business opportunities.
In this role, you will communicate clearly and effectively with both clients and multi-disciplinary teams and use advanced mathematical and computer science skills to analyze vast pools of data.
You appreciate diversity.
You love to be challenged.
You are passionate.
Responsibilities
Analyze customer store data to evaluate key KPIs, understand trends, risks and opportunities; Propose solutions for identified risks/opportunities
Assist the management team with the development of expansion strategies including product offerings and regional market analysis
Gather and analyze market research data for various growth initiatives
Assist teams in analyzing data for efficiency/cost saving projects
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting, and other business outcomes
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Requirements
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models along with a Bachelor's degree (B.
A.
/ B. S.) from four-year college or university in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SLQ, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets preferred
Strong MS Excel skills (data analysis, modeling, and functions) with SQL querying experience preferred
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, regression, simulations, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, statistical tests, and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product development
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers as needed and visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
The ability to drive impact and be a true partner to the business, working closely with top-level managers
A friendly work environment with a diverse group of motivated, talented, and visionary colleagues
Comprehensive healthcare benefits
19 days of vacation plus an extra day off on your birthday
All applicants are given equal opportunity regardless of age, gender identity or expression, language, disability, ethnic origin, national origin, religion, belief, culture, socio-economic status, or sexual orientation.
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python']","['risk', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'risk', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The Alpha Insights team is looking for an entrepreneurial data scientist to contribute to its data-driven investment initiatives.
You will take on the following responsibilities:
Deliver metrics and analyses to all functions within Alpha Insights including product, design, and business units
Write ETLs to convert structure/unstructured data into stable data assets
Build visualizations to enable team members to extract relevant insights
Own data-driven product components (e.g.
ranking and recommendation algorithms)
You should possess the following qualifications:
3-5 years of experience in data analysis or similar role
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics or related, quantitative field
Experience applying statistical methods (distribution analysis, classification, regression, clustering, etc.).
Application of these methods to user behavior a plus
Demonstrated experience highlighting innovation, creativity, and intuition, e.g.
the ability to laterally identify other sources of useful information and think 'outside the box'
Strong data transformation skills (e.g.
using Pandas, R,)
Software engineering skills in at least one imperative programming language
Communication skills to explain metrics/analyses to members of management, engineering, product and business teams.
Prior experience in finance is not required
You will enjoy the following benefits:
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation, sick days, and paid caregiver leaves
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
","['r', 'panda']","['regress', 'etl', 'classif', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['r', 'panda', 'regress', 'etl', 'classif', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"About The Role:
You’ll be part of the Data & AI team which is responsible for everything from collecting data, to reporting facts, investigative analysis, building machine learning and computer vision models.
What You'll Do:
Develop SQL to transform the raw data produced by the farm into a comprehensive data warehouse as the authoritative source for all facts about the business.
Build and use statistical and algorithmic models to proactively surface and predict relationships in data.
What You'll Have:
You are fluent in SQL, have opinions about a well-designed database, and know how to deal with data too big to analyze in-memory.
You are comfortable working in a highly technical team: contributing through version control, peer-reviewing code, and managing processes in production.
You’ve got a natural attention to detail and drive for order that yields accuracy and reliability in the data you work with.
You have experience in and a passion for visualizing data to tell clear stories and support decision making.
You have some familiarity with data science languages like R or python, and enjoy learning more.
You believe that teams succeed and fail together and take responsibility for ensuring the success and safety of your teammates.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['computer vision', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'computer vision', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Jobs at Instagram
Data Scientist, Instagram - Well-being, Trust
A core part of delivering on that, is making sure that people are safe from harm when they use Instagram, feel supported by Instagram when they need it, and are enabled to support each other and their communities.
This includes ensuring that people are not exposed to harmful content or accounts, their interactions on the platform are safe, their accounts and data are secure and that civic expression on Instagram is authentic and safe from foreign interference.
At the heart of the Instagram Well-being organization is the data science team whose empirical studies and rigorous analyses shape the direction of Well-being product development.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis.
You are scrappy, focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, progression, and user engagement of a product.
Responsibilities
Be a strategic partner for Well-being in identifying high impact analytical problems and find innovative ways to tackle these problems via data analysis, experimentation, and statistical modeling.
Minimum Qualifications
Experience in product management with proven quantitative expertise and your work experience and accomplishments reflect this.
Experience leading and executing cross-functional data science projects with measurable organizational and product impact.
Demonstrate a track record of judgement in balancing practical business needs and scientific rigor.
6+ years of hands-on data science experience in the consumer media or consumer product, including at least 2 years serving in a lead capacity.
Expert knowledge of SQL, Python, R.
Proven communication skills and the experience connecting with and influencing a broad spectrum of audiences.
Practical, hands-on experience with a wide variety of causal inference and statistical modeling methods.
Experience in field experiments, experimental design, missing data, survey sampling, and/or panel data.
Experience in Observational causal inference or quasi-experimental methods.
Experience in statistical modeling as related to survival modeling for lifetime value and threat detection.
Advanced education degree in Biostatistics, Experimental Psychology, Measurement and Evaluation, Political Science, Econometrics or a similar quantitative field.
Preferred Qualifications
Knowledge of user and data privacy.
Instagram is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer.
","['sql', 'python']","['experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'account', 'biostatist', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'account', 'biostatist', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Overview:
The Data Scientist will collaborate with two staff teams, the Volunteer Experience Team and Texter Experience Team.
Role can be located in New York NY, SF Bay Area CA, Durham NC, Denver CO or Seattle WA.
What you will be doing:
Lifecycle analysis.
What elements of training help CCs learn?
Evaluation.
Frequently analyze the results of volunteer engagement efforts (eg, emails) and new products (eg, a recommender system).
Clarify what conclusions the team can draw from what may be imperfect data, and maximize team learnings.
Work to build research support for training, policy, and product improvements to better serve texters.
Stakeholder engagement: Be a strategic partner and work with stakeholders to connect analysis to key decisions that affect the organization.
Who you are:
Impact-oriented.
You want to work on meaningful projects that lead to positive impact.
You develop analysis and tools with people in mind.
Independent, self-motivated, and curious.
You have a knack for taking vague questions and crystallizing them into impactful projects.
You love identifying and solving problems.
Deliberate, mindful, team-player.
You involve stakeholders early, emphasize consistent rigor and a high standard of ethics in your analyses, and document analyses so they are both transparent and replicable.
Requirements
You have:
A minimum of 2 years of experience in Analytics, a degree in a related field (mathematics, business, statistics, economics, computer science), or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Proficiency in SQL and one or more data science languages, like python or R.
Proficiency in statistical methods and experimental design and analysis.
Experience building charts in visualization tools like Sisense, Looker, and/or Tableau.
Experience using mixed research methodologies, including survey design and qualitative research, a plus.
Benefits
3 weeks paid time off per calendar year, plus the week between Christmas and New Years, federal holidays, your birthday, and others
Medical, dental, and vision benefits for the staff member and family
403B retirement plan (the nonprofit equivalent of a 401K) that matches 3% of your salary
Paid sick/safe and personal leave
Bereavement leave (in the case of death of an immediate family member)
Flexible, remote-friendly work policies
Professional development stipend
FSA and transit benefits
Free mental health services
4 week volunteer sabbatical after 2 years of continuous, full-time work to work with a non-profit anywhere in the world
","['tableau', 'looker', 'sql', 'python']","['bay', 'experimental design', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'looker', 'sql', 'python', 'bay', 'experimental design', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"The Data Scientist will touch all aspects of the organization including marketing, retail, operations, product, customer experience, wholesale and engineering to increase the organization's sophistication leveraging data and modelling to drive decision-making and optimize profit generating activities.Casper (casper.com) was created to re-imagine sleep from the ground up, beginning with its obsessively engineered, outrageously comfortable mattress.
MS/MBA or PhD in a quantitative field is preferred.
* Proficient knowledge in statistical modeling and machine learning methodologies, bonus points for experience with generalized linear models, time-series, state space, and econometric modeling* Strong data modeling skills including writing complex SQL queries, experience with dbt a plus.
* Python expertise, with a solid understanding of open source data mining / data visualization software packages (e.g., scipy, pandas, numpy).
* Experience of using data visualization platforms such as Looker, and web analytics platforms like Heap, Google Analytics is preferred* Experience of implementing modeling algorithms for business applications* Strong communication skills and able to influence others to achieve buy-in for recommendations and translate business challenges into data science applications that meaningfully drive results* Highly motivated self-learner.
* Medical, vision, and dental insurance to help you with those coughs or cavities (too many waffles...)* Wellness programs like cash incentives for tracking sleep and fitness, credits for your favorite studios and in-office activities* Unlimited vacation policy.
* Catered lunches twice a week to give you time to catch up with your teammate* Free snacks and coffee, including a huge breakfast selection (10 types of cereal anyone?
)* A full gifted bed set when you join and product discounts for friends and family!If you dream about this stuff this job is probably right for you.
","['looker', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi']","['data modeling', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['looker', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"Lead Data Scientist
They aren’t afraid of messy data, and are comfortable working in a fast paced, production-oriented environment.
What you'll do:
Analyzes data, as well as contributes to the design, implementation, and delivery of analytics products and services.
Builds predictive models, tools, and data visualizations.
Oversees and/or leads research development project and data science project plans for clients and internal initiatives.
Strives to support team excellence by documenting processes and evangelizing new approaches.
Preferred Experience & Background:
At least 4 years working in a quantitative production environment or a postgraduate degree in a quantitative field.
Advanced understanding of a statistical programming language such as R, Python, or Julia.
Experience building predictive models using regression and machine learning techniques.
Ability to manipulate data with SQL.
Proven experience creating analytics output within a production-oriented team.
Ability to effectively communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience, both in writing and verbally.
Publications, working papers, or conference presentations in a quantitative field.
Experience managing diverse, multi-disciplinary teams and mentoring staff.
Knowledge of experimental design and causal inference.
Ability to create user interfaces for new products using frameworks such as Shiny or Django.
Experience with GIS.
Experience creating informative and engaging data visualizations using industry leading tools.
This position is available in DC, NY, & LA
","['julia', 'excel', 'sql', 'django', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'gi']",1.0,"['julia', 'excel', 'sql', 'django', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'gi']"
DS,"Hello, World!
WHAT YOU'LL DO
You will join a small but growing team of Data Scientists.
Collaborate across teams to help scope out analyses, through a combination of experimentation (A/B testing) and quantitative user research.
Design experiments and evaluate results to test and iterate on new product ideas.
Mentor and consult with a cross-functional team of data scientists, engineers, and product managers.
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
3+ years of industry experience in a data science, analytics, or research role.
You have strong data intuition and knowledge of using data science best practices to drive impact.
Able to write clean and efficient queries on massive datasets.
Applied experience with statistical programming languages - R or Python preferred.
Understanding of statistical methods and when to use them (hypothesis testing, experiment design, sampling).
Strong written and verbal communicator.
Comfortable working with loosely defined research problems.
WHAT WILL MAKE YOU STAND OUT
Background in experimentation and measurement.
A workflow involving reproducible methods and version control - Github, Docker.
Experience automating dashboards with business intelligence tools - Looker, Tableau.
Passionate about teaching the world to code.
Interesting questions you might work on
What are some different types of patterns in user behavior?
(experiment reporting framework, forecasting)
","['looker', 'github', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'docker']","['hypothesi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['looker', 'github', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'docker', 'hypothesi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"*CIB Applied AI & Machine Learning - Digital & Platform Services Operations****About J.P. Morgan Corporate & Investment Bank**J.P. Morgan's Corporate & Investment Bank is a global leader across banking, markets, securities services and wholesale payments.
The Corporate & Investment Bank provides strategic advice, raises capital, manages risk and extends liquidity in markets around the world.
**Required Technical Qualifications and experience**+ MS or PhD in a quantitative discipline, e.g.
Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Data Science, Economics, Engineering, Physics.+ Hands-on experience analyzing data.+ Strong ability to develop and debug in Python or similar professional programming language.+ Some experience with machine learning APIs and computational packages (examples: TensorFlow, Theano, PyTorch, Keras, Scikit-Learn, NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, statsmodels).+ Problem solving and collaboration skills**Nice to Have**+ Experience with big-data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, SparkML, etc.+ Experience with Unix and LaTeX.+ Should be able to work both individually and collaboratively in teams, in order to achieve project goals.+ Must be curious, hardworking and detail-oriented, and motivated by complex analytical problems.+ Must have the ability to design or evaluate intrinsic and extrinsic metrics of your model's performance which are aligned with business goals.+ Must be able to independently research and propose alternatives with some guidance as to problem relevance.+ Must be able to undertake basic and advanced EDA, may require some direction from more senior team; should be aware of limitation and implication of methodology choices.+ Ensures re-use and sharing of ideas within team and locale.+ Able to work with non-specialists in a partnership model, conveys information clearly and creates a sense of trust with stakeholders.+ Shows institutional awareness and some understanding of applied problem solving, may require coaching and guidance as to how to most rapidly reach a satisfactory conclusionJ.P.
Morgan is a global leader in financial services, providing strategic advice and products to the world's most prominent corporations, governments, wealthy individuals and institutional investors.
","['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"About You:
Love to have an impact, learn from the best, and help people access unforgettable experiences
Currently pursuing or recently completed a degree in a quantitative field like statistics, mathematics, computer sciences, or engineering
Have familiarity with using tools like Python, SQL, or R
Initially, you'll learn:
How to present findings and make decisions with a real commercial impact
How to explore and find meaning in extremely high volumes of data
How to optimize coverage and ef?ciency of ad campaigns through search engines and social media platforms
Best practices for designing, running, and analyzing feature experiments (A/B tests)
What your team's goals are and how to achieve them
Your Growth Path:
Receive mentorship and a clear path for growing your technical and leadership skills
Be given autonomy to make decisions regarding experiments and tests
Demonstrated results and increasing ownership are rewarded
An environment where you can quickly grow your skills, autonomy, and knowledge
A+ Compensation Package, including stock incentives
Paid Time Off, 401k, Health, Vision, and Dental Insurance
Dog friendly office, weekly lunches, office snacks, and team events
Fans from nearly every country in the world can find millions of tickets to their favorite events in the language, currency, and with the device of their choice.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['statist', 'data']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'statist', 'data']"
DS,"YOUR ROLE
You will have the opportunity to constantly learn new things, take on responsibilities and help propel a successful startup to even further success.
Companies and consumers alike will rely heavily on what you build!
SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
4+ years of experience or 2+ years of experience if you hold a graduate degree in a relevant field (statistics, mathematics, (astro)physics, computer science, etc) of hands on data science using Python including:
• Data wrangling: acquire, clean, analyze and present data
• Text mining and Natural Language Processing including regular expressions, packages TM, NLTK, etc.
• Machine Learning: clustering, regression/classification
• Statistics
DESIRED SKILLS/EXPERIENCES
Experience with databases, APIs, web scraping, financial modelling, economics, software engineering standards (git, collaboration and project management software, software development lifecycle understanding, general computer science principles), science background
Located in or willing to relocate to New York City
","['nltk', 'git', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'clean', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['nltk', 'git', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'clean', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"As a CVS Health colleague, youll be at the center of it all.
Looking for opportunities to use cutting edge technologies analyzing petabytes of data in a world class Hadoop cluster, generating insights to guide consumers in their journey to wellness and help them achieve their health ambitions, whether its running the Inca Trail Marathon or playing tackle football with their grandkids?
Aetnas Member Analytics team is focused on delivering strategically-impactful programs and tools to help members across all life stages feel the joy of achieving their best health, in their own way.
This position will work within a cross-functional team, delivering predictive analytics solutions to drive customer engagement and next-best-action, and improve customer experience across critical journeys, e.g., onboarding, breast cancer, maternity.
The candidate will be responsible for extracting and manipulating data from multiple, large data sources and using the data to deliver predictive model and solutions to drive member behavior change and experience across channels (mobile app, web, email, social, call center, Apple)
66201
Fundamental Components:
Manages and is responsible for the successful delivery of the algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools to meet business needs.
Develops complex algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes.
Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve multiple and complex business problems.
utilizing advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses and specialized expertise in the organization and/or industry.
Applies analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced statistical techniques.
Manages large and complex analytical projects from data exploration, model building, performance evaluation and testing.
Behaves as mentor to junior team members to provide technical advice.
Collaborates with business partners to develop technical /business approaches and new or enhanced technical tools.
Interacts with internal and external peers and management to share highly complex information related to areas of expertise and/or to gain acceptance of new or enhanced technology / business solutions.
Background Experience:
Strong skills to effectively communicate and negotiate across the business and in the external health care environment
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.
Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.
Deep knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
Solid understanding of health care industry, products, and systems.
Demonstrates proficiency in all areas of mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling and advanced in-depth specialization in some areas.
7-10 or more years of progressively complex related experience.Demonstrates strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to business partners.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related discipline.
Masters degree or PhD preferred.
from you via e-mail.
Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter.
#LI-DT1
","['hadoop', 'excel']","['machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'excel', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Hello, World!
Codecademy has helped over 45 million people from around the world upgrade their careers with engaging, accessible, and flexible education on programming and data skills.
* Collaborate across teams to help scope out analyses, through a combination of experimentation (A/B testing) and quantitative user research.
* Design experiments and evaluate results to test and iterate on new product ideas.
* Mentor and consult with a cross-functional team of data scientists, engineers, and product managers.WHAT YOU'LL NEED* 3+ years of industry experience in a data science, analytics, or research role.
You have strong data intuition and knowledge of using data science best practices to drive impact.
Able to write clean and efficient queries on massive datasets.
* Applied experience with statistical programming languages - R or Python preferred.
* Understanding of statistical methods and when to use them (hypothesis testing, experiment design, sampling).
* Strong written and verbal communicator.
Comfortable working with loosely defined research problems.WHAT WILL MAKE YOU STAND OUT* Background in experimentation and measurement.
* A workflow involving reproducible methods and version control - Github, Docker.
* Experience automating dashboards with business intelligence tools - Looker, Tableau.
* Passionate about teaching the world to code.
","['looker', 'github', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'docker']","['hypothesi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['looker', 'github', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'docker', 'hypothesi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"You are key to helping global clients make better decisions based on data analytics.
Analytical thinkers who use their research talents to provide critical insights in advanced analytics for the growing needs of global organizations
Sophisticated communicators who can easily explain complex technical material to nontechnical audiences
Self-motivated professionals who can manage multiple projects, set a standard of excellence, and consistently deliver exceptional results
Data experts who excel at building predictive models using various data sources and techniques to inform business decisions
Mission-driven scientists who are motivated to solve the world’s most pressing problems
What you need:
Master’s degree required.
Degree from a statistics, engineering, mathematics, computer science, computational social science, physics, or operations research program preferred.
Ph.D. a plus.
At least six years of professional work experience conducting analysis and writing code in Python and R required.
A deep understanding of the mathematical fundamentals of machine learning and statistics, with an emphasis on nonparametric and nonlinear methods (e.g., random forests, support vector machines, neural networks) required
Previous work experience with survey design, sampling, weighting, item nonresponse, imputation and other survey research concepts and challenges preferred
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis
A strengths-based, engagement-focused, and performance-oriented culture
A flexible work environment
World-class managers who support, empower, and engage you
Ongoing learning and development opportunities
Mission-driven work that changes the lives of people around the world
","['r', 'excel', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to shape how millions of people buy, sell, connect, and share around the world?
The Product Analytics&Insights team tackles challenging and critical problems facing eBays Product & Engineering teams.
These problems require deep analysis and thoughtful insights and can directly impact the operations of eBays core businesses.
Members of the team have the unique opportunity to influence decision making at the highest levels of the organization.
You will have access to eBays vast data resources, which include some of the largest community-based marketplaces in the world.
To be successful in this role:
Experience and technical skills/knowledge of Advanced Analytics and Data Science is very preferred
You must have strong technical skills of Python and SQL.
You have strong empirical and analytical background, either demonstrated through coursework or original research
You have demonstrated the ability to combine quantitative and qualitative findings in order to frame the right questions and deliver actionable insights
You are a lateral thinker, who constructively challenges the obvious answer in order to examine the underlying mechanisms or phenomenon
You believe collaboration and effective communication are critical to achieving goals
Additionally, the following background and experience is preferred:
Recent graduate or currently graduating Masters or PhD of a science (e.g.
mathematics, physics, engineering, statistics, data science, ML, etc.)
Ability to present complex analyses and insights effectively in simple terms
Experience with both descriptive and inferential statistics ability to build basic prototype models
Background in ecommerce product experience either through prior research or work experience
Experience with site experimentation (A/B testing), econometrics, or casual inference a plus
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
","['sql', 'python']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",2.0,"['sql', 'python', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"About this role:
In this role, you will:
· Solve new and challenging problems using statistical, Machine Learning, or optimization approaches to create measurable customer facing impact.
· Translate prototype models to production quality, scaling to millions of customers and across different languages.
· Design experiments leveraging your models to measure effectiveness.
· Work closely with product, business and engineering teams to execute on your project plans.
· Communicate verbally and in writing to senior leaders with various levels of technical knowledge, educating them about your approach, as well as sharing insights and recommendations.
· Drive best practices on the team; mentor and guide junior members to achieve their career growth potential.
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelor's Degree
· 3+ years of experience with data scripting languages (e.g SQL, Python, R etc.)
or statistical/mathematical software (e.g.
R, SAS, or Matlab)
· 2 years working as a Data Scientist
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters or PhD Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Economics or a related quantitative field.
· Experience in the Ad-Tech industry
· Experience building content based recommendation models
· Experience in NLP techniques
· Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to effectively advocate technical solutions to research scientists, engineering teams and business audiences.
#sspajobs #sspasv #adsto #booksvert
","['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"What about over the next five?
Which product lines are poised to quintuple in size?
The Topline Forecast team in the Supply Chain Optimization Technologies (SCOT) organization is dedicated to answering these questions using statistical methods.
A successful candidate will be a problem solver who enjoys diving into data, is excited by difficult modeling challenges, and possesses strong communication skills to effectively interface between technical and business teams.
Key Responsibilities:
· Implement statistical methods to solve specific business problems utilizing code (Python, R, Scala, etc.).
· Develop models and data-driven analyses to support strategic decisions
· Improve upon existing methodologies by developing new data sources, testing model enhancements, and fine-tuning model parameters.
· Directly contribute to the design and development of automated forecasting systems.
· Build customer-facing reporting tools to provide insights and metrics which track forecast performance and explain variance.
· Collaborate with researchers, software developers, and business leaders to define product requirements, provide analytical support, and communicate feedback.
· Presenting critical data in a format that is immediately useful to answer questions about the inputs and outputs of Forecasting systems and improving their performance.
Basic Qualifications
· MS in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Finance, Engineering, or Computer Science.
· 2+ years work experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and communication.
· Proficiency in at least one statistical software package such as R, Stata, Matlab, or Python.
· Experience with object-oriented programming languages.
· Expertise using SQL for acquiring and transforming data.
· Outstanding quantitative modeling and statistical analysis skills.
· Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to effectively advocate technical solutions to research scientists, engineering teams and business audiences.
Preferred Qualifications
· 4+ years of work experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and communication.
· Experience building complex data visualizations.
· Experience working in command-line Linux environments.
· Experience with causal inference, applied time series modeling or machine learning forecasting applications.
· Strong project management skills.
","['linux', 'scala', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'financ', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['linux', 'scala', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'financ', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"What You'll Do
Who You Are
You have a track record of working in the analytics space and have experience with data analysis, visualization tools and an understanding of modeling
You have a keen understanding of SQL, some programming skills (e.g.
Python), and exposure to data warehousing concepts – including the ability to productionize metrics
You have an ability to operate effectively and autonomously across multiple teams in situations of ambiguity, with only high-level direction
You know how to understand and tackle loosely defined problems and come up with relevant answers and actionable insights
You have strong communication skills and experience working across multiple teams
","['sql', 'python']","['data warehousing', 'commun', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['sql', 'python', 'data warehousing', 'commun', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"Department
The Field Human Resources Department (Field HR) is responsible for recruitment, selection, placement, and retainment of qualified and well-suited field staff to meet the growing needs of MSF field operations.
Project
The People Analytics project aims to support and strengthen data utilization amongst MSF’s global Human Resources (HR) teams so that HR planning is more strategic and data-driven.
The project acts as an internal resource for HR teams so that they can leverage the power of data science to support decision-making and strategies around recruiting, retaining, placing, developing and administering policy and programs for MSF’s workforce of ~45,000 people around the world.
Under the direction of the Head of People Analytics, the Data Scientist will help identify opportunities for data-driven solutioning in HR and will be the focal point for the technical aspects of the team’s work.
The ideal candidate is energetic, patient, proactive, organized and passionate about Data Science and how it can be used to for social good and to positively influence organizations and people operations.
Tasks
Job Functions and Responsibilities
Build, iterate and validate predictive models using multiple statistical techniques;
Perform data manipulation, wrangling, cleansing and analysis;
Transform and clean large, messy and often distributed datasets by using data cleaning tools/methods to improve data quality by removing unwanted observations, fixing structural errors, investigating outliers, manage missing data (dropping, imputing, etc.
), scrubbing for duplicate data and validating the accuracy of data;
Interpret, understand and extract value and meaning out of MSF’s global HR data;
Continuously learn and share knowledge about new ways to mine data and distill meaning out of the data available, finding creative ways to work around limitations;
Take ownership of data models and solutions by communicating and advocating their use to the Head of People Analytics;
Collaborate closely with the People Analytics Team and play an advisory role/pair with the Data Science Intern(s).
Travel
The role will not include travel, however collaboration with teams across the MSF movement globally during irregular hours may be required.
Qualifications
Required
Minimum 3-5 years of proven professional experience as a Data Scientist;
Minimum Master’s Degree in a relevant subject (e.g., Statistics, Data Science, Computational Mathematics, etc.
);
Must have expert skills and knowledge in R;
Must have strong skills and significant experience in applied statistics with the ability to use a variety of techniques to extract insights from data;
Some experience with R Shiny is preferred;
Some experience with Python is preferred;
Familiarity with BI tools and storytelling using data visualization (i.e.
PowerBI (preferred), Qlik, Tableau) is preferred;
Experience in data mining;
Experience in data wrangling/cleansing;
Proficiency in relational and non-relational databases including SQL;
Excellent organizational skills with the ability to prioritize and manage multiple workstreams and competing deadlines;
Superior attention to detail and a commitment to producing accurate and reliable work;
The maturity and experience to navigate the challenges of working in a resource-limited setting, with the ability to adapt to a rapidly growing and scaling work environment;
A strong work ethic, commitment to professionalism, intellectual curiosity, and positive attitude, especially when confronting limitations (in the data or otherwise);
Passion for data and its use in driving organizational change;
A willingness to perform other tasks as assigned.
Preferred
Ph.D. in a relevant subject (e.g., Statistics, Data Science, Computational Mathematics, etc.)
Analytics experience in the HR, non-profit, humanitarian or global health field;
An interest or background in HR Analytics, Strategic Workforce Planning or People Analytics;
Experience with People Data such as compensation, attrition/retention, and leadership pipeline development;
Experience working on a global team;
Experience working in consulting, innovation or with startups.
Fixed Term Assignment: 6 months
Application Deadline: Open Until Filled No phone calls please.
Desired Hiring Date: April 2020
Applicants not meeting the minimum experience and education criteria will not be considered
MSF-USA is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer
Type
HQ
Pay Class & Contract Type
Temporary FT Salaried Exempt
Compensation
Starting salary mid 80's to low 90's (commensurate with experience)
Working Time (Hours Per Week)
35
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python']","['data mining', 'data', 'cleans', 'outlier', 'predict', 'clean', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'data mining', 'data', 'cleans', 'outlier', 'predict', 'clean', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']"
DS,"What will you be doing?
• Work closely with Product Managers and R&D to put your work into production
‍
Qualification
‍
• 2 or more years prior industry experience as a data scientist and/or engineer
• Strong communication skills
• Strong, production-level Python experience
• An open mind and the ability to challenge yourself to learn new tools and approaches, independently and as part of a team
• A strong interest in understanding and working with eCommerce data
• Familiarity with big data processing pipelines, databases, and archives
• Familiarity with cloud computing, specifically with AWS or GCP, as well as high-performance computing, including process optimization
• Familiarity with Scrum/Agile project management methodologies
Advantage
‍
• Experience with eCommerce and/or HRIS systems data
• Experience with MQL / SQLAn advanced degree in Computer Science, Applied Math, or a similar technical field
• Knowledge in the machine-learning domain
• Front End development experience
","['python', 'r', 'aw', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data', 'optim', 'math', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['python', 'r', 'aw', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'optim', 'math', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"- Manage the design and execution of experiments, models, and other analyses to drive strategic decision making
- Communicate your findings directly and via visualizations
- Develop data-driven features that drive new products (e.g.
improved search results, stock recommendations)
- Help define and shape a data-driven culture and experimentation mindset
Requirements
- Database querying: Postgres, S3, Redis
- Using relevant tools and services: Redshift, S3, Spark, Hadoop, Hive, Periscope, and third-party analytics services
- Using advanced algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, segmenting, decision trees
","['spark', 'redshift', 's3', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'postgr']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['spark', 'redshift', 's3', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sql', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Title: APPLIED DATA SCIENTIST, Tomorrow Networks
Key responsibilities will include:
Building and developing data products
Raw data analysis and processing
Building statistical and machine learning models
Collaboration with the rest of the data and engineering team
Youll be working with a team of data scientists, developers and engineers to bring new products to market, including front-end developers and data engineers.
Skills/Experience:
Bachelors/Masters degree in computer science or a related field with a focus on machine learning, data science, data visualization
1-2+ years of experience in similar roles
Strong fundamental knowledge in data structures and coding
Experience coding in Python, R and familiarity with C++
Proficiency with data visualization/mapping software (e.g.
D3.js, Tableau)
Experience with state of the art big data technologies
Strong communication and visualization skills, to leverage the data to tell a story
","['tableau', 'r', 'python']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'python', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Machine learning techniques will include familiarity or knowledge of at least one of the following areas: feed-forward, recurrent, recursive and convolutional neural networks, maximum entropy models, and other algorithms related to time series analysis and supervised learning.
Responsibilities:
Develop scalable tools leveraging machine learning and deep learning models to solve real-world problems in areas such as Speech Recognition, Natural Language Processing and Time Series predictions.
Suggest, collect and synthesize requirements.
Create an effective roadmap towards the deployment of a production-level machine learning application.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
Experience in Deep Learning: DNN, CNN, RNN/, GAN or other auto encoder (AE)
Experience developing statistics models and machine learning models
Ability to develop and debug in Python/Java/C++
Proficient in GIT version control.
R and Matlab are also relevant
Experience with big-data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, SparkML, etc
Experience with machine learning APIs and computational packages (TensorFlow, Theano, PyTorch, Keras, Scikit-Learn, NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, statsmodels)
Familiarity with basic data table operations (SQL, Hive, etc.)
Problem solving and collaboration skills:
Curious, hardworking and detail-oriented, and motivated by complex analytical problems
Ability to design or evaluate intrinsic and extrinsic metrics of your model's performance which are aligned with business goals
Able to research and propose alternatives with some guidance as to problem relevance.
Undertake basic EDA, may require some direction from more senior team; should be aware of limitation and implication of methodology choices
Share best practice within the WM Operations, Client Service and Performance Technology organization
Takes a structured, incremental approach to delivery, inclusive of stakeholders, with clear transparency of plan, and consistent track record of delivery
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'spark', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'cnn', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'recurr', 'statist', 'convolut']",1.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'spark', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'cnn', 'supervis', 'nn', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'recurr', 'statist', 'convolut']"
DS,"What you’ll do day-to-day
The data scientist will be responsible for envisioning, implementing, and maintaining the technical infrastructure that will drive HCAP’s people analytics priorities forward.
Ideal applicants will have a bachelor’s degree or higher and three to five years of relevant work experience developing automated analytical reporting products in a business setting.
Experience building ETLs, manipulating data at scale, and overseeing the technical operations of data infrastructure is essential.
Knowledge of scripting languages for data retrieval and transformation (e.g., R, Python, SQL) is critical.
The ability to collaborate with a product manager and software development team in the architecture of a central data warehouse that will facilitate efficient reporting automation is also vital.
Familiarity with business intelligence programs (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, Pentaho, Shiny) and leading practices in data visualization is desired.
Individuals who possess a dedicated customer service mentality, excellent interpersonal communication skills, an ability to see how small details impact the bigger picture, and a knack for rapid problem solving are highly sought after.
Willingness to dive into details, collaborate effectively with teammates, and drive projects to completion is imperative.
The ability to exercise extreme discretion with confidential information is also essential.
People analytics experience is preferred but not required.
religion, gender, pregnancy, national origin, age, military service eligibility, veteran status, sexual
orientation, marital status, disability, or any other category protected by law.
than just a legal boilerplate.
of backgrounds and personal characteristics.
information (including personal information contained therein) for purposes reasonably related to their
application, including without limitation: review and management of employment applications and supporting
materials; administration and management of offers to and communication with candidates; and administration,
required in connection with a proposed sale, spin-out, reorganization, or outsourcing of all or some of the
the foregoing, such as direct marketing of third-party products to candidates, without candidate consent.
As
used herein, the term ""personal information"" is meant to broadly describe information identifying or relating to
a specific individual; it is intended to encompass ""personal data,"" ""sensitive personal data,"" and ""personally
and regulatory authorities, and to third parties which provide or may provide support and/or services to the
The persons who may have access to this personal information
(Of course,
candidates will be considered for employment opportunities only in those countries in which they express
interest.)
(including appropriate technical measures against unauthorized or unlawful processing and against
accidental loss or destruction of, or damage to, such information) and will retain such data as
required by applicable law or regulation.
Candidates have the right to request access to, and correction of,
their personal information in accordance with applicable law; any such request should be submitted
to recruiting-inquiries@deshaw.com.
and do not wish to proceed with their applications should email cvwithdraw@deshaw.com.
Personal information of candidates who have been the subject of background checks may have
been transferred in accordance with applicable regulations, including without limitation the E.U.-U.S.
Privacy Shield; any concerns with such transfers should be submitted to backgroundcheck-inquiries@deshaw.com.
candidates who
do not agree to such future use should email recruiting-inquiries@deshaw.com.
New York City HQ
1166 Avenue of the Americas
New York, NY 10036
","['pentaho', 'power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['pentaho', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']"
DS,"The result?
Marketing that is predisposed to succeed and be persistently optimized, directly impacting clients' bottom lines.
The ideal candidate will have:
A Masters or PhD from a well-regarded college or university.
STEM degrees are preferred.
3+ years of hands-on experience doing quantitative analysis, modeling, optimization and/or statistics.
Experience utilizing Python (or similar language) and SQL.
Superb communication and presentation skills
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms
An ability to translate business challenges into quantitative problems, and solve them by whatever means necessary, which may not always be strict machine learning
A willingness to learn foundational knowledge and skills rapidly
An ability to think strategically, analytically, and proactively about diverse business problems
A commitment to managing the quality & accuracy of analytics, ensuring high standards with your and others’ work
Experience in advertising or advertising technology is a plus
Experience multi-tasking in a fast-paced environment is a plus
Experience working directly with clients is a plus
Experience working on a tech team is a plus, with experience in cloud technologies, version control, etc.
Your responsibilities would include:
Building analyses, stories and slides for client reports
Interfacing directly with clients to communicate results
Operating existing software infrastructure to traffic, evaluate performance, and analyze media
","['sql', 'cloud', 'python']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Job: Data Scientist
Reports to: Director, Data & Insights
Start Date: ASAP
At its core, DoSomething.org is a data-driven organization.
Data leads every strategy and goal-setting conversation.
A successful candidate will possess strong analytical and programming skills alongside a steadfast sense of curiosity, ability to communicate to technical and non-technical stakeholders and a solutions-oriented mindset.
What you'll do:
Data Analysis and Model Building (50%)
Mine and synthesize large data sets to enhance the organizations understanding of membership segments, propensities, outcomes and decision points.
Build models and analyses that uncover the key drivers of acquisition, engagement and retention within the context of the DoSomething campaign mix and product feature development.
Build statistical models to predict various outcomes of interest and forecast KPIs
Deliver findings & recommendations to non-technical, cross-functional stakeholders via various visualization methods (Google Analytics, Slides, Docs, Looker, notebooks etc.)
Assist in sizing impact of new growth opportunities
Contribute to the development DoSomething.orgs long term analytics strategy
Data Infrastructure Strategy & Design (20%)
Inform requirements for derived tables that enable analysis; Optimize these joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design
BI/ Operational support (30%)
Support ad hoc requests for data & insights from business stakeholders across product, marketing, campaign and business development teams
Support top level Looker reports/dashboards for non-technical staff
Strong sense of curiosity.
You have the desire to learn new skills and understand complex problems fast.
Ability to explain analytical outcomes in basic terms.
You understand why making data accessible to the larger organization is important, and don't want to be a gatekeeper to this pertinent information.
High degree of technical proficiency:
1-3 years of experience with R or Python
Ability to write scalable, portable scripts that automate querying or generate reproducible analysis
Experience with the following:
BI tool (Tableau/Looker/PowerBI)
Working with non-relational data
Data warehousing technology and environments (a plus, not a non-negotiable)
Team oriented with the ability to work cross-functionally and collaboratively at all levels of the organization.
Well-rounded individual.
You are currently learning a new skill or adopting a new hobby that has nothing to do with data science.
Other Notes:
Data is everywhere.
Past successful candidates have come with backgrounds in CS, statistics, mathematics, and economics, although these are not required.
Application Instructions.
Identifying information includes your name, photos, LinkedIn URL, email and physical address.
The Perks.
3 weeks vacation plus the week between Christmas and New Years (plus Summer Fridays from Memorial Day to Labor Day!).
And your birthday, Valentines day, and a half-day on Halloween.
If youre in costume.
Seriously.
An inclusive office environment, a gong, brownie bake-offs, and the best coworkers you could ask for.
Mhmm.
You read that right.
Five (or six?
Were losing count.)
different ways of making coffee.
An incredibly compelling reason to wake up and make it to work every day.
DoSomething.org is an equal opportunity employer.
Please, no calls.
------------------------------------------------
DoSomething.org is one of the largest organizations in the world focused on young people and social change.
DoSomething Strategic is the consulting arm of DoSomething.org.
This includes your full name, contact information, and any personal information disclosed in your resume, cover letter, and other supplemental application materials.
Data is collected for evaluation criteria when seeking employment at DoSomething
Your data will not be recycled for marketing emails or to sell to third parties.
DoSomething will retain candidate profiles for 3 years.
Is your data secure?
JazzHR maintains secure job board pages.
Job boards will default to HTTPS.
Powered by JazzHR
","['looker', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python']","['data warehousing', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['looker', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"You would be leading a team of data engineers responsible for data acquisition from multiple vendors, transforming it, and making it usable across the entire organization.
You will work closely with research and operations in order to ensure they have access to the information they need.
You will have a major influence on the design of the systems and processes.
You will work with the latest cloud-based technologies.
Responsibilities Lead major initiatives successfully Implement the hardest parts of the system Play a critical role in technical direction for the team Produce high-quality work and improve others by thoughtful code reviews Influence engineering culture Lead and coordinate releases across multiple teams Provide high-quality feedback on teammates and collaborators from other teams Help with recruiting of senior engineers Preferred Qualifications B.S.
in Computer Science 5+ years of experience Working knowledge of big data, streaming and queuing tools Strong oral and written communication Bonus Qualifications Knowledge of Airflow and Python
","['airflow', 'cloud', 'python']","['big data', 'research', 'commun', 'data']",1.0,"['airflow', 'cloud', 'python', 'big data', 'research', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"Hinge is seeking a versatile data scientist to work on product development initiatives.
From assessing opportunities and results through analytical techniques to curating personalized experiences with machine learning, you will take on a central and multi-faceted role in the product development process.
In turn, your work will deeply influence how millions of Hinge members connect with each other.
Responsibilities
Collaborate with a cross-functional team of product managers, researchers, and engineers to develop and iterate on product features
Translate product objectives to data science problems and vice versa
Perform ad hoc exploratory analysis as needed
Requirements:
2+ years of experience as data scientist
Strong knowledge of statistics and machine learning
Experience with A/B testing
Proficiency in SQL and Python
Exposure to engineering best practices
Superb communication skills
Deep sense of intellectual curiosity
Comfort with ambiguity
Hinge is the dating app for people who want to get off dating apps.
Hinge is on a mission to change that.
On Hinge, there are no rules, timers, or games.
Instead, you’ll meet your most compatible matches and you’ll have unique conversations over what you’ve shared on your detailed profile.
It’s a natural way to find a great first date.
- Authenticity: Share your genuine thoughts and opinions directly.
- Courage: Invite and deeply consider challenges and criticism.
- Empathy: Be empathetic, communitarian and trustworthy.
","['sql', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'exploratori', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['sql', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'exploratori', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Position Details Client (Direct Client)Position Data ScientistLocation NYC, NYDuration 6+ Months Data scientist PowerBI report writer Microsoft Data Gateway configuration and troubleshooting experience Sharepoint online ndash connecting PowerBI to sharepoint lists, integrating Power Automate with sharepoint online and PowerBI Microsoft Power Automate for ETL SQL query writing experience, stored procedures, functions Experience with excel spreadsheets, sharepoint lists, sql server database, outside APIs as data sources Ability to support PowerBI platform ndash understands permissions, sharepoint integration points, Power Automate as ETL Faruk Kureshi Unique Comp, Inc Direct - 718-706-9195 Email- farukuciny.net
","['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['etl', 'data']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'etl', 'data']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist
Type of Hire: Experienced
Why should ONLY the big investment banks and elite hedge funds have access to recent advancements in quantitative and AI investing?
Why should someone like you be forced to settle?
Your money matters too!
Creating consumer-facing financial products to help individuals invest and save better.
Stocks?
ETFs?
Options?
Cryptocurrencies?
Why throw darts at a stock market dart board?
Free Insurance Coverage to an awesome insurance plan!
Medical, Dental, Vision, etc…we cover it all!
Pay Half of the Insurance Coverage for your Family
$100 monthly stipend to the Food Court
$150 monthly Health & Wellness coverage.
It can be used for gym memberships, massages and even your Peloton subscription!
Discounts to Broadway Plays, Theme Parks, Ski Lifts…you even get discounts on Apple Products!
What is your role?
Who are you?
Love how Big Data and statistics are transforming investment markets
Excited about how AI technology can change the way people invest
Love coding
Believe Blockchain can change the world
Happy
Curious
Helpful
Accountable
Team Player
Personal Competencies:
Strong background in advanced statistics and financial engineering
Experience with Deep Learning and Reinforcement Learning
Fluent in Python and C++
Have experience with R, Julia and Golang
Experience with Deep Learning and Reinforcement Learning
Strong communication skills
Experience working as part of a remote team
Self-motivated, detail-oriented
Strong organizational skills
Document everything
A methodical approach to all tasks
Ability to prioritize workloads and meet deadlines
Fluent English speaker
Responsibilities:
Architect and build AI investing algorithms for financial markets
Write high-performance code designed to scale
Able to take a design/proposal and carry it through to a thoughtful and polished end result with good test coverage
Take initiative to improve the software whenever you notice something lacking
Write documentation around features and operations to help share knowledge and save other developers time
Have the ability to learn and grow
Requirements:
3-5 years years professional experience as a data scientist
Experience in financial markets is preferable
Extensive experience with Python and C++
Experience with R, Julia and Golang is preferable
Experience with API requests and pulling data
Passionate about using technology and big data to make investing easier
","['r', 'julia', 'python']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'account', 'reinforc', 'statist', 'commun', 'blockchain']",999.0,"['r', 'julia', 'python', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'account', 'reinforc', 'statist', 'commun', 'blockchain']"
DS,"Excellent medical, dental, and vision benefits.
Newly renovated offices with sitstand desks and multi-monitor setups.
Team outings and dinners.
Education reimbursement and learning opportunities.
IBKRaposs premier technology provides electronic access to stocks, options, futures, forex, bonds, and funds worldwide from a single IBKR Integrated Investment account.
IBKR has offices in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Hungary, Estonia, Russia, India, Hong Kong, China, Japan and Australia.
IBKR is a member of NYSE, FINRA, and SIPC.
For more information, please visit www.ibkr.cominfo
",['excel'],['account'],999.0,"['excel', 'account']"
DS,"**Basic Qualifications:**+ 3+ years of professional data science/analytical experience+ 3+ years of professional experience using data-building and statistical programming languages: SAS, Python, R, SQL+ Practical experience and expertise in applied statistics and data science methodologies (general advanced data modeling and predictive analytics e.g., multivariate regression analysis, machine learning, forecasting, Bayesian estimation)+ Experience with data exploration utilizing data visualization tools (e.g.
Tableau, Looker, Pandas, ggplot2, Plotly)+ Experience with distributed databases and query languages like Spark and Scala+ Ability to think strategically, including interpreting market and consumer information+ Ability to simplify highly complex analyses into terms that are easily accessible and impactful for both written and verbal formats+ Demonstrated ability to present data science results and actionable recommendations to business and technical clients+ Intellectually curious, analytically rigorous, hard-working, good work ethic and an on-point business intuition**Preferred Qualifications:**+ Experience in e-commerce, consumer products, retail or digital products strongly preferred+ Experience in customer analytics, including lifetime value analysis, customer propensity, retention, forecasting, and customer segmentation strongly preferred+ Knowledge and professional application of machine learning algorithms (SVM, Random Forest, Naive Bayes, KNN, etc.)
This email address is not for general employment inquiries or correspondence.
","['spark', 'looker', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'plotli', 'python', 'sa']","['regress', 'data modeling', 'bay', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'knn', 'svm', 'forecast', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']",999.0,"['spark', 'looker', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'plotli', 'python', 'sa', 'regress', 'data modeling', 'bay', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'knn', 'svm', 'forecast', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: New York, NY, USA; Mountain View, CA, USA; Seattle, WA, USA
Minimum qualifications:
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Bioinformatics, Economics) or equivalent practical experience.
10 years of experience in data analysis or related field as a Statistician, Data Scientist, Computational Biologist, or bioinformatician.
5 years of experience in people management or leadership.
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages.
Preferred qualifications:
Doctorate's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Operations Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Industrial Engineering).
12 years of tech industry work experience as a statistician, bioinformatician, or data scientist.
Experience in statistical data analysis, such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, and sampling methods.
8 years of leadership experience, including people management.
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Ability to select the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem.
About the job
As a Technical Lead, you do more than just crunch the numbers.
Identifying the problem is only half the job; you also figure out the solution.
With your leadership and professional expertise, you manage a team of analysts, plan project goals and lead the overall strategy for your group.
You are a recognized authority in your functional area and develop, organize and launch projects that span engineering and analysis.
Responsibilities
Work with large datasets and solve difficult analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods.
Conduct end-to-end analyses, including data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Make business recommendations with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.
Research and develop analyses and forecasting and optimization methods across ads quality, search quality, end-user behavioral modeling, and live experiments.
Manage a data science team.
","['r', 'panda', 'matlab', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'panda', 'matlab', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Do you have the analytic skills to find insight in a pile of healthcare data?
Do you thrive in a fast-paced environment?
Successful candidates will have the potential to become project/client leaders and become recognized as expert senior consultants.
Primary roles
Hands on advanced data analytics and project management
Investigate discrepancies between medical concepts and their manifestation in claims datasets
Contribute to hypothesis development for quasi-experimental designs
Assist junior colleagues with the development of their programming and analytic skills
Role in client management that will increase over time
Qualifications:
Required:
At least five years of experience analyzing very large medical insurance claims with SAS and/or SQL
Understanding of medical coding systems (CPT, ICD-9, DRG, etc.)
Limited travel—working at client site is rare
Knack for prioritizing and completing multiple projects and tasks
Strong oral and written communication skills
Strong problem solving and analytical skills
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team
Experience or knowledge of the healthcare industry and payer systems
Preferred:
Experience in insurance, finance, or outcomes research
Experience scrubbing large, non-standardized claims datasets
Experience with MarketScan and/or Medicare (or similar) databases
PharmD, RN, MD, MPH, MS, PhD, FSA, ASA or similar background
Requirements
Capable of carrying out a given task with all details necessary to get the task done well
PharmD, RN, MD, MPH, MS, PhD, FSA, ASA or similar background
Experience using advanced excel functionality (VBA, macros), SAS, and/or SQL in a professional capacity
Understanding of medical coding systems (CPT, ICD-9, DRG, etc.)
\nExperience or knowledge of the healthcare industry and payer systems \n
Experience with MarketScan and/or Medicare (or similar) databases
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'sa']","['experimental design', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'healthcar']",3.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'sa', 'experimental design', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"You will work with advanced hardware, software and techniques to develop computational algorithms and statistical methods that find patterns and relationships in large volumes of data.
Data Scientists clearly communicate their conclusions to a diverse audience and become experts through Agency-sponsored continuing education, attendance at academic and technical conferences as well as collaboration with the Intelligence Community.
DDI focuses on developing the workforce with cutting-edge skills, investing in IT infrastructure, and modernizing the way the Agency does business.
Learn more about the Directorate of Digital Innovation.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree
Experience in a science, technology, engineering or mathematics (STEM) related field, such as:
Computational social science
Computer science
Data analytics
Economics
Engineering
Geospatial analysis
Mathematics
Operations research
Quantitative finance
Statistics
GPA of at least 3.0 on a 4-point scale
Experience with real world data through thesis research, internships, or work experience
Creativity
Initiative
Integrity
Leadership abilities
Problem solving skills
Ability to work in a diverse team environment
Desired Qualifications:
Advanced degree in a data science equivalent field or sub-field
Experience working with data rich problems through research or programs
Experience with computer programming or user experience/user interface
Ability to successfully complete projects with large or incomplete data and provide solutions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
All applicants must successfully complete:
A thorough medical and psychological exam
A polygraph interview
A comprehensive background investigation
To be considered suitable for Agency employment, applicants must generally not have used illegal drugs within the last 12 months.
The issue of illegal drug use prior to 12 months ago is carefully evaluated during the medical and security processing.
You can add up to four (4) positions.
The positions will appear in the cart once you have created an account.
DO NOT submit multiple applications; this will only slow the review of your application and delay processing.
Please read the Application Instructions carefully before you begin the online application process.
Important application instructions for this position:
The following items must be attached to your on-line application (PDF format preferred):
Resume
Cover letter in which you specify your qualifications for this position.
Please address why you want to work in this role and what differentiates you from other applicants.
Unofficial transcripts for all degrees
You can excerpt longer papers.
Their interest, however, may not be benign or in your best interest.
Once you reveal your interest you lose control of that information.
",[None],"['data', 'geospati', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['data', 'geospati', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Job Ref: 55708
Category: Information Technology
Department: ANALYTICS AND REPORTING
160 Water St. #3, New York, NY
Job Type: Regular
Employment Type: Full-Time
Hire In Rate: $100,000.00
Salary Range: $100,000.00 - $115,000.00
Marketing Statement
Position Overview
This includes data exploration / data mining, model building, performance & program evaluation, and related testing and recommendations.
Senior Data Scientist is expected to build / implement data science solutions at scale, and to provide thought leadership & give presentations as a Subject Matter Expert in advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses.
S/he needs to be comfortable and experienced with leading highly complex projects involving multiple internal & external resources and tasks.
The successful candidate can work both independently with little supervision or guidance & collaboratively with many stakeholders and SME’s, leading advanced data analysis and data modeling projects, from project design & iteration w/ internal clients, to the reception / processing of data and analyses and or modeling, and to the delivery of final reports/presentations, communication of results and implementation support.
Teamwork is essential as this role requires collaborating with various subject matter experts, management, and other industry leaders.
This position requires an analytical-minded individual who enjoys and thrives working in a fast-paced, nebulous, challenging, but rewarding environment.
Comprehensive knowledge of healthcare insurance industry, products, systems, business strategies and products is highly desired.
Strong understanding of Quality, Care and Utilization Management and Measurement reporting is also highly preferred, along with experience working with healthcare claims data.
Based on project requirements, determine, extract and aggregate appropiate data sets.
Create meaningful data visualizations & presentations to communicate findings and relate them back to how they create business impact.
Develop sophisticated algorithms / predictive models to evaluate scenarios to make predictions of future outcomes, and or evaluate future impact of changes
Lead the design, development, and delivery of proactive linked data studies w/ internal teams and SME’s; direct or perform these linked data studies and build out studies using new linked data sets.
Drive conversations with internal stakeholders and leaders on product design, data specification, model implementations
Provide thought leadership on advanced statistical / mathematical analyses and related strategic insights to various internal stakeholders and key decision makers.
Tests new statistical analysis methods, software and data sources for continual improvement of quantitative solutions.
Drive proof of concept tests of new data, software and technologies.
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design
Assures compliance with regulatory and privacy requirements during design and implementation of modeling and analysis projects.
Perform other duties as required
Minimum Qualifications
3+ years’ of workingl experience with healthcare claims data.
5+ years related experience with healthcare data analytics.
Strong practical experience with SQL and Pthon is required; experiences in R, Hadoop, NoSQL is a plus.
Strong expertise in statistical modeling techniqures such as linear regression, logistic regression, survival analysis, GLM, tree models (Random Forests and GBM), cluster analysis, prinicpal components, feature creation, and validation.
Strong expetise in regularization techniques (Ridge, Lasso, elastic nets), variable selection techniques, feature creation (trasnformation, binning, high level categorical reduction, etc.)
and validation (hold-outs, CV, bootstrap).
Experience with business intelligence platforms (e.g.
Tableau, NicroStrategy, SAP) is a plus.
Excellent problem solving skills, critical thinking and conceptual thinking abilities
Strong organizational, management and leadership skills
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Excellent communication skills
Ability to work independentley and collabortively.
Professional Competencies
Integrity and Trust
Customer Focus
Functional/Technical skills
Written/Oral Communication
","['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'net', 'hadoop']","['predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'healthcar', 'gbm', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology', 'regress', 'glm', 'cluster', 'optim', 'data mining', 'busi', 'recommend']",999.0,"['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'net', 'hadoop', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'healthcar', 'gbm', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology', 'regress', 'glm', 'cluster', 'optim', 'data mining', 'busi', 'recommend']"
DS,"A retail energy provider in New York is looking for several Data Scientists to join their growing team.
Here, you'll have the opportunity to be a part of one of the state's biggest initiatives in the clean energy space.
As a part of a small but hungry team, you will work on exciting projects, and get the hands on experience required to thrive in the Data Science field while interfacing with key stake holders and senior leadership regularly.
About You - 3-5 years experience in industry as a Data Scientist or Machine Learning Engineer - Masters Degree or PhD in a Quantitative field - Working experience with Python, AWS, SQL - Strong written and oral communication skills - Experience in Energy, Finance, or Digital Retail space - Experience with customer lifetime value, churn propensity, segmentation, cash flow models etc..
","['aw', 'sql', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'clean', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['aw', 'sql', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'clean', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"More than one million registered users across 1,400 customers and partners access the world's most-used platform for clinical development, commercial, and real-world data.
Discover more at www.medidata.com.
Acorn AI is one of the largest AI companies exclusively dedicated to life sciences.
Your Mission:
Power smarter treatments and healthier people with innovative analytic applications and advanced data systems
Create innovative applications and data flows for research and production settings with engineering best practices, transparency, and scalability.
Develop advanced data systems to extract, assess, integrate, transform, clean, analyze and visualize datasets for complex analytics and statistical modeling.
Solve complex business questions where situations or data require in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Assess analytical data sources, conduct hands-on exploration to determine their value, and make them available enterprise-wide
Your Competencies:
Advanced skills in data transformation, statistical processing, modeling dataset construction and manipulation of structured and unstructured data sources.
Deep experience in data engineering technologies including SAS, R, Python, SQL in a cloud setting.
Familiarity in NLP and entity recognition are a plus.
Familiarity with statistical concepts and experience supporting complex predictive model builds and implementations.
Demonstrated ability to collaborate with all levels of data science, technology personnel and senior leadership.
Clear, concise communication abilities – writing, verbal, presentation – to all levels of technical and non-technical audiences.
Entrepreneurial spirit and commitment to creating rigorous, high-quality insights from data, at scale.
Your Education & Experience:
Undergraduate degree in a technical or scientific field, such as Statistics, Data Science, Computer Science, or similar.
Master’s degree or PhD preferred.
5+ years professional experience as a data scientist, data engineer, data analyst, or related role
Experience with clinical trial data is not required, but interest to learn and understand how these data drive medical research is paramount
#LI-AS1
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Family Stories team at Instagram has been tasked with building a platform that fosters sharing between you and family, friends, and community, and giving everyone the best tools to share and consume Stories regardless of the app theyre using.
You are directly responsible for ensuring proper goal-ing, testing, forecasting and developing insights that identify the biggest opportunities for the IG community and drive product strategy.
This person will be the first Data Scientist joining the newly formed team.
The ideal candidate can shape and own a narrative and interface directly with leadership.
The Family Stories team will scale in H2 2020 and H1 2021, so this is an ideal role for an IC who wants to move into a lead and then into a manager position.
Responsibilities:
Developing Goal Metrics and Evaluate Product Team Performance
Investigating Ad Hoc Issues and Debugging Regressions
Develop Testing Plans and Validate Statistically Accurate Results
Analyze Data Trends to Identify Opportunities and Drive Product Strategy
Size opportunities to ensure product teams are prioritizing the most impactful work
Ensure product strategy has actionable measurement plans by developing goal metrics and evaluating product team performance
Determine ways to use data as a strategic asset in product development Technical Execution:
Partner with Data Engineering to ensure the right metrics are created and validate accuracy
Develop new metrics with accuracy and stability
Validate metric accuracy for internal and external reporting
Mininum Qualifications:
5+ years of hands-on data science experience
Expert knowledge of SQL
Knowledge of one scientific computing language such as R, Python, or Julia
Experience on working with multiple cross functional partners and influence decision making based on data experience initiating and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
Analytical toolbox in probability and causal inference, especially experimental design
Preferred Qualifications:
","['r', 'sql', 'julia', 'python']","['probabl', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'analyz', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['r', 'sql', 'julia', 'python', 'probabl', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'analyz', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"There are a lot of directions to explore, and each team member is expected and encouraged to help set the development agenda.
You'll make an impact by
Developing machine learning, deep learning, or dynamic simulation models for forecasting and classification
Creating new model features by intelligently combining multiple data sources
Creatively applying additional techniques to develop and test new data products
Envisioning new and useful data-driven applications to help people manage chronic conditions
You'll bring
Several years of experience in machine learning or simulation modeling
Strong skills with a scripting language such as Python, and data-related libraries
Expertise in any of deep learning, time series forecasting, pattern identification, recommendation systems, natural language processing, or other data science subdomains with application to helping transform the lives of people living with diabetes
Ability and motivation to absorb new, complex domain knowledge quickly
Evident verbal and written communication skills ranging from documentation of experiments and results to explaining project goals, plans, and progress
Demonstrated ability to set and follow a productive agenda independently, while keeping coordinated with the team
Bonus Points:
Experience with data related to diabetes or other chronic conditions
Experience with tracking data from mobiles and wearables
A personal connection to, or passion for empowering people living with chronic conditions
You'll get
Deeply impact the lives of people with chronic conditions
Work at an early stage startup and help develop the future of healthcare
Competitive salary and equity commensurate with experience and performance
Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance and 401k plan
Yearly Professional Development Budget
Unlimited Vacation Days
And it works.
Today, the rate of people living with chronic conditions is increasing dramatically, and traditional approaches to healthcare cannot possibly scale to reach them all.
www.onedrop.today
",['python'],"['deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'forecast', 'time series', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['python', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'forecast', 'time series', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"For more information, visit www.Point72.com/working-here.
Role
As a Data Scientist, you will support an idea generator testing investment theses using alternative data and building models to execute on the results of that research.
Responsibilities
Test research hypotheses and assumptions of researchers
Pull data from disparate sources
Design and validate models that transform data into actionable insights
Identify and deploy statistical, machine learning, and deep learning methods that strike the right balance between predictive power and robustness
Write efficient, modular, and dependable code, packages, libraries, and scripts
Iterate quickly to test the additive impact of new data and research findings on alpha generation
Document all work extensively
Stay abreast of new research
Desirable Candidates
Ph.D. (preferred) or M.S.
in a technical field with an applied or experimental component
3+ years of experience in a relevant field researching real-world data problems (though not necessarily in finance)
Extensive experience developing algorithms and production-grade code
Strong programming skills in Python and SQL/NoSQL
Experience with cloud infrastructures
Strong written and verbal communication skills and a proven ability to collaborate with others
","['nosql', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['nosql', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"You will thrive here if:
You can operate in a fast paced, dynamic environment
You believe data-led decision making is the norm
You see feedback or failure as motivation to learn and to grow
Reporting to the Director of Data, Models, and Decisions (DMD), the successful candidate has an opportunity to join an innovative data science and engineering team that's operationalizing data across the organization.
In this role you will:
Propose and execute research efforts integrated with production systems
Design and build a modern, flexible predictive analytics platform
Develop measurement strategy, control methodology, and experimental design
Simplify stakeholder access to novel insights and key performance indicators through conversational AI
Your qualifications are:
5+ years of experience deploying machine learning models in a production environment
Masters or PhD in Computational Linguistics, Computer Science, Statistics, Physics, Mathematics, or another quantitative field
Ability to write Python code that is efficient and clean
Experience with distributed computing frameworks such as Spark and Hadoop
Experience with scripting languages working in a Linux environment
Ability to work closely with teammates in a highly collaborative environment and simultaneously be a self-starter with strong individual contributions
Experience with Python packages for data science and machine learning, including pandas and scikit-learn
Experience modeling to production and monitoring performance pre- and post-launch
Ability to collaborate with stakeholders and quantify ROI to help ensure model adoption
Why you'll love working here:
You'll have great benefits plus flexible time off and free lunch on Fridays.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances.
","['linux', 'spark', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit']","['experimental design', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['linux', 'spark', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'experimental design', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist will be responsible for researching and building machine learning and natural language processing applications.
This includes researching and developing models, algorithms, and applications; analyzing raw source data and derived data; presenting findings; and building tools.
Job Responsibilities:
Design, implement, and validate your solutions using Scala or Python on a large state-of-the-art cluster
Requirements & Preferred Skills:
A Ph.D., (or Master’s degree plus at least 5 years’ relevant experience), in Computer Science, Statistics, Linguistics, Mathematics, Economics, Physics, or a related scientific discipline.
At least 2+ years of experience working with large datasets for drawing business insights.
Work experience at leading high tech companies such as Google, Amazon, and Facebook etc.
is highly desirable.
Research experience and coursework in Machine Learning
Fluency in Python programming
Experience with large data sets
Strong understanding of statistics and modeling techniques
Desire to work in a highly collaborative environment
Experience with Natural Language Processing, Information Retrieval, or Recommender Systems.
Experience with distributed computing, such as Hadoop, Spark, or related technologies would also be an added advantage.
Experience with mathematical optimization, control theory, time-series analysis would also be an added advantage.
","['hadoop', 'scala', 'spark', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'natural language processing', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",2.0,"['hadoop', 'scala', 'spark', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'nlp', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
DS,"Sr. Big Data Architect:
# Capable of designing an entire architecture end to end
# ETL workflows
# Batch and stream processing
# Data model design
# Assess new technologies, tools and frameworks, compare vendors, recommend tech-stack
- Strong in either Java, Scala or Python (one of them)
- Experience in Kafka, Spark, stream processing, Hadoop & hdfs
- Nice to have: Cloud, Azure, Snowflake, basic knowledge of stocks trading, basic machine learning
- Based on NY: remote now but it'll be onsite/midtown when Covid settles down.
","['kafka', 'scala', 'spark', 'snowflak', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java']","['etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'big data']",999.0,"['kafka', 'scala', 'spark', 'snowflak', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'big data']"
DS,"The OnPoint solutions portfolio drives advanced, actionable insights to help customers identify root causes, analyze performance, and optimize equipment as well as plant operations to improve efficiency, yield, reliability, environmental performance, and safety.
The Data Scientist will work with a dynamic team and be responsible for delivering A.I.
A Day In The Life Typically Includes:
Research, design and develop machine learning algorithms as part of the product development team
Perform Root Cause Analysis leveraging data science on large industrial problems related to process control, process engineering, and discrete manufacturing environments
Use industry technologies, tools, and data mining frameworks for data analytics including data visualization for analyzing, optimizing, developing hypotheses, and drawing conclusions
What You Will Need:
Basic Qualifications:
3+ years of industry experience analyzing data sets and applying machine learning to assist decision making and solve industrial problems
3+ years of experience building and deploying scalable A.I.
models using state of the art learning algorithms.
3+ years of experience on building models from ground up using python and packages like sklearn, pandas, xgboost, tensorflow and keras as well as tools such as Jupyter notebook
Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Physics, Data Science, Engineering, or Statistics from an accredited institution
What Will Put You Ahead?
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree or PhD in Mathematics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Physics, Data Science or Statistics from an accredited institution
Ability to comprehend research papers and implement it
2+ years of experience working with web services like AWS, Azure or Google cloud.
Experience deploying models to production and maintain models in a commercial setup
The ability to communicate results clearly and a focus on driving impact
Salary and benefits commensurate with experience.
Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran
Except where prohibited by state law, all offers of employment are conditioned upon successfully passing a drug test.
This employer uses E-Verify.
Please visit the following website for additional information: www.kochcareers.com/doc/Everify.pdf
","['kera', 'xgboost', 'sklearn', 'google cloud', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'aw']","['data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['kera', 'xgboost', 'sklearn', 'google cloud', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'aw', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist - Altdata
Sectors: Asset Management
Job Type: Permanent
This is an exceptional opportunity to solve problems related to alpha generation and trading, and advance data driven products.
You will have the opportunity to partner up with quant researchers, technologists, and academics beyond traditional finance to develop creative solutions to the world's most challenging problems across markets and industries.
Additionally, you will have the flexibility and opportunity for tremendous career growth.
The ideal candidate / successful individual will have experience with:
Minimum of a Bachelor's or Master's Degree in STEM programs (ie.
Applied Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Engineering, Neuroscience, or relevant degree)
2-5 years of experience in data science and engineering
Heavy experience with Python, R, SQL
Experience creating data engineering features, data pipelining, analytics
Experience applying statistical methods to proprietary data and deriving actionable insights, communicating analysis to researchers
STRONG communication skills are a must!
Good to have:
PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, etc.
Bonus points for experience working with alternative, non-traditional data sources
Ability to wear multiple hats, self-starter mentality
Ability work in a fast paced environment and create projects from scratch
Please attach a copy of your resume if you or someone in your network is a good fit.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'financ', 'econom', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"An Ideal Candidate will have the following Technical experience and background:
Deep expertise in modern machine learning and artificial intelligence techniques
Expert level proficiency with common modeling tools and frameworks, e.g.
Python, R, Scala, TensorFlow, etc.
Ability to understand data management and model productionalization best practices Ability to write scalable, production level code
Proficiency with tools to automate CI/CD pipelines (e.g., Jenkins, GIT, Control-M)
Design and implement end-to-end solutions using Machine Learning, Optimization, and other advanced technologies, and own live deployments
Experience with frameworks for either Machine Learning or NLP (Scikit-Learn, SpaCy, Pytorch, Spark NLP)
Experience with cloud computing environment (ideally Microsoft Azure)
Experience working on a large scale Spark implementation Productionalized one or more ML application on a big data platform
Must be able to translate business problem into modeling approach taking into account business requirements, data availability, development time / complexity and ability to scale.
Experience leading project management activities including communications within project teams, stakeholder management, leadership updates, etc.
Must be able to extract actionable insights from the analysis and interpred outcomes of complex models for business audience
Experience with preparing data for the analysis, work with data engineering team to create modeling dataset, assess completeness and quality of data and perform feature engineering
Knowledge of the healthcare landscape including patient and payer concerns, as well as the operational considerations in support of the business objectives and analytics experience within the retail and/or healthcare industries is highly preferred
Experience working with data and have a strong understanding of analytics and how it is leveraged within the healthcare/retail industry
Creative problem solver, flexible, proactive and ability to work in a fast paced, ever changing environment
Experience presenting to audiences including technical, non-technical and senior leaders (both verbally and through Microsoft Office products - Excel, Word, and PowerPoint)
Experience in managing cross functional initiatives communicating effectively and confidently with business partners, project team members and senior management
Excellent written and oral communication skills, ability to interact with and influence decision-making by non-analytical business audiences
Bachelor's Degree in Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering or related field
Minimum 3 years of healthcare industry experience or Master's Degree with coursework focused on advanced algorithms, mathematics in computing, data structures etc.
Background Experience
Masters degree in Mathematics, Engineering, Health Informatics or a related field.
Minimum 3 years of healthcare industry experience in an analytical role working with health care data, systems and standards.
Must have experience utilizing R or Python to manipulate large datasets and develop statistical models; performing mathematical analysis, machine learning, and experimental design and evaluation; utilizing data visualization techniques and business intelligence tools, including Tableau or RShiny; and writing SQL queries to extract, transform and load large datasets.
","['pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'azur', 'spaci', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'account', 'pipelin', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'azur', 'spaci', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'account', 'pipelin', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Role Summary
You will report to the Vice President of Data Products.
You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in in healthcare.
You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods.
You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics.
You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
B.sc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Knowledge of machine learning methods- un/supervised, non/parametric, ensemble.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy, pyspark).
Knowledge of advanced computational techniques and AI: neural networks, bayesian networks, mixture models, NLP, stochastic.
optimization, HMMs, MCMC, search, NLP, image processing.
Advanced visualization skills- interactive custom visualizations in d3.js, plotly, etc.
","['mapreduc', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'seaborn', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sklearn', 'numpi', 'cloud']","['regress', 'big data', 'data', 'dashboard', 'pca', 'supervis', 'optim', 'math', 'neural network', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'seaborn', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sklearn', 'numpi', 'cloud', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'dashboard', 'pca', 'supervis', 'optim', 'math', 'nn', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Search by Keyword
Clear
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert
form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Share this Job
AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest
Data Scientist, Recommendations
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
The successful candidate will leverage their experience in Data Science to...
Collect, clean, integrate, analyze, and visualize internal and external data on customer and product characteristics to identify opportunities and guide recommendation strategy
The accomplished individual will possess...
Experience developing and deploying recommendation engines
Python and SQL coding skills
1+ years of experience as a Data Scientist
BA/BS in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, etc.)
An understanding of Agile workflows and product development cycles
The outstanding individual will possess...
A Masters or PhD in a technical field
Expertise in AWS, Azure, and/or GCP
Experience working with non-technical teams and business partners
Experience working with containerized environments (e.g.
Docker)
Knowledge of retail and an interest in fashion
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.
Perseverance: Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Strategic Agility: Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.
Building Effective Teams: Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale and spirit in their team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.
Managerial Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration.
These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law.
Req ID:
62146
Find similar jobs:
Jobs at Stuart Weitzman es_MX,
Jobs at Stuart Weitzman,
Jobs at Coach fr_CA,
Jobs at Coach es_MX,
Jobs at Coach
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
Data Scientist, Recommendations
The successful candidate will leverage their experience in Data Science to...
Collect, clean, integrate, analyze, and visualize internal and external data on customer and product characteristics to identify opportunities and guide recommendation strategy
The accomplished individual will possess...
Experience developing and deploying recommendation engines
Python and SQL coding skills
1+ years of experience as a Data Scientist
BA/BS in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, etc.)
An understanding of Agile workflows and product development cycles
The outstanding individual will possess...
A Masters or PhD in a technical field
Expertise in AWS, Azure, and/or GCP
Experience working with non-technical teams and business partners
Experience working with containerized environments (e.g.
Docker)
Knowledge of retail and an interest in fashion
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.
Perseverance: Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Strategic Agility: Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.
Building Effective Teams: Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale and spirit in their team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.
Managerial Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration.
These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law.
Req ID:
62146
","['sql', 'gcp', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'aw']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'gcp', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'aw', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"Search by Keyword
Clear
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert
form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Share this Job
AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest
Data Scientist, Analytics & Insights
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Primary Purpose:
The successful individual will leverage their proficiency in Data Science to...
Consult cross-functional partners on designing data-driven analyses, strategies and tools
Perform large-scale data science methodology to extract useful business insights and unlock new strategies and optimizations
Translate analyses to data stories, identify actionable solutions and recommendations to influence the direction of the business by communicating results to cross-functional groups
Design and develop data visualization to help external partner understand data insights
Gather and define business requirements for data science tools and models and work with internal partners to ensure pipeline for future business analyses.
Establish best practices and provide guidance to global counterparts.
Communicate and present findings to leadership level business partners
An outstanding professional will have...
Experience with programming languages such as R, Python and SQL
Experience with BI tools (e.g.
Tableau, Power BI)
Experience with Google Analytics and BigQuery is a plus
Experience with D3.js or other advanced data visualization tools is a plus
Proficiency to tell compelling and concise narratives with complex data
Hands-on, Fast learner, self-driven, natural curiosity, and enthusiasm for data science
Experience working cross functionally and interacting with partners at all levels
Excellent communication, teamwork and relationship building skills
Demonstrated ability to leverage analytics into revenue driving initiatives
Ability to evaluate and change priorities daily and to perform efficiently within a fast paced team environment
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or related technical field; Master is a plus
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.
Perseverance: Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Strategic Agility: Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.
Building Effective Teams: Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale
and spirit in his/her team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.
Managerial Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration.
These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law.
Req ID:
73329
Find similar jobs:
Jobs at Stuart Weitzman es_MX,
Jobs at Stuart Weitzman,
Jobs at Coach fr_CA,
Jobs at Coach es_MX,
Jobs at Coach
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
Data Scientist, Analytics & Insights
Primary Purpose:
The successful individual will leverage their proficiency in Data Science to...
Consult cross-functional partners on designing data-driven analyses, strategies and tools
Perform large-scale data science methodology to extract useful business insights and unlock new strategies and optimizations
Translate analyses to data stories, identify actionable solutions and recommendations to influence the direction of the business by communicating results to cross-functional groups
Design and develop data visualization to help external partner understand data insights
Gather and define business requirements for data science tools and models and work with internal partners to ensure pipeline for future business analyses.
Establish best practices and provide guidance to global counterparts.
Communicate and present findings to leadership level business partners
An outstanding professional will have...
Experience with programming languages such as R, Python and SQL
Experience with BI tools (e.g.
Tableau, Power BI)
Experience with Google Analytics and BigQuery is a plus
Experience with D3.js or other advanced data visualization tools is a plus
Proficiency to tell compelling and concise narratives with complex data
Hands-on, Fast learner, self-driven, natural curiosity, and enthusiasm for data science
Experience working cross functionally and interacting with partners at all levels
Excellent communication, teamwork and relationship building skills
Demonstrated ability to leverage analytics into revenue driving initiatives
Ability to evaluate and change priorities daily and to perform efficiently within a fast paced team environment
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or related technical field; Master is a plus
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.
Perseverance: Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Strategic Agility: Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.
Building Effective Teams: Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale
and spirit in his/her team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.
Managerial Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration.
These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law.
Req ID:
73329
","['power bi', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['risk', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'risk', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Data Scientist
New York, NY | Full Time
The ideal candidate is capable of ingesting, processing and interpreting data sets that vary widely in size, structure, complexity, and dimensionality.
They are quick to adapt to new technology, and passionate about data-driven business problem solving for business operations.
They also thrive in cross-functional teams and can clearly communicate technical concepts to non-technical individuals.
Bachelors, Masters, or Ph.D.
Passion for quantitative problem solving and developing data driven solutions to difficult business questions
Demonstrated proficiency in Python, in an academic or professional environment
Skills in or familiarity with data cleaning, natural language processing, machine learning, artificial intelligence, visualization, network analysis, and distributed computing are a plus
Familiarity with database concepts and structures
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analyses clearly
Fluent oral and written English communication skills
Self-starter and team player
Ability and willingness to travel from time to time (domestic and international)
Compensation is competitive and commensurate with your degree and experience.
",['python'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
DS,"For more information, visit www.Point72.com/working-here.
Role
A long/short healthcare investment team is looking to add a Data Scientist to lead data research and strategy.
This person will build the team’s workflow and infrastructure for data analysis and research across healthcare, fundamental, and market data to drive insights and impact investment decisions.
Job Responsibilities
Develop strategic plan and roadmap for data research strategy and serve as an expert statistician/data scientist on a discretionary healthcare investment team
Perform analyses on large datasets to extract actionable insights that will help drive decisions across the business
Communicate data-driven insights and recommendations to key stakeholders
Stay abreast of new research in statistics, machine learning, and deep learning
Desirable Candidates
4+ years of experience in a similar data scientist role
Undergraduate degree or higher in science, computer science, statistics, economics, mathematics, or similar quantitative discipline
Strong programming skills in SQL/NoSQL and at least one of the following Python, R, or C++
Dynamic, collaborative, solution-oriented team builder who is an expert in driving data-driven analysis
Ability to balance strategic vision for the team with strong attention to detail and commercial awareness in a fast-paced environment
Communicative person that values building strong relationships with colleagues and stakeholders and has the ability to explain complex topics in simple terms
Willingness to take ownership of his/her work, working both independently and within a small team
Ability to tackle loosely defined problems
Willingness to get in the weeds on the analysis while maintaining strategic perspective
Experience working with healthcare or market data is a plus
","['nosql', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['nosql', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"As part of the Growth Opportunities department, you will lead insights for a new team focused on Automated Marketing for new user acquisition.
The Automated Marketing product area represents the art and science of bringing the right content to the right users, at scale.
What You'll Do
Establish learning agendas, measurement plans and success metrics in close coordination with marketing teams and stakeholders
Set a strategic framework to identify and prioritize new projects by evaluating and forecasting their potential for growth impact
Who You Are
You have 4+ years of experience in marketing analytics or business intelligence (focused in marketing) with a proven track record of delivering performance results required
You have an understanding of digital media (social, search, display) required
You have strong analytical skills, including analysis and modeling of big data, statistics, A/B testing, and experimental design (required)
You have strong SQL skills and advanced programmatic expertise, like R or Python (required)
You have data visualization skills required (e.g.
Tableau)
You have familiarity with marketing tracking platforms (e.g.
Adjust, DoubleClick, Google Tag Manager, Google Analytics) preferred
You have experience in executing incrementality testing with marketing platforms (FB, Twitter, Snapchat, Google) preferred
You have a passion for translating business objectives into actionable analyses and results into business and product recommendations
You are a highly motivated and flexible individual with the ability to lead cross-functional teams and drive projects to successful and timely delivery
You thrive in a dynamic environment and are able to execute with autonomy
","['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['big data', 'experimental design', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']",999.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'big data', 'experimental design', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"What Is The job?
You will be helping to build out a new team in this effort.
Since this is a new role, there is no team in place currently, so you will help to build it going forward.
You should be comfortable and excited about working with these external stakeholders.
What Skills Do You Need?
• You should have advanced experience with building Machine Learning models.
• Master's or Ph.D. in a quantitative or computational field.
• It's a ""plus"" if you have management experience or experience building a data science team.
Compensation
• $275,000 - $325,000 total compensation
• Medical, Dental, and Vision Coverage
• In-office gym, great culture, and amazing learning environment
What's In It For You?
This is a phenomenal opportunity for an experienced Data Scientist to join a great organization and make an impact immediately.
",[None],"['machine learning', 'data']",2.0,"['machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"Data Scientist
You will research, design, implement and validate cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes.
Candidate Requirements:
Posses a Ph.D. (strongly preferred) or Master's Degree in operations research, applied statistics, data mining, machine learning, physics or a related quantitative discipline.
Deep understanding of statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and recommendation and optimization algorithms.
Passionate about asking and answering questions in large datasets, and will be to communicate that passion to product managers and engineers.
Keen desire to solve business problems, and live to find patterns and insights within structured and unstructured data.
Expert in analyzing large, complex, multi-dimensional datasets with a variety of tools.
Experienced with BI tools.
Experience with relational databases as you are with Hadoop-based data mining frameworks.
Experience with SQL, Python, Java and C/C++.
Education:
Master's Degree or higher
","['sql', 'bi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'java']","['data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['sql', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'java', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"He/she will work closely across C100's programs and datasets to understand objectives and identify trends in various studies.
Responsibilities:
Responsible for researching, collecting, analyzing, storing and creating data related to C100’s programs and its dual missions
Responsible for overseeing data presented across surveys, studies in order to identify meaningful results
Lead and build data architecture processes and databases
Perform quantitative and qualitative data analysis
Audit data on a regular basis to ensure data integrity and quality
Must have experience working with software development teams and have strong communication skills including capability to explain complex technical topics
Must have experience with relevant data analysis software programs
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology or related field; PhD degree preferred
preferred
Good problem-solving and analytical skills, ability to resolve issues
Exceptional writing, proofreading and copy editing skills
Strong interpersonal and presentation skills
Attention to detail, and a propensity to approach problems from creative angles
Outstanding prioritization and project management skills
Powered by JazzHR
PR2XEtXlzi
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'information technology']",1.0,"['commun', 'data', 'information technology']"
DS,"Job title: Data Scientist / Statistician
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary:
Negotiable
Job published: 2019-08-05
Job ID: 41456
Responsibilities:
Serve as expert statistician/data scientist on discretionary investment team
Test research hypotheses and assumptions of portfolio manager and investment analysts by designing methodology and writing necessary code to perform backtesting, cross-validation, event studies, Bayesian data analysis, etc.
Test and identify the most predictive and robust statistical, machine learning, and deep learning methods to forecast factors, features, metrics, drivers, etc.
relevant to portfolio manager and investment analysts in making investment decisions
With guidance from and in collaboration with portfolio manager and investment analysts help select relevant data sets
Work closely with team’s data engineer/systems developer to help specify best sources, format, and delivery mechanism of data
Write efficient, modular, and dependable code, packages, libraries, and scripts
Ensure code is written so it is easily understood by teammates when reviewing
Document all work extensively and train teammates on use of work products (e.g., custom Python libraries or R packages)
Work closely with team’s data engineer/systems developer and portfolio manager to design research (e.g., backtesting software) and production (e.g., trade file creation) processes
Stay abreast of new research in statistics, machine learning, and deep learning
Requirements:
3+ years of working experience in a role that requires advanced statistical analysis
Be an expert in statistics (e.g., doctoral level) including time-series analysis
Have strong programming skills in SQL/NoSQL and at least one of the following Python, R, or C++
Good communication skills
Education:
Advanced degree in quantitative discipline (or 6+ years of full-time work experience using advanced statistical analysis)
If you would like to be considered for the position of Data Scientist / Statistician or wish to discuss the role further then please leave your details below.
","['nosql', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",2.0,"['nosql', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Collect and analyze various telemetry and behavioral data
Produce daily metrics and reports
Clean and prepare data for Machine Learning and A.I.
Assist with designing and running A/B tests
Automate frequently used reporting and data analysis workflows
Work closely with software engineers and architects to extract, transform and standardize data for optimal use for analytic tools
Qualifications
Bachelors in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related fields; Masters strongly preferred
2+ years' experience in a data science or data analysis role
2+ years of Java coding experience
2+ years mining and analyzing data sets to extract meaningful trends, producing meaningful and actionable reports
Experience using statistical programming languages, machine learning and other toolkits and techniques for analyzing large, complex datasets
Technical proficiency with transforming structured and unstructured data sets
Strong analytical skills, attention to detail and accuracy
Expert problem solving skills and creative thinking ability
Comprehensive Dental and Vision
Discretionary performance bonus
Flex Spending Account
Commuter Reimbursement Account
Matching 401K
Stock Incentive Plan
Vacation
Life Insurance
",['java'],"['data', 'account', 'clean', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['java', 'data', 'account', 'clean', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Here's how it works:
Upon acceptance into the marketplace, a recruiter will reach out and schedule brief 1 on 1 phone interview with you;
If you qualify, your profile will be featured and then listed in front of the best investment management firms seeking individuals like you;
Receive interview requests, field offers and get hired;
Space will be limited.
Requirements
Must have a Bachelors of Science in Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering, Physics, or related quantitative field with strong record of academic achievement
Experience using machine learning and specifically natural language processing to mine unstructured data, extracting information from documents such as electronic filings, contracts, news, patents etc.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
Professional experience with one or more of Java, Hibernate, Python, Scala, C/C++.
Experience with Numerical / Scientific Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas)
Knowledge of machine learning pipelines using Scala / Spark or Python / scikit-learn
Possess intellectual curiosity and a strong passion for investing and financial markets
Bonus Points:
Masters degree or higher in Computer Science or related quantitative field with specialization in natural language processing and/or machine learning
Over two years of work experience (outside of internships)
Experience with distributed computing architectures
Experience with tools for statistical computing (e.g.
R, NumPy, SciPy).
Experience with big data technologies like Apache Spark, Hadoop, Cassandra, etc.
Posted 06/17/2020
Full Time position
Compensation will be Market Rate
","['scala', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'c', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'decision tree', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'c', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'decision tree', 'data', 'nlp', 'nn', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The right candidate will be a problem solver who is obsessive about all things data, and is enthusiastic about working with cutting-edge techniques, technologies and applications.
You’ll solve complex marketing and business challenges – from cross-channel media and customer experience optimization, targeting and business strategy – by accessing, integrating, manipulating, mining, modeling a wide array of data sources.
Requirements:
Technical
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree preferably in Computer Science, Information Systems, Statistical Analysis or Economics
Familiarity with statistical analysis/modeling, data science and/or data design and development of actionable advanced analytical solutions that provide insights to decision makers
Hands-on experience mining data for decision focused insights
Ability to design complex systems and translate user requirements into business solutions
Background in predictive modeling and machine learning
2 years of experience with open source machine learning or statistical analysis tools
Experienced in at least one programming language (Java, Python, Scala, R)
Guru level experience with query tools and languages including SQL
Experience with NoSQL databases and related tools
Experience with Amazon AWS big data and machine learning technologies a plus (RedShift, Sagemaker, Comprehend etc.)
Non-technical
Strong communication skills – oral and written
Ability to guide and lead a data analytics team of 5 – collaborate with both technical and non-technical colleagues in product management and executive leadership groups
Ability to gauge the complexity of machine learning problems and a willingness to execute simple approaches for quick effective solutions as appropriate
Demonstrated self-starter who thrives in a fast paced environment
","['nosql', 'scala', 'aw', 'redshift', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['nosql', 'scala', 'aw', 'redshift', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"As a data scientist at TBWA\Chiat\Day New York, you will join a close-knit and innovative data science team that is pioneering the use of data as a core component of creative storytelling.
This is not just another data wrangling job.
As part of one of the world's leading creative agencies, the TBWA Data Team works closely with strategy across global clients and new business.
Every day is a little bit different and you will be challenged to evolve the role of data in the creative process.
The ideal candidate believes in the creativity of data.
Having a curious-minded approach to research, problem solving and supporting multiple client work streams will lead to success on this team and in this agency.
On a day to day level, the Data Scientist is responsible for collecting data from disparate sources, merging datasets, performing exploratory analyses, and extracting key insights.
Impact will be your goal.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Big picture thinking and attention to detail to solve problems/help teams make decisions/find insights
Perform extraction and interrogation of data sets from multiple platforms and perform hygiene and quality control steps.
Data sources will include: web analytic tools, media analytics, customer databases, social listening tools, search tools, syndicated data, research & survey tools, etc.
Derive key findings and observations from analyzing various data sources, and together with more senior analytics staff, communicate those findings orally or in writing, primarily to internal agency team.
Develop a picture of the customer leveraging data from 3rd party data sources.
Stay abreast of industry trends, best practices, and the evolving analytics landscape.
Put together slides with findings and insights that are communicated to cross functional teams.
REQUIREMENTS
3-5 years experience with programming languages such as R, Python, SQL, etc.
Advanced skills in Excel functions: Pivots, advanced formulas/macros, multi-spreadsheet links.
Competency in analytic techniques such as: time series data analysis, segmentation, univariate & multivariate statistical analysis, various metrics and key performance indicators, research & test design, significance testing, variance and growth calculations, forecasting, return on investment.
Working knowledge of data visualization tools, such as Shiny, Tableau or Power BI.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Preferred:
2-4 years of work experience in marketing analytics or related fields such as advertising, direct marketing, online marketing, loyalty marketing, using data to solve complex Marketing problems.
Basic knowledge of marketing/advertising/research principles.\
Alignment with TBWA\Chiat\Day Values
Key TBWA\Chiat\Day Attitudes
Curiosity: Be open-minded to ideas wherever they come; curious people are often unafraid of change;
Collaboration: Self-confidence without a big ego; work with all types of people;
","['power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['data', 'exploratori', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'data', 'exploratori', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"This is not just a machine learning job.
To be successful, you'll have to have a deep technical understanding of data science concepts across the disciplines of research methods, causal modeling, applied statistics and machine learning.
You'll also have the ability to build large-scale prototypes of your novel methodologies from the ground up.
The ideal Senior Data Scientist will also want to grow the impact that they have across the organization by taking on increasing responsibilities.
Responsibilities of the role:
Build supervised and unsupervised learning systems to extract visitation behavior from sensor data.
Collaborate with engineering teams on implementing and deploying large scale data processing pipelines
Build internal tools for monitoring and investigation purposes
Lead cross-team cooperation and mentor junior scientists
Qualifications
5+ years of work or educational experience in data science, machine learning, and statistics.
PhD degree or comparable research experience in a quantitative field
Proven track record of delivering on products and/or practical research endeavors
Experience with the Python science stack and/or Scala required
Experience with Hadoop, Spark, or similar frameworks is a plus
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
","['hadoop', 'scala', 'spark', 'python']","['data', 'supervis', 'research', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['hadoop', 'scala', 'spark', 'python', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"solution that saves companies money by providing complete up-to-date visibility, line-item level insights, anomaly detection, and the tools you need to action on them: approvals, payments, forecasting, benchmarking, and more.
ABOUT THIS ROLE (REMOTE APPLICANTS OK)
Data science code to clean and prepare the data extracted from invoices, including handling nulls, addressing exceptions, imputing data (when possible), and enriching data using third-party APIs
Data science code to validate the goodness of extractions performed by the ML models + human in the loop
Collaborate with vendors to perform OCR and text classification
at scale
Once the data has been mapped to the canonical taxonomy, perform feature engineering, generate insights, detect anomalies, and surface the intelligence in a digestible format to the end user
You will work closely with the data engineers to productionize the data science and machine learning code that is developed, and you will work closely with the engineering team to make sure the data science and machine learning pipelines are performant in production.
PERFECT FIT
You want to join an early-stage startup or you are extremely anxious to be challenged at your first startup
You are passionate about building / leading data science teams and rapidly developing data pipelines at various stages of growth
You pride yourself in communicating complex concepts, including the ability to distill intricate workflows and systems into clear processes and decisions with measurable company-wide impact
You ask “why” a lot and use critical thinking and data to back up your intuitions.
You hate when a customer struggles through your product experience
Qualifications
3+ years of experience in Python, Data Science, Machine Learning, and NLP
2+ years of experience with Spark, coding in either PySpark or Scala
Have built and deployed deep learning models using TensorFlow and/or PyTorch
Are well versed in NLP
Experience with Unsupervised Learning is a bonus
","['pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'tensorflow', 'python']","['deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'ocr', 'nlp', 'unsupervis', 'anomali', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'ocr', 'nlp', 'unsupervis', 'anomali', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Sightway’s unique platform building approach affords team members the opportunity to participate in each investment’s growth and success from an early stage.
Sightway Capital is building a world class data science team in order to execute on this vision.
You will take on the following responsibilities:
Design and implement models that explore, predict, and optimize a range of key business drivers such as lead generation, customer risk, revenue, pricing
Perform data exploration and visualization in order to uncover insights from data
Brainstorm hypotheses to solve business needs
Build models using a range of analytical techniques in order to prove or disprove hypotheses
Prepare and present findings to TSPI management, portfolio executive team
You should possess the following qualifications:
1-5+ years of experience in applied data analysis & prediction, preferably in an industry setting
Experience solving business problems using data science by directly interfacing with a client’s management team would be ideal
Degree in a technical or quantitative disciplines, like statistics, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, or computer science
Demonstrably strong data science modeling intuition and feature engineering creativity
Intimate familiarity with the potential flaws & fallacies in the applications of specific statistical methods
Experience specifying & managing requirements for datasets leveraged in your analyses
Working knowledge of SQL and common data science toolkits : Python, R, Spark, Matlab
Strong written & verbal communication and presentation skills, with experience crafting a compelling narrative supported by data
A portfolio of open-data analyses or data-driven research publications would be ideal
You will enjoy the following benefits:
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves
","['spark', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python']","['risk', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'risk', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"You would be welcomed to a friendly, inclusive environment where you can learn, and collaborate with some of the most talented people in the industry.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Identify and lead analytic experiments aligned with long-term strategic initiatives.
Design, develop, and deliver machine learning enabled solutions to address critical business or game questions.
Design and build validation tests to assess the efficiency of the model (or algorithm) in place and provide strategic insights to stakeholders.
Conduct proactive in-depth analysis and predictive modeling to uncover hidden opportunities.
Partner with data analysts, data engineers, data scientists, and stakeholders to better understand requirements, find bottlenecks, and implement resolutions.
Collaborate with the Analytics Tech lead to establish best practices for repeated application.
Help mentor and develop the skillsets of the junior team members within your team or department.
Work within a team of data analysts and engineers.
REQUIRED
7+ years in data science or similar role in the marketing, finance, forensics or technology fields required.
Extensive knowledge of machine learning techniques such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Data Mining, Clustering, and Classification.
Experience in pushing models to production and iterating on models in production.
Proficiency in statistics such as distributions, predictive modeling, data validation, statistical testing, and regression.
5+ years of experience in machine learning / statistical languages and systems such as Python, Matlab, R.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field, with a strong quantitative background.
Ability to develop and maintain good relations and communicate with people at all hierarchical levels.
Strong problem-solving skills.
Ability to reconcile technical and business perspectives.
Autonomy and entrepreneurship.
Strong team spirit.
PLUSES
4+ years using SQL (or a SQL-like language) required, other programming experience highly preferred.
Experience with Hadoop and pySpark an asset.
Graduate degree (MBA, MSc or Master's, PHD), an asset.
Game industry experience strongly desired.
","['hadoop', 'sql', 'matlab', 'python']","['regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'bay', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'predict', 'nn', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'sql', 'matlab', 'python', 'regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'bay', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'predict', 'nn', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Hi,
Greetings of the Day!!!
Looking for Data Scientist for below requirement.
Job Title: Data Scientist with SQL, Python, R, Tableau.
Duration: 12 Months Plus
Interview Mode: F2F Mandatory.
Experience requirements
5+ years as a data scientist leading efforts to identify relevant questions, collect data from a multitude of different data sources, organize the information, translate results into solutions, and communicate findings in a way that positively affects decisions
5+ years working with SQL, Python, R, Tableau and other data science programing languages and tools
Strong quantitative and problem-solving skills
Experience and passion for data wrangling, data cleaning, and ETL
Experience working with administrative data sets
Experience with statistical modelling and machine leaning analysis
Experience with Bayesian analysis
Proficiency in GIS concepts and software (ArcGIS, Google Maps, QGIS, Carto)
Attention to detail for documenting work processes and writing clear instructions for technical tasks
Ability to distill complex material into actionable recommendations
Excellent written and oral communication skills
JOB Duties
Â Develop SQL and Python queries to analyze the completeness and quality of key data elements in StreetSmart, including demographics, caseload history, mental illness diagnoses, and substance abuse details
Â Develop and monitor a data cleaning prioritization plan, working with a data analyst dedicated to data cleaning
Â Manipulate and analyze administrative data in order to predict outcomes and make data-driven recommendations
Â Collaborate with team members to develop novel strategies for technical analysis
Â Evaluate ethical implications of design choices for predictive analytics models and automated decision support systems
Â Create and present compelling reports to stakeholders based upon project findings and methods
Â
If interested, kindly do share profiles to madhavi(at)impetususa(dot)com
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['etl', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend', 'gi']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'etl', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend', 'gi']"
DS,"***
You will collaborate with a team of engineers, designers, product managers, social workers, psychologists, and scientists.
Work with product and engineering teams to improve user acquisition, patient adherence, and clinical outcomes
Develop data infrastructure to ingest and integrate multiple data sources, ETL, validate, and create automated reports for clients
Design and build data deliverables across multiple contexts, such as: claims analyses/financial ROI, longitudinal treatment outcomes, provider quality, and risk stratification algorithms
BA/BS in Psychology, Economics, Biology, Biochemistry, or other STEM-related field.
Fluency in R
Strong presentation skills — fluently tell a compelling clinical or business story with data
Strong written communication skills — quickly compose client-facing communications or publications for peer-review
Experience with Git, Python, SQL, parallel/distributed computing, cloud computing, and other data science toolkits
Experience or knowledge of traditional statistics, e.g.
measures of central tendency, descriptive statistics, and inferential statistics
Possess the initiative and ability to self-direct projects and solve unconventional problems
STEM PhD— especially in Applied Sciences (e.g.
Biostatistics, Psychiatry, Psychology, Biological Sciences), or 3-4 years of equivalent data analysis experience
Experience using any of the following data: EMR, clinical trials, claims data, longitudinal
Demonstrated passion for, and understanding of, mental illness and broader U.S. healthcare system
Experience programming and testing statistical/machine learning models
Experience using data visualization techniques to present key findings
Ability to quickly and independently pick up concepts and skills
Experience working cross-functionally with operations, product, engineering, and design teams
You’ll be the first human to discover something about how to treat mental illness.
Great people: make an impact on something that truly helps people alongside an incredible team.
If you're interested in the role, please submit your CV/Resume via email to careers@springhealth.com, along with one code sample and one writing sample.
The code samples can be in any language, and the writing sample should either be 250 words, or include a 250 word abstract.
","['git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['risk', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'risk', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture?
More About the Role:
Prototype and ship large-scale models that help drive profit or order volume
Conduct A/B experiments to validate the effectiveness of these models
Work closely with financial stakeholders to construct models that drive business goals
Leverage big data tools to incorporate new data sources into modeling pipelines
Work closely with data scientists and backend engineers to implement and maintain your changes
MS with 5+ years of relevant industry experience or PhD in computer science, engineering, statistics, machine learning, mathematics, or in another quantitative field
Experience shipping changes to a production environment
Comfortable with using git, basic Linux commands, and object-oriented programming languages (Scala, Java, Python)
Experience performing analysis with large-scale SQL tooling (Presto, BigQuery, etc.)
Familiarity with basic AWS tools like EC2 and S3
Superior communication and data presentation skills
Effective working in a fast-paced team environment
Preferred Qualifications
Demonstrated ability to work on cross-functional teams
Experience making high-impact decisions (multiple millions of dollars)
Flexible PTO.
Health and Wellness.
Learning and Career Growth.
MealPerks.
Who’s ready for some lunch?
Fun.
Social Impact.
The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster.
Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
","['linux', 'scala', 'ec2', 'aw', 'bigqueri', 'git', 'sql', 's3', 'python', 'java']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['linux', 'scala', 'ec2', 'aw', 'bigqueri', 'git', 'sql', 's3', 'python', 'java', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Client JD below:
You then go through a few rounds of interviews for the project
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
DS,"Business/Team Introduction
Data Scientist Responsibilities
In a typical day, you will work closely with talented machine learning scientists, statisticians, software engineers, and business groups.
Your work will include cutting edge technologies that enable implementation of sophisticated models on big data.
Your analytical abilities, business understanding, and technical savvy will be used to identify specific and actionable opportunities to solve existing business problems in Demand Forecasting, through collaboration with engineering, research, and business teams.
Your expertise in synthesizing and communicating insights and recommendations to audiences of varying levels of technical sophistication will enable you to answer specific business questions and innovate for the future.
Major responsibilities include:
· Translating Demand Forecasting business questions and concerns into specific analytical questions that can be answered with available data using statistical and machine learning methods; working with engineers to produce the required data when it is not available
· Presenting critical data in a format that is immediately useful to answer questions about the inputs and outputs of Demand Forecasting systems and improving their performance
· Improving upon existing Demand Forecasting statistical or machine learning methodologies by developing new data sources, testing model enhancements, running computational experiments, and fine-tuning model parameters for new forecasting models
· Supporting decision making by providing requirements to develop analytic capabilities, platforms, pipelines and metrics then using them to analyze trends and find root causes of forecast inaccuracy
· Formalizing assumptions about how demand forecasts are expected to behave, creating definitions of outliers, developing methods to systematically identify these outliers, and explaining why they are reasonable or identifying fixes for them
· Utilizing code (Python, R, Scala, SQL etc.)
for analyzing data and building statistical and machine learning models and algorithms
Amazon.com is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer Minority / Female / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, Computer Science, or Economics
· 2+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, statistical modeling, and communication
· 2+ years of experience with data querying languages (e.g.
SQL, Hadoop/Hive, Scala) and statistical/mathematical software (e.g.
R, Matlab, Stata)
Preferred Qualifications
· Experience processing, filtering, and presenting large quantities (Millions to Billions of rows) of data
· Superior verbal and written communication skills with the ability to effectively advocate technical solutions to scientists, engineering teams and business audiences
· Proven ability to convey rigorous technical concepts and considerations to non-experts
· Natural curiosity and desire to learn
· Fluency in a scripting or computing language (e.g.
Python, Scala, C++, Java, etc.)
· Depth and breadth in quantitative knowledge.
Excellent quantitative modeling, statistical analysis skills and problem-solving skills.
Sophisticated user of statistical tools.
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
· Experience in forecasting and time series is a plus
","['scala', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'outlier', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['scala', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'outlier', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The Opportunity
He/she will also work closely with Arenas Engineering and Product teams to ensure the successful implementation and refinement of such methods.
Mission and culture
This is just the beginning of a revolution in how employers use data to make better HR decisions and how individuals are able to find fulfilling work beyond the bounds of bias.
Contribution to the open source community.
Small feedback loops are critical to developing product and technology.
Ownership gives individuals the agency to grow and aligns outcomes.
Responsibilities
Develop innovative solutions to business, product or technical requests using appropriate Data Science techniques
Prototype solutions using appropriate machine learning or statistical models and techniques; assist the engineering team in implementing such solutions
Review existing processes, approaches, and models related to data science; propose and initiate solutions and/or improvements
Disseminate knowledge and techniques; solidify best practices by contributing to internal tools or libraries; mentor junior data scientists
Requirements
3+ years practical experience in industry product as a Data Scientist in a production environment
Excellent Python (numpy, pandas, scikit-learn, etc.)
or R programming skills, familiar with open source libraries and tools for data science
Track record of speedily and rigorously developing and deploying machine learning models to resolve industry problems
Strong SQL skills
Superior communication and data visualization skills
Experience working in an agile development environment
Bonus Skills
Masters or PhD in a quantitative field (such as computer science, statistics, a quantitative social, biological, or physical science) is preferred but not required
Experience with Natural Language Processing, deep learning, experimental design and A/B testing, recommender systems or other deployed data products
Experience working in software development
Experience with sophisticated statistical or econometrical models
Perks
The mission, the people and the work.
The mission: work on a project that is making the world a better place.
The work: pragmatically use amazing technology.
Competitive salary, benefits and equity.
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'natural language processing', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'nlp', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"Consultant, Data Science (GenPact/Morgan Stanley)
Function: Analytics, Data Engineering
New York, NY
Inviting applications for the role of Data Scientist (with Machine Learning and Python)
In this role, you will be responsible for analyzing data and developing predictive models for various use-cases within Equity Risk and MSIM.
You Must have strong experience employing different data mining / data analysis methods, data engineering/transformation using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models.
You should have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights.
The ideal candidate is adept at discovering and using wide variety of data-sets together.
It is critical that you are comfortable understanding the business domain and interpreting / explaining the findings of models as it applies to the business problem for people outside data-science domain.
Responsibilities
Work with partners, finding opportunities for demonstrating data to seek for business challenges.
Identify valuable data sources / data sets that can be used to improve results.
Analyze data to interpret against business opportunity and Client trends and patterns.
Process, cleanse, and verify the integrity of structured / unstructured data used for analysis.
Research and implement custom statistical models and machine learning algorithms.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to evolve an idea into successful solution.
Coordinate with engineering and software development team to integrate model into continuous business / process /software cycle.
Present information using data visualization techniques.
Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders / decision makers.
Qualifications
Minimum qualifications
Masters Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or relevant field
7+ years' practical experience as a Data Scientist with proven track record
Strong math skills (e.g.
Statistics, algebra, multi-variable calculus)
Expertise with R, SQL and Python
Extensive background in data mining and statistical analysis
Deep understanding of real-life applicability and limitations of machine-learning algorithms
Problem-solving aptitude
Analytical mind and business acumen
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Preferred qualifications
• Experience with B2B, Financial Industry, Asset Management, Financial Market Data, Sales & Marketing is helpful.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of sophisticated statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and accurate usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/ Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Expertise querying Relational / No-SQL databases and using statistical programming languages like R, Python, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Hadoop, Hive, Spark, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for partners using: Business Objects, Tableau, D3.js, ggplot, etc.
Experience with data-science tools: Dataiku, Jupyter, etc.
Knowledge of opensource, 3rd party, cloud based data science / NLP / machine learning platforms (e.g.
AWS or Azure offerings)
","['spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'cloud']","['analyz', 'boost', 'predict', 'statist', 'risk', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'glm', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'cloud', 'analyz', 'boost', 'predict', 'statist', 'risk', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'glm', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Use statistical analysis, machine learning, pattern recognition, and data visualization along with domain knowledge and subject-specific models to solve science, engineering, and commercial problems
Solve challenging data science problems by developing novel and/or adapting existing computational methods
Debugging and performance tweaking in Python
Taking ownership over parts of an application and collaborating on global issues Understand and enjoy working in a micro services based architecture
Hands-on experience in PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, RESTFul,GIT, API, JSON, Statistical Analysis, Machine Learning, Pattern Recognition,
Knowledge in Data Visualization, Numpy, Pandas, Scipy, Matplotlib, Soup, Scrapy, Teradata,NoSQL, Redis, Elastic Search, Mongo, Django, Flask, Pyramid, SVN, Mercurial,Linear Algebra and Optimization
Knowledge in Hypothesis Testing, Monte Carlo Simulation, Clustering
","['postgresql', 'nosql', 'git', 'sql', 'django', 'scipi', 'panda', 'flask', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'numpi', 'oracl']","['hypothesi', 'data', 'cluster', 'optim', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['postgresql', 'nosql', 'git', 'sql', 'django', 'scipi', 'panda', 'flask', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'numpi', 'oracl', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'cluster', 'optim', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The role should have a solid understanding of how to analyze sport data and build predictive models.
Key skills include: familiarity with statistical programs such as R or python.
More details to be provided during interview.
Experience having built a predictive sports model previously is highly recommended.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $2,000.00 - $4,000.00 per month
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",['r'],"['statist', 'recommend', 'predict', 'data']",999.0,"['r', 'statist', 'recommend', 'predict', 'data']"
DS,"Do you love numbers and finding the story in the numbers?
Does the thought of tackling a complex data issue make you smile?
Have you got a knack for solving problems?
Do you want to help drive the results of a multi-million dollar business?
The person in this role would be responsible for conducting data analysis and developing predictive models by leveraging data science and machine learning to solve various business use cases, including marketing intelligence, customer segmentation, and predictive models for operations.
Candidates must have strong experience in a variety of data manipulation tools, data analysis/ mining methods to build and implement models and should be able to develop algorithms and simulation methods.
A successful candidate will have the proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights.
Research and develop statistical and machine learning methodologies to solve complicated business problems
Work with stakeholders to identify opportunities by leveraging large data sets to drive business decisions.
Collaborate with sales, marketing and senior executive teams for model development
Strong communication skills and ability to clearly present ideas and technical findings to key decision makers
Knowledge of statistical and machine learning techniques in regressions and classifications such as generalized linear models, classification trees, Random Forest, XGBoost, SVMs etc.
Industry experience in such areas a definite plus.
Knowledge of stochastic process in terms of transaction matrix and equilibrium distribution, etc.
Experience in R, Python, and SQL, etc.
and in variable selection and dimension reduction skills such as LASSO and PCA
Unsupervised learning experience such as k-means, hierarchical clustering, Bayesian network etc.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
Graduate degree in Statistics, Data Science, Applied Math, Operations Research, Computer Science or other areas in STEM.
Exceptional candidates with undergraduate degree will be also be seriously considered.
Additional honors include being named, two times, as one of the 50 fastest growing companies in New York City and to the prestigious Inc. 500 list as one of the 500 fastest growing companies in the United States.
Please mark @talent.icims.com as a safe sender to ensure recruiter emails don't go to spam
","['xgboost', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'pca', 'random forest', 'predict', 'bayesian', 'research', 'math', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['xgboost', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'pca', 'random forest', 'predict', 'bayesian', 'research', 'math', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"Are you a data scientist who dreams of building scalable solutions and innovations that enhances and enriches millions of customers lives every day?
If so, this may be a great fit for you!
As a data scientist, you will be responsible for making experimentation methods recommendations by researching state-of-art methods, examining and tuning the current methods with simulations.
You will be working on projects through their entire lifecycle from idea creation through implementation, experimentation and finally, deployment.
You will be working with other data scientists, ML experts, engineers as well as product teams locally and abroad, and on cross-disciplinary efforts with other scientists within Amazon.
",[None],"['recommend', 'data']",999.0,"['recommend', 'data']"
DS,"This is an exciting opportunity to join a thriving, well-funded startup with big ambitions.
In addition to doing ground breaking work, this role will be pivotal in establishing a culture of openness, positive communication, and continuous learning.
Are you that person?
Let's talk.
Responsibilities:
Identify and integrate new datasets, working closely with the engineering team to strategize and execute the development of data products.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to help solve various problems and make a true impact across various domains and industries.
Communicate analytic solutions and implement improvements as needed to operational systems.
Other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or related discipline
3 to 6 years of practical experience in data science (compensation scales accordingly)
Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience
Experience with data visualization, analytics platforms and basic programming languages (i.e., Java/Python, SAS)
Comfort working in a dynamic, research-oriented group with several ongoing concurrent projects
","['java', 'sa', 'python']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['java', 'sa', 'python', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Music for everyone, no credit card needed.
Want to help shape the future of free?
Here’s how.
-Revolutionizing the way that podcasts are monetized
-Providing self serve tools and interfaces for advertisers and operators to get their message out
-Optimizing and personalizing how ads and messages are served, to reach the right user with the right message at the right time
-And more!
What you'll do
Perform and present analyses on large sets of data to extract actionable insights that will help drive product decisions
Design and conduct A/B tests to drive iterative improvement to both user and advertiser metrics through efficient experimentation
Impact product strategy by leading foundational research & experimentation initiatives to develop a deeper understanding of how product, platforms & promotions influence user behavior
Build lasting solutions to surface critical data and performance metrics through visualizations and dashboardsMentor and coach other data scientists
Who you are
You know how to understand and solve loosely defined problems and come up with relevant answers and actionable insights to guide product development decisions
You have a deep understanding of numbers, as well as a strong business senseYou have relevant experience, with a degree in economics, psychology, computer science, statistics, or mathematics or another quantitative discipline
You have the technical competence to perform advanced analytics: coding skills (such as Python, Java, or Scala), experience with analytics & visualization tools (Pandas, R, SPSS, SQL, Hadoop, Tableau), and experience performing analysis with large datasets
You possess statistical competence (such as regression modeling, A/B testing, significance testing etc)
Have demonstrated experience with hands-on statistical modeling and possess knowledge about machine learning (such as predictive modeling, decision trees, classification models, and especially clustering techniques)
Worked in an analytics role within an advertising function
","['scala', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'java']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'java', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"That’s where you come in.
Nerding out is also highly encouraged.
Responsibilities
Develop, evaluate, deliver, and maintain superb content on the cutting-edge of technology for training experiences relevant to audiences with a diverse set of backgrounds.
Participate in planned tailoring of teaching content for both corporate and client audiences.
Provide feedback to product and content development teams.
Stand as an instructional mentor for students of all levels.
About You
Proficiency in statistical computing and/or programming in R and/or Python.
Taught undergraduate or graduate level coursework in STEM, required.
Demonstrated knowledge of Statistics and Machine Learning from both a theoretical and applied perspective.
Experience in developing a curriculum or providing training in a client-facing endeavor.
Perks
Competitive salary, adjustable hours, and flexible vacation policy.
Completely stocked snack pantry.
High-quality computational equipment.
","['r', 'python']","['statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['r', 'python', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
Primary responsibilities include:
Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Participate in the development of documentation.
This role conducts experimentation in various data science techniques, developing, executing, and maintaining scripts and prototypes to analyze, interpret, visualize, and gain knowledge from numerous data sets individually or in combination to meet mission needs.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Experience using the statistical computer language Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
#CJ
","['jira', 'python']","['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['jira', 'python', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Duties Provides advanced professional input to complex Data Science assignmentsprojects.
Responsible for the research, extraction and analysis of data.
Evaluates and writes reports.
May research and analyze algorithms.
Provides statistical data trends to business partners such as medical management and underwriting.
Combines IT capabilities with advanced clinical knowledge to determine trends, costbenefit ratios, and forecasting of health care costs, medical management, and health economics.
Supports and provides direction to more junior professionals.
Works autonomously, only requiring expert level technical support from others.
Exercises judgment in the evaluation, selection, and adaptation of both standard and complex techniques and procedures.
Utilizes in-depth professional knowledge and acumen to develop models and procedures, and monitor trends, within Data Science
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'econom']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Members of the Studio team will be focused on driving impact and creating real value for clients and internal users.
As a Data Scientist, you will be:
Providing essential insight and leverage on business problems through a data science lens
Acting as a leader in data-related problem solving discussions, workshops and cross-functional co-creation sessions
The go-to person for answering complex analytic questions related to large data sets in the spirit of helping clients shape solutions and services more effectively
Responsibilities
As a Data Scientist, you will be expected to:
Work within integrated client and project teams to provide essential insight and leverage on business problems through a data science lens
Understand, communicate, and manage the end-to-end lifecycle of analytics on a given project
Balance deep involvement in technical solution development with execution, communication and delivery of the client project
Support project teams through an understanding of which quantitative problems are the most valuable in a certain industry and a direction on which features and model structures are best suited to solving them
Embark on exploratory data analysis projects to grow toolkit and content, as well as to discover untapped areas of growth and optimization
Skills & Requirements
As a Data Scientist, you will be expected to:
Work well in interdisciplinary teams
- Co-create with other Engineers, Designers, business experts, clients, and end-users, working in a fully integrated (vs. siloe-ed) manner
- Have extensive experience working with Software Developers and Engineers
Demonstrate strong communication skills, i.e.,
- Demonstrate effective written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills
- Communicate the solution, its parameters, its assumptions and its inner workings to audiences who vary widely in their levels of technical fluency and seniority
Be a self-starter who takes initiative
- Able to work under very little supervision and guidance, to achieve team goals and complete assignments within established time frames
- Be flexible and willing to learn adapt quickly to new problems and fluid project circumstances
- Contribute to problem solving within a flat team structure; roll-up your sleeves to contribute to all aspects of the solution
Demonstrate technical background in computer science, data science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, statistics or other quantitative and computational science:
- Demonstrate professional experience building and delivering data science and statistics based solutions, with an emphasis on creating measurable results and lasting impact, i.e.,
- Demonstrate experience managing the process of building a model, incorporating features, tuning performance, and deploying into production, often working under tight time constraints
- Leverage an engineering mindset and show a willingness to make rapid, pragmatic decisions to improve performance, accelerate progress or magnify impact; recognizing that the good is not the enemy of the perfect
- Demonstrate solid and battle-tested understanding of the standard canon of machine learning practices, including but not limited to:
- Linear and logistic regression
- Decision tree classification and regression
- Neural networks
- Dimensionality reduction
- Clustering
- Bagging, boosting, and other non-parametric methods
- Demonstrate expertise working with and maintaining open source data analysis platforms, including but not limited to:
- Pandas, Scikit-Learn, Matplotlib, TensorFlow, Jupyter and other Python data tools
- Spark, HDFS, Kafka and other high volume data tools
- SQL and NoSQL storage tools, such as MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, MongoDB and ElasticSearch
Have minimum 3-5 years of relevant experience
","['nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'matplotlib', 'mongodb', 'python', 'elasticsearch', 'scikit', 'postgr']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'neural network', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'matplotlib', 'mongodb', 'python', 'elasticsearch', 'scikit', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nn', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Machine Learning Researcher / Data Scientist
All types of learning and AI, including deep learning and statistical learning, are potentially relevant.
You’ll work with smart, talented people across their business to create groundbreaking, next-generation data intensive machine learning applications.
You’ll be involved, hands-on, through the entire cycle.
They will expect you to be agile / to lead / to think outside the box.
Principal Responsibilities:
The team is tasked with building next generation of advanced statistical and machine learning methods to produce models and prescriptive data that result in better decisions by their Portfolio Managers, Analysts, and Traders, Quants and / or applications.
Specific responsibilities include designing, implementing, testing experimentally and scaling up new models for forecasting asset prices, developing new tradeable signals, and other financial applications.
The ideal candidate would have a background and a deep passion for working with machine learning techniques within the investment community.
Strong computer science and technical background with exceptionally, creative “Hands-On” High Impact Machine Learning Research and Applications experience - All types of learning and AI, including deep learning and statistical learning, are potentially relevant.
Experience and a high level of interest in financial markets (with prior experience a big plus) – candidates from both industry and academia with broad experience across multiple fields of Machine Learning is a plus.
Ability to work in an open collaborative and highly charged investment environment.
Strong desire to contribute and build a business – not just solve novel problems.
Ability to work with a wide range of users – traders, portfolio managers, research analysts, quants and the wider investment management team to develop and implement technology in support of a dynamically growing investment platform
An individual who loves solving deep and complex technical and business problems and wants to have an outsized impact with the services/ products they deliver.
An individual with a passion for machine learning , high level of intellectual curiosity, a commitment to excellence and an unparalleled drive to deliver world-class services.
About the Client:
They have a relentlessly focuses on innovation and integration: innovation in new products, markets and businesses as well as new tools, models and technology management and performance structures; integration of fundamental research, quantitative strategies and technical analysis, all supported by an intensive focus on operational excellence and comprehensive risk management.
The talent and dedication of their people is critical to their success.
They offer an opportunity for developing one’s professional career while working with individuals trained in a variety of disciplines in a collegial and dynamic environment.
They offer a broad range of competitive benefits on a global basis.
The management team needs individuals of the highest professional caliber who are leaders, problem solvers, analytic, detail-oriented, and entrepreneurial.
Successful candidates are:
Analytic and relentless in pursuit of the right answer
Strong communicators who excel at rapid synthesis
Able to demonstrate sound business judgment
Able to digest complexity while maintaining an understanding of the “big picture” of business needs
Team players who are energized by a collaborative enterprise
They believe that these standards are the foundation for superior investment performance and are critical to delivering performance to clients
",['excel'],"['risk', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist
Duration: Long (Contract)
Rate: $60/hr.
Client: DXC
Â
Looking for Data Scientist resource - Who has Sound knowledge in the product support and implementation
Â
Technical Skills:
5+ years of hands-on experience as a Data Scientist with â
â Undertaking data collection, preprocessing and analysis
â Building models to address business problems
â Presenting information using data visualization techniques
â Experience in data mining, business intelligence tools, data frameworks
â Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
â Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with languages such Scala, Java or C++ would be an advantage
","['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data mining', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data mining', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Position: Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer
Sizzle: Without a doubt you will have the opportunity to collaborate with top engineers in the AI and Machine Learning space; work in ""google esq "" environment and get compensated with a strong base salary, bonus, stock options, UNLIMITED time off, ability to work remote and great benefits
Unlike traditional workflow automation tools RPA systems develop the action list by watching the user perform that task in the applications graphical user interface (GUI), and then perform the automation by repeating those tasks directly in the GUI.
This can lower the barrier to use of automation in products that might not otherwise feature APIs for this purpose.
RPA tools have strong technical similarities to graphical user interface testing tools.
These tools also automate interactions with the GUI, and often do so by repeating a set of demonstration actions performed by a user.
RPA tools differ from such systems including features that allow data to be handled in and between multiple applications, for instance, receiving email containing an invoice, extracting the data, and then typing that into a bookkeeping system
The Role:
The need is for multiple Data Scientists who also are versed in Machine Learning.
You will interface extensively with Client, other software engineers, stakeholders and business sponsors while building and enhancing customized Client models put into production.
The day to day can include the following as well:
Design, develop and create machine learning models to deliver use case requirements.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Communicate the analytic solution to stakeholders and provide improvements to client's operational systems.
This position requires expertise in acquiring, processing, analyzing and modeling of information from massive amounts of structured and unstructured data.
A track record of data-driven implementation and strong experimental design cannot be overemphasized.
What You'll Need for Success:
1-3 years of experience using machine learning in an applied setting.
Bachelor's or Master's in a related field such as CS, Machine Learning, Statistics, Physics
Excellent programming skills in Java and Python
","['excel', 'java', 'python']","['experimental design', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['excel', 'java', 'python', 'experimental design', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Responsibilities
Work with experienced team members on modeling and data science engagements from understanding the business objective and evaluating the model's business impact, through data sourcing and analysis, to model development and implementation
Develop a relationship with business stakeholders and be proactive about changes in model performance, customer behavior, and the competitive landscape
Qualifications:
M.S.
degree in Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Operations Research, or Economics
Hands-on experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence
Expertise in at least one of the following: Python, R
PreferredQualifications:
PhD in a quantitative discipline
1+ years of relevant experience in consumer finance, wealth management, or a major retailer
Hands-on experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence applied to large datasets
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Learn and work on meaningful initiatives with some of the best and brightest in the market research industry.
This position exists within the Methodology team, a core function in Research Science that is responsible for building models and code that help achieve quality outcomes.
Also helpful is experience triangulating estimates from disparate data sources with different sample frames, levels of measurement, and frequency of collection.
The ideal candidate will be an experienced statistical programmer using R who also has experience working with survey and sales data, refining and developing methodological improvements, and familiarity with or willingness to learn Agile or Lean approaches to developing new product improvements.
Provide peer mentoring of other team members via code reviews, pair programming, unit test/acceptance test reviews, and brainstorming sessions.
Adopt and continue to improve usage of development practices and patterns, such as test-driven development, version control, and use of agile management tools.
Conduct original research-on-research (e.g., through simulations and/or evaluations of historical data) to improve methodologies, processes, and data integrity for both survey and scanner (point-of-sale) data.
Graduate-level experience preferred.
6+ years of work experience, with solid breadth and depth of knowledge of statistical and analytic techniques.
Excellent time management and creative problem solving skills.
Experience with data analysis in R is required.
Experience with additional languages and/or more extensive proficiency in R preferred.
Excellent written and oral communication skills, with the ability to communicate effectively to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Experience with one or more development methodologies (Agile, Lean, Scrum) is preferred.
Experience with tools for managing software development is preferred (tools such as JIRA, Confluence, Github/Gitlab issue tracker, Trello, Team Foundation Server/DevOps Server, etc).
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.
","['r', 'github', 'jira', 'excel']","['data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'github', 'jira', 'excel', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"• http://www.fujitsu.com/global/about/corporate/info/
• http://www.fujitsu.com/global/digitalannealer/
• http://www.fujitsu.com/global/solutions/business-technology/ai/
The Data, Analytics and AI consultant will be responsible for identifying, developing and delivering customer engagements in the fields of Data, Analytics, and AI across multiple industries.
Typical responsibilities will be pre-sales and delivery of strategy, design and implementation consulting services in the areas of Data, Analytics and AI.
The day-to-day work include preparing pre-sale collateral, conducting strategy workshops, creating demos, architecting new solutions, and leading the design and implementation of Data, Analytics and AI solutions and products for clients across multiple industries.
Key Accountabilities:
• Cross-industry consulting in the areas of Data, Analytics, AI, and Cloud solutions
• Traveling to client sites and sales prospects as required, up to 30>
• Leading the development of processes for ingestion and processing multi-sourced structured and un-structured data in rest and in motion, on premises and on the cloud using SQL, Kafka, Scoop, Flume, HDFS, Hive, HBase, Impala, Spark, Python, and other evolving tools and technologies
• Developing and validating business stakeholders' conceptual data models (including socializing and implementing logical and physical data warehouses, data marts, cloud and unstructured data storage), integrating new and existing data sources and metadata (including business rules, definitions, attributes, etc.)
to deliver analytics requirements
• Implementing Master Data Management solutions
• Building data storage solutions on premises and on the cloud – data warehouses, data marts, noSQL databases, Hive and Impala schemas
• Building data workflows, monitoring and managing jobs and resources
• Scripting in Unix / Linux shells and Microsoft Azure PowerShell
• Working with evolving data, analytics, and AI technologies like Hadoop and Spark
• Working with evolving Microsoft Azure and Amazon Web Services (AWS) cloud technologies
• Delivering solutions to customers quickly (including Proof of Concepts / Proof of Value)
• Working in collaborative and agile team environment with changing and ambiguous requirements
• Handling a variety of responsibilities under pressure and functioning independently
• Communicating with confidence and integrity with clients and peers
• Conveying complex technical concepts to business users
• Rapidly learning and implementing new technologies and tools
• Identifying, developing and evolving repeatable data solutions aligned to market/customer needs
• Ensuring customer satisfaction and reference ability
Required Skills and Experience:
• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, AI, Operations Research, Data Science, Engineering, or related fields
• Minimum 5 years of professional Data, Analytics, and AI experience
• Minimum 5 years of proven experience working with structured and unstructured data technologies to ingest, process, model, visualize and report on structured and un-structured data in rest and in motion using Hadoop, Kafka, Spark, Microsoft Azure and/or Amazon Web Services (AWS)
• Must have experience in creating and delivering pre-sale and delivery presentations and leading client facing communications
• Preferred experience in Operations Research and Artificial Intelligence (AI) end to end projects
Desired skills
• Advanced degree(s) in Computer Science, Mathematics, Operations Research, Data Science, Engineering, or related fields
• At least 3 years of experience in Python coding
• At least 1 year of experience in Spark (Scala and Java) coding
• Minimum 3 years of experience in Hive, HBase, Impala coding
• Minimum 3 years of experience in UNIX / Linux shell scripting
• Some experience with Microsoft Azure and / or AWS
• At least 5 years of experience in SQL coding
• Operations Research hands on experience
• Artificial Intelligence hands on experience
","['unix', 'kafka', 'linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'microsoft', 'hbase', 'sql', 'amazon web services', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'java']","['data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['unix', 'kafka', 'linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'microsoft', 'hbase', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'java', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
DS,"The Data Scientist will be part of the Enterprise BI team at , Inc.
This individual will manage one or more analysts and focus on customer-level advanced analytics for the direct-to-consumer and business-to-business channels.
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
As a hands-on analytics leader, deliver actionable insights while prioritizing and managing the workload of junior analysts
Collaborate with business owners and propose appropriate analytics solutions to address critical business questions
Create Tableau dashboards to empower business owners
Develop advanced analytics solutions to address some open business questions, e.g.,
Multi-Brand Customer Segmentation
Next Best Offer/ Next Best Brand
Channel Attribution
Customer Retention
Requirements
Key Competencies:
Strong analytical mind, problem-solving skills and foundation in Statistics
Ability to collaborate well with individuals on-site and in remote offices
Intermediate to advanced level of expertise using SAS, SQL, Tableau, Python
Outstanding analytical skill set: a clear expert in the Analytics/ Data Science field
Experience working with large volumes of data, combining and reconciling data from different sources
Experience in MS Office applications with very strong Excel skills
Requirements:
Minimum B.S.
in Mathematics, Statistics, Data Analytics or related quant field
5+ years in a similar analytical role generating insights through data analytics
Strong communication skills: both written and verbal
Ability to work independently on multiple concurrent assignments
Self-driven for continual learning and ongoing training/development
Highly organized, detail-oriented
, Inc. is a leading provider of gifts for all celebratory occasions.
For the past 40 years, has been helping deliver smiles to customers with a 100% Smile Guarantee backing every gift.
The , Inc. family of brands also includes everyday gifting and entertaining products from Harry & David, The Popcorn Factory, Cheryl's Cookies, , Wolferman's, Moose Munch premium popcorn, Personalization Universe, Simply ChocolateSM, and SM.
Loyalty programs, such as Celebrations Passport, Celebrations Rewards and Celebrations Reminders are designed to deepen relationships with customers across all brands.
, Inc. was named to the Stores 2017 Hot 100 Retailers List by the National Retail Federation and also received the Gold award in the Best Artificial Intelligence category at the Data & Marketing Association's 2017 International ECHO Awards.
Shares in , Inc. are traded on the NASDAQ Global Select Market, ticker symbol: FLWS.
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python', 'sa']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'python', 'sa', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist, Real World Evidence
What you will do
Data Insights is a diverse and talented team with strong expertise in discovering, prototyping and launching new data products.
You will be tasked with curating high quality clinical research variables from structured and unstructured data sources using creative data science approaches.
To do that, you will:
Rapidly iterate on early stage products where a hybrid skill set of product intuition, customer empathy and technical expertise is essential
Do this all while mentoring team members and guiding them to tackle bigger and more complex problems
Who You Are
You are an entrepreneurial, customer-focused data scientist, experienced in driving new data capabilities.
You are excited by the prospect of tackling meaningful problems each and every day.
You are a kind, passionate and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback, and values the chance to make a real impact on people’s lives.
In addition:
You have an advanced degree in a quantitative field &/or have a minimum of 4 years of working experience in an analytical and technical capacity.
You have worked with open source data science tools and languages (R/Python) and are interested in contributing to them yourself (bonus points for experience doing so!)
Researchers, data scientists, designers, clinicians, technologists and many more all work together to improve cancer care and accelerate research.
Career coaching opportunities
Professional development benefits for attending conferences, industry events and external courses
Work/life autonomy via flexible work hours and flexible paid time off
Generous parental leave (16 weeks for either parent)
Back-up child care
Flatiron-sponsored fitness classes
","['r', 'python']","['research', 'data']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"Are you a Data Scientist that is interested in working with one of world's leading Quantitative Hedge Funds?
Are you a Data Scientist that would enjoy working with a cutting-edge financial and engineering teams and to expand their data science and machine learning capabilities?
As the Data Scientist, you will:
• Manage large amounts of complex data in R or Python and running quantitative queries.
• Identify timely and unique data sets, diving deep into a diverse set of data domains as well as visualizing and exploring underlying data drivers
• Build statistical analysis and financial modeling techniques to large data sets.
What you need:
Master's or PhD degree from a competitive university in a quantitative field such as statistics, mathematics, operational research, computer science, finance or economics.
Quantitative and Developer experience (Python and/or object oriented programming)
Proficiency with statistical and data analysis and programming tools such as R, SAS, Stata, SQL or Matlab.
What you get:
• Work with one of the leading Quantitative Hedge Funds
• Work in not your typical hedge fund.
Very collaborative and casual work environment as compared to most Wall St. Firms
• Incredible work perks (too many to name!)
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['financial modeling', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'financial modeling', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"About the role:
From optimizing real-time bidding auctions, to separating human from non-human web traffic, to building out a global cross-device graph across billions of users, you will have the opportunity to work on numerous cutting-edge problems and develop scalable, high-performance solutions to big data problems using state-of-the art technologies, languages and frameworks.
You will:
Partner closely with Engineering on the architecture and implementation of modeling efforts to ensure performance and scalability.
Work seamlessly with Product and Analytics to define concrete measures of success, including business level goals as well as improvement of client outcomes.
Develop tools and processes to monitor performance of existing models and implement enhancements to improve scalability, reliability, and performance.
You have:
BS, Masters, or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Computer Science, Math, Physics, Statistics, Electrical Engineering, or similar).
Experience in implementing projects in any of (or all of) the following ML toolkits: Tensorflow, scikit-learn, Pytorch.
Previously participated in deploying Machine Learning Models all the way from research to production pipeline.
Worked with large and highly imbalanced datasets and developed good intuition on tradeoffs between accuracy, training speed and deployment constraints.
Related and adjacent experience with data architecture and engineering.
At least a year of software development experience in Scala and/or Python.
Experience with Golang a plus and something you will gain experience with here.
You are:
Hands-on with a passion ""in-the-trenches"" work with real-world datasets resulting in actual business outcomes and better client results.
An influencer with strong communication skills, and the ability to effectively discuss models with other Data Scientists as well as business partners at the appropriate level of technical detail.
Fast learner who is an analytic thinker and creative problem solver.
And, let's face it, so do the free snacks, great benefits, and unlimited vacation.
","['pytorch', 'scala', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['pytorch', 'scala', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job Responsibilities
Develop reliable systems that are scalable, and maintain current software to ensure its effectiveness and efficiency.
Create organized and accessible ways to document code and track changes in software including updates for future reference and use.
Educate and update staff and executive management about how to use various software, while ensuring their understanding and accessibility.
Job Skills & Qualifications
Required
Masters in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related fields
5+ years' experience in a data science or data analysis role
TOR157
",[None],"['statist', 'data']",2.0,"['statist', 'data']"
DS,"What You'll Do
Adeptly interpret and utilize mass quantities of data to generate innovative hypotheses & insights, and present these insights to the different stakeholders
Use sophisticated statistical methods to solve problems, leveraging up-to-date academic research and tools
Quantitatively test hypotheses about customer and driver behavior using large sets of proprietary data; leverage results to increase conversion and retention at every touch point
Design and implement novel experiments to better understand current operation as well as expansion to new markets
Who You Are
Obsessed with data; analytical and rigorous, with a thorough understanding of statistics and machine learning
Extraordinary communicator with demonstrated writing and editing skills.
Passionate about elegant visualization; you understand the importance of graphic techniques in communicating a quantitative idea effectively
Have a deep understanding of business concepts within strategy, operations, and marketing
Have a PhD in statistics, machine learning, physics, math, systems biology, or highly quantitative fields in social sciences, including 2+ years of graduate-level research experience (or the equivalent).
Have experience with predictive modeling and statistical analysis techniques in a business environment
Demonstrate mastery in some or all of the following: SQL, Python, R, and Tableau
Ready to join the ride?
","['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Build Data Pipelines for AI/ML Solutions using Python
KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES KEY DUTIES
Build Data Pipelines deployed at the edge (customer locations)
Programming skills:- SPSS Modeler (with working experience in most of common libraries like Scikit , numpy, pandas, mathplotlib, keras, tensorflow, nltk, genism, spacy etc)
Working experience in end to end data science project life cycles from use case framing, data collection, data exploration, model building, deployment
Working experience in most of the common Machine Learning techniques related to Time series, Regression, Classification,
Clustering, NLP, working with IoT data
","['nltk', 'kera', 'panda', 'python', 'spss', 'spaci', 'scikit']","['regress', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'account', 'nlp', 'time series', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['nltk', 'kera', 'panda', 'python', 'spss', 'spaci', 'scikit', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'account', 'nlp', 'time series', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"11 West 19th Street (22008), United States of America, New York, New York
Principal Associate, Data Scientist - Small Business Card, Entity Resolution
The business has been growing massively year over year on the heels of a robust strategic agenda around building business-grade solutions to meet the needs of small businesses across the nation.
In this role, you will:
Partner with a cross-functional team of data scientists, software engineers, and product managers to deliver a product customers love
Leverage a broad stack of technologies Python, Conda, AWS, H2O, Spark, and more to reveal the insights hidden within huge volumes of numeric and textual data
Build machine learning models through all phases of development, from design through training, evaluation, validation, and implementation
Flex your interpersonal skills to translate the complexity of your work into tangible business goals
The Ideal Candidate is:
Customer first.
Innovative.
You continually research and evaluate emerging technologies.
Creative.
You thrive on bringing definition to big, undefined problems.
You love asking questions and pushing hard to find answers.
Youre not afraid to share a new idea.
A leader.
You challenge conventional thinking and work with stakeholders to identify and improve the status quo.
Your passionate about talent development for your own team and beyond.
Technical.
Youre comfortable with open-source languages and are passionate about developing further.
You have hands-on experience developing data science solutions using open-source tools and cloud computing platforms.
Statistically-minded.
Youve built models, validated them, and backtested them.
You know how to interpret a confusion matrix or a ROC curve.
You have experience with clustering, classification, sentiment analysis, time series, and deep learning.
A data guru.
Big data doesnt phase you.
You have the skills to retrieve, combine, and analyze data from a variety of sources and structures.
You know understanding the data is often the key to great data science.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree plus 5 years of experience in data analytics, or Masters Degree plus 3 years in data analytics, or PhD
At least 1 year of experience in open source programming languages for large scale data analysis
At least 1 year of experience with machine learning
At least 1 year of experience with relational databases
Preferred Qualifications:
Masters Degree in STEM field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics) plus 3 years of experience in data analytics, or PhD in STEM field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics)
At least 1 year of experience working with AWS
At least 3 years experience in Python, Scala, or R
At least 3 years experience with machine learning
At least 3 years experience with SQL
","['h2o', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['h2o', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Scientist with an anticipated start date of Fall 2020.
Are you committed to using your talents in research and advanced analytics to give global organizations critical advice?
Are you a leader who applies your instincts and expertise to discover breakthroughs that are key to clients’ growth?
Are you a driven professional who can manage multiple projects, set a standard of excellence and follow through on commitments for exceptional results?
Do you instinctively connect with others, understand individuals’ needs and share your passion for analytics to achieve shared goals?
Do you excel at building predictive models using various data sources and techniques to inform practical business decisions?
What you will do:
You will mentor and develop other data scientists, helping them grow their technical and consulting skill sets.
What you need:
Ph.D. required.
A degree from a statistics, engineering, mathematics, computer science, computational social science, physics or operations research program preferred.
Previous or current Top-Secret U.S. government clearance required
At least 16 years of work experience (which can include years spent earning advanced degrees)
Expert-level production coding in Python preferred
Mastery in conducting analysis in Python and/or R required; additional analytic software experience a plus
At least four years of experience building production-level machine learning and predictive analytics systems with data pipelines required
A deep understanding of the mathematical fundamentals of machine learning and statistics, with an emphasis on nonparametric, nonlinear methods (e.g., random forests, support vector machines, neural networks) and natural language processing required
At least one year of experience working within distributed systems and managing workflows in a cloud infrastructure required
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis
","['r', 'excel', 'cloud', 'python']","['data', 'random forest', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'cloud', 'python', 'data', 'random forest', 'nlp', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'svm', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Health Fund
Job Title: Data Scientist
Grade: 11
Department: Executive Office
Reports To: Director of Operations
FLSA Status: Non-Union/Non-Management - Exempt
Posting Date: June 30, 2020
Summary: The Data Scientist is responsible for exploring, examining, analyzing and visualizing data from multiple disparate sources to develop new products based on the data gathered; has strong business acumen, along with an effective ability to communicate findings to both business and technology leaders.
The prime candidate will have the ability to analyze incoming data from multiple business domains and build a data platform upon which to build multiple data-driven applications.
The person will be responsible for designing and implementing processes and layouts for complex, large-scale data sets used for aggregation, statistical and research purposes.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
 Data mining using state-of-the-art methods
 Identify valuable data sources and automate collection processes.
 Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
 Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner
 Creating automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
 Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
 Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
 Build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms
 Combine models through ensemble modeling
 Present information using data visualization techniques
 All other duties as assigned by management
Qualifications and Core Competencies:
 Practical ability to visualize data, communicate the data, and utilize it effectively
 Extensive experience solving analytics problems using quantitative approaches
 A proven passion for generating insights from data
 Strong knowledge of statistical methods generally, and particularly in the areas of modeling and business analytics
 Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
 Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner
 Strong problem solving and logical skills.
Technical Skills:
 Expert level proficiency in Python, R, or Julia languages for the development of data science applications
 Expertise with SQL databases and unstructured data stores
 Experience working with complex and/or large data sets
 Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive
Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, etc.
 Expertise in testing and validating models and assessing the trade-offs between different modeling techniques and specifications
 Experience with deep learning utilities such as Tensor Flow, PyTorch, or Flux
 Experience with Qlikview or KNIME a plus
Interpersonal Skills:
 Effective written and verbal communication with all levels of the organization, including both business and IT partners
 Ability to think creatively and to work well both as part of a team and as an individual contributor
Education and/or Experience:
 Degree in Applied Math, Economics, Statistics, Computer Science or other quantitative field.
MS preferred
Language Skills: Speak, read, write and understand English
Reasoning Ability: High
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations: None
Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions.
 Under 1/3 of the time: Standing, Walking, Climbing or Balancing, Stooping, Kneeling, Crouching, or Crawling
 1/2 to 2/3 of the time: Sitting, Reaching with Hands & Arms
 Over 2/3 of the time: Talking or Hearing
 100% of the time: Using Hands
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
computer science: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
education in economics
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['pytorch', 'tensor', 'julia', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python']","['analyz', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'anomali', 'visual', 'commun', 'bay', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['pytorch', 'tensor', 'julia', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'analyz', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'anomali', 'visual', 'commun', 'bay', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Guy Carpenter is seeking candidates for the following position based in the New York Office
LEAD DATA SCIENTIST
'
What can you expect?
The Lead Data Scientist role within the Data Strategy group at Guy Carpenter (""GC"") provides an opportunity to create and improve data-driven products to power one of the world's largest and most respected risk management and reinsurance firms.
As a member of the Data Strategy group, the Lead Data Scientist will work with fellow data scientists, data engineers, product managers, business analysts, and stakeholders from other internal groups to design and improve data-centric products with the dual mandate of (1) increasing the efficiency of the data collection and analysis process across GC and (2) driving the monetization of data via newly designed and existing products for GC's reinsurance clients.
The lead data scientist will act as an advisor on a number of internal initiatives and will have ownership over projects which will require direct reporting to senior-level management in both business and technical groups.
Incorporate new, cutting edge business intelligence, machine learning, and alternative data practices into wider organization to drive efficiencies and generate revenue
Own the full stack execution of data science projects from data wrangling, model development, presentation, measurement to deployment
Work with data engineers to produce fully productionized pipelines including data ingestion, cleaning, feature engineering and model training/prediction.
Conduct research and analysis into reinsurance and advisory products to augment industry-standard models and develop new market offerings for GC's clients
Establish and maintain strong relationships with internal team members and external clients when possible
Monitor performance of data products and respond to internal inquiries regarding their maintenance
Evangelize data science techniques and best practices throughout analytics and engineering teams
Additional Tech Lead Responsibilities
Own the implementation for data products on the team's roadmap
Development data science and engineering talent within the team
Support the hiring of technical and business talent
Partner with the team product manager to manage technical communications with stakeholders
Collaborate with the product manager to establish sprint backlogs, stories and estimation
What you need to have:
3-5 years of experience as a data scientist or in equivalent quantitative engineering role
Significant experience with Python (pandas, sklearn), Spark (RDDs, dataframes), machine learning algorithms and libraries (TensorFlow, PyTorch), SQL
Must be able to produce production level code and familiar with engineering best practices (e.g.
unit testing, code reviews)
Experience acquiring and organizing data in cloud and on-premises environments
Bachelor's or Master's Degree in data science, computer science or related quantitative field such as applied mathematics, statistics, engineering or operations research
Experience working in an Agile environment to facilitate the quick and effective fulfillment of group goals
Good interpersonal skills for establishing and maintaining good internal relationships, working well as part of a team and for presentations and discussions
Strong analytical skills and intellectual curiosity as demonstrated through academic experience or work assignments
Ability to communicate technical concepts to non-technical audience
Excellent verbal and writing skills for complex communications with GC colleagues at all levels of the organization
Good ability to prioritize workload according to volume, urgency, etc.
and to deliver on required projects in a timely fashion
Desire to take ownership of proposed and assigned tasks and to seek assistance when needed
Ability to thrivein ambiguity, anddrive technical focus in directions of high business value
What makes you stand out:
Experience with machine vision and extracting structured information from images, multimedia, and other unstructured file formats (CSS)
Prior experience in relevant insurance/reinsurance field performing analytic analysis or experience in building model/software products for financial or insurance industry
Familiarity with modern data productivity frameworks and their alternatives such as Databricks, DataRobot and Alteryx
Significant experience with natural language processing techniques ranging from topic classification to sentiment analysis
Guy Carpenter delivers a powerful combination of broking expertise, trusted strategic advisory services and industry-leading analytics to help clients adapt to emerging opportunities and achieve profitable growth.
For more information, visit www.guycarp.com and follow Guy Carpenter on LinkedIn and Twitter @GuyCarpenter
Requisition #: R_096108-en
6ahf9io63
","['pytorch', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'sklearn', 'cloud']","['risk', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['pytorch', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'sklearn', 'cloud', 'risk', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Requisition Number
6027006
Department
Enterprise Reporting
Melville
992 North Village Avenue Rockville Centre, NY 11570
Schedule
Full Time
Shift
Day shift
Hours
8:00am - 4:00pm
Job Details
POSITION SUMMARY:
DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Drive Data management, classification and taxonomy development
Hypothesis development and testing
Data model and algorithm development and training
Collaborate with the multi-disciplined business analysts, technical analysts, data scientists and software engineers
Works collaboratively to design, implement and maintain data science models and applications.
Synthesizes complex data-related problems into actionable business and/or clinical strategy, and communicate findings to appropriate end-users and stakeholders.
Serves as the link between the clinical staff (customer) requirements and IS capabilities.
POSITION REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Education:
PhD in Computer Science, Biomedical Informatics or related field
Experience:
Experience with predictive modeling in healthcare, is preferred
Experience with healthcare data, including HL7, EMR and claims data, is preferred
Experience with natural language processing, is preferred
Experience with using languages like R, Scala and Java, is preferred
Experience with big data cluster computing tools like Spark, is highly-desirable
Experience with machine learning (supervised and unsupervised), is preferred
Experience with statistical analysis, is essential
Experience with hypothesis testing, is essential
Knowledge/Skills:
Proficient with statistical software packages (R, Python, MATLAB, SAS or related programs)
Highly proficient with Excel, Microsoft Office and using data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Qlik, PowerBI) to present data in clear, concise formats
Solid creative thinking, learning agility, decision making, problem solving, reasoning, and visualization skills and abilities.
Interest in becoming a content expert in healthcare reporting databases and warehouses.
Communicate effectively with excellent verbal/written communication skills.
Collaborating with developers for customized development.
Able to manage multiple tasks, often with competing deadlines.
Possess the ability to contribute to an environment that motivates individuals to work collaboratively as a team
Employee will perform all work activities according to the highest ethical and legal standards.
Conduct himself/herself in conformity with the HIPAA Compliance Program and applicable institutional policies and procedures for patient privacy.
","['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'healthcar']",3.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'nlp', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The lead data scientist will act as an advisor on a number of internal initiatives and will have ownership over projects which will require direct reporting to senior-level management in both business and technical groups.We will count on you to:* Incorporate new, cutting edge business intelligence, machine learning, and alternative data practices into wider organization to drive efficiencies and generate revenue* Own the full stack execution of data science projects from data wrangling, model development, presentation, measurement to deployment* Work with data engineers to produce fully productionized pipelines including data ingestion, cleaning, feature engineering and model training/prediction.
unit testing, code reviews)* Experience acquiring and organizing data in cloud and on-premises environments* Bachelor's or Master's Degree in data science, computer science or related quantitative field such as applied mathematics, statistics, engineering or operations research* Experience working in an Agile environment to facilitate the quick and effective fulfillment of group goals* Good interpersonal skills for establishing and maintaining good internal relationships, working well as part of a team and for presentations and discussions* Strong analytical skills and intellectual curiosity as demonstrated through academic experience or work assignments* Ability to communicate technical concepts to non-technical audience* Excellent verbal and writing skills for complex communications with GC colleagues at all levels of the organization* Good ability to prioritize workload according to volume, urgency, etc.
Guy Carpenter delivers a powerful combination of broking expertise, trusted strategic advisory services and industry-leading analytics to help clients adapt to emerging opportunities and achieve profitable growth.
","['excel', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You'll work in Python, developing and measuring the accuracy of Tensorflow models that use datasets in stored in Spark.
As such, successful candidates must be highly capable in each of the following dimensions (among others): adaptability, curiosity, resourcefulness, analytical thinking/problem solving, proactivity, collaboration, technological savvy, and operating in a dynamic environment.
Job Responsibilities
Create NLP-based systems to structure new sources of data using SpaCy and surface that data via APIs
Work with Data Engineering to ensure you have access to the source data needed for modeling
Work within a team structure to deliver on machine-learning projects and data efforts
Iterate in an agile development workflow and use version control systems (Git and the TFX suite of tooling) to manage model validation and data accuracy
Preferred Qualifications:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, or similar hard-science.
5+ years hands-on experience in Data Science roles at fast-paced product-driven tech companies
Extensive experience creating measured and validated models in Tensorflow
Deep and broad interest in all aspects of machine-learning
Strong experience with Spark, SQL, R, and Python
Working knowledge of cloud-services
Experience using and working with accompanying data pipelines
Working knowledge of a Python web framework like Flask
","['spark', 'git', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'flask', 'python', 'spaci', 'cloud']","['data', 'problem solving', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['spark', 'git', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'flask', 'python', 'spaci', 'cloud', 'data', 'problem solving', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You will research, analyze, and translate data to deliver recommendations and help solve business problems.
Responsibilities:
Determine problem statements to drive data analysis
Utilize data mining and machine learning techniques to help shape software development
Develop internal A/B testing procedures
Collaborate with a cross-functional agile team with members from Product Management, Development, and User Design to build innovative product solutions
Translate analytical and technical concepts to team members and external stakeholders to help inform and drive business decisions
Skills & Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science, or related field
4+ years of experience in designing, developing, evaluating, and deploying predictive modeling, machine learning, and advanced analytics
Experience working with engineers to develop and ship new product features
Familiarity with at least a few Databases, Data Warehouses, and Reporting or Visualization tools
Expert level knowledge in one or more languages commonly used in data analytics (Python, R, Java, Scala)
Superior analytical and problem-solving capabilities
Excellent oral and written communication, negotiation, and interpersonal skills
","['scala', 'excel', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['scala', 'excel', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Do you have a passion for solving hard problems at scale?
Are you eager to join a trust- based, globally-connected team, where your contributions will make a meaningful difference?
WHO YOU ARE:
* You have a sustained track record of making significant, self-directed, and end-to-end contributions to large and impactful machine learning projects.
* You have a strong sense of data intuition.
You are able to work from first principles and intuition to develop solutions and adapt them to a unique environment.
* You are a broadly skilled data scientist with experience embedding models into always-on production systems, working across a variety of technologies and data sources.
* You have a product-focused mindset.
* You work with confidence and without ego.
You have strongly-held, defensible ideas, and advocate for what you believe is right.
You are also adept at identifying and evaluating trade-offs, willing to be proven wrong, and quick to walk through fire to support your fellow teammates.
* You value, seek out, and foster diversity.
To complement this team, you will welcome ideas that are different from your own and be skilled at finding and building from common ground.
What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate.
WHAT YOU WILL BE DOING:
* You have an abundance of intellectual curiosity and are enthusiastic to learn (and teach) new technologies / techniques.
* You are you comfortable working on an agile, distributed team spanning multiple time zones and continents.
* You are able to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical audiences.
* You have over 10 years of experience working in a data-driven role.
Some of those years of experience may have been spent pursuing an advanced degree in a quantitative field, but it's not a requirement.
All aspects of employment will be based on merit, competence, performance, and business needs.
",[None],"['machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Marketing Statement
For more than 30 years, MetroPlus has been committed to building strong relationships with its members and providers to enable New Yorkers to live their healthiest life.
Position Overview
This includes data exploration / data mining, model building, performance & program evaluation, and related testing and recommendations.
Senior Data Scientist is expected to build / implement data science solutions at scale, and to provide thought leadership & give presentations as a Subject Matter Expert in advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses.
S/he needs to be comfortable and experienced with leading highly complex projects involving multiple internal & external resources and tasks.
The successful candidate can work both independently with little supervision or guidance & collaboratively with many stakeholders and SME’s, leading advanced data analysis and data modeling projects, from project design & iteration w/ internal clients, to the reception / processing of data and analyses and or modeling, and to the delivery of final reports/presentations, communication of results and implementation support.
Teamwork is essential as this role requires collaborating with various subject matter experts, management, and other industry leaders.
This position requires an analytical-minded individual who enjoys and thrives working in a fast-paced, nebulous, challenging, but rewarding environment.
Comprehensive knowledge of healthcare insurance industry, products, systems, business strategies and products is highly desired.
Strong understanding of Quality, Care and Utilization Management and Measurement reporting is also highly preferred, along with experience working with healthcare claims data.
Based on project requirements, determine, extract and aggregate appropiate data sets.
Analyze healthcare data and using quantitative methods to create actionable and timely information across the Medical Management teams, and up and down the MetroPlus business hierarchy.
Create meaningful data visualizations & presentations to communicate findings and relate them back to how they create business impact.
Develop sophisticated algorithms / predictive models to evaluate scenarios to make predictions of future outcomes, and or evaluate future impact of changes
Lead the design, development, and delivery of proactive linked data studies w/ internal teams and SME’s; direct or perform these linked data studies and build out studies using new linked data sets.
Drive conversations with internal stakeholders and leaders on product design, data specification, model implementations
Provide thought leadership on advanced statistical / mathematical analyses and related strategic insights to various internal stakeholders and key decision makers.
Tests new statistical analysis methods, software and data sources for continual improvement of quantitative solutions.
Drive proof of concept tests of new data, software and technologies.
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design
Assures compliance with regulatory and privacy requirements during design and implementation of modeling and analysis projects.
Perform other duties as required
Minimum Qualifications
3+ years’ of workingl experience with healthcare claims data.
5+ years related experience with healthcare data analytics.
Strong practical experience with SQL and Pthon is required; experiences in R, Hadoop, NoSQL is a plus.
Strong expertise in statistical modeling techniqures such as linear regression, logistic regression, survival analysis, GLM, tree models (Random Forests and GBM), cluster analysis, prinicpal components, feature creation, and validation.
Strong expetise in regularization techniques (Ridge, Lasso, elastic nets), variable selection techniques, feature creation (trasnformation, binning, high level categorical reduction, etc.)
and validation (hold-outs, CV, bootstrap).
Experience with business intelligence platforms (e.g.
Tableau, NicroStrategy, SAP) is a plus.
Excellent problem solving skills, critical thinking and conceptual thinking abilities
Strong organizational, management and leadership skills
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Excellent communication skills
Ability to work independentley and collabortively.
Professional Competencies
Integrity and Trust
Customer Focus
Functional/Technical skills
Written/Oral Communication
","['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'net', 'hadoop']","['analyz', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'healthcar', 'gbm', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'glm', 'cluster', 'optim', 'data mining', 'busi', 'recommend']",999.0,"['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'net', 'hadoop', 'analyz', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'healthcar', 'gbm', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'glm', 'cluster', 'optim', 'data mining', 'busi', 'recommend']"
DS,"Responsibilities include:
Building algorithms and data flows based on these findings
Working directly with the founders to set the technology and architectural roadmap
Being part of the early team of one of the hottest NY startups!
Culture Fit:
You secretly run regressions in Python on your laptop while your friends are watching sports
You're a team player
Great sense of humor
Experience and Education:
3 years of industry experience applying data science to solving business problems
Experience turning models into product
Quantitative degree at a top university (social science training preferred but not required)
Familiar with main SQL and main Python data science packages (incl.
Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Scikit-learn)
Please note: This is a full-time position that will be remote initially (due to COVID-19) and based in New York once safe to re-open the office (no earlier than Fall)
","['sql', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['regress', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['sql', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'regress', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES
Constructing deeper and broader knowledge graph by mining both public information and proprietary data.
Developing advanced search functionalities and algorithms to effectively index and find experts matching clients specific needs.
Applying natural language processing and machine learning to generate highly effective searches from client requests automatically.
Optimize the expert outreach platform to increase the response rate.
Define metrics, A/B testing and conduct statistical measurement of features and improvements.
REQUIRED SKILLS
6+ years of industry experience in data science.
Strong track record of applying NLP and ML methods in solving real world problems.
Fluency of large dataset processing with mainstream big data stack.
Ability to communicate complex concepts in a clear and effective manner.
Passion for making knowledge more accessible in the world.
Strong sense of ownership and results-focused.
BONUS SKILLS
Familiarity with Google Cloud Dataflow or Apache Beam & AI Platform
Docker
RabbitMQ
Apache Kafka
Apache Beam, Hadoop, Spark
Jenkins
Python
","['kafka', 'spark', 'python', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'docker', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'graph', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['kafka', 'spark', 'python', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'docker', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'nlp', 'graph', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"OpenWeb (formerly Spot.IM) is on a mission to increase the quality of conversations online.
Today, OpenWeb works with more than 700 top-tier publishers (including News Corp, Verizon Media, CBS, Fox News, Hearst, Refinery 29 and more) and hosts 100 million monthly active users.
Let's take the web back from the trolls - together.
Are you in?
Develop the department by using your technical knowledge in data science and your adtech industry experience to shape the overall data strategy
Drive the development of engineering and analytical tools, technology, and data acquisition
Hire, manage, and retain a strong, centralized team to support you in executing the plans
The Skills and Experience You Bring:
Extensive experience of at least 10+ years in leading data science teams and complex initiatives
Previous experience in digital advertising, targeting, advertising optimization products, or other related ad-tech products
Deep understanding of the ad-tech ecosystem
Demonstrated ability to self-motivate, guide teams, and work in executives teams while being flexible within a fast-paced and ever changing environment
Advantage for hands on experience with emerging statistical methods/techniques (e.g.
machine learning and/or artificial intelligence)
The OpenWeb Culture
OpenWeb is committed to building diverse teams and upholding an equal employment workplace that is free from discrimination.
Please take a moment to review OpenWeb's Privacy Practice
",[None],"['optim', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data']",999.0,"['optim', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Base: $160,000 - $220,000
As a Data Scientist, you will explore a breadth of challenges: identifying timely and unique data sets, diving deep into a diverse set of data domains, visualizing and exploring and visualizing underlying data drivers, and developing data set features and forecasts.
Responsibilities:
Operate and extend the data science platform to deliver production-grade data curation and analysis services
Own end-to-end data workflows and develop deep domain expertise on the underlying actors and behaviors manifested through data
Visualize and explore data sets to enable the ideation and generation of new, predictive feature
Qualifications and Experience:
Advanced degree in Computer Science is preferred
3+ years of experience in data analysis or similar role
Experience applying statistical methods (distribution analysis, classification, clustering, etc.)
Strong coding skills with data-frames are a prerequisite, example platforms include Pandas, R, Matlab, and Apache Spark Demonstrated experience highlighting innovation, creativity, and intuition, e.g the ability to laterally identify other sources of useful information and think 'outside the box'
Prior Experience in finance is not required
","['r', 'panda', 'matlab', 'spark']","['classif', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist']",2.0,"['r', 'panda', 'matlab', 'spark', 'classif', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"The Role
Want to build something new and exciting?
Do you like building tools that can answer what demand might look like 6 months out for a particular product?
Some of the day to day might include:
Owning the full Data Science life-cycle from conception to prototyping, testing, deploying, and measuring its overall business value
Developing quantitative models, leveraging machine learning and advanced data analysis techniques
Serving as a consultative partner to the marketing and creative teams to understand needs and conduct analyses that will help determine targeting strategy
Provide technical leadership and strategic initiatives for your team
What You Bring to the Party
Conferred Bachelor of Science in Engineering or Computer Science or technical equivalent and 8+ years of experience in data science type roles
Highly proficient in Python and SQL programming
Machine Learning experience: supervised/unsupervised learning, recommendation systems, reinforcement learning, deep learning, time series etc.
> Prophet, arima, deepar, lstms
> RL or ranking work is a plus
Ability to effectively work with business leads: strong communication skills, ability to synthesize conclusions for non-experts and desire to influence business decisions
Intuitive sense of how quantitative and technical work aligns closely with business priorities and business value
Ability to thrive in a dynamic environment where there can be degrees of ambiguity
Intellectual curiosity and a strong desire to always be learning
Be really excited with the idea of building something new, for a business tackling e-commerce in an entirely different way
Ability to work independently and/or within a collaborative team structure
Highly organized with critical attention to details, along with good time and priority task management
Strong communication skills in two parts: 1.)
very strong writing skills utilizing the rules of English grammar; 2.)
verbally clear, concise, and grammatically correct oral (speaking) communication skills in English
Plusses, not required
Conferred Bachelor of Science in Engineering and/or Computer Science and 10+ years of experience post degree in data analyst or science roles
Conferred Master of Science or PhD in a quantitative field, e.g.
Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Neuroscience, Operations Research, etc
Product Ecommerce experience
","['prophet', 'sql', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'lstm', 'econom', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['prophet', 'sql', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'lstm', 'econom', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Role Summary
You should have a good mix of programming/CS skills and have background in supporting life sciences / healthcare customers in a customer-facing capacity.
You will work closely with research scientists, business development, and other data scientists to assist on client data delivery, client management, and various deliverables built on clinical and claims data.
This role reports to the Vice President of Data Products.
Responsibilities
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives.
Run feasibilities and query the data to support day-to-day questions of the data.
Share client feedback with key internal stakeholders.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Advanced visualization skills- interactive custom visualizations in d3.js, plotly, etc.
","['mapreduc', 'spark', 'tableau', 'r', 'seaborn', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud']","['regress', 'big data', 'data', 'pca', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['mapreduc', 'spark', 'tableau', 'r', 'seaborn', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'pca', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Project work covers all phases conceptualization, planning, data acquisition, modeling, documentation, and presentation of findings/recommendations.
Design tests, benchmark and track performance of predictive models over time.
Improve business results, by applying machine learning to ongoing business activities, and develop recommendations to guide future activities.
Work with partners in Data Engineering, Marketing, Product and Programmatic teams, to operationalize integration of analytic models into production environment(s).
Stay current on relevant academic and industry developments to identify best-in-class algorithms, techniques, libraries, etc.
Partner with other team members to evolve existing capabilities.
Perform ad hoc analytic tasks and reporting as needed.
Select features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques
Mine data using state-of-the-art methods
Extend companys data with third party sources of information when needed
Enhance data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Process, cleanse, and verify the integrity of data used for analysis
Create automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
Skills:
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, etc.
Exceptional quantitative analytics/applied statistics skills, including regression, clustering and classification, forecasting and machine learning, and other techniques appropriate for large scale data analysis.
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Weka, NumPy, MatLab, etc.
Excellence in at least one of these is highly desirable
Exceptional programming skills in a modern-stack Linux environment.
This includes knowledge of approaches to automate workflows and data pipelines.
Experience with big data technologies: Hadoop, AWS/EMR, Spark, Hive.
Two or more years of business/marketing analytics experience, preferably in a media organization.
Exceptional communication skills, particularly in communicating and visualizing quantitative findings in a compelling and actionable manner for management.
Strong set of professional skills: attention to detail; analytic, logical and creative problem solving; critical thinking; ability to work independently and within a cross-functional team.
Advanced degree with an emphasis in a quantitative discipline such as statistics, engineering or mathematics.
PhD preferred.
","['linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi']","['big data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'statist', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'anomali', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'forecast', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'big data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'statist', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'anomali', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'forecast', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Music for everyone, no credit card needed.
Want to help shape the future of free?
Here’s how.
The data science and analytics team in this area will be helping to answer questions such as:
You’ll join a new team of data scientists and analysts that’s part of an existing insights organization and that offers plenty of opportunity for collaboration and learning.
What you'll do
Perform and present analyses on large sets of data to extract actionable insights that will help drive product decisions.
Work with colleagues across Ad Sales, Sales Operations, Partner Solutions and Revenue Partnerships to understand analytic needs and deliver impactful findings.
Collaborate with insight partners across the organization and contribute to the wider data science practice.
Team responsibilities include delivering the following:
Data infrastructure - Dashboards and key metrics, audience segmentation, exploratory analysis and forecasting of trends, marketing attribution, experimentation
Communicate data-driven insights and recommendations to key stakeholders.
Work closely with cross-functional teams.
Mentor and coach other data scientists.
Who you are
You know how to understand and solve loosely defined problems and come up with relevant answers and actionable insights to guide product development decisions.
You have a deep understanding of numbers, as well as a strong business sense and demonstrated ability to work with other disciplines.
You have relevant experience, with a degree in economics, psychology, computer science, statistics, or mathematics or another quantitative discipline
You have the technical competence to perform advanced analytics: coding skills (such as Python, Java, or Scala), experience with analytics & visualization tools (Pandas, R, SPSS, SQL, Hadoop, Tableau), and experience performing analysis with large datasets.
You possess strong statistical competence (such as regression modeling, a/b testing, significance testing etc).
","['scala', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'java']","['regress', 'data', 'dashboard', 'econom', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'java', 'regress', 'data', 'dashboard', 'econom', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Data Scientist / Machine Learning Engineer
Seeking a Azure Big Data Machine Learning Engineer where you will help leverage data to make informed decisions.
You will be knowledgeable of cloud based architectures and Azure technologies.
You will be passionate about Machine Learning, Deep Learning, and be an expert with Azure ML with knowledge of AutoML, MLOps, and data science on ML platform.
Well versed with Data Science, Machine learning and Deep Learning based solutions and frameworks.
Azure Machine Learning, Machine Learning Server, BOT framework, Cognitive Services, Azure Databricks, etc.)
Ability to Interpret the logical side of the data, demonstrate leadership in advanced Analytics, support leading project tasks, experience with ETL tools, Python coding required-At least 2 years preferred, Hands-on with Spark, SQL highly preferred.
","['spark', 'sql', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'etl', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'etl', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Specific Responsibilities/Duties:
Model voter characteristics, including demographic and behavioral dimensions
Deliver high quality voter data by using any tools at your disposal, from building models to coding heuristics to driving new data acquisition
Participate in healthy development practices: author quality code, participate in code reviews
Minimum Qualifications and Requirements:
Mission-driven and passionate about improving the data ecosystem for progressive causes
3+ years professional experience building and running software in a team setting
Fluency with a higher-level language (Python, SQL)
Experience with building complex data systems a plus: deploying and using workflow systems, large scale batch and stream processing, data warehousing.
Experience with Google BigQuery and PySpark preferred.
Pragmatic with a bias towards action, a sharp thinking cap, and comfortable stretching outside their role
At least one previous cycle of campaign organizing experience is strongly preferred
Minimum MS in quantitative field, PhD preferred.
Seniority Level: Mid level, Senior level
Employment Type: Full-time
","['pyspark', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'data warehousing']",3.0,"['pyspark', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'data warehousing']"
DS,"Job ID
762858BR
New York, New York, United States
Business
Date posted
Jul.
02, 2020
Job Summary:
You will focus on improving business results through the combination of statistical rigor, data analysis, and fast paced execution with an emphasis on driving actionable business recommendations.
Responsibilities:
Modeling, Forecasting, and Opportunity Sizing: Both to set goals and help evaluate potential opportunities, this data scientist will be tasked with creating models that ascribe value to content and can inform content development decisions.
Support Insights and Visualization of Complex Data sets: Development of prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, machine learning models and robust analytics leading to actionable insights communicated clearly and visually.
Contribute to Product Features: Build/test offers, personalization and recommendation experiences by analyzing complex data sets and developing algorithms to produce results with the goal of increasing customer engagement and retention.
Partner: Partner closely with business stakeholders to identify and unlock opportunities, and with other data teams to improve platform capabilities around data modeling, data visualization, experimentation and data architecture.
Basic Qualifications:
3+ years of professional data science/analytical experience
3+ years of professional experience using data-building and statistical programming languages: SAS, Python, R, SQL
Practical experience and expertise in applied statistics and data science methodologies (general advanced data modeling and predictive analytics e.g., multivariate regression analysis, machine learning, forecasting, Bayesian estimation)
Experience with data exploration utilizing data visualization tools (e.g.
Tableau, Looker, Pandas, ggplot2, Plotly)
Experience with distributed databases and query languages like Spark and Scala
Ability to think strategically, including interpreting market and consumer information
Ability to simplify highly complex analyses into terms that are easily accessible and impactful for both written and verbal formats
Demonstrated ability to present data science results and actionable recommendations to business and technical clients
Intellectually curious, analytically rigorous, hard-working, good work ethic and an on-point business intuition
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in e-commerce, consumer products, retail or digital products strongly preferred
Experience in customer analytics, including lifetime value analysis, customer propensity, retention, forecasting, and customer segmentation strongly preferred
Knowledge and professional application of machine learning algorithms (SVM, Random Forest, Naive Bayes, KNN, etc.)
and modern deep learning techniques (PyTorch, Keras/Tensorflow) is a plus
Required Education
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research or a related field
Preferred Education
PhD or MS degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, CS, Econometrics or related field
Additional Information:
DSSDATA
Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'looker', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'plotli', 'python', 'sa']","['predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'bay', 'research', 'forecast', 'knn', 'busi', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']",1.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'looker', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'plotli', 'python', 'sa', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'bay', 'research', 'forecast', 'knn', 'busi', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"You will be involved from pre-sales to support.
You will work on next generation algorithms development and help measure, maintain and upgrade current business.
Responsibilities:
Building algorithms and designing experiments to merge, manage, analyze, and extract data for tailored reports to colleagues, clients or management.
Gathering, standardizing, and analyzing voluminous electronic data, such as records, general ledgers, sales and inventory data, etc.
Creating and monitoring anomaly detection systems.
Own complete life cycle from problem formulation to solution deployment and maintenance
Building predictive models and presenting information using data visualization tools and techniques.
Develop proven methods and strategies for the larger Data Scientist team.
Collaborating with engineering and product development teams.
Querying and mining large data sets to discover transaction patterns, examining financial data and filtering for targeted information that utilize both traditional and predictive/advanced analytic methodologies.
Act as a technical thought leader in collaboration with the analytics team, helping to set the strategy and standards for data science and advanced analytics.
Excellent interpersonal skills with ability to communicate clearly and concisely with executives, engineers, account managers, sales, business partners and data scientists.
Qualifications
0-10+ years of work experience in a Data Scientist role (or related field).
3+ years of outstanding technical abilities with Java, or C/C++ development experience with statistical machine learning models
Bachelor’s degree or higher in data relevant fields: Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, etc.
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as Python, R etc., with expert proficiency in at least one
Experience creating, managing, and utilizing high performance relational and NoSQL databases, such as Microsoft SQL Server, Oracle, Microsoft Access, OLAP and other software.
Experience with a business intelligence tool such as Tableau, Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics
Experience with Spark, Kaplan, Breeze, MapReduce models a plus
You can describe and speak in an approachable way about complex analyses and concepts within a cross-functional team.
You are a great “analytic translator”.
You know how to simplify technical concepts when explaining things to non-technical business leaders.
Experience with at least two of Social Network Analysis, Knowledge Graphs, Predictive Modeling, Language Processing (including NLP) is a plus
Excellent understanding of computer science fundamentals, data structures, and algorithms
Rounded business skills with the ability to understand customer and/or stakeholder needs
Have a strong mathematical background and have experience with modeling complex high dimensional problems
Experience performing petabyte scale data analysis and developing meaningful visualizations
Must be organized, have an eye for detail, and be able to identify trends within the data and tell that story to business leaders
","['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'oracl', 'java']","['machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'anomali']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'oracl', 'java', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'anomali']"
DS,"Data Scientist & Senior Data Scientist
You will need to have a deep expertise in data science with a desire to work with large clinical datasets.
This is a great opportunity for an individual to leverage their experience and skills in data analytics to make a meaningful impact on reproductive medicine.
Responsibilities:
• Working with large scale structured and unstructured clinical data.
• Applying standard statistical analysis and machine learning techniques in an R&D setting.
• Developing standardized and automated processing pipelines to prepare data for analytic activities.
• Planning and executing analytic solutions for scientific audits, reviews, and reports with minimal supervision.
• Designing, developing, and maintaining databases for scientific and commercial applications.
• Setting up and working on compute clusters and parallel computing.
An ideal candidate would have the following academic background and concrete skills (Required Skills):
• Master’s or PhD in biostatistics, computer science or a similar discipline is required.
• Minimum of 2+ years of professional Data Science, Statistical Analysis and/or Machine Learning experience.
• You should have an understanding of Bayesian decision theory, Support Vector Machines (SVM), Markov modeling, clustering, survival analysis, and other standard analytical methods used for regression and classification problems.
• Proficiency in SQL, NoSQL, or MongoDB programing.
• Proficiency in modeling and programming with R, Matlab, or Python.
Any C/C++ would be a plus.
• A proven publication record, along with strong organizational, writing, and communication skills.
The ideal candidate will have the following characteristics (Desired Skills):
• Enjoys working in a highly collaborative environment with a diverse team to tackle complex problems
• Is disciplined and driven to deliver ongoing research results
• Has a positive attitude with a willingness to roll up their sleeves and do what it takes to get the job done
• Is highly organized
• Is a strong written and verbal communicator
• Has a hard work ethic with emphasis on execution
They are also generating whole genome datasets that expand their understanding of how a woman’s personal genetic signature relates to her fertility potential.
These genetic feature sets, together with the clinical metrics, will power the next generation release of their SaaS platform.
","['nosql', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'c']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'research', 'svm', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['nosql', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'c', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'research', 'svm', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The successful candidate will leverage their experience in Data Science to...
Collect, clean, integrate, analyze, and visualize internal and external data on customer and product characteristics to identify opportunities and guide recommendation strategy
The accomplished individual will possess...
Experience developing and deploying recommendation engines
Python and SQL coding skills
3+ years of experience as a Data Scientist
BA/BS in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, etc.)
An understanding of Agile workflows and product development cycles
The outstanding individual will possess...
A Masters or PhD in a technical field
Expertise in AWS, Azure, and/or GCP
Experience working with non-technical teams and business partners
Experience working with containerized environments (e.g.
Docker)
Knowledge of retail and an interest in fashion
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.
Perseverance: Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Strategic Agility: Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.
Building Effective Teams: Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale and spirit in their team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.
Managerial Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration.
These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law.
","['sql', 'gcp', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'aw']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'gcp', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'aw', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"As a critical member of the Product Insights team, you will have the unique opportunity to influence decision making and the product roadmap with data insights and thought leadership.
To be successful in this role:
You would have to strike a balance between strategic thinking and hands-on analyses using tools like SQL, R, Python.
You would need to possess strong technical skills to extract actionable insights from enormous amounts of data from Hadoop.
At the same time, you also need to have the ability to think about the big picture and connect the dots to evaluate how the insights impact eBays ecosystem.
You would need a deep understanding of statistics, supervised/unsupervised algos and their applicability in various practical scenarios as you choose the best way to extract insights from data to solve a customer problem.
Youd need strong understanding of A/B testing framework and causal inferences
You would need a mindset for scalability as you help create scalable processes and strategy for the data science team
Youd need a strong customer mindset and ability to connect customer voices with data insights to recommend product solutions and collaborate with engineering and product partners
You would need an ability to present complex analyses and insights effectively in simple terms
Proactive collaboration and effective communication are critical
Requirements:
Strong quantitative background with a degree in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related disciplines.
5-10 years experience in the field of data science and analytics is preferred
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
","['hadoop', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'causal', 'econom', 'supervis', 'math', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'causal', 'econom', 'supervis', 'math', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"About the Role:
What You'll Do:
You’ll analyze historical data related to crop growth and environmental characteristics to forecast yields for future harvests and uncover insights about ways conditions can be optimized.
You’ll optimize work and production schedules to achieve the highest utilization of time and space in the farm.
You’ll work alongside software engineers to implement data processing and visualization systems that make data readily available and simplify how insights are communicated.
What You'll Have:
You have a strong mathematical background in probability, statistics, and optimization algorithms.
You are fluent in a scripting language such as Python or R for analysis and modeling.
You are proficient with query languages (SQL/Postgres) and maybe even dream in SQL
You have a deep understanding of and have applied various machine learning techniques for solving real-world problems, and can provide technical leadership in the team.
You must be able to translate business, operations, and agricultural questions into data science problems, solve those problems, and interpret the output back into clear outcomes.
You are confident in taking ownership of projects from start to finish and enjoy the process of turning nebulous ideas into reality.
","['postgr', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['sql', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"From birthday parties to gameday potlucks, life’s special moments are bettered by the craftsmanship and tradition found behind local pizzerias’ counters.
Can you imagine what a small mom and pop pizza shop could achieve with the resources of Domino’s?
Your passion for solving problems and sense of urgency will fuel the success of the team.
You will report to the Director of Data Science.
Graduate degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Operation Research or equivalent quantitative fields.
PhD preferred
6+ years of industry/academic experience in data science, machine learning or a related field using mainstream languages such as Python, Spark etc
Demonstrated craft in modeling and optimization techniques tailored to meet business needs
Experience in developing production level code or partnering with engineering teams to deliver product features
Track record of developing junior members from academia/industry to advance their careers in a business environment
Familiarity with programming languages such as Java, C++, Perl
Experience in product management a plus
This united network of pizzerias enables these small businesses to thrive against major corporate chains and form the nation’s largest marketplace for authentic pizza.
","['perl', 'java', 'spark', 'python']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['perl', 'java', 'spark', 'python', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Job title: AI/Machine Learning Consultant
Duration: Long Term
W2 Role
Â
1.ÂHands on experience with Python , Multithreading , Rest API
2.ÂExperience with using and having an in-depth understanding of AI/ML Algorithms, Neural Networks ( Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.)
3.ÂExperience with NLP Libraries (Standford, Spacy)
4.ÂShould have ability to incorporate NLP and ML into full-stack , user facing applications
5.ÂShould be able to think out-of-box and develop algorithms for complex problem solution
6.ÂExperience with all parts of Data Engineering ( Data Mining, Data Processing, Data Cleaning, Data Modeling)
7.ÂShould have strong Data Analyzation and Visualization skills
8.ÂHelp identify new data science methods worth exploring, determine the processes and techniques to implement
","['pytorch', 'kera', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'spaci']","['visual', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'neural network', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['pytorch', 'kera', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'spaci', 'visual', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'nn', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"You would be welcomed to a friendly, inclusive environment where you can learn, and collaborate with some of the most talented people in the industry.
This candidate loves a variety of data, contexts, business problems, and methodologies; they also want to pick the best solution for the situation.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Lead the development of consumer-ready analysis to analytics team leadership, live producers, product managers, and partner groups.
Identify and lead analytic experiments aligned with long-term, strategic initiatives.
Lead the design, development, and delivery of machine learning enabled solutions to address critical business or game questions.
Lead the design and development of validation tests to assess the efficiency of the model (or algorithm) in place and provide strategic insights to stakeholders.
Lead the development of frameworks, models, tools, and processes to ensure data influences decisions at all levels.
Collaborate with the analytics tech lead to establish best practices for repeated application.
Lead and inspire a team of world class data scientists, providing leadership through coaching and mentorship on a regular basis.
Influence the analytics roadmap.
Participates in the recruitment of the best in class data scientists.
QUALIFICATIONS
3+ years of experience managing/supervising a team.
8+ years of experience in data science or similar role in the video game, marketing, finance, forensics, or technology fields required.
8+ years of experience in machine learning, statistical languages, and systems such as Python and R.
Extensive knowledge of machine learning techniques such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Data Mining, Clustering, and Classification.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field, with a strong quantitative background.
Ability to develop and maintain good relations and communicate with people at all hierarchical levels.
SKILLS
Strong problem-solving skills.
Ability to reconcile technical and business perspectives.
Autonomy and entrepreneurship.
Strong mentoring abilities.
Strong team spirit.
PLUSES
Experience with Hadoop.
Graduate degree (MBA, MSc or Master's, PHD).
Game industry experience.
","['hadoop', 'python']","['data mining', 'classif', 'bay', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'nn', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'python', 'data mining', 'classif', 'bay', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'nn', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Data Scientist will be taking ownership of their code and help implement machine learning predictive models with modern ML tools.Ideally, this Data Scientist will have experience working with Python and SQL.
Any experience with cloud & big data tools will be a plus.This is the perfect chance to growth technically with a leader in the industry!Required Skills & Experience* 3-5 years professional experience* Experience with working in Python and SQL* Experience with ML tools such as SciLearn and Pandas* Comfortable working with GCP* Excellent communicationDesired Skills & Experience* Previous experience working in a data intensive environment* Familiarity with Spark or Hadoop is a plus* Exposure to any cloud platform is also a plusWhat You Will Be Doing* You would be working on a variety of data science projects, specifically focusing on implementing ML-based predictive models and writing production worth codeTech Breakdown* 100% Data ScienceRole Breakdown* 90% Hands on development* 10% Working cross-functionally with the Digital Marketing & Business Intelligence team.The Offer* Competitive annual salary up to $155,000Your benefits will include:* Full health benefit including medical, dental, and vision* 401(k) options* PTO & vacation policies* Defined pension plan optionsApplicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis now and in the future.Jobspring Partners, part of the Motion Recruitment network, provides IT Staffing Solutions (Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire) in major North American markets.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Before the dawn of everything internet, insurance was intimate and personal.
You walked down the street to chat with your broker, and the risk to your business, your livelihood, was covered with a handshake.
Today things are different.
The average insurance policy for a mom-and-pop store trades through a dozen different hands and traverses a maze of systems and processes.
Few are accountable and fewer know the whole story.
Some of the problems you will solve entail understanding data, identifying patterns, quantifying the impact of ML / NLP models and designing data visualizations.
As one of the founding members of a small, multi-disciplinary team of technologists, designers and product managers, you’ll have the freedom to make key product decisions without much oversight, and the tools and resources to build and ship ideas quickly.
Who you are
You want to use your statistical, scientific, and engineering training to craft and deploy models to transform one of the most entrenched industries.
You paint with plots and your models don’t keep secrets.
Image recognition is no longer an innovation to you, instead it is a routine task.
NLP isn’t a foreign acronym and you’ve gone from strings to whiskers.
You sail smooth in Python and always have sklearn, tensorflow, keras and pytorch on deck.
K-means more than a curt text and Logit and Probit are not Hobbit characters.
You have experience with relational databases such as PostgreSQL, Oracle or SQL Server, and maybe even Hadoop, Hive, Spark or Redshift.
You strive to learn the newest and greatest techniques where BERT/ELMo are not just Sesame Street© characters.
What you’ll own
The roadmap of projects you’ll work on that tie directly to business goals and objectives.
Manage the entire lifecycle of data projects from strategic planning to tactical activities (data collection, cleanup, analysis, model implementation).
Facilitate communication throughout the development process between executive stakeholders, your users and technical teams.
Coordinate and build strong working relations with various internal stakeholder groups, including IT, engineering, and legal.
Minimum Qualifications
Degree in computer science, engineering, mathematics, statistics, data science or a related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
3 years of work experience in data science or related field.
Experience with statistical modeling using R, Python, or similar statistical languages.
In depth knowledge of advanced models such as generalized linear models, penalized regression models, tree based models and neural networks
Proven track record building business-practical models and implementing them into production.
Familiarity with Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn, Keras, Tensorflow, Pytorch
Experience with data architecture and management (PostgreSQL, Hadoop, Oracle, Hive, Spark, Redshift and/or SQL Server)
If manually entering, only include your most recent or relevant job information needed for this role.
For either method, please attach your most current resume.
Additional job history may be obtained if selected for the interview process.
","['postgresql', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'redshift', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sklearn', 'hive', 'numpi', 'oracl', 'scikit']","['risk', 'regress', 'data', 'account', 'neural network', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['postgresql', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'redshift', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sklearn', 'hive', 'numpi', 'oracl', 'scikit', 'risk', 'regress', 'data', 'account', 'nn', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.
As a Senior Data Scientist you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data.
Examples of projects the team works on include machine learning models for developing digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!
Typical Accountabilities
Works within established frameworks to deliver a variety of tasks that support projects in meeting their objectives.
Independently keeps own knowledge up to date and learns from senior team members, proposing appropriate training courses for personal development.
Reviews working practices and ensures non-compliant processes are escalated
Ensures own work is compliant within Clinical Development.
Collaborate in a multidisciplinary environment with world leading clinicians, data scientists, biological experts, statisticians and IT professionals.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience
Essential
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Knowledge of range of mathematical and statistical modelling techniques, and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills.
Minimum 2+ years of experience or post doctoral.
Desirable
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry
Communication, business analysis, and consultancy.
",['r'],"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",3.0,"['r', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"One of the world’s leading financial consultative service providers are looking for Data Sceintists to join their team.
Roles & Responsibilities
Identify and process various sources of client/third-party financial data
Analyse sets of data to identify structures, patterns and trends
Use patterns in data to propose solutions and strategies for client problems
Create and present findings to senior management team and other stakeholders, as and when required
Essential Requirements
5+ years of relevant experience (e.g.
Data Scientist, Data Analyst, Statistician, Economist, etc.)
Working knowledge of machine learning algorithms and technologies
A great knowledge and/or experience of business intelligence tools (e.g.
VBA, SQL, Tableau, etc.)
MSc or higher in Data Science, Statistics, Economics or a related field
Experience delivering agile solutions to various small and large clients
Strong problem-solving skills
Excellent attention to detail
Impeccable listening skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Able to create and maintain strong working relationships with both internal and external colleagues and clients
Great planning and organisational skills
A desire for continuous learning and professional improvement
Desirable Skills
Experience working within the financial services (or similar) sector
Knowledge of cloud computing technologies (MS Azure, Amazon AWS, etc.)
A working knowledge of Python programming
Experience providing advisory or consultation services to client
Benefits
Competitive salary
Work-from-home Scheme
Fully funded training courses available
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $60,000.00 to $75,000.00 /year
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['aw', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Role
You will use data to develop product roadmaps and drive business value projects with different business stakeholders.
This job requires dealing with advanced statistical concepts on a daily basis.
If that is exciting, this is the job for you.
You are a Product Manager who has always used data to drive decisions!
You will
Manage and own Data Science Team roadmap and help quantify business value of projects.
Gather stakeholder requirements for data science projects and help translate them into actionable steps for project members.
Set and communicate product vision across the organization.
You will help in supporting the productionization of data science projects.
Evangelize data science to the broader organization to ensure project buy-in.
Bridge the gap between technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Work with assorted teams, including analytics to ensure data quality both going in and coming out of Data Science models and other products.
Push the Data Scientists to achieve higher quality results by keeping modelling efforts grounded in business needs and ensuring that mathematical modelling methods are appropriate for a given solution.
Develop appropriate training materials for data science tools and ensure that the tools are fully documented
Create and curate tasks for software engineers
What you bring to the party
4+ years of product management experience is an absolute requirement along with cross functional project management
Ability to translate between business and technical requirements
Experience building and evaluating data driven models
Proven ability to collaborate and work across an organization building high functioning partnerships that perpetuate a collaborative work environment
Familiarity with database, visualization, and data science tools e.g.
SQL, Python, APIs
Must be able to garner and hold the respect of the Data Scientists Team
Conferred Bachelor of Science or Arts or equivalent work experience
Ability to work independently and/or within a collaborative team structure
Highly organized with critical attention to details, along with good time and priority task management
Strong communication skills in two parts: 1.)
very strong writing skills utilizing the rules of English grammar; 2.)
verbally clear, concise, and grammatically correct oral (speaking) communication skills in English
Plusses, not required
Conferred Master or Ph.D. degree
Proficient in one additional language other than English, such as (but not limited to), French, Spanish, Portuguese, German, Dutch, Italian, Russian, Korean, Japanese, Mandarin, Vietnamese, etc
","['sql', 'python']","['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"What you will do
Data Insights is a diverse and talented team with strong expertise in discovering, prototyping and launching new data products.
You will be tasked with curating high quality clinical research variables from structured and unstructured data sources using creative data science approaches.
To do that, you will:
a wide range of data science techniques to iteratively prototype new approaches to turn raw clinical data into high quality research variables
Rapidly iterate on early stage products where a hybrid skill set of product intuition, customer empathy and technical expertise is essential
Do this all while mentoring team members and guiding them to tackle bigger and more complex problems
Who You Are
You are an entrepreneurial, customer-focused data scientist, experienced in driving new data capabilities.
You are excited by the prospect of tackling meaningful problems each and every day.
You are a kind, passionate and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback, and values the chance to make a real impact on peoples lives.
In addition:
You have an advanced degree in a quantitative field &/or have a minimum of 4 years of working experience in an analytical and technical capacity.
You have worked with open source data science tools and languages (R/Python) and are interested in contributing to them yourself (bonus points for experience doing so!)
Researchers, data scientists, designers, clinicians, technologists and many more all work together to improve cancer care and accelerate research.
Career coaching opportunities
Professional development benefits for attending conferences, industry events and external courses
Work/life autonomy via flexible work hours and flexible paid time off
Generous parental leave (16 weeks for either parent)
Back-up child care
Flatiron-sponsored fitness classes
","['r', 'python']","['research', 'data']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"Looking for a Senior Data Scientist/Python Developer for a top investment bank located in Manhattan, NY.
My client is looking for a senior candidate to define models that can identify different revenue opportunities across different banking products and then build the models and necessary technical infrastructure to automate execution of these models.
10+ years of expertise in Python, Hadoop, Data Science are the key requirements.
","['hadoop', 'python']",['data'],999.0,"['hadoop', 'python', 'data']"
DS,"Summary
What you’ll do:
Lead new projects and initiatives starting from understanding business to carrying out projects and presenting to stakeholders.
Design and execute data products in marketing, business operations, and customer retention spaces
Act as a subject matter expert with all things data
5 years of experience in a data science role, building predictive algorithms and data products ideally related to marketing, business operations, or customer retention
Ability to execute projects from problem formulation to influencing stakeholders.
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms such as decision forests, logistic regression, k-means clustering, etc.
Ability to communicate findings clearly and deep understanding of your current business
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and data visualization tools (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Experience with big data platform (i.e.
Hadoop)
Intensely curious – always asking questions and not being OK with the status quo.
Obsessed with making things better and more efficient.
Ability to be objective and follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data.
Strong organizational skills including time and project management
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
BS/MS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
EOE, including disability/vets
","['power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop']","['regress', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The Data Scientist shall have at least a Masterrsquos degree in data science, statistical analysis, machine learning, or related fields and seven (7) years relevant experience in research, organizational and business analyses, predictive analysis, and deep learning development with preference for experience running big data projects for the federal government or at least 24 semester hours in a combination of operations research, mathematics, probability, statistics, mathematical logic, science, or subject-matter courses requiring substantial competence in college level mathematics or statistics.Education may be a substitute for years of experience.
oDemonstrate applying appropriate methods in order to mathematically formulate and examine statistical associations between variables within a data set using R or Python oConceptualize, plan, design, and develop deep learningartificial intelligence algorithms for multi-objective optimization and decision-making tools focused on solving resource allocationprioritization problems.
oExperience implementing the following libraries in R h2o, Keras and mlr andor the following libraries in Python TensorFlow, PyTorch and mpi4py.
oExperience implementing the Data Analysis Epicycle and skilled in performing multiple correspondence analysis (MCA), principal component analysis (PCA), and association rule mining.
oAbility to develop algorithms in a High-Performance Computing (HPC) environment using custom multi-core desktop computers and Microsoft MPI oProduce executive level summary reportsbriefings of algorithm results using R Markdown or Jupyter Notebook.
oUtilizeMS Access to perform queries and analyses oUtilizeMS Excel to perform analyses to produce reports oUtilizeMS PowerPoint to produce reports oUtilizeMS Word to produce reports oUtilizeR(COT statistical analysis program)to perform analyses
","['h2o', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python']","['probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data', 'pca', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['h2o', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data', 'pca', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Would you, as a Senior Data Scientist, like to start a new R&D Data Science team housed within a leading global reinsurance specialist?
What's The Job?
Masters Degree or PhD in Computer Science or STEM field.
Statistical / Math background preferred.
Production level experience with modern Machine Learning tools and techniques.
Production level NLP experience.
Knowledge of Deep Learning techniques.
Python is your preferred language.
You have engineering fundamentals and built products in the past.
Experience with CI/CD pipelines for automated testing.
Experience using Spark with Big Data is a big plus.
Compensation:
$150,000 - $170,000
Bonus
Robust Full Benefits Package
","['r', 'spark', 'python']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'math', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'spark', 'python', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'math', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
If you are a Senior Data Scientist with experience, please read on!
Full Time/Direct Hire
- Competitive salary and stock options
- Comprehensive health, dental and vision plans
- Flexible vacation days
- Outfit your home office with the gear you need to work effectively
- Regular team retreats (...to be continued post-covid)
- Regular game nights and other fun activities (... in the mean time)
- Office in Manhattan with direct views of the High Line
What You Will Be Doing
- Partner with engineering and design to ideate and implement product changes that drive growth
What You Need for this Position
- 5+ years of experience doing quantitative analysis
- 5+ years of experience working collaboratively with engineering and design
- 5+ years experience running product optimizations and growth efforts
- Experience in manipulating data sets through statistical software or other methods.
- Experience in making analytical, data-driven decisions and communicating the results of analyses.
- Knowledge of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, product experimentation, regressions, experimentation logic and biases)
- Experience with prioritizing, communicating and influencing teams
Nice to Have (not required):
- Experience with software development/coding and/or working closely with software engineers.
- Experience with product design, or product wire-framing tools.
- Experience working on platforms with massive adoption
- Experience working on a product that has gone through hyper-growth
OR email your resume to: erinn@cybercoders.com
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
",[None],"['regress', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'optim', 'statist']",999.0,"['regress', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'optim', 'statist']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for defining, building, and improving statistical models to improve business processes and outcomes in one or more healthcare domains such as Clinical, Enrollment, Claims, and Finance.
As part of the broader analytics team, Data Scientist will gather and analyze data to solve and address complex business problems and evaluate scenarios to make predictions on future outcomes and work with the business to communicate and support decision-making.
This position requires strong analytical skills and experience in analytic methods including multivariate regressions, hierarchical linear models, regression trees, clustering methods and other complex statistical techniques.
Duties & Responsibilities:
• Develops advanced statistical models to predict, quantify or forecast various operational and performance metrics in multiple healthcare domains
• Works with multiple teams to support data collection, integration, and retention requirements based on business needs
• Identifies critical and emerging technologies that will support and extend quantitative analytic capabilities
• Collaborates with business subject matter experts to select relevant sources of information
• Develops expertise with multiple machine learning algorithms and data science techniques, such as exploratory data analysis and predictive modeling, graph theory, recommender systems, text analytics and validation
• Assists on projects/requests and may lead specific tasks within the project scope
• Prepares and manipulates data for use in development of statistical models
• Other duties as assigned
Minimum Qualifications:
-Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Qualifications:
- Master’s degree in Computer Science or Statistics
Familiarity with major cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
Healthcare Industry Experience
Minimum Qualifications:
-Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Qualifications:
- Master’s degree in Computer Science or Statistics
Familiarity with major cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
Healthcare Industry Experience
EEO Law Poster and Supplement
","['aw', 'azur', 'cloud']","['regress', 'text analytics', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'graph', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['aw', 'azur', 'cloud', 'regress', 'text analytics', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'graph', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Responsibilities
About the Role:
Clinical - Who is going to get sick?
When is the best time to implement these actions?
You Are:
Driven by curiosity and a passion to learn, you thrive in situations where you can bring clarity to ambiguous and multi-faceted problems
Obsessive about streamlining data and modeling processes; if you find you or your colleagues doing something several times, you create a standard reproducible workflow
Requirements:
MS in statistics, biostatistics, mathematics, econometrics, epidemiology, computer science, or other quantitative field
Experience with statistical/mathematical software (e.g.
R, SAS, Matlab) and data querying languages (e.g.
SQL, PLSQL) with demonstrated ability to learn and wield multiple analytical tools
Expertise in supervised and unsupervised data mining and predictive modeling techniques
Demonstrated experience executing reproducible and rigorous analyses in a timely manner
Expertise in translating business needs into relevant data-driven deliverables and analyses
Experience managing multiple projects independently, sometimes on tight deadlines
Excellent interpersonal communication skills and ability to work collaboratively across different teams
Nice to Have:
Software engineering experience (e.g.
coding standards, testing)
Experience with version control, shell scripting, and the Unix filesystem
Experience with operational analytics and applying operational research techniques to support strategic and operational decisions
Experience in quasi-experimental methods such as propensity score matching or instrumental variable analysis
Experience with medical claims, electronic medical records, and health assessment data (e.g.
OASIS, UAS-NY)
PDGM, Value Based Payment, dual-risk models, Hospice Final Rule)
","['unix', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'sa']","['risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'econometr']",999.0,"['unix', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'sa', 'risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Can you imagine what a small mom and pop pizza shop could achieve with the resources of Domino's?
Your passion for solving problems and sense of urgency will fuel the success of the team.
Graduate degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Operation Research or equivalent quantitative fields.
PhD preferred
6+ years of industry/academic experience in data science, machine learning or a related field using mainstream languages such as Python, Spark etc
Demonstrated craft in modeling and optimization techniques tailored to meet business needs
Experience in developing production level code or partnering with engineering teams to deliver product features
Track record of developing junior members from academia/industry to advance their careers in a business environment
Familiarity with programming languages such as Java, C++, Perl
Experience in product management a plus
Ilir has since built an amazing team of operators, marketers, technologists, and investors - all dedicated to making it easier for people to enjoy their favorite local pizza while helping local shops succeed.
","['perl', 'java', 'spark', 'python']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['perl', 'java', 'spark', 'python', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Global Transactions Services (GTS) is looking for a Sr. data scientist to join the Data and Insights team.
The data scientist will:
Design solutions by applying tried-and-true techniques or developing custom algorithms as needed by the business problem.
Collaborate with data engineers and platform architects to implement robust production real-time and batch decisioning solutions
Ensure operational and business metric health by monitoring production decision points
REQUIRED SKILLS
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning)
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics)
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming)
Ability to implement data science pipelines and applications in a general programming language such as Python,R, Scala
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team
Excellent communication skills (verbal, written, visual).
Must be able to work and translate needs with Engineering, Product teams, and Senior Leaders.
DESIRED SKILLS
Shift:
Hours Per Week:
40
Learn more about this role
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'excel', 'r', 'python']","['probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'excel', 'r', 'python', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"About the Role
The Market and Sales Analytics Data Scientist, is responsible for supporting the strategic analytical requirements for the global sales team.
These requirements may include new market identification, market/account segmentation, new product opportunities and return on investment.
This role reports into the Vice President, Revenue Operations, and will partner closely with the Sales Leadership team and cross functional stakeholders including marketing, finance, product management, and human resources.
This role will require the candidate to have expertise in complex analytics, modeling, database creation/manipulation, and solid communication skills.
What You'll Be Doing
Collaborate with cross-company partners and stakeholders in marketing, product management, and finance.
Create and analyze large market, competitive intelligence, commercial and e-commerce data sets to answer questions related to growth initiatives in the areas of go to market (GTM) strategy, market/account segmentation, territory creation, and capital/resource allocation.
Ability to manage large data sets from primary market research and secondary sources to mine additional insights with comprehensive skill in Python, R and SQL.
Ability to combine/enhance data bases to conduct this analysis.
Prepare comprehensive analytical flows in support of critical business decisions.
Create clear and concise analytics/reports for the commercial team, utilizing storytelling techniques and a deep comfort with field sales concepts
Respond to ad hoc requests for key commercial and business insights
Ensure that appropriate analytical techniques and data sources are fully leveraged for incoming analytics requests
Evaluate, recommend and communicate appropriate models/techniques and industry knowledge to enable other team members to answer business questions
Support data infrastructure and process improvements
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in business, economics, statistics, mathematics, or another analytical field
4+ years of experience in quantitative analytical or forecasting experience
Strong analytical, planning and organizational skills are a must.
You will be performing the tasks and managing your tasks.
Deep understanding of the types of analyses and insights that can be drawn from using data and the ability to act as an advisor and speak effectively to sales leaders about the meaning of analyses done
Complete understanding of data quality, validation and compliance processes ensuring accuracy in metrics and communicating discrepancies clearly, prior to being presented to stakeholders
Knowledge of coding techniques in R or Python, SQL and VBA, and advanced Excel skills; comfort with reporting production and automation techniques
Experience with Tableau and Salesforce
Proven track record of influencing project teams to execute plans and obtain results
Proven ability to make complex decisions when dealing with ambiguity.
Ability to link strategy to clearly actionable initiatives.
Sense of urgency to deliver both short-term and long-term results.
Team player with a proactive and collaborative approach.
Strong ability to work across functions.
Some NYC Benefits & Perks:
Fully-covered medical, dental, and vision insurance from your first day
Catered lunch, team events, healthy snacks, yoga, pilates, soccer league, and more
In The News
Fortune Magazine: 25 Best Workplaces in New York
Inc Magazine: Best Workplaces
Built In NYC: 100 Best Workplaces
Crain's: Best Places to Work in New York City
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"As a Sr. Data scientist on the T1 Seller Development team, you will own the development of analytical models to drive growth across the multi-billion dollar Seller business.
The role will focus on developing machine learning and statistics models to prove out complex growth relationships between Sellers, Products and Programs.
As one example, priority #1 for the role will be assessing behavior patterns of a Seller and correlating it to growth trajectory.
The output of this will inform the development of new software and programs to drive incremental growth.
The right candidate will have a strong interest in working with a newly formed tight knit team of data geeks that cover the full stack of data skillsets, including (1) data engineering, (2) analytics, (3) SQL and (4) ML/statistics.
The right candidate will have a strong track record of independently delivering complex analytics projects, but also guiding team members around them to build out the supporting data infrastructure to execute the work.
Basic Qualifications
· Master's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, Economics, or a related quantitative field.
· 5+ years experience applying machine-learning and scale-out approaches to complex problems
· 2+ years of experience using mainstream programming language (C++, Java, Python, or similar).
· Hands on experience with statistical analysis and R
· Strong with SQL
Preferred Qualifications
· A PhD in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Mathematics, Machine Learning, AI, Statistics, or equivalent)
· Expert in the areas of data science, machine learning and statistics.
· Advanced knowledge and expertise with Data modelling skills
· Sound business judgment with demonstrated ability to balance technical and business needs to make the right decisions about technology, models, and methodologies.
· Experience in business development
","['sql', 'r', 'java', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['sql', 'r', 'java', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"experienced Data Scientist.
The ideal candidate has experience
with building pipelines and data infrastructure.
Prior
experience at a startup and owning a project is important.
Engineering chops are a major plus.
The role is full-time and
their office if based in Dumbo.
Requirements
4+ years of data science experience
Node, React, Python, React Native
computer science or related degree
team player and great communication
If interested please send resume to kevin@ingenium.agency
","['react', 'node', 'python']","['commun', 'data', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['react', 'node', 'python', 'commun', 'data', 'pipelin']"
DS,"As a Data scientist on the T1 Seller Development team, you will own the development of analytical models to drive growth across the multi-billion dollar Seller business.
The role will focus on developing machine learning and statistics models to prove out complex growth relationships between Sellers, Products and Programs.
As one example, priority #1 for the role will be assessing behavior patterns of a Seller and correlating it to growth trajectory.
The output of this will inform the development of new software and programs to drive incremental growth.
The right candidate will have a strong interest in working with a newly formed tight knit team of data geeks that cover the full stack of data skillsets, including (1) data engineering, (2) analytics, (3) SQL and (4) ML/statistics.
The right candidate will have a strong track record of independently delivering complex analytics projects, but also guiding team members around them to build out the supporting data infrastructure to execute the work.
Basic Qualifications
· Master's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, Economics, or a related quantitative field.
· 3+ years experience applying machine-learning and scale-out approaches to complex problems
· 2+ years of experience using mainstream programming language (C++, Java, Python, or similar).
· Hands on experience with statistical analysis and R
· Strong with SQL
Preferred Qualifications
· Experience working with economists and data scientists
· Interest in working with international teams
· Experience in business development
","['sql', 'r', 'java', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['sql', 'r', 'java', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"With an annual tech budget of $10B+, it has started significantly investing and building in the next generation core infrastructure, data and AI technology.
Responsibilities
• Experiment, develop and productionize high quality machine learning models, services and platforms to make huge technology and business impact.
• Lead a team of engineers to build products and deliver solutions, depending on previous architecture and technical leadership experience.
• Design and implement highly scalable and reliable data processing pipelines and perform analyses and insights to drive and optimize business result.
Minimum Qualifications
• BS, MS or PhD degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
• Solid programming skills with C/C++, Java, Python or other equivalent languages.
• Deep knowledge in Machine Learning, Data Mining, Information Retrieval, Statistics.
• Expert in at least one of the following areas: Natural Language Processing, Computer Vision, Speech Recognition, Reinforcement Learning, Ranking and Recommendation, or Time Series Analysis.
• Major machine learning frameworks: Tensorflow, Caffe/Caffe2, Pytorch, Keras, MXNet, Scikit-Learn.
• Experience in ETL pipelines, both batch and real-time data processing.
• Strong analytical and critical thinking skills.
• Self-motivation, great communication skills and team player.
Preferred Qualifications
• Cloud computing: Google Cloud, Amazon Web Service, Azure, Docker, Kubernetes.
• Experience in big data technologies: Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Kafka.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['kubernet', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'kafka', 'spark', 'google cloud', 'mxnet', 'tensorflow', 'hadoop', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'caff', 'azur', 'hive', 'docker', 'scikit', 'java']","['etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'data', 'machine learning', 'natural language processing', 'reinforc', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['kubernet', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'kafka', 'spark', 'google cloud', 'mxnet', 'tensorflow', 'hadoop', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'caff', 'azur', 'hive', 'docker', 'scikit', 'java', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'data', 'machine learning', 'nlp', 'reinforc', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"(Solid understanding of using data with advanced analytics, BI, Data warehouse solutions or Big Data analytics to improve business performance)* Experience working with AWS, GCP, Azure, or similar cloud platform* Experience developing commercial solutions in Python, Scala, or R* Experience developing commercial data science solutions leveraging one or more of the following: operations research, natural language processing, machine learning, deep learning, video/image/text analysis, or time-series analysis.
* Experience with Structured and Unstructured Data* Experience building recommendation engines - Multi-Algorithm/Multi-Model
","['scala', 'aw', 'bi', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'research', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",999.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'powerbi', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'nlp', 'research', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"The successful candidate will be able to form solid partnerships with Credit Operations, Technology, Finance and Sales & Marketing.Responsibilities* Leverage analytics and data science to drive optimal decision-making across the customer risk management lifecycle i.e., acquisition, underwriting, operations, portfolio management and collections.
",[None],"['risk', 'optim', 'financ', 'data']",999.0,"['risk', 'optim', 'financ', 'data']"
DS,"This person should have experience writing surveys to a digital audience, analyzing results, and connecting results to first and third party data sources.
* Incorporate complex technical and business requirements into research when applicable.
* Review and approve survey programming to ensure critical data elements are in place for effective analysis.
* Ensure quality fielding, clean and format data, prepare summary statistics and cross tabulation analysis.
* Conduct market and competitive analysis to observe trends and highlight changes.Preferred Qualifications:* 3+ years of professional experience in qualitative and/or quantitative survey research.
* Demonstrated ability to translate complex data sets into clear and actionable narratives, and ability to communicate opportunities and challenges to multiple stakeholders.
* Understanding of statistics, testing methodologies, market segmentation theories and the analytics behind them and market research concepts and techniques.
* Experience in deploying, programming and/or writing surveys.
* Experience integrating user research into product, design and marketing practices.
* Strong presentation skills specifically speaking about research methodologies and findings.
Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
",[None],"['data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'segment']",999.0,"['data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'segment']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for defining, building, and improving statistical models to improve business processes and outcomes in one or more healthcare domains such as Clinical, Enrollment, Claims, and Finance.
As part of the broader analytics team, Data Scientist will gather and analyze data to solve and address complex business problems and evaluate scenarios to make predictions on future outcomes and work with the business to communicate and support decision-making.
This position requires strong analytical skills and experience in analytic methods including multivariate regressions, hierarchical linear models, regression trees, clustering methods and other complex statistical techniques.
Duties & Responsibilities:
• Develops advanced statistical models to predict, quantify or forecast various operational and performance metrics in multiple healthcare domains
• Investigates, recommends, and initiates acquisition of new data resources from internal and external sources
• Works with multiple teams to support data collection, integration, and retention requirements based on business needs
• Identifies critical and emerging technologies that will support and extend quantitative analytic capabilities
• Collaborates with business subject matter experts to select relevant sources of information
• Develops expertise with multiple machine learning algorithms and data science techniques, such as exploratory data analysis and predictive modeling, graph theory, recommender systems, text analytics and validation
• Assists on projects/requests and may lead specific tasks within the project scope
• Prepares and manipulates data for use in development of statistical models
• Other duties as assigned
Minimum Qualifications:
-Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Qualifications:
- Master’s degree in Computer Science or Statistics
Familiarity with major cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
Healthcare Industry Experience
Minimum Qualifications:
-Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Qualifications:
- Master’s degree in Computer Science or Statistics
Familiarity with major cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
Healthcare Industry Experience
EEO Law Poster and Supplement
]]>
","['aw', 'azur', 'cloud']","['regress', 'text analytics', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'graph', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['aw', 'azur', 'cloud', 'regress', 'text analytics', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'graph', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"From birthday parties to gameday potlucks, life's special moments are bettered by the craftsmanship and tradition found behind local pizzerias' counters.
This united network of pizzerias enables these small businesses to thrive against major corporate chains and form the nation's largest marketplace for authentic pizza.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
DS,"Real World Data, Healthcare Data Scientist
Responsibilities
Conduct discussions with clients and internal stakeholders to understand business problems and use cases then formulate focused solutions
Extract and integrate results across disparate datasets
Augment internal data with third party sources of information when needed
Independently conduct analyses with a hands-on, detail-oriented approach
Lead and conduct Real World Evidence analyses which may include, but not limited to:
Longitudinal retrospective studies of existing databases to assess patient characteristics, treatment patterns, and associated clinical, economic and/or patient-reported outcomes
Retrospective or prospective evaluations of disease treatment patterns, outcomes including drug utilization and adherence;
Cross-sectional analyses of patients, caregivers, health care providers/practitioners, and/or payers;
Assessments exploring the burden of illness, patient preference and/or comparative effectiveness;
Models of cost-effectiveness; indirect treatment comparison models and methodologies
Data modeling using advanced methods in Machine Learning, Predictive Modeling
Socialize key insights through objective story-telling that brings meaningful and actionable context to drive more data-informed decision making
Qualifications
Master's/Bachelor's Degree in Analytics/Data Science/Statistics/Mathematics/Engineering/ Computer Science or related
5+ years of Analytics/modeling experience working with large, complex, and disparate datasets
3+ years of experience in a Healthcare organization such as Provider, Payer, and Pharmaceutical
Knowledge of Healthcare Real World Data including but not limited to Electronic Health Records, Medical and Pharmacy Claims, Pricing, Affiliation, and Formulary.
Understanding of care and claims upstream processes.
Expert in complex data extraction using SQL
Data management and Predictive modeling/Machine learning using Python/R/SAS
Understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as GLM Models, Regularization, KNN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Trees, Random Forest, etc.
Experience with at least one business intelligence/visualization tool such as Tableau, Domo
Analytic problem-solving skills with a creative and innovative outlook
Excellent communication (written and oral) including describing complex data topics in simple terms
Exceptional organizational, strategic thinking and problem-solving skills
Competency with Microsoft Office, particularly PowerPoint, Excel and Word
Ability to work well in a matrix driven organization
Background in epidemiology or biostatistics experience preferred but not required
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'sa']","['data modeling', 'bay', 'glm', 'data', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'random forest', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'econom', 'knn', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'sa', 'data modeling', 'bay', 'glm', 'data', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'random forest', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'econom', 'knn', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
+ Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
+ Build 'smart' systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
+ Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution
In the first year this role will focus on the following
+ Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
+ Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
+ Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
+ Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
+ Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers
Required Qualifications
+ Master's Degree + 3 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 5 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
+ Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
+ Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
+ Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ Master's Degree or PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
",[None],"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Salary: competitive
Sectors: Data and Business Intelligence
Job Type: Permanent
A well funded start-up in the green energy space is looking for a individual contributor Data Scientist to join their team in NYC focusing on customer DS model development.
The person would be working across multiple teams with passionate professionals with various backgrounds.
Compensation is competitive and could include an equity package as well.
Requirements:
3+ Years of industry Data Science experience
Experience working with customer focused data science models (Customer Segmentation, Churn propensity etc.)
Master's degree or higher in a quantitative/technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Physics etc)
Excellent communication skills
Experience with AWS, SQL
Ideal background would be someone with previous experience in the energy sector
","['excel', 'sql', 'aw']","['data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'aw', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"About_our_Client
Designation: Computer Vision - Image Analytics Data Scientist
Experience: 7+ years
Duration: 6+ months contract with possible extension
Required_Skills_/_Experience:
2+ years of experience in computer vision algorithm development within
image analytics
2+ years of experience programming in (like C++, R, Python, etc..)
Expertise in developing computer vision frameworks to analyze human
movement and facial expressions
Excellent data science skills, including a strong understanding of
statistics, probability, and algorithms
7+ years of overall experience delivering scalable and resilient
services at large enterprise scale
If you are interested in this role, please_attach_your_updated_resume while
applying.
For more information, reach out toMukaddish Alion .
","['r', 'excel', 'python']","['probabl', 'statist', 'computer vision', 'data']",999.0,"['r', 'excel', 'python', 'probabl', 'statist', 'computer vision', 'data']"
DS,"Req ID: 68574BR
The Clinical Products team has three main goals.
Second, the team develops data-driven clinical recommendations that are delivered to members, their providers, and their caregivers.
pricing) better predict member care journeys.
About the position.
A Principal Data Scientist will join the Clinical Products team and will be responsible for leading and providing technical vision for one or (more likely) more projects.
A Principal Data Scientist will build and lead a team that develops predictive models, works with clinical experts (e.g.
doctors) to translate their subject matter expertise into machine learning models, sources data, and presents to technical and non-technical stakeholders.
A Principal Data Scientist will also lead and mentor team members.
Finally, Principal Data Scientist will need to help set the team s coherent, actionable, and inspiring technical visionand she will need to inspire the team to execute on that vision.
Fundamental Components included but are not limited to:
+ Lead team of 2-3 Data Scientists to develop and deliver models that inform CVS-Aetna s clinical programs.
+ Consults with business partners and clinical leaders to understand problems and goals, understand business value, and translate into business opportunities to be captured through predictive analytics solutions.
+ Develops and/or uses advanced algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes
+ Demonstrates superior communication skills, and ability to develop and participate in presentations and consultations to business stakeholders on analytics results and solutions
+ Supports deployment of insights across multiple channels, i.e., web, mobile app, email, social, call center, Apple watch
+ Motivates team members and probes into technical detail
+ Contributes Subject Matter Expertise (SME) through interactions with team members, peers and managers to exchange complex information related to areas of specialization
+ Mentors others, and champions 360-feedback across team
Qualifications Requirements and Preferences:
+ 7-10 or more years of progressively complex related experience.
+ Demonstrates proficiency in all areas of mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling and advanced in-depth specialization in some areas.
+ Deep knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
+ Demonstrates strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to business partners.
+ Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.
+ Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.
+ Clinically oriented background or professional experience is a plus.
Benefit Eligibility
Benefit eligibility may vary by position.
Job Function: Data & Analytics
Aetna is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veterans status.
",['excel'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",3.0,"['excel', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"What You'll Do
Mentor more junior data-scientists one to one, through peer reviews and academic guidance
Who You Are
You will have at least 5 years experience in applied research, statistical modeling and ML with a degree or higher (MS/PhD) in statistics, mathematics, econometrics, or similar field
Significant breadth and depth of statistics/ML knowledge
High level of ability in R or Python
Competence with SQL and experience performing analysis on large datasets
Experience working and creating data/feature pipelines is a plus
You are capable of taking on loosely defined business problems and translating complex thinking into practical application for diverse audiences
You are a communicative person who values building strong relationships with colleagues and partners and enjoys mentoring and teaching others
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'econometr', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'econometr', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job title: Senior Data Scientist
Strategy & Planning
· Work with cross departmental team to define metrics, guidelines, and strategies for effective use of algorithms and data.
· Identify, design, and build appropriate datasets for identification of complex Data pattern and analytics.
· Create data mining and analytics architectures, coding standards, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies.
· Establish links across existing data sources and find new, interesting mash-ups.
· Coordinate data resource requirements between analytics, Application teams and Business Stakeholders.
· Work with product managers, engineers, and analytics team members to translate prototypes into production
· Assist in the development of data management policies and procedures.
· Develop best practices for analytics instrumentation and experimentation.
Acquisition & Deployment
· Conduct research and make recommendations on big data infrastructure, database technologies, analytics tools, services, protocols, and standards in support of procurement and development efforts.
· Well versed in Cloud technologies and Big Data platform.
· Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources.
Operational Management
· Develop algorithms and predictive models to solve critical business problems.
· Analyze historical data, identify patterns come up with predictive, prescriptive, descriptive and cognitive analytics.
· Develop tools and libraries that will help analytics team members more efficiently interface with huge amounts of data.
· Will deep dive as the requirement demands into supervised machine learning (classification – binary target variable).
Expert in handling a suite of non-parametric classification algorithms (Decisions Tree, Rule-Based classifier & Naive Bayes) as well as parametric classification algorithms (Logistic Regression, Support Vector Machine, Nearest Neighbor Classifiers) with deeper use of R, python.
Expert in Un supervised learning techniques.
Knows the optimal method /technique to use in different situations.
· Analyze large, noisy datasets and identify meaningful patterns that provide actionable results.
· Develop and automate new enhanced imputation algorithms.
· Create informative visualizations that intuitively display large amounts of data and/or complex relationships.
· Develop, implement, and maintain change control and testing processes for modifications to algorithms and data analytics.
· Collaborate with database and disaster recovery administrators to ensure effective protection and integrity of data assets.
· Manage and/or provide guidance to junior members of the analytics team.
Position Requirements
Formal Education & Certification
· Minimum 5 years’ experience in modeling and analysis Graduate or post graduate university degree in the field of computer science, mathematics, or statistics, Data Science and/or [10] years + equivalent work experience.
· Certifications in CAP highly desirable.
Knowledge & Experience
· Well versed with CRISP-DM methodology and reference model.
· Very Hands on.
Has proven track record of successful Data Science implementations from industry preferably Public Transportation and Travel industry.
· Responsible for building advanced analytics and models for critical business areas including schedule optimization, anomaly detection of the routes, driver utilizations, GPS data and engine fault codes.
· Perform advanced quantitative and statistical analysis of large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and correlations that can be used to improve business performance.
· Develop scalable, efficient, and automated processes for large scale data analyses and model development, validation, and implementation.
· Utilization of machine learning and other techniques to prevent, detect/resolve route data and operational data anomalies requiring human intervention.
· Core and strategic responsibility to assess, plan and develop driver scoring algorithms and model.
· Collaborates with internal and external business and data teams, data engineers and analysts.
· Oversee processes within the Data and Analytics team to ensure sustainable and efficient deployment of algorithm trained models.
· Advanced knowledge one or more of the following: Linear and Non-Linear Models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, SVM, Neural Networks, Unsupervised Methods (Dimensionality Reduction, Clustering, etc.)
· Probabilistic Modeling and Computation.
· Machine Learning, including Deep Learning.
· Advanced knowledge in R and Python.
· Advanced experience with SQL skills.
· Must be able to perform impact data analysis and data profiling on source data systems and determine best way to model data.
· Employ data visualization tools where appropriate (ggplot, Tableau, ThinkCell, etc.).
· Clearly communicate project requirements and modeling outcomes to technical and non-technical audiences.
· Ability to work in a self-directed work environment.
· Ability to work in a team environment.
· Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
· Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
If you are interested, please fill the below details and send along with your updated resume.
• Visa Status:
• Contact Number:
• Are you open to face to face interview?
:
:
• Expected Rate $/Hr:
• Skype ID:
• Project Availability:
• Best time to reach:
Regards,
Hameed Shaikh
Phone : 732-743-8526
Email: hameed.s@spikeitglobal.
com
Web : www.spikeitglobal.com
nullQualifications
null
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'data mining', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'anomali', 'recommend']",2.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'data mining', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Job Overview:
This is a hands-on role located in New York City.
Responsibilities:
Champion the use of data science, machine learning, and AI to reduce cost and increase the value of human judgment in decision making.
Lead data science projects
Work with business partners to understand how data science can help meet their business needs, formulate quantitative and measurable objectives, and guide them to actionable solutions.
Use advanced research techniques such as statistical analysis, machine learning, and data visualization to explore data, test hypotheses, identify underlying causes and patterns.
Collaborate with divisions to leverage best in breed data science practice already in place, share knowledge and create new models and algorithms to solve problems distinct to corporate (e.g.
sales forecasting, promo optimization, etc.)
Participate in the design and building of the data science center of excellence.
Required Skills & Qualifications:
Degree in a quantitative field (Mathematics, Computer Science, Statistics, Operational Research, Engineering, etc).
Solid understanding and professional experience in statistical analysis
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with experience in breaking down a complex problem into solvable components
Strong skills in data extraction, exploration, transformation and visualization
Deep understanding of best-in-class and emerging methods and techniques in data science, with a high level of analytical rigor in formulating insights and strategies
A confident, self-starter with the ability to think logically and make fact-based decisions
Able to communicate clearly and concisely – to distill clear and simple themes from complex analytical findings
Enjoy forward and critical thinking
Strong leadership shills
Technical Skill Requirements:
Proficient in Python and Jupiter Notebook
Experience using data science and ML libraries, such as SciPy and scikit-learn
Data visualization tools (e.g.
MatPlotLib, Seaborn, Tableau, etc.)
Familiar with Git/Github
Operating with data at scale (e.g.
Apache Spark, Snowflake, Databricks, etc.)
Desired Skills:
Advanced degree in a quantitative field
Experience in a deep learning library (e.g.
PyTorch, Keras/Tensorflow)
Cloud machine learning platforms, e.g.
AWS SageMaker
Writing and tuning SQL
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'github', 'excel', 'git', 'sagemak', 'sql', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'tensorflow', 'seaborn', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'github', 'excel', 'git', 'sagemak', 'sql', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'tensorflow', 'seaborn', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The team:The Cloud Cost Optimization team works directly with the CTO and is responsible for identifying and executing on cost-saving opportunities, providing engineering teams actionable visibility into spend, and empowering finance to understand and incorporate the complexities of cloud costs.
The opportunity:As a Data Scientist on the CloudOps team, you'll work with and analyze usage and billing data generated from cloud applications.
You will:* Build marginal cost models using cloud usage and cost data, and use these models to discover trends and build forecasts* Own and refine cloud provider billing data ingestion pipelines* Develop new ways to understand the relationship between cloud resource consumption in complex containerized environments and business drivers* Think deeply about what data and actionable views to surface from CxO down to individual engineers deploying new projects* Develop metrics that bring clarity too complicated environments including containers, shared resources, and bespoke cost variables.
Requirements:* You've worked with leadership to define a problem space, select questions to be answered, and created repeatable compelling reporting to ""solve"" stakeholder understanding* You have experience creating and maintaining data ETL pipelines using Spark, Luigi, Airflow, and other open-source technologies using programming languages like Python, Scala, SQL* You're comfortable spending the day in notebooks (Zeppelin, Jupyter, Observable, etc) and have frequently used notebooks to share findings and create insight for yourself and others* You enjoy getting to the bottom of arcane data sets; and creating logic to make those same datasets understandable to the masses * You're comfortable with ambiguity in the early stages of a project; and appreciate the work needed to determine the how in reaching an objective* You're familiar with cloud infrastructure; and what an engineers may consider when deciding on a serverless solution, or a particular cloud server.
* You have a BS/MS/PhD in a scientific/quantitative field or equivalent experience Bonus points:* Have previously worked with cloud provider billing data* Interested in business outcomes, high impact projects that have a tangible result on business metrics.
You've worked on these projects in the past and are eager for more.
* You've faced a tradeoff between increasing infrastructure cost or increasing the cost to team time.
You've been woken up by infrastructure alarms.
* You hold some strong opinions on the features in AWS Cost Explorer, the GCP billing console, or Azure Cost Management + Billing
","['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'airflow', 'sql', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'etl', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'airflow', 'sql', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'etl', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The ideal candidate has experience with building pipelines and data infrastructure.
Prior experience at a startup and owning a project is important.
Engineering chops are a major plus.
The role is full-time and their office if based in Dumbo.
Requirements
- 4+ years of data science experience
- Node, React, Python, React Native
- computer science or related degree
- team player and great communication
If interested please send resume to kevin@ingenium.agency
","['react', 'node', 'python']","['commun', 'data', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['react', 'node', 'python', 'commun', 'data', 'pipelin']"
DS,"As one of the members of this business-critical team, you will:
Build a working relationship with the team and client-facing stakeholders
Actively following and improve the coding best practices followed by the team
Deliver against high standards for execution for client deliverables
Partner with Product to understand team input required to enable successful productization of requests
Possess a strong blend of technology and analytical skill
Demonstrable success in conducting analyses to generate business insights
Experience tackling a variety of analytics projects
Ability to build strong visualization to tell a compelling data story
Prior experience in both optimizing and automating data queries
Solution/Delivery-oriented team player willing to go above and beyond
High motivation, work ethic, and self-discipline to organize and complete tasks
After 3 months, you will
Iterate to push the boundaries on what problems can be solved through data analytics
",[None],"['busi', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['busi', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"Hi,
Data Scientist with background in Epidemiology –Consultant with health data analytics expertise-Immediate
Duration: start off 3 mos.
with high likelihood of extension
Must have excellent written and oral communication skills
Must be Senior Resource ( 10 yrs+) in Health Data Analytics field
Must have multiple project experience working for large hospital( over 750+ beds)/Public Health Agency
Functional data experience with lab results/meeting KPI’s in Pandemics/Covid-infectious diseases
more of a Functional resource who had extensive experience in Data Analytics working with Major Hospitals in NA also should have Population Health Systems Expertise.
Sincerely,
HR Manager
Phone: 425-999-4933
Email: arun(AT)nfolksdata.com
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
if interested please send me the resumes on arun(at)nfolksdata.com
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'kpi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'kpi']"
DS,"You'll be part of a fiercely collaborative technology team charged with creating digital solutions that are transforming the way employers and job seekers connect.
Developing next-generation applications and products for some of the most recognized brands in the world.
All this in an environment that constantly challenges you to push beyond boundaries and enhance your expertise - with the support of a global team of industry experts.
Sound like a fit for your talent and passion?
Read on.
What does a Sr. Data Scientist do?
Building machine learning models to optimize campaign performance at massive scale
Identifying, creating, and transforming informative features based on historical and real-time data
Leading the technical direction of the Data Science team, in parallel with the VP, Product
Working with Product to define data collection and modeling frameworks
Coordinating and working closely with engineering to put models and algorithms into production
Working collaboratively with other Data Science teams in cross product efforts
Deep understanding of statistical and machine learning models (logistic regression, decision trees, SVMs, etc.)
and clustering and classification techniques
Proven experience building models and placing models into production
Experience in optimization problems, and solving those problems at scale
Well versed in statistical programming languages such as R, Python
Familiarity with relational databases such as Postgres and Amazon Redshift and accessing data via SQL
Degree in a technical field such as computer science, artificial intelligence, engineering
Graduate work in machine learning a plus or relevant work experience
Experience in ""Ad Tech"" data science principles a huge plus
Data driven leader, ready to provide technical direction to a team from day 1
Knows and loves the startup world - quick thinking and acting with minimal/no supervision
Self-driven, independent, creative and eager to learn new skills
Ability to work effectively with incomplete information
Great communication skills
Embraces the remote nature of the future of work
","['redshift', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'postgr']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'logist', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'optim', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['redshift', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'logist', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'optim', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Learn more at doubleverify.com.
What You'll Do:
Work on problems related to machine learning and data analytics over hundreds of millions of web pages; graph mining and algorithmic optimization on petabytes of data; and causal inference with missing data - to name a few.
Who You Are:
You have a sustained track record of making significant, self-directed, and end-to-end contributions to large and impactful machine learning projects.
You think beyond just the task at hand to deeply understand the 'why' behind what you are doing.
You have a strong sense of data intuition.
You are able to work from first principles and intuition to develop solutions and adapt them to a unique environment.
You are a broadly skilled data scientist with experience embedding models into always-on production systems, working across a variety of technologies and data sources.
You have a product-focused mindset.
You work with confidence and without ego.
You have strongly-held, defensible ideas, and advocate for what you believe is right.
You are also adept at identifying and evaluating trade-offs, willing to be proven wrong, and quick to walk through fire to support your fellow teammates.
You value, seek out, and foster diversity.
To complement this team, you will welcome ideas that are different from your own and be skilled at finding and building from common ground.
You are a creative thinker, not bound by ""the way things have always been done.""
What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate.
You have an abundance of intellectual curiosity and are enthusiastic to learn (and teach) new technologies / techniques.
You are comfortable working on an agile, distributed team spanning multiple time zones and continents.
You are able to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical audiences.
You have over 3 years of experience working in a data-driven role.
Some of those years of experience may have been spent pursuing an advanced degree in a quantitative field, but it's not a requirement.
You have experience with big data technologies such as Spark or AWS; are able to write efficient SQL; and are proficient in one or more of the following programming languages: R, Python, or Scala.
","['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'aw']","['big data', 'data', 'causal', 'optim', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'aw', 'big data', 'data', 'causal', 'optim', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Entry level
Graduate and entry level positions
Type of job
Full-time
Area of Expertise
Data Analytics/Engineering
Your job
Build and implemen...
Open job details
Published on 04/29/2019
",[None],['data'],2.0,['data']
DS,"The Personalization team makes deciding what to play next easier and more enjoyable for every listener.
What You'll Do:
Build lasting solutions to experimentation and attribution modeling
Commit to ensuring industry-leading best practices for experimental design and statistical analysis
Who You Are:
You will have at least 5 years experience in applied research and statistical modeling with a degree or higher (MS/PhD) in statistics, mathematics, econometrics, or similar field
Significant expertise in experimentation methodologies
Significant breadth and depth of statistics/ML knowledge
High level of ability in R or Python
Competence with SQL and experience performing analysis on large datasets
You are capable of taking on loosely defined problems and translating complex thinking into practical application for diverse audiences
You are a communicative person who values building strong relationships with colleagues and partners and enjoys mentoring and teaching others
You bring passion and playfulness to your work and those around you
,.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['experimental design', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'experimental design', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Role Summary
This role reports to the Vice President, Data Products.
Responsibilities
Establish and maintain relationships with key partner stakeholders at strategic partner sites and serve as the liaison to provide expert support on all data and technology features and projects.
Lead training activities for strategic client partners, providing presentations and consultation to maximize the value obtained from data products and technology solutions.
Contribute to the development of study protocols, statistical analysis plans , programming specification and output documents
Access internal stakeholders as needed to support partner aims, including team members from Outcomes Services (OSS), Data Science, Patient Engagement, and other areas relevant to partner needs
Coordinate delivery schedules, manage client expectations, and assure successful integration of products and technology into partner workflows.
Manage eureka Health pre-sales and post-sales efforts in partnership with business development and product teams.
Engage with and present to executives, data science teams, and clinical teams.
Supervise execution of projects within a matrix environment, including coordinating project activities, participating in client-facing project meetings, providing guidance and leadership when analyzing research findings, developing results presentations and recommendations, and validating deliverables.
Requirements
PhD, MD or equivalent in AI/Machine Learning, Data Science, statistics, biostatistics, epidemiology or in a related discipline.
5+ years experience in life Science or biotech industry in a Data Science role.
2+ years of experience in a client-facing role supporting real-world data (RWD) client projects would be a plus.
2+ years of experience in (RWD) study design, data preparation, and data modeling.
Excellent time management skills, contributing to multiple projects with competing timelines.
Experience designing and executing prospective or retrospective database studies.
Publications in peer reviewed journals and/or abstracts in scientific conferences.
Proven experience working with large, individual-level data sets or in a (RWD) data analyst role.
Strong programming skills in Python, R and deep knowledge of (RWD) data sets and how best to select the right data sources given the study question at hand.
","['r', 'excel', 'python']","['data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",3.0,"['r', 'excel', 'python', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Heshe will exercise their knowledge of descriptive and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques to develop strategic insights to drive business goals.
Works hard at advancing the state-of-the-art in how data is applied to solve problems in Public Transportation industry.
Responsibilities Strategy Planning Work with cross departmental team to define metrics, guidelines, and strategies for effective use of algorithms and data.
Identify, design, and build appropriate datasets for identification of complex Data pattern and analytics.
Create data mining and analytics architectures, coding standards, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies.
Establish links across existing data sources and find new, interesting mash-ups.
Coordinate data resource requirements between analytics, Application teams and Business Stakeholders.
Work with product managers, engineers, and analytics team members to translate prototypes into production Assist in the development of data management policies and procedures.
Develop best practices for analytics instrumentation and experimentation.
Acquisition Deployment Conduct research and make recommendations on big data infrastructure, database technologies, analytics tools, services, protocols, and standards in support of procurement and development efforts.
Well versed in Cloud technologies and Big Data platform.
Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources.
Operational Management Develop algorithms and predictive models to solve critical business problems.
Analyze historical data, identify patterns come up with predictive, prescriptive, descriptive and cognitive analytics.
Develop tools and libraries that will help analytics team members more efficiently interface with huge amounts of data.
Will deep dive as the requirement demands into supervised machine learning (classification ndash binary target variable).
Expert in handling a suite of non-parametric classification algorithms (Decisions Tree, Rule-Based classifier Naive Bayes) as well as parametric classification algorithms (Logistic Regression, Support Vector Machine,Nearest Neighbor Classifiers) with deeper use of R, python.
Expert in Un supervised learning techniques.
Knows the optimal method technique to use in different situations.
Analyze large, noisy datasets and identify meaningful patterns that provide actionable results.
Develop and automate new enhanced imputation algorithms.
Create informative visualizations that intuitively display large amounts of data andor complex relationships.
Develop, implement, and maintain change control and testing processes for modifications to algorithms and data analytics.
Collaborate with database and disaster recovery administrators to ensure effective protection and integrity of data assets.
Manage andor provide guidance to junior members of the analytics team.
Position Requirements Formal Education Certification Minimum 5 yearsrsquo experience in modeling and analysis Graduate or post graduate university degree in the field of computer science, mathematics, or statistics, Data Science andor 10 years + equivalent work experience.
Certifications in CAP highly desirable.
Knowledge Experience Well versed with CRISP-DM methodology and reference model.
Very Hands on.
Has proven track record of successful Data Science implementations from industry preferably Public Transportation and Travel industry.
Responsible for building advanced analytics and models for critical business areas including schedule optimization, anomaly detection of the routes, driver utilizations, GPS data and engine fault codes.
Perform advanced quantitative and statistical analysis of large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and correlations that can be used to improve business performance.
Develop scalable, efficient, and automated processes for large scale data analyses and model development, validation, and implementation.
Utilization of machine learning and other techniques to prevent, detectresolve route data and operational data anomalies requiring human intervention.
Core and strategic responsibility to assess, plan and develop driver scoring algorithms and model.
Collaborates with internal and external business and data teams, data engineers and analysts.
Oversee processes within the Data and Analytics team to ensure sustainable and efficient deployment of algorithm trained models.
Advanced knowledge one or more of the following Linear and Non-Linear Models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, SVM, Neural Networks, Unsupervised Methods (Dimensionality Reduction, Clustering, etc.)
Probabilistic Modeling and Computation.
Machine Learning, including Deep Learning.
Advanced knowledge in R and Python.
Advanced experience with SQL skills.
Must be able to perform impact data analysis and data profiling on source data systems and determine best way to model data.
Employ data visualization tools where appropriate (ggplot, Tableau, ThinkCell, etc.).
Clearly communicate project requirements and modeling outcomes to technical and non-technical audiences.
Ability to work in a self-directed work environment.
Ability to work in a team environment.
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources Well versed with Git.
Expert in using NLP, Ensemble methods.
Do Exploratory Data analysis using SQL.
Must have machine learning and AI expertise.
Familiarity with relational,SQL and NoSQL databases.
Expert knowledge of statistical analysis tools such as R, R studio, Matlab, Rapid Miner Good working knowledge of Reporting Analytical tools like Tableau, Power BI Experience with very large datasets a must.
Knowledge of mapreduce framework (hivepig other tools for accessing data in HadoopHBase cluster systems) a plus.
Experience in programming withJAVA, Perl, C. Project management experience.
Good understanding of the organizationrsquos goals and objectives.
Knowledge of applicable data privacy practices and laws.
Personal Attributes A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data.
A flexible analytic approach that allows for results at varying levels of precision.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Strong technical documentation skills.
Good interpersonal skills.
Highly self-motivated and directed.
Keen attention to detail.
Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
Strong customer service orientation.
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
Contact Details 703-876-0070 X 331, sunilhadiamondstar.com
","['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'python', 'power bi', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'perl', 'cloud']","['big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'exploratori', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'anomali', 'recommend']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'python', 'powerbi', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'perl', 'cloud', 'big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'exploratori', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Principal Metrics Analyst->> Provides advanced guidance and technical leadership across multiple areas for CTS organizational and functional effectiveness measurements.
Works with business stakeholders to develop strategic solutions.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
DS,"Responsibilities
Applies and integrates advanced statistical, mathematical, data mining, predictive modeling and business analysis skills and techniques to discover and identify new insights, predict and prescribe outcomes, advise on turning new insights into actionable opportunities and outcomes, and provide the tracking and measurement of results.
Develop solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, machine learning techniques, and robust analytics to support analytic insights and visualization of complex data sets for productization and monetization.
Models need constant refitting as data changes over time.Interprets available internal and external data resources to develop and deliver information solutions, including analytical information.
Applies creative problem solving and inter-departmental networking to address data and information needs across the enterprise.
Shares best practices with peers through coaching and mentoring around core methodologies, patterns, standards and processes.
Through a clear understanding of the assigned business area, utilizes technical skills to access and extract data from diverse sources residing on multiple platforms and implement large, complex data models and information solutions by combining, synthesizing and structuring data from various data sources.
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Econometrics or related field 5+ years relevant experience with a proven track record of leveraging analytics to drive significant business impact or to develop data/algorithm-based products
Statistical knowledge and intuition - ideally utilized in A/B testingExperience with distributed databases and query languages like Hive, Spark, Scala, or PigProgramming
Experience with a scripting language such as Python, Perl, Java, or RubyProficiency with a statistical analysis tool such as R or SASRelational, and/or columnar data experience requiredExperience with SQLMachine learning experience
Ability to tell a story with data - What does the analysis tell you?
What do you think the business should do next?
Why do you think what is happening, is happening?
Ability to influence others with the story of what you're seeing in the data to make business recommendations
Ability and desire to mentor other team members through projects independently from start to finish, working with internal and external teams to make decisions and maintain momentum
Excellent time and project management skills, with the ability to manage detail work and communicate project status effectively to all levels
Proven track record in meeting aggressive deadlines
Master's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Econometrics or related fieldPhD in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related field.
This job is not covered by the existing Collective Bargaining Agreement.
Get started now!
","['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'r', 'perl', 'hive', 'java']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",1.0,"['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'r', 'perl', 'hive', 'java', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"You'll work with datasets that include millions of detailed medical, pharmacy, lab claims, EHR, and application data.
The ideal candidate will be an entrepreneurial, motivated data scientist who is well-versed in data analysis and algorithm implementation and eager to learn new things and make an impact on the industry.
Responsibilities:
Design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets - user activity, EHR, ADT, medical claims, pharmacy claims, lab test claims etc.
Derive insights from descriptive analysis that drive a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes.
Qualifications:
Experience building high quality data products.
7+ years experience as a data scientist, software engineer with predictive modeling, or similar experience of solving real problems with data mining and machine learning techniques.
PhD or Master’s Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied statistics, physics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Proficiency in building Machine Learning (supervised and unsupervised) models and recommendation systems.
Strong knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Ability to execute, starting from problem definition, to a working implementation.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Proficiency in Python and code versioning systems like git.
Expertise with data science toolkits like scikit-learn and pandas.
Knowledge of software architectures and tools such as Scala, Hadoop.
Familiarity working in a Linux server-based environment.
Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers.
jsmith@quartethealth.com).
account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email.
Have someone to refer?
","['linux', 'scala', 'git', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit']","['probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['linux', 'scala', 'git', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume when submitting your application for consideration.
To participate in some selection activities you will need to respond to an invitation.
The invitation can be sent by both email and text message.
In order to receive text message invitations, your profile must include a mobile phone number designated as Personal Cell or Cellular in the contact information of your application.
It all begins with outstanding talent.
It all begins with you.
The Risk and Finance CIO organization provides technology to several lines of businesses including Risk, Compliance, Finance, Audit and Legal with a combined technology spending in excess of $500+MM annually and is a 1100+ person global organization.
This individual will be responsible for standing up cutting-edge analytical capabilities, leveraging automation, cognitive and science-based techniques to manage data and models, and drive operational efficiency by offering continuous insights and improvements.
Key Responsibilities:
Strong understanding of data science techniques and libraries and their applicability to business problem classes
Help in design and implementation of algorithms and tools for analytics and data scientist teams.
Use a variety of languages, tools and frameworks to marry data and systems together.
Collaborate with modelers, developers, DevOps and project managers on meeting project goals.
Required Qualifications
10+ years of application development and implementation experience
A BS/BA degree or higher in science or technology
8+ years of experience with Big Data or Hadoop tools such as Spark, Hive, Kafka and Map
10+ years of experience in one or a combination of the following: data management, data science, Artificial Intelligence (AI) or Machine Learning (ML)
3+ years of experience developing scripts for data extraction, data transformation and loading in a distributed database environment
4+ years of experience delivering ETL, data warehouse and data analytics capabilities on big-data architecture such as Hadoop
6 + years of experience working on cross-organization initiatives
4+ years of development experience with languages such as Python, Java, Scala, or R
4+ years of Low Latency systems development or implementation experience
2 + years of architecture, engineering experience, or a combination of both, with distributed storage and processing technologies
5+ years of experience in software delivery in a large matrixed organization or on a complex system such as AKA, Development, DEVOPS, or QA
Desired Qualifications
Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal communication skills
4 + years of statistical modeling experience using the R programming language
Knowledge and understanding of analytical methods used in: statistical analysis, modeling, and reporting
Knowledge and understanding of modeling techniques such as ANOVA, Decision Tree, Neural, Logistic, and Monte Carlo
SAS programming experience in model implementation, reporting, and complex data manipulations
Experience with Tensorflow, Theano or Keras
Knowledge and understanding of Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Linear Regression, Models (Tensor Flow)
Other Desired Qualifications
8+ years of experience deploying or managing data pipelines for supporting data-science-driven decisioning at scale
4+ years of experience with python, unix and pyspark programming
4+ years of experience on distributed, high throughput and low latency architecture based on Hortonworks Hadoop Cluster, Private/Public Clouds
Job Expectations
Ability to travel up to 10% of the time
Disclaimer
Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.
","['unix', 'kera', 'tensor', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'kafka', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'java']","['risk', 'regress', 'etl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'tensor', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'kafka', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'java', 'risk', 'regress', 'etl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"This is Full Time Position.
Members of HCAP are curators of employee data and leverage it to help answer strategic and operational talent questions for leaders across the business.
Ideal applicants will have a bachelor’s degree or higher and three to five years of relevant work experience developing automated analytical reporting products in a business setting.
Experience building ETLs, manipulating data at scale, and overseeing the technical operations of data infrastructure is essential.
Knowledge of scripting languages for data retrieval and transformation (e.g., R, Python, SQL) is critical.
The ability to collaborate with a product manager and software development team in the architecture of a central data warehouse that will facilitate efficient reporting automation is also vital.
Familiarity with business intelligence programs (e.g., Tableau, Power BI, Pentaho, Shiny) and leading practices in data visualization is desired.
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['pentaho', 'power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'shini', 'r', 'python']","['busi', 'etl', 'data', 'visual']",1.0,"['pentaho', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'shini', 'r', 'python', 'busi', 'etl', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"Learn and work on meaningful initiatives with some of the best and brightest in the market research industry.
As a data scientist with this groundbreaking team, you will identify, investigate and prototype diverse sets of data, creating and applying strategies for normalization, projection, and calibration.
The role requires strong analytical and data processing aptitude, and an ability to quickly integrate new ideas into functional prototypes poised to scale.
The successful candidate will be a highly motivated team player with wide-ranging curiosity and creativity, along with common sense and a demonstrated ability to produce high-quality outcomes from methodologies to models to processes.
Key Responsibilities Partner with global stakeholders across business verticals to develop research data product specifications.
Leverage big-data technology to design, prototype, develop and optimize data processing procedures and algorithms.
Analyze alternative data sources and develop recommendations on which data sources are promising to solve specific business needs.
Qualifications: A blend of education and professional experience demonstrating both business and data savvy is required for this role.
5+ years' experience in data-intensive role(s) that embedded or partnered with a business unit to drive tangible results.
Demonstrated success in solving business problems using a diverse skill set in data management, processing, and modeling.
Strong programming skills in R and SQL.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to tailor messaging based on the audience.
An understanding and acceptance that preparatory data cleansing and processing is core to successful modeling.
This role will be governed by this principle.
Exposure to or experience modeling “alternative” data such as geolocation, financial transaction, passive metering, or clickstream to solve business problems is a plus.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.
","['r', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Newark, NJ, United States
Job Ref ID: 484241000022296008
Job Type: Temp/Contract to Direct
Number of Positions: (1)
Work Experience: 5+ years
Descrip?tion
The Senior Data Scientist’s will harness vast amounts of data to optimize business results.
He/she will exercise their knowledge of descriptive and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques to develop strategic insights to drive business goals.
Works hard at advancing the state-of-the-art in how data is applied to solve problems in Public Transportation industry.
Will also be responsible for teaching data analysts and software engineers how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Responsibilities
Strategy & Planning
Work with cross departmental team to define metrics, guidelines, and strategies for effective use of algorithms and data.
Identify, design, and build appropriate datasets for identification of complex Data pattern and analytics.
Create data mining and analytics architectures, coding standards, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies.
Establish links across existing data sources and find new, interesting mash-ups.
Coordinate data resource requirements between analytics, Application teams and Business Stakeholders.
Work with product managers, engineers, and analytics team members to translate prototypes into production
Assist in the development of data management policies and procedures.
Develop best practices for analytics instrumentation and experimentation.
Acquisition & Deployment
Conduct research and make recommendations on big data infrastructure, database technologies, analytics tools, services, protocols, and standards in support of procurement and development efforts.
Well versed in Cloud technologies and Big Data platform.
Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources.
Operational Management
Develop algorithms and predictive models to solve critical business problems.
Analyze historical data, identify patterns come up with predictive, prescriptive, descriptive and cognitive analytics.
Develop tools and libraries that will help analytics team members more efficiently interface with huge amounts of data.
Will deep dive as the requirement demands into supervised machine learning (classification – binary target variable).
Expert in handling a suite of non-parametric classification algorithms (Decisions Tree, Rule-Based classifier & Naive Bayes) as well as parametric classification algorithms (Logistic Regression, Support Vector Machine, Nearest Neighbor Classifiers) with deeper use of R, python.
Expert in Un supervised learning techniques.
Knows the optimal method /technique to use in different situations.
Analyze large, noisy datasets and identify meaningful patterns that provide actionable results.
Develop and automate new enhanced imputation algorithms.
Create informative visualizations that intuitively display large amounts of data and/or complex relationships.
Develop, implement, and maintain change control and testing processes for modifications to algorithms and data analytics.
Collaborate with database and disaster recovery administrators to ensure effective protection and integrity of data assets.
Manage and/or provide guidance to junior members of the analytics team.
Requirements
Position Requirements
Formal Education & Certification
Minimum 5 years’ experience in modeling and analysis Graduate or post graduate university degree in the field of computer science, mathematics, or statistics, Data Science and/or [10] years + equivalent work experience.
Certifications in CAP highly desirable.
Knowledge & Experience
Well versed with CRISP-DM methodology and reference model.
Very Hands on.
Has proven track record of successful Data Science implementations from industry preferably Public Transportation and Travel industry.
Responsible for building advanced analytics and models for critical business areas including schedule optimization, anomaly detection of the routes, driver utilizations, GPS data and engine fault codes.
Perform advanced quantitative and statistical analysis of large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and correlations that can be used to improve business performance.
Develop scalable, efficient, and automated processes for large scale data analyses and model development, validation, and implementation.
Utilization of machine learning and other techniques to prevent, detect/resolve route data and operational data anomalies requiring human intervention.
Core and strategic responsibility to assess, plan and develop driver scoring algorithms and model.
Collaborates with internal and external business and data teams, data engineers and analysts.
Oversee processes within the Data and Analytics team to ensure sustainable and efficient deployment of algorithm trained models.
Advanced knowledge one or more of the following: Linear and Non-Linear Models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, SVM, Neural Networks, Unsupervised Methods (Dimensionality Reduction, Clustering, etc.)
Probabilistic Modeling and Computation.
Machine Learning, including Deep Learning.
Advanced knowledge in R and Python.
Advanced experience with SQL skills.
Must be able to perform impact data analysis and data profiling on source data systems and determine best way to model data.
Employ data visualization tools where appropriate (ggplot, Tableau, ThinkCell, etc.).
Clearly communicate project requirements and modeling outcomes to technical and non-technical audiences.
Ability to work in a self-directed work environment.
Ability to work in a team environment.
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Well versed with Git.
Expert in using NLP, Ensemble methods.
Do Exploratory Data analysis using SQL.
Must have machine learning and AI expertise.
Familiarity with relational, SQL and NoSQL databases.
Expert knowledge of statistical analysis tools such as R, R studio, Matlab, Rapid Miner
Good working knowledge of Reporting Analytical tools like Tableau, Power BI
Experience with very large datasets a must.
Knowledge of map/reduce framework (hive/pig other tools for accessing data in Hadoop/HBase cluster systems) a plus.
Experience in programming with JAVA, Perl, C.
Project management experience.
Good understanding of the organization’s goals and objectives.
Knowledge of applicable data privacy practices and laws.
Personal Attributes
A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data.
A flexible analytic approach that allows for results at varying levels of precision.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Strong technical documentation skills.
Good interpersonal skills.
Highly self-motivated and directed.
Keen attention to detail.
Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
Strong customer service orientation.
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
Share This Job
Share
Tweet
Share
Share
Pin
Email
","['nosql', 'python', 'pig', 'power bi', 'git', 'hbase', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'bi', 'cloud', 'perl', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'exploratori', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'anomali', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nosql', 'python', 'pig', 'powerbi', 'git', 'hbase', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'cloud', 'perl', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'exploratori', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"About this role:
In this role, you will:
· Solve new and challenging problems using statistical, Machine Learning, or optimization approaches to create measurable customer facing impact.
· Translate prototype models to production quality, scaling to millions of customers and across different languages.
· Design experiments leveraging your models to measure effectiveness.
· Work closely with product, business and engineering teams to execute on your project plans.
· Communicate verbally and in writing to senior leaders with various levels of technical knowledge, educating them about your approach, as well as sharing insights and recommendations.
· Drive best practices on the team; mentor and guide junior members to achieve their career growth potential.
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelor's Degree
· 5+ years of experience with data scripting languages (e.g SQL, Python, R etc.)
or statistical/mathematical software (e.g.
R, SAS, or Matlab)
· 4+ years working as a Data Scientist
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters or PhD Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Economics or a related quantitative field.
· Experience in the Ad-Tech industry
· Experience building content based recommendation models
· Experience in NLP techniques
· Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to effectively advocate technical solutions to research scientists, engineering teams and business audiences.
#sspajobs #sspasv #adsto #booksvert
","['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Primary Purpose:
The successful individual will leverage their proficiency in Data Science to...
Consult cross-functional partners on designing data-driven analyses, strategies and tools
Perform large-scale data science methodology to extract useful business insights and unlock new strategies and optimizations
Translate analyses to data stories, identify actionable solutions and recommendations to influence the direction of the business by communicating results to cross-functional groups
Design and develop data visualization to help external partner understand data insights
Gather and define business requirements for data science tools and models and work with internal partners to ensure pipeline for future business analyses.
Establish best practices and provide guidance to global counterparts.
Communicate and present findings to leadership level business partners
An outstanding professional will have...
Experience with programming languages such as R, Python and SQL
Experience with BI tools (e.g.
Tableau, Power BI)
Experience with Google Analytics and BigQuery is a plus
Experience with D3.js or other advanced data visualization tools is a plus
Proficiency to tell compelling and concise narratives with complex data
Hands-on, Fast learner, self-driven, natural curiosity, and enthusiasm for data science
Experience working cross functionally and interacting with partners at all levels
Excellent communication, teamwork and relationship building skills
Demonstrated ability to leverage analytics into revenue driving initiatives
Ability to evaluate and change priorities daily and to perform efficiently within a fast paced team environment
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or related technical field; Master is a plus
Drive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Interpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.
Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.
Perseverance: Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.
Dealing with Ambiguity: Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.
Strategic Agility: Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.
Building Effective Teams: Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale
and spirit in his/her team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.
Managerial Courage: Doesn’t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and “actionable” positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.
All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant’s or employee’s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration.
These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law.
","['power bi', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['risk', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'risk', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist with SQL, Python, R, Tableau.
Duration: 12 Months Plus
Interview Mode: F2F Mandatory.
Â
Experience requirements
5+ years as a data scientist leading efforts to identify relevant questions, collect data from a multitude of different data sources, organize the information, translate results into solutions, and communicate findings in a way that positively affects decisions
5+ years working with SQL, Python, R, Tableau and other data science programing languages and tools
Strong quantitative and problem-solving skills
Experience and passion for data wrangling, data cleaning, and ETL
Experience working with administrative data sets
Experience with statistical modelling and machine leaning analysis
Experience with Bayesian analysis
Proficiency in GIS concepts and software (ArcGIS, Google Maps, QGIS, Carto)
Attention to detail for documenting work processes and writing clear instructions for technical tasks
Ability to distill complex material into actionable recommendations
Excellent written and oral communication skills
JOB Duties
Develop SQL and Python queries to analyze the completeness and quality of key data elements in StreetSmart, including demographics, caseload history, mental illness diagnoses, and substance abuse details
Develop and monitor a data cleaning prioritization plan, working with a data analyst dedicated to data cleaning
Manipulate and analyze administrative data in order to predict outcomes and make data-driven recommendations
Collaborate with team members to develop novel strategies for technical analysis
Evaluate ethical implications of design choices for predictive analytics models and automated decision support systems
Create and present compelling reports to stakeholders based upon project findings and methods
If you are interested you can reach me at shravya@techprojects.us/732-258-0370.
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['etl', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend', 'gi']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'etl', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend', 'gi']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist Machine Leaning specialist
Duration: 6 months renewable as long as the new hire performs well
Client: Undisclosed Investment Bank
Type: Contract or contract-to-hire based on experience and performance
Fundamentals:
Knowledge of Machine Learning techniques: e.g.
Regression, Classification, Natural Language Processing, Dimensionality reduction, Clustering, Time Series, Neural networks
Knowledge of Visualization techniques: eg.
matplotlib, seaborn, Plotly, Tableau, Flask, D3.js
Knowledge of programming languages used in Data Science: Python, R, Stata
Knowledge of Economics: Fixed Income, Equities, etc
","['tableau', 'r', 'seaborn', 'matplotlib', 'flask', 'python', 'plotli']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'natural language processing', 'dimensionality reduction', 'neural network', 'visual', 'time series', 'econom']",999.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'seaborn', 'matplotlib', 'flask', 'python', 'plotli', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'nlp', 'dimensionality reduction', 'nn', 'visual', 'time series', 'econom']"
DS,"Hinge is seeking a data scientist to oversee initiatives in statistical modeling and recommender systems.
You will lead efforts to glean actionable insights from massive amounts of data for the purpose of driving product decisions.
This role is expected to progress to a managerial position within 6 months.
Responsibilities:
Translate product objectives to data science problems and vice versa
Use a combination of exploratory analysis and data mining techniques to identify and understand trends and anomalies
Partner with stakeholders and collaborators to prioritize and coordinate projects (Within 6 months)
Manage a small team of data scientists while continuing to spend about 50% of time doing hands-on work
About You:
4+ years of experience as data scientist
1+ years of experience as manager or tech lead
Strong knowledge of statistics and machine learning
Experience with A/B testing
Proficiency in SQL and either Python (preferred) or R
Exposure to engineering best practices
Superb communication skills, in speech and in writing
Good organizational skills
Deep sense of intellectual curiosity
Hinge is the dating app for people who want to get off dating apps.
Hinge is on a mission to change that.
On Hinge, there are no rules, timers, or games.
Instead, you’ll meet your most compatible matches and you’ll have unique conversations over what you’ve shared on your detailed profile.
It’s a natural way to find a great first date.
- Authenticity: Share your genuine thoughts and opinions directly.
- Courage: Invite and deeply consider challenges and criticism.
- Empathy: Be empathetic, communitarian and trustworthy.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'exploratori', 'statist', 'commun', 'anomali', 'recommend']",999.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'exploratori', 'statist', 'commun', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Title: Senior Data Scientist
The Senior Data Scientist will harness vast amounts of data to optimize business results.
He/she will exercise their knowledge of descriptive and multivariate statistical techniques and applications, and database analysis tools and techniques to develop strategic insights to drive business goals.
Works hard at advancing the state-of-the-art in how data is applied to solve problems in Public Transportation industry.
Will also be responsible for teaching data analysts and software engineers how to work effectively with vast quantities of data.
Responsibilities
Strategy & Planning
Work with cross departmental team to define metrics, guidelines, and strategies for effective use of algorithms and data.
Identify, design, and build appropriate datasets for identification of complex Data pattern and analytics.
Create data mining and analytics architectures, coding standards, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies.
Establish links across existing data sources and find new, interesting mash-ups.
Coordinate data resource requirements between analytics, Application teams and Business Stakeholders.
Work with product managers, engineers, and analytics team members to translate prototypes into production
Assist in the development of data management policies and procedures.
Develop best practices for analytics instrumentation and experimentation.
Acquisition & Deployment
Conduct research and make recommendations on big data infrastructure, database technologies, analytics tools, services, protocols, and standards in support of procurement and development efforts.
Well versed in Cloud technologies and Big Data platform.
Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources.
Operational Management
Develop algorithms and predictive models to solve critical business problems.
Analyze historical data, identify patterns come up with predictive, prescriptive, descriptive and cognitive analytics.
Develop tools and libraries that will help analytics team members more efficiently interface with huge amounts of data.
Will deep dive as the requirement demands into supervised machine learning (classification – binary target variable).
Expert in handling a suite of non-parametric classification algorithms (Decisions Tree, Rule-Based classifier & Naive Bayes) as well as parametric classification algorithms (Logistic Regression, Support Vector Machine, Nearest Neighbor Classifiers) with deeper use of R, python.
Expert in Un supervised learning techniques.
Knows the optimal method /technique to use in different situations.
Analyze large, noisy datasets and identify meaningful patterns that provide actionable results.
Develop and automate new enhanced imputation algorithms.
Create informative visualizations that intuitively display large amounts of data and/or complex relationships.
Develop, implement, and maintain change control and testing processes for modifications to algorithms and data analytics.
Collaborate with database and disaster recovery administrators to ensure effective protection and integrity of data assets.
Manage and/or provide guidance to junior members of the analytics team.
Position Requirements
Formal Education & Certification
Minimum 5 years' experience in modeling and analysis Graduate or post graduate university degree in the field of computer science, mathematics, or statistics, Data Science and/or [10] years + equivalent work experience.
Certifications in CAP (Certified Analytics Professional ) highly desirable.
Knowledge & Experience
Well versed with CRISP-DM methodology and reference model.
Very Hands on.
Has proven track record of successful Data Science implementations from industry preferably Public Transportation and Travel industry.
Responsible for building advanced analytics and models for critical business areas including schedule optimization, anomaly detection of the routes, driver utilizations, GPS data and engine fault codes.
Perform advanced quantitative and statistical analysis of large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and correlations that can be used to improve business performance.
Develop scalable, efficient, and automated processes for large scale data analyses and model development, validation, and implementation.
Utilization of machine learning and other techniques to prevent, detect/resolve route data and operational data anomalies requiring human intervention.
Core and strategic responsibility to assess, plan and develop driver scoring algorithms and model.
Collaborates with internal and external business and data teams, data engineers and analysts.
Oversee processes within the Data and Analytics team to ensure sustainable and efficient deployment of algorithm trained models.
Advanced knowledge one or more of the following: Linear and Non-Linear Models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, SVM, Neural Networks, Unsupervised Methods (Dimensionality Reduction, Clustering, etc.)
Probabilistic Modeling and Computation.
Machine Learning, including Deep Learning.
Advanced knowledge in R and Python.
Advanced experience with SQL skills.
Employ data visualization tools where appropriate (ggplot, Tableau, ThinkCell, etc.).
Clearly communicate project requirements and modeling outcomes to technical and non-technical audiences.
Ability to work in a self-directed work environment.
Ability to work in a team environment.
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Well versed with Git.
Expert in using NLP, Ensemble methods.
Do Exploratory Data analysis using SQL.
Must have machine learning and AI expertise.
Familiarity with relational, SQL and NoSQL databases.
Expert knowledge of statistical analysis tools such as R, R studio, Matlab, Rapid Miner
Good working knowledge of Reporting Analytical tools like Tableau, Power BI
Experience with very large datasets a must.
Experience in programming with JAVA, Perl, C.
Project management experience.
Good understanding of the organization's goals and objectives.
Knowledge of applicable data privacy practices and laws.
Personal Attributes
A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data.
A flexible analytic approach that allows for results at varying levels of precision.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Strong technical documentation skills.
Good interpersonal skills.
Highly self-motivated and directed.
Keen attention to detail.
Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
Strong customer service orientation.
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
","['nosql', 'python', 'power bi', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'cloud', 'perl', 'java']","['big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'exploratori', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'anomali', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nosql', 'python', 'powerbi', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'cloud', 'perl', 'java', 'big data', 'correl', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'time series', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'data mining', 'exploratori', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Millions of people use Trello every day, generating billions of data points.
As the ideal data scientist, you are someone who can do a deep technical dive and communicate effectively with others.
You love wrangling messy data into an elegant solution, and helping others understand the power of their data.
This role is a chance to have a huge impact on how millions of users collaborate.
You will...
Partner with engineering, product, and leadership teams passionate about strategic improvements to Trello.
Dive deep into a wide range of data (behavioral, financial, etc.)
to identify opportunities and recommend solutions.
Contribute to data team initiatives passionate about ensuring fast, reliable, and comprehensive data.
Unblock data questions using Redshift, Athena, Databricks, Python, R, Mode Analytics, Tableau.
Do your best work in a lively, respectful, and encouraging environment.
About you...
You have experience analyzing data and experimentation in a business setting.
You know how to pick the right approach to a data question.
You know that sometimes the simplest solution is the best.
You are adept at prioritizing, and can bring good opinions to the table.
You enjoy collaborating with non-technical consumers of data, and turning loosely-defined questions into clearly prioritized projects.
You are creative and inventive, with a passion for deriving insights from data and telling a story.
You know when to run with something, and when to ask for help.
You strive to master new technology or language when the need arises.
Bonus points for …
Proven experience working on projects around user acquisition, retention, purchasing drivers.
Referenceable work with some seriously huge datasets.
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['tableau', 'redshift', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['tableau', 'redshift', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"LEAD DATA SCIENTIST
'
What can you expect?
The lead data scientist will act as an advisor on a number of internal initiatives and will have ownership over projects which will require direct reporting to senior-level management in both business and technical groups.
Incorporate new, cutting edge business intelligence, machine learning, and alternative data practices into wider organization to drive efficiencies and generate revenue
Own the full stack execution of data science projects from data wrangling, model development, presentation, measurement to deployment
Work with data engineers to produce fully productionized pipelines including data ingestion, cleaning, feature engineering and model training/prediction.
Conduct research and analysis into reinsurance and advisory products to augment industry-standard models and develop new market offerings for GCs clients
Establish and maintain strong relationships with internal team members and external clients when possible
Monitor performance of data products and respond to internal inquiries regarding their maintenance
Evangelize data science techniques and best practices throughout analytics and engineering teams
Additional Tech Lead Responsibilities
Own the implementation for data products on the teams roadmap
Development data science and engineering talent within the team
Support the hiring of technical and business talent
Partner with the team product manager to manage technical communications with stakeholders
Collaborate with the product manager to establish sprint backlogs, stories and estimation
What you need to have:
3-5 years of experience as a data scientist or in equivalent quantitative engineering role
Significant experience with Python (pandas, sklearn), Spark (RDDs, dataframes), machine learning algorithms and libraries (TensorFlow, PyTorch), SQL
Must be able to produce production level code and familiar with engineering best practices (e.g.
unit testing, code reviews)
Experience acquiring and organizing data in cloud and on-premises environments
Bachelors or Masters Degree in data science, computer science or related quantitative field such as applied mathematics, statistics, engineering or operations research
Experience working in an Agile environment to facilitate the quick and effective fulfillment of group goals
Good interpersonal skills for establishing and maintaining good internal relationships, working well as part of a team and for presentations and discussions
Strong analytical skills and intellectual curiosity as demonstrated through academic experience or work assignments
Ability to communicate technical concepts to non-technical audience
Good ability to prioritize workload according to volume, urgency, etc.
and to deliver on required projects in a timely fashion
Desire to take ownership of proposed and assigned tasks and to seek assistance when needed
Ability to thrive in ambiguity, and drive technical focus in directions of high business value
What makes you stand out:
Experience with machine vision and extracting structured information from images, multimedia, and other unstructured file formats (CSS)
Prior experience in relevant insurance/reinsurance field performing analytic analysis or experience in building model/software products for financial or insurance industry
Familiarity with modern data productivity frameworks and their alternatives such as Databricks, DataRobot and Alteryx
Significant experience with natural language processing techniques ranging from topic classification to sentiment analysis
The companys 75,000 colleagues advise clients in over 130 countries.
With annualized revenue approaching $17 billion, Marsh & McLennan helps clients navigate an increasingly dynamic and complex environment through four market-leading companies including Marsh, Mercer and Oliver Wyman.
","['pytorch', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'sklearn', 'cloud']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['pytorch', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'sklearn', 'cloud', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Do you want to be part of a team that encourages your growth, supports your ambitions and makes it a priority for you to reach your goals?
Is helping people part of who you are?
Position Summary:
In this role, you will perform data-driven research, problem solving, and algorithm development through the systematic application of mathematics, statistics and computer science as well as cutting edge data technologies.
Results of this work manifest themselves in a variety of ways, including interactive visualizations, presentations, publications, web applications, predictive algorithms, and APIs.
This is an opportunity to join a small but growing high performing team with diverse backgrounds in applied math, computer science and physics that have been tasked with developing, maintaining and extracting knowledge from a strategic data asset.
Overall Responsibility:
Set strategy and assume a leadership role in cyber security domain expertise
Develop roadmaps for projects and services, data, and technology
Oversee operations of algorithm and system deployments
Lead projects and research initiatives
Develop algorithms and predictive models, create prototype systems, visualizations, and web applications
Design and analyze experiments
Assemble data sets from disparate sources and analyze using appropriate quantitative methodologies, computational frameworks and systems
Disseminate findings to non-technical audiences through a variety of media, including interactive visualizations, reports and presentations
Mentor junior team members
Candidate Requirements:
Industry recognized cyber security expertise
7+ years working with data and relevant computational frameworks and systems
7+ years developing of probabilistic models and machine learning algorithms
Proficient level of understanding in the following areas and an expert in at least one: machine learning, probability and statistics (esp.
Bayesian methods), natural language processing, operations research
Exceptional problem solving skills and willingness to learn new concepts, methods, and technologies
Expert in data analysis using R or Python (numpy, scipy, matplotlib, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.)
programming languages
Knowledge of HTML/CSS/Javascript, d3.js and web application frameworks (Flask, Django, Play!, etc.)
Knowledge of NoSQL systems, Hadoop/map-reduce, Spark, Hbase, etc.
Experience in database design and SQL
Ability to work in a highly collaborative environment
Outstanding communication skills (publication history a plus)
Education - M.S.
or Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Electrical Engineering, Physics, etc.)
is required
CORE VALUES
And your voice will always be heard.
","['nosql', 'spark', 'hbase', 'sql', 'django', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'flask', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'research', 'math', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",2.0,"['nosql', 'spark', 'hbase', 'sql', 'django', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'flask', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'predict', 'research', 'math', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.
As a Principal Data Scientist you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data.
Examples of projects the team works on include machine learning models for developing digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!
Typical Accountabilities
Develops novel data science solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leads small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Independently keeps own knowledge up to date and learns from senior team members, proposing appropriate training courses for personal development.
Coaches/mentors junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
Works within established frameworks to deliver a variety of tasks that support projects in meeting their objectives.
Reviews working practices and ensures non-compliant processes are escalated.
Ensures own work is compliant within Clinical Development.
Collaborate in a multidisciplinary environment with world leading clinicians, data scientists, biological experts, statisticians and IT professionals.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience
Essential
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques, and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills.
Communication, business analysis, and consultancy.
Minimum 5+ years of work experience
Desirable
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context
",['r'],"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",3.0,"['r', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Data Scientist - Social Impact (FT)
Req #: 0000049004
Category: Professional / Management
Status: Full-Time
Shift: Day
Walmart SDOH Grant,
95 Old Short Hills Road, West Orange, NJ 07052
Job Summary:
Essential Functions:
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of clinical and social data sources and work with internal stakeholders to develop processes necessary to secure individual-level data from partner entities
Develop custom data models and algorithms, in an effort to match relevant data sources to streamline existing processes, as well as successfully integrate clinical and social datasets
Create predictive and prescriptive modeling to increase and optimize the experience of patients and healthcare personnel, as well as generate the insight required to support changing healthcare financing models and revenue streams
Coordinate across departments to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Develop standard reporting mechanisms for multiple audiences
Job Requirements:
Advanced degree or equivalent experience in Machine Learning, Statistics, Computer Science, or associated field; multi-sector experience a plus
A minimum of 5-7 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Superior written and verbal skills with the ability to translate complex data and concepts into user-friendly information that is relevant across disciplines for diverse stakeholders
Ability to analyze large, diverse datasets and offer thoughtful insight, problem solving, and critical thinking needed to transform processes and outcomes
Experience leading a project from conception to release.
Demonstrated ability to help track projects and ensure deliverables/scope are clearly communicated and managed
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques, as well as share their relevance and applicability to key stakeholders
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SLQ, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc
Experience using web services: Redshift, S3, Spark, DigitalOcean, etc
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers, including but not limited to government agencies, Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc
Other Duties:
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Additional Information:
Medical/Dental/Vision plans
401 (k)
Vacation/Personal/Holiday/Sick Time Off
Short & Long Term Disability
Basic Life & Accidental Death Insurance
Tuition Reimbursement
The system includes eleven acute care hospitals, three acute care children s hospitals and a leading pediatric rehabilitation hospital (Children s Specialized Hospital).
","['d3', 'spark', 'redshift', 'mysql', 's3', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'financ', 'predict', 'random forest', 'neural network', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['d3', 'spark', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'financ', 'predict', 'random forest', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists.
Your Responsibilities:
Develop new ways to measure user behavior and to evaluate performance in the virtual environment and drive R&D in immersive Data Science
Run customer studies and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Build forecasting models to predict real-world performance based on behavior in the immersive environment
Incorporate your research outcomes into product offering
Your Skills:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses
Experience designing and training machine learning models is preferred.
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL.
Familiarity with Javascript and HTML is a plus.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Passion for using data to improve user experiences
","['r', 'javascript', 'sql', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",2.0,"['r', 'javascript', 'sql', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Bring Creativity to Data products.
Responsible for building and maintaining the machine learning systems, data, platform and processes.
Perform qualitative and quantitative data analysis.
Cleanse and transform raw data used in machine models.
Perform data munging, data mining, clustering & classification methods, pattern recognition.
Comfortable with statistics, calculus and multivariate analysis.
Participate in ML POCs, validate the results and develop production implementations.
Build and optimize scalable machine learning solutions in the public cloud.
Familiar with SQL, Python, R, SparkML, TensorFlow, GCP, AWS, SQL Server.
Develop production systems in Python.
Work independently to research and solve business and technical problems.
Plan their work individually and as part of a team.
Mentor and train other Data Scientists on the team.
Qualifications:
Strong practical experience with machine learning techniques in the industry, accounting and financial industries is a plus.
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Experience with machine learning algorithms for building ML models, their accuracy, cleanliness, reliability.
Experience with predictive and prescriptive analyses, modeling, and segmentation.
Have strong passion for empirical data research for practical applications.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in clear, precise, and actionable
Comfortable with complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources.
Very comfortable with data engineering methods and pipelines.
Expert knowledge of analysis tools such as R, Matlab, or SAS
Experience with data warehousing, relational databases, ETL, BI, data mining.
Experience in SQL, R, Python languages.
Strong familiarity with GCP and AWS, SQL Server.
Practical experience with GIT version control.
Comfortable working with open source tools in a Unix/Linux environment.
Experience with and ownership of data-informed decision-making.
Experience translating business requirements into functional, and non-functional requirements.
Strong sense of product and data ownership.
Works independently without the need for supervision.
Strong written and verbal skills – able to explain the work in plain language.
MS/PhD in Computer Science or other quantitative disciplines
","['unix', 'linux', 'aw', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'bi', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'gcp', 'sa', 'cloud']","['etl', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'pipelin', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']",2.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'aw', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'powerbi', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'gcp', 'sa', 'cloud', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'pipelin', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']"
DS,"The role will collaborate closely across the Film Data Strategy & Transformation, Marketing & Strategy teams to identify business problems and provide data-driven solutions.
The successful candidate will be a member of the Film IT Marketing, Finance & Strategic Planning (MF&SP) team, within the NBCU Film IT organization.Responsibilities* Develop, maintain and operationalize new and existing Film models to support forecasting and performance; Run and test model outputs* Partner with Marketing teams and Media Agency to champion the use of data and analytics solutions* Capture business requirements for data & analytic solutions and collaborate with the Film Marketing teams to ensure business requirements align with business needs* Define and structure modeling approach; Identifying and selecting algorithms and statistical techniques* Provide data driven analysis and solutions to ad-hoc business questions* Develop and support the ingestion, processing and analysis of data (pipelines) for modeling, reporting, visualization and business intelligence purposes* Collect, Clean, extract, analyze and interpret large data sets from internal and external systems* Data prep to create data sets fit for predictive modeling and/or AutoML tools* Build initial profiling reports: Correlations, availability and distributions (transformations)* Carry on analysis answering key business questions by applying an analytical mind-set.
Quickly and efficiently process information from multiple sources.
Collaborate with stakeholders to interpret complex technical analysis and communicate them effectively* Develop and maintain partnerships across Film Marketing, Strategy, Media Agency and Technology teams to develop and implement scalable solutions resulting from insights* Perform other duties and responsibilities as assignedQualifications/RequirementsBA/BS in Engineering, Computer Science, Marketing, Statistics, Mathematics, Economics or other quantitative discipline1-3 years of experience working with large data sets and analytical toolsWorking knowledge of SQL and PythonExperience with building statistical data models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, etc.
)Tableau, Data Studio, Power BI or equivalent report building experienceExperience analyzing data in Adobe Analytics and audience targeting platforms (e.g.
DMP's, CDP's) a plusExperience with Big Query / Google Technology stack a plusExperience with ML tools a plusStrong analytical and problem-solving skills with ability to utilize technology to create innovative solutionsDesired CharacteristicsExperience building and deploying ML pipelines: training models, feature development, regression testingData modeling experience (operationalizing data science models/products)Knowledge of cloud environments such as AWS, GCP or Azure, Agile principlesTeam-oriented and collaborative approach with a demonstrated enthusiasm and willingness to learn new methods, tools, practices and skillsExcellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to communicate technical and business concepts with leadership teams and end-usersExperience with the broader Film Theatrical media industry with and understanding of the digital landscape as well as the drivers influencing the consumer behaviorsStaying up to date on the latest industry trends in technology that could provide solutionsAbility to work collaboratively with teams across the organizationMust be detail-oriented and thorough with the ability to meet aggressive deadlinesEffective in a variety of formal/informal presentation settings: one-on-one, small and large groups
","['power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'aw', 'azur', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['regress', 'data modeling', 'decision tree', 'correl', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'predict', 'clean', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'aw', 'azur', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'regress', 'data modeling', 'decision tree', 'correl', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'predict', 'clean', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"* Present findings to the Data Science team members.
* Interact with multiple teams.Within 3 months, you will:* Have established architecture and implementation for an intelligence-driven product feature in a data-rich environment.
* Have complete ownership of a data science product and made production quality code commits into the team's repository.
* Contribute to the broader team's success by offering ideas and constructive feedback to other team member's projects.
* Work independently and closely with Engineering teams to deliver data science solutions into the product with proper API design.
* Uphold the values of transparency, honesty, and unconditional support for the team.
* Define problems, collect data, establish facts, draw valid conclusions, and make recommendations for continuous improvement.
* An ability to explain complex problems in a simple way.
* Capability to build algorithms that touch the cutting edge of statistics and machine learning.
* Develop scalable and efficient methods for large scale data analysis and model development.
* Derive pride from technical excellence, and pursue excellence in all areas of work.Requirements:* Hunger for impact, drive to learn fast, be creative, and win as a team.
* BS in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Engineering or a related field, or equivalent experience.
* 3-4+ years experience in working with noisy real world structured and semi-structured data.
* Expert in Python or Scala, with related statistical and machine learning packages.
* Background in data mining, machine learning, statistical analysis, or mathematical modeling, with experience deploying models in a production environment.
* Experience with A/B testing methodologies and experiments.
* Strong SQL abilities and experience with massive relational database systems.
* Excellent communication skills to explain your results and solution to the stakeholders in a clear and compelling way.Bonus* MS or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering or other quantitative field.
* Patent, publication, or conference presentation in an AI or ML related field.
* Experience writing production quality, version controlled code.
* Experience considering user psychology and user experience.
* Experience with Databricks, Spark, AWS, Kafka or Kinesis.
* Knowledge of basic macroeconomic concepts.
* Thirst for delivering game-changing products.
* Exceptional drive and precision in delivery.
* A belief that your work is tied to your life's mission.
* A comprehensive benefits package to meet the needs of you and your family.
* Flexible paid time off.
* Corporate gym access.
* Daily breakfast, weekly team lunches, and an endless supply of snacks.
* The rare opportunity to create a new world.
It allows users to round up their daily purchases and automatically Invest the Change® into a low-cost, diversified portfolio of exchange-traded funds offered by some of the world's top asset managers (including Vanguard and BlackRock).
Customers accumulate fractional shares in one of five portfolios constructed by world-renowned Nobel Laureate economist Dr. Harry Markowitz.
","['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'kafka', 'excel', 'sql', 'aw']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'kafka', 'excel', 'sql', 'aw', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"PERKS & BENEFITS
Unlimited Vacation, Paid Sick Days & Holidays
100% Employee Covered Medical, Dental, Vision Plan Base Plan
Life Insurance, 401k, Flexible Spending Accounts, Commuter Benefits & More
Catered Lunches & Well-stocked Kitchens
Yoga & Wellness Activities
Happy Hours
Dog Friendly
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Create data visualizations and analysis pipelines that turn complicated problems into simple solutions for stakeholders.
QUALIFICATIONS:
An advanced or postgraduate degree in a quantitative field.
The ability to use SQL or a scripting language such as Python or Scala to generate, clean and explore complex datasets.
A demonstrated track record of using statistical languages/packages such as R or Python to build features, create models and explore datasets.
Experience presenting and describing complex datasets or statistical processes to audiences without a technical background.
The ability to learn and use skills that you already have to tackle new problems in a creative way.
NICE TO HAVE:
Evidence of presentations/publications demonstrating the ability to drive research projects from start to finish.
Experience with neural network frameworks such as Tensorflow/Torch.
Knowledge of Apache Spark and associated products.
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'account', 'clean', 'neural network', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'account', 'clean', 'nn', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']"
DS,"SUMMARY
You will be engaged with other Data Scientists, and cross-functionally with analysts, product managers, and engineers to deliver machine learning based personalization products.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Implement and debug models in Python using various ML frameworks (e.g.
tensorflow, scikit-learn, lightGBM, etc.)
Create and deploy training and prediction pipelines to operationalize models using a variety of technologies such Airflow/Luigi, Hive/Spark
Collaborate with developers, program managers, and product managers in an open, creative environment
WHAT TO BRING
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field (e.g.
Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics, Operations Research, Econometrics, Statistics)
2+ years related experience with developing and operationalizing personalization models in either an academic or professional setting and 4+ years of relevant work experience
Ability to draw insights and conclusions from data to inform model development and business decisions
Desire to collaborate with other data scientists, data analysts, and business partners
Familiarity with machine-learning concepts and statistics
Proficient in analyzing data and developing machine-learning models using Python (with ML frameworks like tensorflow, scikit-learn, etc.)
Capable of reading and writing Object-Oriented code to review and implement modeling pipelines (Airflow, Luigi, etc.)
Working knowledge of SQL and distributed data technologies (Hive, Spark)
NICE-TO-HAVES
MS in Physics, Computer Science, Engineering, Economics, Statistics or related quantitative field (e.g.
Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research)
Experience fully integrating data science solutions into the business and operationalizing ML models
Familiarity with Scala
Previous project experience using time-series forecasting, clustering, or regression/classification
","['scala', 'spark', 'airflow', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'econometr', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'airflow', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'econometr', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']"
DS,"ABOUT THE ROLE:
In this role, you will be responsible for delivering models in production that optimize marketplace interactions, generate insights, and detect anomalies among other things.
WHAT YOU'LL DO:
Build machine learning systems to understand the secondary marketplace eCommerce ecosystem
Utilize natural language processing to uncover insights from contextual data
Develop models to optimize marketplace recommendations
Build anomaly detection systems for detecting fraud or erroneous data
The nasty but inevitable job of data wrangling
Internal Data Science reading group - spend time each week keeping up with current research and presenting interesting findings
WHO YOU ARE:
Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative field, Ph.D. preferred
3+ years of professional experience with Python
Experience with tools and frameworks like Pytorch, TensorFlow, Scikit-Learn, SQL, etc
Familiarity with deployment and tracking tools such as MlFlow, Airflow, Docker, Kubernetes
Familiarity with mathematical models underlying data science methods
Drive to learn and improve
","['kubernet', 'pytorch', 'airflow', 'mlflow', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'docker', 'scikit']","['machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['kubernet', 'pytorch', 'airflow', 'mlflow', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'docker', 'scikit', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"What You'll Do:
Innovate!
Implement innovative quantitative analyses, try new data wrangling techniques, and experiment with new visualization tools
Work with other analysts to build tools and set processes to automate data analyses
Work closely with the product and engineering departments to understand, solve, and anticipate their analytics needs
Foster a culture of transparency: act as the main liaison between other departments to ensure data accuracy and uniform understanding of key metrics
Possess excellent communication and presentation skills
About You:
4+ years of experience with dashboarding tools like Tableau or similar (Periscope Data is a plus)
4+ years of experience with SQL (BigQuery and MySQL is a plus)
Ability to take vague requirements and transform them into concise deliverables
Ability to manage multiple priorities and a fast-paced environment
Strong working knowledge of Python, R, and/or D3 is a plus
Bachelor's Degree in Statistics, Mathematics or similar
","['d3', 'excel', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['d3', 'excel', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy.
Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid.
Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom, enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.
When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created an account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Please Capitalize first letter of your First and Last Name.
Please avoid using fully capitalized text for your First and/or Last Name.
NOTE: If your name is hyphenated or has multiple capitalization, please use the same format as your government ID.
What You'll Do:
Innovate!
Implement innovative quantitative analyses, try new data wrangling techniques, and experiment with new visualization tools
Work with other analysts to build tools and set processes to automate data analyses
Work closely with the product and engineering departments to understand, solve, and anticipate their analytics needs
Foster a culture of transparency: act as the main liaison between other departments to ensure data accuracy and uniform understanding of key metrics
Possess excellent communication and presentation skills
About You:
4+ years of experience with dashboarding tools like Tableau or similar (Periscope Data is a plus)
4+ years of experience with SQL (BigQuery and MySQL is a plus)
Ability to take vague requirements and transform them into concise deliverables
Ability to manage multiple priorities and a fast-paced environment
Strong working knowledge of Python, R, and/or D3 is a plus
Bachelor's Degree in Statistics, Mathematics or similar
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
Los Angeles - Traction, California, United States of America
Additional Locations:
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
","['d3', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'dashboard', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['d3', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'dashboard', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Job Title:
Data Scientist
Department:
Technology
Summary of Position:
This resource will have access to a variety of different data sources available to the Data Products and Engineering team, entailing clickstream, financial, marketing, event, and internal data.
This individual will be responsible for exploring data sets as large as 1 petabyte (1PB) and driving business results with their data-based insights using predictive modeling.
The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and can use models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action.
Other responsibilities will include (but are not limited to) data visualization, data- driven problem solving, They have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in data sets and can brainstorm ways to improve business outcomes/determine future project focus.
They must also have experience and interest in content analysis.
Experience & Skills:
4+ years of experience as a Data Scientist within a large, consumer-facing analytics environment
Strong python/R programming experience to extract, clean, analyze, and visualize data
Exposure to cloud environments (preferably AWS)
Strong experience utilizing Spark for data processing
Automation experience using Amazon S3 or other comparable storage service
Machine Learning experience using Tensorflow, Scikit-learn, or Spark ML
Experience using Amazon SageMaker for cloud machine learning
At least a B.S.
in Computer Science, EE or Mathematical Science.
MS or PhD preferred
This means that all applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of gender, age, race, national origin, disability, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
Nearest Major Market: Los Angeles
","['spark', 'aw', 'sagemak', 's3', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'aw', 'sagemak', 's3', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']"
DS,"DescriptionThe Data Scientist 2 uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Data Scientist 2 work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.ResponsibilitiesHumana's Clinical Trend and Analytics Team is seeking a Data Scientist.
The Clinical Trend and Analytics team uses advanced scientific techniques, forecasting, and machine learning to predict financial and clinical outcomes in order to guide investments that improve health outcomes and reduce costs.
The Data Scientist leverages large sets of structured and unstructured data to develop tactical and strategic insights.
The work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.
Consumers expect more personalized and holistic experiences from their health partners.?
Ideally, this position would be located in Louisville, KY.
View the EEO is the Law poster.If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.Humana Safety and SecurityHumana will never ask, nor require a candidate provide money for work equipment and network access during the application process.
",[None],"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Requisition ID: 54021
All Locations: El Segundo, CA (California)
A trusted partner.
A national resource.
A leader in national security space.
Are you ready to launch your career?
Responsibilities
Participate as part of a high-performing team supporting critical work for U.S. National Security Space.
In this role, you will be expected to use your expertise in data science to serve as a force multiplier, as well as becoming an independent subject matter expert on international space systems.
Key Functions
Support and conduct detailed technical analyses of current and future space systems.
Prepare technical reports, briefings, and other deliverable materials as required.
Critically review reports, briefings, and other materials produced by team members.
Support and develop customer relationships.
International travel to conferences or meetings is possible.
Qualifications
Required
Demonstrated expertise and experience in Data Science
Demonstrated experience with space systems and/or space operations
Highly motivated self-starter capable of both working independently and collaborating with teams
Flexibility to learn, build, and test new tools/capabilities
An affinity for challenging puzzles and problem solving is a plus
Strong interest and enthusiasm for understanding global space activities and operations
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science/Engineering, Engineering, Mathematics, or Physical Sciences
Active TS/SCI clearance
A minimum of 8 years of progressively more responsible and related engineering/scientific experience
Preferred
Advanced degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science/Engineering, Engineering, Mathematics, or Physical Sciences
Background in space systems engineering, space domain awareness, space system data analysis, or related fields
Proficiency with Linux, UNIX, Python, MATLAB, and/or other scripting/programming languages
Experience with fusing and analyzing information from multiple sources and extrapolating to answer questions
Prior experience and familiarity with USAF and IC agencies and organizations
Reading comprehension and translation skills in selected foreign languages is of interest
Transcript Requirement
Transcripts are required for this position.
Additional Requisition Details
Clearance Requirement: Top Secret
Access: SCI
Polygraph: Counter Intelligence Polygraph
Employment Type: Regular
Work Schedule: Full Time
U.S. citizenship is required for those positions.
Equal Opportunity Commitment
","['unix', 'linux', 'matlab', 'python']","['statist', 'problem solving', 'data']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'matlab', 'python', 'statist', 'problem solving', 'data']"
DS,"Model Integrity and Collaboration
Drive Innovation and Thought Leadership
Support Decision Making at All Levels
Create Value for Clients by Empowering Consumers
Improve Customer Experience Through Simple Design
Celebrate Success… Often
Purpose of the Role:
The mission of the Behavioral Data Science Team is to design and develop tailored content and algorithms driven by behavioral science and data analytics that drive better patient engagement and health outcomes.
This requires a multidisciplinary blend of data handling, behavioral science and program coordination.
The candidate should have experience working within behavioral science, have excellent organizational skills, be highly adaptable, be able to work independently and be able to work well as a member of a team.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Testing interactive text message workflows that engage users and drive them to be more activated about their health – whether making an appointment to see a doctor or taking on a health challenge to walk 10k steps every day for a week.
Gathering demographic data about different populations (age, income, ethnicity, zip code, etc.)
to help the team build a model that uses the social determinants of health as a predictor of health and behavior change.
Generate statistical reports to track performance using SQL, Excel, R and Tableau for data extraction, analysis, and visualization.
Skills, Abilities, and Experience:
Bachelor’s degree, preferably in cognitive psychology or cognitive science
Experience in healthcare industry preferred
1-2 years of experience with SQL, Excel and R or Python
3-5 years of non-academic experience working in health care or behavioral science with a substantial portion of that time related to understanding consumer engagement, using data analytics, and tracking outcomes of innovative programs and policies.
Candidates do not need to have experience in all of these areas but should have solid experience in at least one of them.
Strong writing and content development skills
Experience in research methods in behavioral science and exploratory data analysis
Intense intellectual curiosity – strong desire to always be learning new technologies
Analytical, creative, and innovative approach to solving difficult problems
Ability to communicate clearly and effectively – verbally and in writing
Extensive experience working with messy and diverse data-sets to generate both qualitative and quantitative analyses.
As a result, extracting relevant features from this data requires experience working with complex behavioral and social sciences data rather than conventional “big” data).
Have extensive experience pulling data from RDBMS using SQL for data analysis, data modeling and feature engineering; ability to write scripts using Python or R for data manipulation
Hands-on knowledge and experience with ML algorithms such as Bayesian classifiers, clustering, neural networks (CNN, RNN, deep learning, etc.
), SVM, and decision trees.
Have used in at least one or more of the following frameworks: Tensorflow, SciKit-learn, NumPy, Pandas, Weka, etc.
Health care domain expertise (i.e., expertise in impact evaluation, data analysis and intervention design as it relates to health and healthcare)
Experience with authoring project reports, briefs, and webinar presentations
Experience working with Tableau
Minimum Experience:
Advanced degree (or Bachelor's degree with relevant experience) in economics, psychology, sociology or statistics.
Thorough understanding and hands on experience with implementing behavioral science and/or behavioral economics theories within patient engagement programs
Behavioral Competencies:
Results oriented with a strong sense of urgency, and able to pivot as requirements change
Strong verbal and written skills for communicating with fellow team members and clients
Able to take charge and thrive in uncharted territory and with complex and ambiguous problems
Highly curious and able to independently learn new methodologies, tools, and processes as needed
Strong aptitude and passion for healthcare, technology and technology related innovation
Values accuracy and quality, is very detail oriented, and is highly organized
The Perks:
Enjoy flexible PTO and work hours
401K Program with a 100% match of first 4%
3 Weeks Paid Maternity/Paternity Leave
Weekly team lunches to celebrate victories
Paid Parking as well as Car Pooling incentives
Laptop fitness stations
Ping pong conference table and Foosball
Free snacks and drinks
Contact Information:
Attn: HR Dept.
16530 Ventura Blvd, Suite #500
Encino, CA 91436
careers@mpulsemobile.com
Powered by JazzHR
FF5PoEzbdl
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['data modeling', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cnn', 'exploratori', 'research', 'neural network', 'svm', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'econom', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cnn', 'exploratori', 'research', 'nn', 'svm', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'econom', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Position Overview
The successful candidate will work with the data science and engineering teams on challenging projects in a variety of domains.
Job Duties/Responsibilities
Ingest, organize, and analyze data from various sources (e.g.
CSV, relational database)
Scope unstructured problems or messy data for tractable insights
Identify candidate statistical or machine learning solutions and test their efficacy
Communicate technical work and findings both verbally and through written reports and visualizations
Work in a collaborative environment to brainstorm, design, implement and deliver solutions to challenging problems
Qualifications and Skills
5+ years of relevant industry work experience
Excellent understanding of statistical or machine learning techniques, such as clustering, regression, time series forecasting, tree-based methods, sampling methods
Demonstrated ability using scientific computing libraries, such as NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Scikit-learn, Matplotlib, and Plotly
Programming proficiency in Python or R
Preferred Requirements
Ph.D. or Master’s
Strong statistical knowledge and experience with hypothesis testing
Fluency with machine learning algorithms, such as CNN, RNN, reinforcement learning, support vector machines, and graph-based models
Experience with TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch
Experience with version control systems (e.g.
Git flow)
Strong oral and verbal communication skills
Research experience with high impact publications
Experience working with cross-functional teams and/or customer facing work
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'git', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'plotli', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['regress', 'hypothesi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cnn', 'reinforc', 'graph', 'research', 'support vector machine', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'git', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'plotli', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cnn', 'reinforc', 'graph', 'research', 'svm', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Lead Data Scientist
They aren’t afraid of messy data, and are comfortable working in a fast paced, production-oriented environment.
What you'll do:
Analyzes data, as well as contributes to the design, implementation, and delivery of analytics products and services.
Builds predictive models, tools, and data visualizations.
Oversees and/or leads research development project and data science project plans for clients and internal initiatives.
Strives to support team excellence by documenting processes and evangelizing new approaches.
Preferred Experience & Background:
At least 4 years working in a quantitative production environment or a postgraduate degree in a quantitative field.
Advanced understanding of a statistical programming language such as R, Python, or Julia.
Experience building predictive models using regression and machine learning techniques.
Ability to manipulate data with SQL.
Proven experience creating analytics output within a production-oriented team.
Ability to effectively communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience, both in writing and verbally.
Publications, working papers, or conference presentations in a quantitative field.
Experience managing diverse, multi-disciplinary teams and mentoring staff.
Knowledge of experimental design and causal inference.
Ability to create user interfaces for new products using frameworks such as Shiny or Django.
Experience with GIS.
Experience creating informative and engaging data visualizations using industry leading tools.
This position is available in DC, NY, & LA
","['julia', 'excel', 'sql', 'django', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'gi']",1.0,"['julia', 'excel', 'sql', 'django', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'gi']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global telecom enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited to help customers define use cases for massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
The AIML Customer Delivery Architect (CDA) is a growth role within the Professional Services umbrella, and is principally oriented around a qualify-deliver-manage model.
The CDA is responsible for partnering with Telecom Industry Professional Services leaders to dive deep into a customers business challenge, to collaboratively propose and qualify a particular set of outcomes, and lead a project/program to ensure high-value, predictable, and successful delivery.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
It is an individual with a unique hybrid of AWS platform expertise and hands-on building, coupled with cross-industry business acumen, including a heavy dose of passion for continued knowledge acquisition and growth, obsession for customers, and their success using AWS that will align well with the desired outcomes to be produced.
ROLE AND RESPONSIBILITIES
· Participate in deep architectural discussions and design exercises to create world-class solutions built on AWS while ensuring solutions are designed for successful deployment in the cloud
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
· Author or otherwise contribute to AWS telecom customer-facing publications such as whitepapers and proof of concepts
· Build deep relationships with senior technical individuals within customers to enable them to be cloud advocates
· Capture and share best-practice knowledge, sales and delivery content amongst the AWS Professional Services community
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 6+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
· Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges
· Customer facing skills to represent AWS well within the customers environment and drive discussions with senior personnel regarding trade-offs, best practices, project management and risk mitigation
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
· Experience architecting/operating solutions built on AWS
· Ability to understand and articulate business impact of technical decisions
· A proven track record of managing and delivering large-scale enterprise IT projects.
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'java']","['risk', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'java', 'risk', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
DS,"You will be working on both client projects and strategic solutions development by leveraging your deep analytical skills and your ability to implement complex analytical methods using current Data Science tools and languages.
Responsibilities
Contribute to multiple projects at the same time, as demand requires
Support team members with aspect of the projects that require advanced R/Python programming
Develop visualizations and presentations that communicate data insights and modeling results to business users.
Qualifications
Master degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Operations Research, Econometrics or related field – PhD Preferred
At least 5 years of relevant experience in Data Science, in particular with:
Advanced data preparation and transformation
Features engineering
Predictive model design, from approach to implementation
Non-predictive analytics, such as clustering, anomaly detection, PCA, etc
Model interpretation and communication of results to non-technical stakeholders
Model deployment and scoring in a production environment
Prior experience in a consulting role, with strong communication and presentation skills
Excellent data science programming skills: R and Python and associated data science-related libraries are mandatory.
Knowledge of other programming and scripting languages as well data analytics platforms skill is a plus.
Advanced knowledge of relational databases and SQL
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'pca', 'predict', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'pca', 'predict', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"The team develops analytic tools, builds data science models for pilot studies and internal stakeholder analytics innovations, and consults on a broad range of data and research best practices.
The role also requires an observant attention to detail, the ability to work well on a small team, and a self-starter approach to problem-solving and debugging.As a Data Scientist, you will:* Work closely with team members on design and execution of large-scale modeling efforts, contributing to analytics libraries and integrating statistical theory* Collaborate on engineering new data science products by translating needs identified with stakeholders into analytic frameworks that can be built into polished user-facing tools* Build, maintain, and enhance existing codebases* Synthesize academic research, tech innovations, and cloud scalability, to elevate business value for clients, both current and prospective* Validate analytics innovations from marketing science and data science teams globally* Provide consulting for internal teams and clients on data engineering and hygiene, areas for improving process efficiency, and data science algorithms and resultsRequirements:* High proficiency writing R and/or Python, including the ability to produce and maintain reusable and modular codebases* Bachelor's degree* Desire to work in a highly collaborative, fun, consensus-oriented environment.
* Experience in analytics, extracting and surfacing value from quantitative data* Attentive learner with excellent time-management skills* Ability to lucidly communicate data science concepts verbally and in written formPluses:* Professional or academic experience with modern techniques and algorithms in machine learning and statistical computing such as neural networks, genetic algorithms, Bayesian modeling, data fusion, drivers analysis, clustering, predictive analytics, network analysis, Monte Carlo, and agent-based models.
* Experience developing data science models in cloud platforms (e.g.
GCP, AWS)* Working knowledge of SQL and experience with database design and administration.
* Experience with Linux server and system administration.
* Experience with collaboration tools (e.g.
Atlassian suite) and version control systems (e.g.
Git).
* Experience integrating R and/or Python with each other and C\C++.
* Large dataset manipulation.
Experience in distributed storage and computing.
* Experience with ReactJS, TypeScript/JavaScript, visualization libraries (e.g.
d3.js).
* Experience creating and deploying web apps (e.g.
Electron, web2py).
* Advanced degree (M.S., Ph.D.), but not required.
* Experience in the field of Market Research.Ipsos is An Equal Opportunity Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other protected class and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
For all future offer negotiations - please target April 6th or after for their start date.
","['linux', 'aw', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['data', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['linux', 'aw', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'data', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']"
DS,"You will enjoy working with rich data sets, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis.
Horizon is an immersive, synchronous social network where people come to experience user-created content, to explore, engage in their interests, and connect with others.
The AR/VR Social Experiences team is exploring the potential of virtual and augmented reality to bring people together in new ways.
Responsibilities:
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operation: forecasting and setting product team goals, designing and evaluating experiments, monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics, building and analyzing dashboards and reports, building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis, evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis: proposing what to build in the next roadmap, understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends, identifying new levers to help move key metrics, building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership: influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, communicating state of business, experiment results, etc.
to product teams, spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure: working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica, automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Knowledge of statistics (e.g.
hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex.
R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Experience working within the tech sector preferred
","['perl', 'sql', 'mysql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa']","['regress', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['perl', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa', 'regress', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Los AngelesProduct - Product managerExperienced
Responsibilities
Generate useful features from large amount of data
Develop segmentation models, classification models, propensity models, LTV models, experimental design, optimization models
Perform statistical analysis such as KPI deep dives, performance marketing efficiency, behavioral clustering, and user journey analytics
Curate audiences and inform engagement tactics to enable differentiated, relevant marketing touches across channels (social, email, in app, push)
Synthesize analytics and statistical approaches into easy-to-consume storylines, both visually and verbally, and provide indicated actions for executive audiences
Capture business requirements for data and analytic solutions and collaborate XFN to ensure business requirements align with business needs
Analyze creatives and surface insights that will help drive engagement and retention.
Support day-to-day collaboration with performance marketing to communicate insights and recommend data informed strategies
Qualifications
- BA/BS in statistics, mathematics, economics, industrial engineering or other quantitative discipline
5-10 years of experience in data science
Experience building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and analytical tools, e.g.
Hive, Spark)
Proficiency in scripting languages (SQL, Python, R, etc.)
Experience working with international partners in different time zones
Share to
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'cluster', 'experimental design', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'segment']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'cluster', 'experimental design', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'segment']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Responsibilities
You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals.
An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment.
A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.)
and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment
Benefits
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tableau', 'r', 's3', 'python', 'aw']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'optim', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tableau', 'r', 's3', 'python', 'aw', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'optim', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"In this role you will:
Translate unstructured business problems into well-defined machine learning projects
Collaborate with a cross-functional team of Engineers, Product Managers, and Business Analysts to identify and manage high leverage opportunities for modeling work
Design and implement highly generalizable models for predicting various outcomes
Take responsibility for modeling implementation in real world settings to solve real world problems
Mentor junior team members in modeling artistry
Masters Degree in a quantitative discipline; PhD degrees preferred
Expert experience designing, developing, and implementing machine learning models/algorithms
Extensive programming experience in R or Python and an interest in learning new languages and technologies
Knowledge of data structures and parallelization
Perks and benefits:
Robust healthcare plans, matching 401K and unlimited vacation time
Dog friendly office with lounge areas, video games and gigantic jigsaw puzzles
On-site gym with fitness classes
Generous family leave policy (6 month maternity leave/3 month paternity leave)
Complimentary massages, manicures, pedicures and more
Daily catered lunches from LA’s top restaurants and fully stocked kitchen
","['r', 'python']","['busi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'healthcar']"
DS,"In this role, you should be highly analytical with a knack for analysis, math and statistics.
Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are essential for interpreting data.
Responsibilities:
Analyze large amounts of data and information with statistical rigor to discover optimization opportunities.
Ensure accurate interpretation by combining business acumen with detailed data knowledge and statistical expertise.
Develop causal inference methodology to analyze behavior in cases where A/B testing may not be possible.
Build statistical models that better leverage test results to uncover insights or effect changes in the product.
Identify valuable data sources and work with data engineers to undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms for digital ad conversion, pacing, and yield
Combine models through ensemble modeling
Propose solutions and strategies to business challenges
Hands-on experience of statistical modeling from conceptualization, methodology creation, deployment and validation and ultimately delivering final insightful recommendations.
Robust mathematical skill, with strong working knowledge in some and the ability quickly to be competent in the rest of the gamut of modeling techniques and associated tooling, for examples:
Established statistical methods for data reduction (e.g., factor analysis, PCA) and for prediction (e.g., regression);
Established machine learning methods for feature extraction (e.g., neural nets), for data reduction (e.g., clustering) and for prediction (e.g., decision trees, graph/network analysis);
Excellent understanding of machine learning algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, ensembles, etc.
Experiencence with common data science toolkits, such as sklearn, tensor-flow, keras, gensim, etc and NLP toolkits such as nltk, spacy, etc
Experience with data visualisation tools such as D3.js, plotly / seaborn / matplotlib / tensor-board, Tableau, etc
Proficiency in working with both NoSQL and relational databases such as DynamoDB, Elasticsearch, etc
Expert proficiency with statistical modeling tools like SAS, R, Python, etc.
Good scripting and programming skills using Python, bash, etc
Strong communication and interpersonal skills (both written and verbal)
Master's or advanced degree with 3+ years experience in CS, Statistics, Machine Learning, Applied Mathematics or a related field, PhD a plus.
Awesome medical, dental and vision plans with heavy employer contribution
Paid maternity leave and paternity leave programs
Paid vacation, holidays, and sick days
Contribution to student loan debt payments after the first year of employment
After the first year, CTI contributes 100% of the first 4% contributed of salary deferrals
In-office gym and weekly fitness and yoga classes
Fully stocked kitchen with snacks and beverages
","['nltk', 'nosql', 'kera', 'tensor', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'net', 'seaborn', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'sklearn', 'spaci', 'elasticsearch', 'sa']","['analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'data', 'causal', 'pca', 'random forest', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'nlp', 'decision tree', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nltk', 'nosql', 'kera', 'tensor', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'net', 'seaborn', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'sklearn', 'spaci', 'elasticsearch', 'sa', 'analyz', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'data', 'causal', 'pca', 'random forest', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'cluster', 'optim', 'nlp', 'decision tree', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"This is a critical role specializing in the application of machine learning methods to meet optimization and efficiency.
The ideal candidate will possess all of the required skills listed below and more!
Duties & Responsibilities:
Reframe objectives as machine learning tasks.
Productively implement and execute machine learning.
Demonstrate how models and systems work for stakeholders.
Collaborate with other teams to create data-based products.
Process and verify data used for analysis.
Improve data collection procedures to develop better ML models.
Create automated anomaly detection systems and track performance.
Develop prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, machine learning techniques, and analytics to support analytic visualization of complex data sets.
Provide recommendations to drive KPIs established by product, marketing, operations, PR teams, etc.
Explore new experimental methods and statistical techniques that will sharpen the product decision-making process.
Develop and deploy testing hypotheses and analyze test results.
Provide necessary analytical rigor to ensure date quality, consistency, and accuracy of insights.
Participate in an Open Source learning environment.
Qualifications:
5+ years of experience in Data Science.
Bachelors degree in Computer or Data Science.
Experience with ML frameworks (TensorFlow, SparkMLlib, Apache Mahout, PySpark, Torch, Caffe, H2o, etc.).
Ability to deliver machine learning techniques in real-time applications.
Expertise in modern statistics, data science, and machine learning.
Expertise in a statistical programming language (Python and R) and data access tools (SQL).
Knowledge and experience with classic statistical modeling techniques (ogistic regression, CART, K-means clustering) and machine learning algorithms (gradient boosting, neural networks, random forest).
Able to handle large, ambiguous streams of data across different formats and entry points.
Experience processing large datasets and cloud environments (AWS, Snowflake and Big Data technologies (Hadoop, Spark).
Ability to develop high value features.
Experience deploying models in real-time environments.
Able to present data science results to clients.
Experience with Apache Spark MLlib, Apache Spark GraphX, and Scala/Java, preferred.
Powered by JazzHR
","['h2o', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'mahout', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'hadoop', 'mllib', 'cloud', 'python', 'caff', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'cluster', 'random forest', 'optim', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['h2o', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'mahout', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'hadoop', 'mllib', 'cloud', 'python', 'caff', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'cluster', 'random forest', 'optim', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"What You'll Do
Develop machine learning models, explore new prediction algorithms, construct new features, and research new technologies
Work with engineers to design machine learning solutions that operate quickly and effectively at scale
What You'll Bring
4+ years of experience in a Data Science role
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Engineering or a quantitative discipline
Masters/PhD degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Engineering or a quantitative discipline preferred
Strong practical knowledge of XGBoost and/or other supervised machine learning techniques
Proficient in Python specifically for Data Science: Pandas, SciKit Learn, NumPy, etc
Proficient in SQL and able to wrangle data from many disparate data sources, including JSON, XML, etc
Experience with R and other Data Science tools is a plus
Experience with GitHub is a plus
Experience with business intelligence tools, such as Looker, Tableau, etc is a plus
Experience with deploying Data Science models into production environments
Ability to work well in a collaborative team environment, and an eagerness to share skills, and develop best practices
Prior experience in FinTech is a plus
What You'll Get
Competitive Salary and Equity Incentives
Robust Healthcare Plans (medical, dental, vision)
401K & Unlimited Vacation Time
Diverse & Inclusive Culture
","['xgboost', 'looker', 'github', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['xgboost', 'looker', 'github', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Client JD below:
You then go through a few rounds of interviews for the project
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
DS,"The MIS Data Scientist documents, reviews, analyzes and evaluates business processes, systems and user needs; formulates requirements to parallel overall business strategies.
Types of analysis and reporting may include: Senior management, operations, capacity and turn time modeling, workflow analysis, process improvement, compliance, financial and/or a variety of other function specific purposes.
Identify process improvements, effects of change implementation and financial impact on the business.
Performs a variety of complicated tasks with a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Ability to develop Qlik Reporting and/or.NET or REACT Applications will also be a plus.
Primary Responsibilities
Able to communicate at a very effective and high-level with managers, Sr managers, and executives
Be the SME for various Reporting implementations especially, Data Science/Analytics related
Work with various Stakeholder groups to develop forecasts and capacity models.
Work with the other Project Managers to ensure assigned milestones are delivered on time, within budget, and it meets or exceeds expectations.
Follow all quality assurance processes, including periodic reviews and transitions and ensures the end product fulfills the project objectives.
Prepare Training Material and User Manuals in cooperation with the Business Unit SME
Assist on other projects as needed, perform other related duties and special projects as required
Efficient work style with attention to detail and a strong sense of urgency.
Evidence the ability to work with all levels of management.
Monitor and report any gaps or risks to decrease or avoid any potential losses
Accepts other duties as assigned by MIS Manager
Ability to multi-task more than one assigned project at a time
Collaborate with management and staff in the development and implementation of all projects and/or initiatives related to operational goals and/or process improvement directives.
Qualifications
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.
Strong data analysis/quantitative/technical aptitude with ability to quickly learn new metrics, processes, and dataset.
Expert++ level in analyzing data and be able to classify groups, predict trends and get meaning out of data.
Hands-on experience with one or more statistical analysis tools like R, Python, MATLAB, etc (must have)
3-5 years of experience, preferably across diverse Finance/MIS/Analytical and Operations roles.
Proven history of delivering timely, high quality, senior manager-level reporting and analysis from diverse, complex data sources
Ideal candidate will have strong R/Python/Statistic experience (must have) along with Qlik experience (plus) along with statistical education/experience.Experience with other various Business Intelligence toolsets: Qlik(ideal), SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS), Tableau, Cognos, , Business Objects, SAS, etc (will be a plus)
Some application development exposure such as REACT, JAVA (a plus)
Strong data analysis/quantitative/technical aptitude with ability to quickly learn new metrics, processes, and datasets
Excellent communication ability with strong attention to detail
Ability to gather requirement and be a self starter
BS/MS in MIS or a quantitative discipline preferred
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['python', 'cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'react', 'r', 'qlik', 'ssr', 'sa', 'java']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['python', 'cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'react', 'r', 'qlik', 'ssr', 'sa', 'java', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
Primary responsibilities include:
Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Participate in the development of documentation.
This role conducts experimentation in various data science techniques, developing, executing, and maintaining scripts and prototypes to analyze, interpret, visualize, and gain knowledge from numerous data sets individually or in combination to meet mission needs.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Experience using the statistical computer language Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
#CJ
","['jira', 'python']","['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['jira', 'python', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"True[X]
Senior Data Scientist
The Senior Data Scientist will be a key member of true[X]s Data Science team.
Plus, choose and attend your favorite tech conference, fully sponsored by true[X].
And this is just one of many training and learning opportunities which true[X] invests in every employee.
There is an endless supply of Data Science work to be done.
Boredom doesnt exist here.
As a Data Scientist, you will be joining a most inventive team that is the driving force and steering wheel behind true[X]s next generation ad products.
If you've wanted to join a team where your work can really have an impact, youve found the right place.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Leverage ""Big Data tools (Spark/Hadoop Ecosystem) and cloud services to build ETL pipelines for the massive and complex data collected on true[X]s proprietary ad platform and by third-party vendors.
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including data sourcing, cleansing, normalization, transformation, mapping, etc.
Develop statistical methods and data mining algorithms to solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems and provide insights to various internal and external stakeholders.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning methods.
Deliver a machine learning project from beginning to end, including validating needs, specifying the requirements, defining an approach, aggregating and exploring data, building and validating models, deploying completed models, and using the results to deliver business impact to true[X].
Write production-level code (Python/Scala/C++) to implement machine learning models at scale.
Work with QA/data/software engineers to test and deploy the models to cloud-hosting ad serves.
Monitor the model performance and efficiency in real time, diagnose and resolve potential production issues, and improve as needed.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide range of people and teams.
Collaborate with colleagues from engineering, business and liberal arts backgrounds.
Present proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions.
Provide direction and guidance to junior members of team on all aspects of Data Science from business context to technical coaching.
REQUIREMENTS:
Advanced degree in computer science, optimization, statistics, or relevant fields
In-depth understanding of modern machine learning (including deep learning, reinforcement learning) models and their mathematical underpinning
Minimum 5 years of working experience in the areas of machine learning, predictive modeling and data mining
Proven track record of customizing machine learning solutions to business problems in a cross functional team
Knowledge of common data structures and ability to write efficient code in at least one programing language (Python, Scala, Java, or C++)
Experience with cloud services (AWS/Google Cloud/Microsoft Azure/Databricks etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication and data/model presentation skills, including an ability to effectively communicate with both business and technical teams
","['scala', 'spark', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
• Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
• Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
• Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
• Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
• 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
• Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
• Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
• Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
• Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
• Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
• Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
• Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
• Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Preferred Qualifications
• Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
• Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
• Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
• Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"They must have strong experience developing/designing databases, using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations.
They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights.
They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams.
The research will focus on the energy space, primarily electric vehicles, electric vehicle infrastructure, and distributed energy resources,
The position will work under the Director of Strategic Research and Analytics.
The team often needs to work quickly and under significant time constraints, the ideal candidate should be comfortable with this environment.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
SKILLS
· Develop, design, and manage databases to support the evaluation work of the Strategic Research and Analytics team.
The successful candidate will work with a variety of stakeholders, both internal and external, to identify existing and new data sources, while assessing the effectiveness and accuracy of the data, as well as opportunities to leverage that data to drive business solutions and success.
· Mine and analyze data to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing, and business strategies, as well as portfolio and program level evaluation.
· Execute various mixed methods models, to identify new, interesting, and executable insights.
Candidate should be an expert in machine learning tools and techniques such as as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, etc
· Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
· Effectively communicate findings to relevant stakeholders through professional, clear, and concise presentations, reports, and visualization of the data and results of any analyses.
The ideal candidate can produce advanced visualizations that are accurate and audience specific.
· Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
QUALIFICATIONS
Essential Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Required
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SLQ, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
and familiar with the following software/tools:
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Preferred
· Knowledge of the electric vehicle and/or DER market and related policies and technologies
· Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase
Education:
· Ph.D. in a relevant field (e.g.
data science, statistics, economics, scenario analysis, forecasting, etc.).
Experience:
§ 7+ years of relevant experience
Licenses, Certificates or Registrations:
· None required
Computer and/or Technical Skills:
· Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python, Weka, NumPy, MatLab, etc.
Excellence in at least one of these is required
· Demonstrated high-level abilities with programs such as (or comparable to) Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook are required.
· Familiarity with statistical and/or data visualization tools is required.
","['hive', 'nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'hbase', 'matlab', 'mysql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'c', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'java']","['regress', 'data mining', 'bay', 'glm', 'data', 'decision tree', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",3.0,"['hive', 'nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'hbase', 'matlab', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'c', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'java', 'regress', 'data mining', 'bay', 'glm', 'data', 'decision tree', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'optim', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"In order to achieve this goal, novel and creative machine learning and statistical analysis is needed.
The candidates will be in charge of developing and implementing such algorithms on a variety of data sources and on a variety of educational outcomes.
You have demonstrated competence in developing highly scalable artificial intelligence systems and ship projects with multiple dependencies across teams to achieve brilliant outcomes for customers.
The EDS shall focus on:
Designing, developing and implementing artificial intelligence algorithms and build scalable production systems focused on student achievement and educational options
Identifying creative uses of artificial intelligence and potential artificial intelligence innovations in k-12 education sector
Collaborate with a team of database experts and educational experts to address emerging client needs
The candidates will be expected to be good communicators, particularly with the ability to communicate in an interdisciplinary environment, where different individuals have different expertise.
Experience testing various hypotheses using Bonferroni correction his highly desirable.
Job requirements:
The candidate needs to have at least an undergraduate degree in either computer science, engineering, informatics, or a related field.
A PhD degree in a related field is an advantage (but is not necessary).
Programming competence demonstrated in at least one or more of these programming languages: Python, R, Java, C++, Matlab.
Knowledge and deployment of advanced statistical and machine learning concepts used in big data analysis including nonparametric tests, ANOVA, mixed models, modern supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms such as SVM, Random Forest, PCA, Clustering, and Neural Networks.
Recognized expertise in at least 1-2 AI specialties (e.g., NLP, computer vision, Bayesian networks).
Excellence as evidenced by publications in relevant journals, awards and accolades, or major commercial breakthroughs
Experience with architectural patterns of large, high-scale software applications, including the management of upstream and downstream dependencies and an ability to understand technical designs, challenges, trade offs, and risks
Ability to communicate clearly in an interdisciplinary environment.
Knowledge and experience working with genomic data or with educational records data is an advantage but it is not necessary.
Ability to work in a Linux environment – advantage
Software tool development experience: source control (git), packaging, documentation – advantage.
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time
Pay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year
Experience:
Artificial Intelligence/ML: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Work from home
Flexible schedule
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Day shift
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['linux', 'excel', 'git', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['risk', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'pca', 'random forest', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'svm', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",1.0,"['linux', 'excel', 'git', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'risk', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'pca', 'random forest', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'nn', 'svm', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"Req ID: 177448
The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Data Scientist for the Digital Product, Platform & Strategy: Data Intelligence Operations department.
The Daily
Analyze and model internal customer data.
Build relationships and collaborate with analysts and researchers across WB.
Provide analysis, reporting, and modeling to internal organizations based on customer data.
Prepare and present results of analyses to leadership.
The Essentials
B.A./B.S.
degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Political Science, or similar quantitative field.
Quantitative oriented Masters Degree or Ph.D preferred.
Minimum of 1-2 years of experience in analytics and data science.
1+ years of experience with conducting analysis in R, Python, SAS, or similar analytical languages.
Experience with relational databases and SQL.
Experience with working in cloud based environments like AWS a plus.
Expertise in machine learning and predictive modeling approaches such as Random Forest, GBM, xgBoost, neural networks/deep learning, etc.
Skilled researcher, able to distill large bodies of research to key findings and explain them to varied audiences.
Experience developing testing plans for evaluating campaigns or changes to products
Knowledge of basic survey design and analysis.
Strong history of identifying opportunities for developing predictive models to meet business needs.
Love of TV, Movies, Games, and Comics is a Plus!
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to pay close attention to complex detail and understand written and oral instructions.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be able to work well under time constraints.
Must be able to handle multiple tasks with changing priorities, communicating changes in scope and schedule to all parties concerned.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to maintain confidentiality.
177448
","['xgboost', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'gbm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['xgboost', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'gbm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"The goal?
To dramatically improve care, outcomes and value during cancer treatment.
Role
Undertaking data collection, preprocessing and analysis
Building models to address business problems
Presenting information using data visualization techniques
Identify valuable data sources and automate collection processes
Performs other related duties as assigned or requested.
Qualifications
Your background
BS/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field
Preferred
Healthcare experience a plus, but not required.
Additional skills
Experience with in-depth rate development templates, risk score analyses, trend analyses, cost management/financial initiatives, back-end technical development and programming
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g.
Tableau, Power BI) and data frameworks (e.g.
Hadoop)
Analytical mind and business acumen
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Experience in data mining
Programming
Statistics
Data Wrangling
Data Visualization & Communication
Data Intuition
Machine Learning (algorithms)
AccessHope is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.
#LI-TT
","['power bi', 'excel', 'bi', 'tableau', 'hadoop']","['risk', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'risk', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This person will have the opportunity to tackle the challenges posed by continuous flow of massive data from heterogeneous sources (often have different data structures as well) using various big data analytics.
This individual will have a deep understanding of data science concepts and techniques across the disciplines of applied statistics and machine learning.
This role has the ability to develop new solutions/algorithms and build scalable prototypes of novel methodologies from the ground up.
Communication skills using data visualization for effectively sharing insights found in data with stakeholders will be a plus.
Responsibilities of the role:
Build supervised and unsupervised learning systems to build user profiles and extract visitation behavior from sensor data.
Collaborate with engineering teams on implementing and deploying large scale data processing pipelines
Build internal tools for monitoring and investigation purposes
Lead cross-team cooperation and mentor junior scientists
Qualifications
5+ years of work or educational experience in data science, machine learning, statistics, or applied mathematics.
PhD degree or comparable research experience in a quantitative field
Proven track record of delivering on products and/or practical research endeavors
Programing skill for advanced computing (experience with the Python science stack and/or Scala required)
Experience with Hadoop, Spark, AWS EMR or similar frameworks is a plus
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
","['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'hadoop']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['python', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Responsibilities
Duties include but are not limited to:
Understand business stakeholders' needs and translate those into a data insights program with solutions for each stakeholder
Deliver on data analytics and insights by planning and performing end-to-end analysis: including aggregating and processing data, exploring data, building and validating predictive models, and presenting to business
Design and implement statistical algorithms and predictive analysis
Explain data analytics and data science findings and machine learning models to internal and external stakeholders
Work with Data Analysts, Product Managers and Software Engineers to gather data insight requirements, set goals and influence the product roadmap
Minimum Qualifications
B.S.
or M.S.
in computer science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics or equivalent experience
4+ years of industry experience in predictive analysis and modeling, data analysis and science
3+ years of industry experience in data analytics
Knowledge of data engineering, database architecture and ETL process
Experience building ML models
Proficient in either Python and R
Experience using ML libraries
Knowledge of machine learning frameworks and toolsets
Experience writing and optimizing SQL
Experience using data visualization tools
Experience presenting data findings
Preferred Qualifications
PhD in computer science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Bio-Engineering/Science field
6+ years of industry experience in predictive analysis and modeling, data analysis and science
4+ years of industry experience in data analytics
Proven ability to tackle business problems with data science solutions
Expert level SQL experience; deep experience with statistical packages such as Python and R.
Ability to develop analytic plans for data modeling process
Ability to accurately determine correlations
Experience with AWS data technologies such as Redshift, S3, Data Pipeline
Experience with MS PowerBI
Skills and Competencies
Ability to think critically
Ability to translate business problems into data questions, create solutions and drive results
Ability to aggregate and analyze data from multiple data sources and build a holistic view
Ability to build clear visualizations to explain complex ideas and analysis result to executives and business unit leaders
Ability to provide guidance to other program and project managers
Ability to resolve conflicts and negotiate agreement
Ability to proactively identify impediments in project/program delivery and craft solutions
","['python', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'r', 'powerbi', 'aw']","['data modeling', 'etl', 'correl', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['python', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'r', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'data modeling', 'etl', 'correl', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The candidate will be a key individual contributor responsible for the design and development of predictive models using latest technologies in machine learning.
The ideal candidate will have previous experience in the Cyber Security domain analyzing large data sets to develop actionable analytics solution.
The candidate must also have experience in developing business intelligence solutions to improve operational efficiency, and in using data visualization tools to help in building visualization ideas to present the results to management teams.
The individual will be responsible for the creation of data models that can be applied for variety of Cyber security and Fraud use cases.
He/she must be able to pick suitable analytic techniques to address the problem and demonstrate expertise in using various algorithms and other modeling techniques.
The individual will report directly to CTO.
This position will also provide candidates the opportunity to interact with some of the best brains in information security space and Fortune 500 C-level executives and showcase their skills and passion as a Data Scientist in the Cyber Security Analytics field.
Responsibilities
Development of state-of-the-art algorithms and models for Cybersecurity and Fraud use case
Work with large (terabytes of data, billions of daily transactions) structured and unstructured data sets.
Design and analysis of new algorithms for real time data analytics
Should coordinate with offshore development team to provide guidance on models and algorithms developed
Work closely and iterate quickly with product teams throughout the organization showing demos and prototypes of the models created.
Education & Experience
Prior experience in Cyber Security domain applied analytics, statistics, business intelligence, or predictive modeling
MS/PhD Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or Engineering
Thorough knowledge and experience in supervised and unsupervised learning methods such as SVMs, linear classifiers, Bayesian networks and clustering techniques.
Possesses strong combination of theoretical knowledge and hands-on experience in statistical techniques, regression analysis and machine learning algorithms
Familiarity with reinforcement learning methods.
Comfortable with multiple databases and large data sets
Strong initiative and ability to manage multiple projects as well as ability to work well with others in a fast-paced, dynamic environment
Strong skills in scripting languages such as Python, Perl or Bash;
Proficient in core Java development and Java EE technologies
Excellent oral and written communication
","['python', 'excel', 'perl', 'c', 'java']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'bayesian', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'excel', 'perl', 'c', 'java', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'bayesian', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"Responsibilities:* Bring Creativity to Data products.
* Perform qualitative and quantitative data analysis.
* Cleanse and transform raw data used in machine models.
* Perform data munging, data mining, clustering & classification methods, pattern recognition.
* Comfortable with statistics, calculus and multivariate analysis.
* Participate in ML POCs, validate the results and develop production implementations.
* Build and optimize scalable machine learning solutions in the public cloud.
* Familiar with SQL, Python, R, SparkML, TensorFlow, GCP, AWS, SQL Server.
* Work independently to research and solve business and technical problems.
* Plan their work individually and as part of a team.
* Mentor and train other Data Scientists on the team.Qualifications:* Strong practical experience with machine learning techniques in the industry, accounting and financial industries is a plus.
* Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
* Experience with machine learning algorithms for building ML models, their accuracy, cleanliness, reliability.
* Experience with predictive and prescriptive analyses, modeling, and segmentation.
* Have strong passion for empirical data research for practical applications.
* Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in clear, precise, and actionable* Comfortable with complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources.
* Very comfortable with data engineering methods and pipelines.
* Expert knowledge of analysis tools such as R, Matlab, or SAS* Experience with data warehousing, relational databases, ETL, BI, data mining.
* Experience in SQL, R, Python languages.
* Strong familiarity with GCP and AWS, SQL Server.
* Practical experience with GIT version control.
* Comfortable working with open source tools in a Unix/Linux environment.
* Experience with and ownership of data-informed decision-making.
* Experience translating business requirements into functional, and non-functional requirements.
* Strong sense of product and data ownership.
* Works independently without the need for supervision.
* Strong written and verbal skills - able to explain the work in plain language.
* MS/PhD in Computer Science or other quantitative disciplines
","['unix', 'linux', 'aw', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'bi', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'gcp', 'sa', 'cloud']","['etl', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'pipelin', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']",2.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'aw', 'git', 'sql', 'matlab', 'powerbi', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'gcp', 'sa', 'cloud', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'pipelin', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']"
DS,"The traditional process is broken, with an average home taking over 90 days to sell and costing thousands of dollars.
With Covid-19, the world is changing, and real estate is no exception.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
DS,"Job ID
R10010227
Los Angeles, California, United States
Business
Date posted
Jan. 11, 2020
Senior Data Scientist
There is an endless supply of Data Science work to be done.
Boredom doesn’t exist here.
If you've wanted to join a team where your work can really have an impact, you’ve found the right place.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including data sourcing, cleansing, normalization, transformation, mapping, etc.
Develop statistical methods and data mining algorithms to solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems and provide insights to various internal and external stakeholders.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning methods.
Write production-level code (Python/Scala/C++) to implement machine learning models at scale.
Work with QA/data/software engineers to test and deploy the models to cloud-hosting ad serves.
Monitor the model performance and efficiency in real time, diagnose and resolve potential production issues, and improve as needed.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide range of people and teams.
Collaborate with colleagues from engineering, business and liberal arts backgrounds.
Present proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions.
Provide direction and guidance to junior members of team on all aspects of Data Science from business context to technical coaching.
REQUIREMENTS:
Advanced degree in computer science, optimization, statistics, or relevant fields
In-depth understanding of modern machine learning (including deep learning, reinforcement learning) models and their mathematical underpinning
Minimum 5 years of working experience in the areas of machine learning, predictive modeling and data mining
Proven track record of customizing machine learning solutions to business problems in a cross functional team
Knowledge of common data structures and ability to write efficient code in at least one programing language (Python, Scala, Java, or C++)
Experience with cloud services (AWS/Google Cloud/Microsoft Azure/Databricks etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication and data/model presentation skills, including an ability to effectively communicate with both business and technical teams
From humble beginnings as a cartoon studio in the 1920s to its preeminent name in the entertainment industry today, Disney proudly continues its legacy of creating world-class stories and experiences for every member of the family.
Disney’s stories, characters and experiences reach consumers and guests from every corner of the globe.
trueX, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer.
Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
","['scala', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'python', 'azur', 'java']","['deep learning', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['scala', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'python', 'azur', 'java', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The primary purpose of the Data Scientist role is to conduct analytics research that leads to improved health outcomes across PIH Health in Whittier, CA.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for enterprise-wide data analysis, scorecards and dashboard development and reporting solutions.This will role will consist of daily operational tasks and project based activities.
Responsibilities
• Under direction of more senior resources, researches emerging technologies to support improved health outcomes
• Performs testing of predictive models on data
• Designs, codes, tests and documents in areas assigned on projects
• Collaborates with SMEs to select relevant sources of information
• Works with teams to support data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business knowledge and best practices
• Uses expected qualification and assurance of information to quantify the accuracy of metrics and analysis
• Works to ensure information is used in compliance with regulatory and security policies
• Provides on-going tracking and monitoring of performance decision systems and statistical models
Qualifications
Academic and Professional Qualifications:
• Bachelors or Masters degree in a relevant field of study (health sciences, computer science, engineering or other quantitative)
Experience:
• 2+ years experience in an healthcare analytics role
• Experience with data management
• Experience with pre-processing, cleaning of data
• Knowledge of statistical techniques
• Effectively uses research and cutting edge technology and data to solve problems
• Experience with SQL, SSIS, Tableau and database development
• Demonstrated critical thinking skills and attention to detail
• Excellent client facing skills with the ability to thrive in a highly critical, fast paced environment
Travel Requirements:
• No usual travel
• Travel to educational conferences as needed
Working Arrangements:
• Work is performed in a standard office environment with minimal exposure to health or safety hazards
Verification of employment eligibility will be required as a condition of hire.
Job Requirements:
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"As a contributor you will work around 5-10/hrs a week in exchange for stock options.
Key duties & responsibilities
Design and develop tools and algorithms for recommendation and predictive engines
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Identify, obtain and prepare data sets for training and testing algorithms
Use Machine Learning to solve modeling and ranking problems across discovery and search
Evaluate potential improvements, prototype, validate, and productionize these strategies
Integration of data from multiple sources including third party sources.
Requirements and qualifications
5+ years of relevant experience as a Data Engineer, Data Scientist or Machine Learning Engineer
Strong software development experience in languages such as Python, Java, Scala, R or C++
Experience working with large data sets using tools like Hadoop, Spark, or ElasticSearch
Knowledge of Machine Learning systems, data mining, search, ranking, recommendations
Experience with relational (SQL) and NoSQL Databases
Sharp analytical and problem-solving skills
Great team player with good communication skills
Good organizational and time-management skills
High level (spoken & written) of English
In addition
You are committed and highly motivated
You are results-oriented, quality-driven, dynamic and hands-on
You are proactive, self-motivated, self-directed and you can work well with remote or limited supervision
You are accurate, versatile, creative, curious, rigorous, adaptable and flexible
You are an independent thinker but also a team worker and a continuous learner
","['nosql', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'elasticsearch', 'java']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'supervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['nosql', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'elasticsearch', 'java', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'supervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Data Scientist II
Job Category:
Information Technology
Department:
Advanced Analytics Lab
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Position Type:
Full Time
Requisition ID:
5568
Job Summary
This individual will lead projects through the iterative data science process (Stating the Question > Exploratory Data Analysis > Model Building > Interpretation > Communication > Operationalization), collaborating with business, I.T., and data subject matter experts from across the enterprise.
Duties
Ability to query, transform, and integrate data from multiple sources and structures.
Research and develop predictive learning models using modeling software.
Effective communication of reproducible analyses and results (including failures), both visually and orally, in peer review and customer settings.
Collaborate and work closely with other departments to identify gaps and structure problems.
Propose solutions and actionable strategies to business challenges.
Work closely with domain experts (both business and data) to understand processes and solution inputs.
Monitor the performance of operationalized predictive models.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Education Required
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Engineering
In lieu of degree, equivalent education and/or experience may be considered.
Education Preferred
Master's Degree in Statistics
Experience
Required:
Skills
Required:
Working knowledge of relational databases, database structures.
Proficiency in Apache Spark, R and SQL (Tableau, Python, and SAS a plus).
Exploratory data analysis capabilities to understand the data.
Regression and classification predictive model development and interpretation using: Heuristic/traditional techniques.
e.g., linear regression, logistic regression, Naïve Bayes; Supervised machine learning techniques.
e.g., decision trees, bootstrap aggregation, boosting, deep learning; Unsupervised machine learning techniques.
e.g., k-means clustering, principal component analysis, hierarchical clustering.
Working optimally as part of a cross-functional team.
Ability to initiate and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance.
Ability to problem solve and quickly find solutions on your own.
Strong interpersonal skills, including the ability to influence management at various levels of the organizations.
Licenses/Certifications Required
Licenses/Certifications Preferred
Required Training
Additional Information
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Tuition Reimbursement
Retirement Plans
Medical, Dental and Vision
Wellness Program
Volunteer Time Off (VTO)
Nearest Major Market: Los Angeles
Job Segment:
Medical, Healthcare
","['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['predict', 'statist', 'healthcar', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'logist', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'information technology', 'segment', 'regress', 'bay', 'research', 'decision tree', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'predict', 'statist', 'healthcar', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'logist', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'information technology', 'segment', 'regress', 'bay', 'research', 'decision tree', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Posted: May 11, 2020
Role Number:
200170197
This role will involve working with Internet-scale data across numerous product and customer touch points, undertaking in-depth quantitative analysis and building models to drive strategy.
The team’s culture is centered around rapid iteration with open feedback and debate along the way, plus strong collaboration with product, engineering, business, and marketing partners.
Key Qualifications
3+ years of experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst, preferably for an app or digital subscription business.
You should have a strong and curious business mindset with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action.
Proficient in SQL languages.
Experience with big data technologies such as Hadoop and Spark preferred, building models for data analytics a plus.
Experience using relevant statistical packages to build predictive/ML models!
Excellent communication, interpersonal and presentation skills with meticulous attention to detail.
You will craft how best to monitor, measure and understand performance!
You will be collaborating with product, business, marketing, finance and executive teams to generate regular presentations for C-level.
Education & Experience
Minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Economics or relevant field.
Ideally, Masters in related field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'hadoop', 'c']","['big data', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'hadoop', 'c', 'big data', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 22, 2020
Role Number:
200172948
This role will involve working with Internet-scale data across numerous product and customer touch points, undertaking in-depth quantitative analysis, building models and partnering with business partners to drive strategy.
The team’s culture is centered around rapid iteration with open feedback and debate along the way.
Key Qualifications
4+ years of experience in a Data Scientist or Data Analyst role, preferably for a digital media, entertainment, or subscription business.
Strong proficiency with SQL-based languages with experience with large scale analytics technologies such as Hadoop and Spark.
Familiarity with Python, command line, Git, Keynote, and data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Curious business demeanor with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action
Excellent communication, social and presentation skills with meticulous attention to detail.
Strong time management skills with the ability to work with tight deadlines and pressure from executive requests.
Dive deep into large-scale data to uncover trends and identify key insights that will inform business strategy
Craft how best to monitor, measure and understand business performance and build out associated Keynote narratives, datasets, and dashboards.
Work closely with business, marketing, finance and executive teams to generate regular presentations for C-level.
Education & Experience
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Economics or related field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c']","['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to shape the future of television through data science?
Weve got the shows people love to watch (Jack Ryan, The Expanse, The Boys) and the Emmy Awards love to honor (The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel, Fleabag).
Youve got the skills to unlock the patterns behind content development, how customers consume content, marketing and optimizing scheduling, distribution and releases.
The data tools you build and the algorithms you create will help drive and define the future of television for millions of customers globally.
Responsibilities include:
Use technical knowledge in machine learning, statistical modeling, probability and decision theory, and other quantitative techniques to solve challenging and at times ambiguous business problems.
Understand the business reality behind large sets of data and develop meaningful analytic solutions.
Work closely with internal stakeholders in finance, marketing, creative development, business affairs, strategy, and program planners.
Innovate by adapting to new modeling techniques and procedures.
Basic Qualifications
· PhD or equivalent Master's degree plus 5+ years of research experience in a quantitative field
· 3+ years experience investing the feasibility of applying scientific principals and concepts to business problems and products
· Programming, prototyping, scripting and visualization skills (SQL, Python, R, Scala).
· Excellent written communication and presentation skills.
Preferred Qualifications
· A PhD in statistics, computer science, engineering, mathematics, or a highly quantitative field.
· Experience with cloud computing (EMR, S3, EC2, Redshift) and big data tools (Spark, Hadoop, HDFS).
· Experience with natural language processing and computer vision.
· Engineering skills such as Linux, version control and code reviews.
· Comfortable with open-ended problems.
Be able to frame your own hypothesis, create meaningful metrics, and select the modeling approach.
· Meets/exceeds Amazons leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazons functional/technical depth and complexity for this role
","['linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'ec2', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 's3', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud']","['probabl', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'natural language processing', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'ec2', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 's3', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud', 'probabl', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'nlp', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"As part of the AI & Analytics group, you will work in a collaborative environment with internal and client resources to understand key business goals, build solutions, and present findings to client executives while solving real-world problems.
Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
Role & Responsibilities:
Work in a collaborative environment with global teams to drive client engagements in a broad range of industries to design and build scalable AI and Machine Learning solutions to solve business problems and create value by leveraging client data
Work with team to quickly understand client needs, develop solutions, and collaboratively present findings to client executives
Collaborate with team to provide data-driven recommendations and solutions to clients by clearly articulating complex technical concepts through generation and delivery of presentations
Analyze and model both structured and unstructured data to generate value
Use industry expertise and data science experience to uncover new opportunities with clients’ data
Perform EDA and feature engineering to both inform the development of statistical models and generate improve model performance and flexibility
Qualifications
1 -2 years industry experience, with work in a quant or data scientist field preferred
Master’s degree or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other closely related field
Excellent team-oriented and interpersonal skills, with a strong interest for consulting
Outstanding communication skills with the ability to clearly articulate findings and present solutions to business partners
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with one or two of the following: Deep Learning methods, NLP, computer vision, sentiment analysis, topic modeling and graph theory and databases
Experience with common data science tools such as Python, R, PyTorch, TensorFlow, Keras, NLTK, Spacy, or Neo4j, and a good understanding of modelling platforms (Azure AutoML, SageMaker, DataBricks, DataRobot and H2O.ai)
Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems: Spark, Hadoop, MapReduce, Pig, Kafka
Familiarity with Cloud-based environments such as AWS (S3/EC2), Azure, Google Cloud
Knowledge of other coding languages such as Java, Matlab, SAS, C
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.
Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed.
Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant : http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.
People matter, results count.
","['mapreduc', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'spaci', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'java', 'kera', 'kafka', 'pig', 'ec2', 'r', 'c', 'sa', 'cloud', 'sagemak', 'aw']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'spaci', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'java', 'kera', 'kafka', 'pig', 'ec2', 'r', 'c', 'sa', 'cloud', 'sagemak', 'aw', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Pluto TV is the leading free streaming television service in America, delivering 100+ live and original channels and thousands of on-demand movies in partnership with major TV networks, movie studios, publishers, and digital media companies.
Pluto TV is available on all mobile, web and connected TV streaming devices and millions of viewers tune in each month to watch premium news, TV shows, movies, sports, lifestyle, and trending digital series.
Headquartered in Los Angeles, Pluto TV has offices in New York, Silicon Valley, Chicago and Berlin.
The ideal candidate is adept at using big data to answer questions for product and process optimization, and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action.
The right person for this job will have used a plethora of data mining/data analysis methods and tools, building and implementing models, using/crafting algorithms and creating/running simulations in a professional environment.
They must have a validated ability to deliver business results with their data-based insights.
They must be comfortable working with a wide range of partners and functional teams.
The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in data and working with partners to improve business outcomes.
This is a critical role with a wide range of responsibilities, including:
Mine and analyze data from databases and data lake sources to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies
Assess the efficiency and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, generate revenue, improve ad targeting and other business outcomes
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on media content, customer and product development
Professional experience using statistical computer languages to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets
Experience working with and creating data frames and other data architectures
Experience with a data mining methodology (CRISP-DM, etc.)
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Technical Requirements:
Coding in several languages: SQL, Python, R, Java, Scala, C (C++), JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: Classification, Association, Clustering, Outliner Detection, GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, etc.
Experience using cloud-based systems: Snowflake, Redshift, S3, Spark, Databricks, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Freewheel, Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, etc.
a plus
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Apache Hadoop, Hive, Apache Spark, Apache Kafka, Map/Reduce, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for partners and internal teams using: Tableau, D3, ggplot, etc.
","['hive', 'd3', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'kafka', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 's3', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'glm', 'data', 'analyz', 'cluster', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['hive', 'd3', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'kafka', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 's3', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'c', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'glm', 'data', 'analyz', 'cluster', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to shape the future of television through data science?
Weve got the shows people love to watch (Jack Ryan, The Expanse, The Boys) and the Emmy Awards love to honor (The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel, Fleabag).
Youve got the skills to unlock the patterns behind how people consume that content and ways the content development, marketing, and scheduling can be optimized.
The data tools you build and the algorithms you create will help drive and define the future of television for millions of customers.
Responsibilities include:
· Build models and tools using technical knowledge in machine learning, statistical modeling, probability and decision theory, and other quantitative techniques.
· Understand the business reality behind large sets of data and develop meaningful analytic solutions.
· Work closely with internal stakeholders in finance, marketing, creative development, business affairs, strategy, and program planners.
· Innovate by adapting to new modeling techniques and procedures.
Basic Qualifications
· PhD or equivalent Master's Degree plus 4+ years of experience in CS, CE, ML or related field
· 2+ years of experience of building machine learning models for business application
· Experience programming in Java, C++, Python or related language
· Excellent written communication and presentation skills.
Preferred Qualifications
· A PhD in statistics, computer science, engineering, mathematics, or a highly quantitative field.
· Experience with cloud computing (EMR, S3, EC2, Redshift) and big data tools (Spark, Hadoop, HDFS).
· Experience with natural language processing and computer vision.
· Engineering skills such as Linux, version control and code reviews.
· Comfortable with open-ended problems.
Be able to frame your own hypothesis, create meaningful metrics, and select the modeling approach.
· Meets/exceeds Amazons leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazons functional/technical depth and complexity for this role
","['linux', 'spark', 'ec2', 'redshift', 'excel', 's3', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['probabl', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'natural language processing', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['linux', 'spark', 'ec2', 'redshift', 'excel', 's3', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'probabl', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'nlp', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Verification of employment eligibility will be required as a condition of hire.
MS Data Scientist
US-CA-Whittier
Job ID: 2020-24439
Type: Regular Full-Time
# of Openings: 1
Category: Information Technology
Whittier, CA
Overview
The primary purpose of the Data Scientist role is to conduct analytics research that leads to improved health outcomes across PIH Health in Whittier, CA.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for enterprise-wide data analysis, scorecards and dashboard development and reporting solutions.This will role will consist of daily operational tasks and project based activities.
Responsibilities
Under direction of more senior resources, researches emerging technologies to support improved health outcomes
Performs testing of predictive models on data
Designs, codes, tests and documents in areas assigned on projects
Collaborates with SMEs to select relevant sources of information
Works with teams to support data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business knowledge and best practices
Uses expected qualification and assurance of information to quantify the accuracy of metrics and analysis
Works to ensure information is used in compliance with regulatory and security policies
Provides on-going tracking and monitoring of performance decision systems and statistical models
Qualifications
Academic and Professional Qualifications:
Bachelors or Masters degree in a relevant field of study (health sciences, computer science, engineering or other quantitative)
Experience:
2+ years experience in an healthcare analytics role
Experience with data management
Experience with pre-processing, cleaning of data
Knowledge of statistical techniques
Effectively uses research and cutting edge technology and data to solve problems
Experience with SQL, Tableau and database development
Demonstrated critical thinking skills and attention to detail
Excellent client facing skills with the ability to thrive in a highly critical, fast paced environment
Travel Requirements:
No usual travel
Travel to educational conferences as needed
Working Arrangements:
Work is performed in a standard office environment with minimal exposure to health or safety hazards
PI121226823
Requirements
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Are you a fit?
In this role you will work with a small team of highly dedicated computer scientists to use cutting-edge algorithms to solve real world problems.
Job Details
Conduct literature reviews to identify possible solutions to a selected problem, including identifying strengths and weaknesses of various approaches
Participate in creative brainstorming on how various methods may be applied to problems of interest
Design, implement, and test prototype algorithms
Support algorithm integration into applications and software services
Evaluate performance of algorithms on selected problems / data sets
Communicate work in both written and verbal forms
Provide guidance on integrating mature algorithmic capabilities into software systems
Qualifications
MS or PhD (preferred) in Computer Science or related field
2-3 years of Experience with ML or experience with AI planning or multi-agent algorithms
Experience with ML frameworks such as SciKit-Learn, TensorFlow, Spark, Keras, etc.
Strong programming experience in Python, Java, C++, etc.,
Experience in developing and operationalizing systems that include advanced algorithmic components
Interested in hearing more?
","['kera', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'java']","['commun', 'data']",2.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'java', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"ISIN code FR0000073298, Reuters ISOS.PA, Bloomberg IPS:FP www.ipsos.com
Data Scientist
Division: Global Science Organization (GSO), Data Science & AI Lab
The team develops analytic tools, builds data science models for pilot studies and internal stakeholder analytics innovations, and consults on a broad range of data and research best practices.
The role also requires an observant attention to detail, the ability to work well on a small team, and a self-starter approach to problem-solving and debugging.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Work closely with team members on design and execution of large-scale modeling efforts, contributing to analytics libraries and integrating statistical theory
Collaborate on engineering new data science products by translating needs identified with stakeholders into analytic frameworks that can be built into polished user-facing tools
Build, maintain, and enhance existing codebases
Synthesize academic research, tech innovations, and cloud scalability, to elevate business value for clients, both current and prospective
Validate analytics innovations from marketing science and data science teams globally
Provide consulting for internal teams and clients on data engineering and hygiene, areas for improving process efficiency, and data science algorithms and results
Requirements:
High proficiency writing R and/or Python, including the ability to produce and maintain reusable and modular codebases
Bachelor’s degree
Desire to work in a highly collaborative, fun, consensus-oriented environment.
Experience in analytics, extracting and surfacing value from quantitative data
Attentive learner with excellent time-management skills
Ability to lucidly communicate data science concepts verbally and in written form
Pluses:
Professional or academic experience with modern techniques and algorithms in machine learning and statistical computing such as neural networks, genetic algorithms, Bayesian modeling, data fusion, drivers analysis, clustering, predictive analytics, network analysis, Monte Carlo, and agent-based models.
Experience developing data science models in cloud platforms (e.g.
GCP, AWS)
Working knowledge of SQL and experience with database design and administration.
Experience with Linux server and system administration.
Experience with collaboration tools (e.g.
Atlassian suite) and version control systems (e.g.
Git).
Experience integrating R and/or Python with each other and C\C++.
Large dataset manipulation.
Experience in distributed storage and computing.
Experience with ReactJS, TypeScript/JavaScript, visualization libraries (e.g.
d3.js).
Experience creating and deploying web apps (e.g.
Electron, web2py).
Advanced degree (M.S., Ph.D.), but not required.
Experience in the field of Market Research.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other protected class and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
For all future offer negotiations – please target April 6th or after for their start date.
Required Skills
Required Experience
Culver City, US-CA
","['linux', 'aw', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['data', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['linux', 'aw', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'data', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Desire to thrill and engage?
True[X]
Senior Data Scientist
The Senior Data Scientist will be a key member of true[X]’s Data Science team.
Plus, choose and attend your favorite tech conference, fully sponsored by true[X].
And this is just one of many training and learning opportunities which true[X] invests in every employee.
There is an endless supply of Data Science work to be done.
Boredom doesn’t exist here.
As a Data Scientist, you will be joining a most inventive team that is the driving force and steering wheel behind true[X]’s next generation ad products.
If you've wanted to join a team where your work can really have an impact, you’ve found the right place.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Leverage ""Big Data” tools (Spark/Hadoop Ecosystem) and cloud services to build ETL pipelines for the massive and complex data collected on true[X]’s proprietary ad platform and by third-party vendors.
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including data sourcing, cleansing, normalization, transformation, mapping, etc.
Develop statistical methods and data mining algorithms to solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems and provide insights to various internal and external stakeholders.
Research and implement state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning methods.
Deliver a machine learning project from beginning to end, including validating needs, specifying the requirements, defining an approach, aggregating and exploring data, building and validating models, deploying completed models, and using the results to deliver business impact to true[X].
Write production-level code (Python/Scala/C++) to implement machine learning models at scale.
Work with QA/data/software engineers to test and deploy the models to cloud-hosting ad serves.
Monitor the model performance and efficiency in real time, diagnose and resolve potential production issues, and improve as needed.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide range of people and teams.
Collaborate with colleagues from engineering, business and liberal arts backgrounds.
Present proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions.
Provide direction and guidance to junior members of team on all aspects of Data Science from business context to technical coaching.
REQUIREMENTS:
Advanced degree in computer science, optimization, statistics, or relevant fields
In-depth understanding of modern machine learning (including deep learning, reinforcement learning) models and their mathematical underpinning
Minimum 5 years of working experience in the areas of machine learning, predictive modeling and data mining
Proven track record of customizing machine learning solutions to business problems in a cross functional team
Knowledge of common data structures and ability to write efficient code in at least one programing language (Python, Scala, Java, or C++)
Experience with cloud services (AWS/Google Cloud/Microsoft Azure/Databricks etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication and data/model presentation skills, including an ability to effectively communicate with both business and technical teams
","['scala', 'spark', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Neurotechnology team.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for developing and
maintaining machine learning algorithms which correlate neurological states
with audio visual content for a consumer facing ML based Neurotechnology
platform.
This position will be responsible for the integrity and effectiveness
of the ML algorithms and databases that power this platform.
The Daily
Hands-on design and ML development work to identify multi-channel sentic
modulation across various biometric device types.
Determine/refine approaches to create a machine learning model to
classify biometric sentic modulation into neurological states.
Determine/refine approaches and methods to identify noise patterns and
false positives across biometric device types.
Determine/refine approaches to create a machine learning model to
identify characters and objects within audio video content.
Design ML model to identify objects/characters within audio visual
content.
Identify & classify biometric noise types.
Document parts of the current and future processing framework.
Work closely with other groups to onboard new biometric device types.
This includes collaborating with Television, Digital Networks,
Theatrical, Business Intelligence, Talent, Content Ops, Biz Ops,
Distribution, et al.
Participate in development/system/database operations as needed (devops,
sysops, and DBA work).
The Essentials
PhD in Computer or Data Science (or similar doctoral degree) is required.
Education/Training in Business is optional but helpful, e.g.
MBA,
Finance, Accounting, Marketing.
10+ years developing complex algorithms for ML based systems and/or
biometrics.
10+ years Digital Signal Processing experience.
10+ years Computer Vision knowledge.
10+ years Biometric device and data processing knowledge.
5+ years Python development and Bash scripting.
5+ years SQL on 1 or 2 DBMS, e.g.
PostgreSQL, MySQL, Redshift, Snowflake,
or other mainstream DBMS.
Background in Video Platforms is very helpful, e.g.
NETFLIX, Google,
YouTube, Amazon, Pluto TV, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, as well as
Salesforce, NetSuite, SAP NetWeaver, Omniture clickstream.
Big Data related experience, e.g.
Redshift, Vertica, Presto, Spark SQL,
Kafka, Kinesis, Hadoop, AWS Lambda, Glue.
Cloud experience, ideally AWS -- or alternate, e.g.
Azure or Google Cloud
Compute.
Business platform API development experience with Google/YouTube &
Facebook.
Background in other sw development languages, e.g.
Ruby, Java,
JavaScript, Scala.
models.
Basic understanding of electrical circuits.
Experience with acquiring and analyzing data from electrical
measurements.
Some experience with MLs image processing.
","['lambda', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'redshift', 'mysql', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'postgresql', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'azur', 'java', 'kafka', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'sql', 'aw']","['big data', 'computer vision', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']",2.5,"['lambda', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'redshift', 'sql', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'postgresql', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'azur', 'java', 'kafka', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'sql', 'aw', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Posted: Apr 22, 2020
Role Number:
200167176
This role will involve working with Internet-scale search data across numerous product, undertaking in-depth quantitative analysis and building machine learning models to drive product and strategy.
The team’s culture centers around rapid iteration with open feedback and debate along the way, plus strong collaboration with product, engineering, business, and marketing partners.
Key Qualifications
3+ years demonstrated ability in a Data Scientist or Data Analyst role, preferably from a role passionate about search and discovery.
Proven experience in music, mobile apps, or video content is a plus.
Strong proficiency with SQL-based languages.
Experience with large scale analytics technologies such as Hadoop and Spark preferred
Familiarity with Python or R and data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Proficiency with text mining and NLP methods.
Curious business attitude with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action.
Excellent communication, social and presentation skills with meticulous attention to detail.
Strong time management skills with the ability to handle work to tight deadlines and the pressure of executive requests.
Craft how best to supervise, measure and understand product and business performance.
Collaborate with business, marketing, finance and executive teams to generate regular presentations for C-level.
Your creative skills will be utilized daily.
Education & Experience
Minimum of a Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Economics or related field.
Ideally, Masters or PhD in related field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c']","['visual', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'visual', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Direct End Client: Medtronic
<strong>Job Title: NLP Engineer -Data Scientist
<strong>Start Date: ASAP
<strong>Position Type: Full Time
<strong>Interview Type: In person or Telephonic or Webcam
<strong>Requirement ID: MED_NLP517_VV
Must Have: Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's with 4+ years of experience, Master's with 2+ years of experience or a Ph.D. with 0+ years of experience.Â
Degree must be in Statistics, Math, Computer Science or similar field.
Experience in Python, R or similar data-science scripting language
Experience with statistical modelling
Experience in using SQL for advanced data analysis and visualization
Nice to Have:
Strong track record in building NLP, NLU models using real-world large datasets, that work in production with positive outcomes
Prior experience with Spark and the AWS stack
Experience with Tensorflow, MXNet or Keras framework
Proficient in relational database management systems with knowledge of non-relational database systems
Background in healthcare & diabetes physiology
Understanding of FDA regulations including (ISO) 13485.
Department: Medtronic Diabetes
Responsibilities:
Create ontology and entity database to enable advanced information inquiry.
Design, implement, test and deploy state-of-the-art NLP, NLU in a production environment.
Work closely with the engineering team to operationalize infrastructure for NLP, NLU algorithms.
Access the performance and analyze the risk of designed NLP, NLU algorithms.
Keep up-to-date with the latest techniques and approaches in machine learning and statistical analysis.
Ability to communicate analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner
<strong>Responsibilities may include the following and other duties may be assigned:
In new product design roles: develops and programs integrated software algorithms to structure, analyze and leverage data in product and systems applications in both structured and unstructured environments.
Develops and communicates descriptive, diagnostic, predictive and prescriptive insights/algorithms.
In product/systems improvement projects: uses machine language and statistical modeling techniques such as decision trees, logistic regression, Bayesian analysis and others to develop and evaluate algorithms to improve product/system performance, quality, data management and accuracy.
In both theoretical development environments and specific product design, implementation and improvement environments, uses current programming language and technologies to translate algorithms and technical specifications into code.
Completes programming and implements efficiencies, performs testing and debugging.
Completes documentation and procedures for installation and maintenance.
Applies deep learning technologies to give computers the capability to visualize, learn and respond to complex situations.
Adapts machine learning to areas such as virtual reality, augmented reality, artificial intelligence, robotics and other products that allow users to have an interactive experience.
Can work with large scale computing frameworks, data analysis systems and modeling environments.
Please share my contact information with others working in Information Technology.
Â
Website: www.vgroupinc.com
<strong>Twitter: VGroupITServices@VGroupITService
<strong>Facebook: www.facebook.com/VGroupIT
","['kera', 'python', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'aw']","['risk', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'predict', 'math', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['kera', 'python', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'aw', 'risk', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'predict', 'math', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The goal?
To dramatically improve care, outcomes and value during cancer treatment.
A data scientist is someone who knows how to extract meaning from and interpret data, which requires both tools and methods from statistics and machine learning, as well as being human.
Role & Responsibility
The Data Scientist is responsible for advising the business on the potential of data, to provide new insights into the business's mission, and through the use of advanced statistical analysis, data mining, and data visualization techniques, to create solutions that enable enhanced business performance.
The Data Scientist functions include:
Undertaking data collection, pre-processing and analysis
Building models to address business problems
Presenting information using data visualization techniques
Identify valuable data sources and automate collection processes
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Skills
Programming
Statistics
Data Wrangling
Data Visualization & Communication
Data Intuition
Machine Learning (algorithms
Requirements
Minimum 3 years’ experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst
Experience in data mining
Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Scala, Java or C++ is an asset
Experience with in-depth rate development templates, risk score analyses, trend analyses, cost management/financial initiatives, back-end technical development and programming
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g.
Tableau, Power BI) and data frameworks (e.g.
Hadoop)
Analytical mind and business acumen
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
BSc/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is preferred
Healthcare experience a plus, but not required.
Education
BSc/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is preferred
Healthcare experience a plus, but not required.
","['scala', 'power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['risk', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['scala', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'risk', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The Data Engineer will lead an exciting team in developing innovative technology and delivering uniquely creative content globally.
The salary for the Data Engineer starts at $90 per hour.
Duties & Responsibilities:
Build and optimize performance of Hadoop and Spark batch jobs (Spark, Kafka, Cassandra, etc.).
Construct and improve ElasticSearch performance.
Build data pipelines orchestration.
Create the design and architecture for data-lake, data-marts, data-models, and data-warehouse.
Ensure efficiency of data science workflows and advanced machine learning algorithms.
Contribute to open source solutions and communities.
Stay current on emerging tools and technologies.
Collaborate cross-functionally with other software engineers and their teams.
Establish and demonstrate technologies, solutions, and leading practices.
Balance resources, requirements, and complexity.
Qualifications:
At least, 5 years Data Engineer experience.
Bachelors in Computer Science or similar field.
Possess a passion for coding.
Knowledge of distributed systems and computation.
Experience with Scala, Java, Python, and Go-Lang.
Experience with Apache Hadoop/Spark ecosystem.
Demonstrated working knowledge of data modeling.
Stellar interpersonal and communication skills.
Required Experience:
Git, Unix/Linux, Unit, Integration, Load Testing, developing REST APIs, Ant, Maven, SBT, Gradle, and Docker containers building and deployment.
Experience, preferred:
Jenkins, GraphQL, Amazon AWS (or other cloud services), Kubernetes, Apache Spark (MLib and Graph X).
Salary for the Data Scientist:
Starts at $90/hour.
Powered by JazzHR
","['kubernet', 'unix', 'kafka', 'scala', 'linux', 'spark', 'aw', 'cassandra', 'git', 'elasticsearch', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'docker', 'java']","['data modeling', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'graph', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['kubernet', 'unix', 'kafka', 'scala', 'linux', 'spark', 'aw', 'cassandra', 'git', 'elasticsearch', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'docker', 'java', 'data modeling', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'graph', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"IC Montreal is an IBM Client Innovation Centre operated by LGS, a wholly owned subsidiary of IBM.
The Centre provides services in application development and support to public and private Canadian organizations.
It is distinguished by a capacity to simultaneously offer large-scale projects, highly stimulating professional challenges, an environment favorable to continuous learning, professional mentoring and, lastly, opportunities for career advancement.
Artificial Intelligence, Internet of Things & Advanced Analytics
Interested in working on cutting edge technology such as Artificial Intelligence (AI), Internet of Things (IoT) or Advanced Analytics (AA)?
Does an opportunity to create innovative digital solutions and transforming industries excite you?
Are you a someone that is Curious & has passion for Leadership & Technology?
Look no further!
As a data scientist, you will have the opportunity to work on projects in the following areas:
Internet of Things (IoT): IBM Watson IoT team is a global leader in helping clients re-invent their businesses with IoT by enhancing efficiencies in manufacturing, operations, asset optimization, financial services, and supply chain management.
Learn more at: https://www.ibm.com/internet-of-things/
Watson Artificial Intelligence (Watson AI): Businesses are using AI now more than ever before.
From banks training AI to empower their digital workforce to telecommunication companies setting up smart chat bots to transform customer service, AI is being scaled across industries at an enterprise level.
Learn more at: https://www.ibm.com/watson/
Learn more at: https://www.ibm.com/analytics/
The position will be based in Montreal and the successful candidate will work on projects across North America.
Role:
Ability to work with the client directly to understand and meet their requirements
Ability to travel when needed for project team meetings or knowledge transfer.
Expected: 30%.
Excellent verbal and written communication abilities: must effectively communicate with technical and non-technical teams
Participate in teams working in an Agile/Scrum or Waterfall process and ensure the stories/tasks are well defined and have all the information and tools to be successful
Ability to work independently on tasks and deliver with a high-level of quality
Ability to work in teams and be open to comments and feedback
Ability to learn quickly and to adapt to a fast-paced environment
Data processing, data design and modeling, deploying the model, visualization, and perform report and interpretation of the results
Experience in AI, Machine Learning, and Deep learning
Experience in how to treat and manipulate big data
Required Skills:
3+ years of experience in data modelling and Python libraries for data science, application development or application support in machine learning, visual recognition or forecasting
2+ years of experience with Big Data architectures including Spark, Hadoop HDFS, analytical processing
2+ years of expertise leveraging both NoSQL (MongoDB, Casandra, Redis, etc…)
2+ years of expertise with relational SQL databases (Oracle, Postgres, MySQL, etc…)
1+ R and its libraries
4+ years experience in Python libraries such as: Pandas, NumPy, SciKitLearn, MatPlotLib, Keras
3+ years of experience of REST.
Application development delivering enterprise-class software products based on developing REST-based API's (json/yaml/OpenApi) using either (Python, Java, .Net, Node.js, etc…)
Experience in cloud technologies and architectures, including Virtualization, APIs, Micro-services and Containers
Nice to Have:
Understanding of Public and Private Cloud Provider services, usage and delivery paradigms
Experience with Cloud services, including VMWare, IBM Cloud, AWS, MS Azure, Google Cloud beyond computer instances and storage; that is leveraging advance services such as Athena from AWS and Serverless Architecture
Experience in leading or managing a team
Experience in AI/Machine Learning models training for pattern classification and computer vision applications (OpenCV, TensorFlow, Caffe, Chainer, Theano)
JIRA knowledge, Confluence, other collaboration tools
Education
Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering or Software Engineering (other backgrounds are considered combined with the right experience and personality to be a great technical leader!)
Job Type: Full-time
Work Remotely:
No
","['excel', 'mysql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'caff', 'spark', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'numpi', 'oracl', 'java', 'nosql', 'kera', 'theano', 'scikitlearn', 'r', 'matplotlib', 'jira', 'cloud', 'sql', 'panda', 'aw', 'postgr']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'classif', 'computer vision', 'data', 'machine learning', 'optim', 'busi', 'chat bot', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'caff', 'spark', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'numpi', 'oracl', 'java', 'nosql', 'kera', 'theano', 'scikitlearn', 'r', 'matplotlib', 'jira', 'cloud', 'sql', 'panda', 'aw', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'classif', 'computer vision', 'data', 'machine learning', 'optim', 'busi', 'chat bot', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Position
Position is based in South San Francisco.
May consider remote
He/she serves as the TI point of contact for E4A health economics outcomes research (HEOR) and health policy and systems research (HPSR) members to design and execute observational research using in-house real-world data (RWD).
As a subject matter expert, he/she may also review and design retrospective observational studies that are conducted by external vendors.
Candidates with additional experience in technical health economics (e.g.
Key responsibilities include:
Collaborate with E4A HEOR and HPSR project owners to identify the appropriate in-house databases (e.g., claims/survey/electronic medical record) and design appropriate methodology to answer specific research questions and to address business needs.
Participate in E4A strategic planning and lead the execution of in-house RWD studies.
Develop and/or oversee research protocol and statistical analysis plans.
Recommend and implement appropriate analytical methodology (e.g., propensity score matching, regression analysis;etc) for RWD studies.
Mentor junior TI members to conduct the analyses, review the results, and communicate/publish findings.
Lead and oversee the analytic execution to ensure the analyses are conducted with the highest accuracy and quality.
Develop knowledge in the covered disease area and identify new data sources, methods, and collaboration opportunities to address business needs.
Assist internal stakeholders to review protocol and to support the design of observational research from external vendors.
Establish a strong partnership with E4A and other stakeholders to ensure successful in-house collaboration.
Prioritize resource and support based on the business impact of deliverables.
When assigned, represent E4A in internal and/or external cross-functional, strategic planning and/or other programs on innovative methodology or technology.
Support the Head of E4A TI on operational excellence.
Assist with recruitment, ongoing coaching/mentoring, and training of junior staff.
Comply with all internal policies and external regulations.
Requirements:
Masters Degree (health policy and management, economics, epidemiology, public policy, or health services research); Doctoral Degree in above or other related disciplines is preferred.
A minimum of four years (six years for masters degree) of prior work experience in academic/research institutes, consulting, managed care, government, and/or pharmaceutical industry.
Deep expertise in observational research methodology.
Ability to recommend data sources and to design analyses that answer research questions.
Strong oral and writing communication skills to summarize and explain the findings to audiences who may not have technical background.
Strong hands-on research and programming (SAS, SQL, and/or R) experience of large claims databases.
A strong track record of publication in peer-reviewed journal
Experience in partnering with cross-functional stakeholders
Strong attention-to-detail
Ability to work collaboratively in a dynamic, team-based environment
Ability to prioritize and adjust project plans appropriately
Demonstrated ability to learn and embrace new technologies, applications and solutions
Ability to mentor intern, fellow, and/or junior staff.
I put the patient first, always.
I am obsessed with meeting customer needs.
I am inclusive.
I build a culture of trust.
I have a growth mindset.
I act with urgency.
I am accountable.
I radically simplify and prioritize for impact.
I follow the science.
#LI-GENEKC1
The next step is yours.
Job Facts
JOB FUNCTION
Modelling & Simulation COMPANY/DIVISION
Pharmaceuticals SCHEDULE
Full time JOB TYPE
Regular
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'sa']","['regress', 'data', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'sa', 'regress', 'data', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Job Title:
Principal Data Scientist
Requisition ID:
R001629
Job Title: Principal Data Scientist
Reporting To: VP, Live Ops Analytics
Department: Live Ops Analytics
Your Platform
Your Mission
The Live Ops Analytics Team is looking for a data science expert.
As a thought leader within the Live Ops Team, your mission is to put the science into decision making.
Priorities can often change in a fast-paced environment like ours, so this role includes, but is not limited to, the following responsibilities:
Provide technical leadership and mentorship to data scientists with a wide range of backgrounds
Democratize and socialize learnings by contributing to a centralized repository that informs future game design, and is carried across titles and franchises
Player Profile
Minimum Requirements:
Advanced degree required with technical focus (Statistics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, etc.)
10+ years total experience in analytics
Exceptional technical skills with SQL, R/ Python for data analysis and experience in ML driven products
Demonstrated programming skills either in data science or software development settings a plus
Expert at deriving narrative from data and communicate the results effectively
Expert in experimentation and causal inference methodologies
Comprehensive experience with predictive and prescriptive modeling
Deep product sense, with a solid understanding of user engagement and monetization strategies in gaming, entertainment/ecommerce service providers, or mobile apps a plus
Extra Points:
Guiding teams to be agile in response to change and to solve complex problems
Being active in the industry, recognized for application of science to games & entertainment
Delivering breakthrough analytical projects resulting in measurable engagement or revenue impact
Exemplifies multi-dimensionalskill setdata science,experimentation, analysis, engineering, etc.
Being a renowned champion for best practices within the analytics, data and engineering teams
Provides context, not control, remaining highly aligned but loosely coupled
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['statist', 'predict', 'data', 'causal']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'statist', 'predict', 'data', 'causal']"
DS,"The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Data Scientist for the Digital Product, Platform & Strategy: Data Intelligence Operations department.
The Daily
Analyze and model internal customer data.
Provide analysis, reporting, and modeling to internal organizations based on customer data.
Prepare and present results of analyses to leadership.
The Essentials
B.A./B.S.
degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Political Science, or similar quantitative field.
Quantitative oriented Masters Degree or Ph.D preferred.
Minimum of 1-2 years of experience in analytics and data science.
1+ years of experience with conducting analysis in R, Python, SAS, or similar analytical languages.
Experience with relational databases and SQL.
Experience with working in cloud based environments like AWS a plus.
Expertise in machine learning and predictive modeling approaches such as Random Forest, GBM, xgBoost, neural networks/deep learning, etc.
Skilled researcher, able to distill large bodies of research to key findings and explain them to varied audiences.
Experience developing testing plans for evaluating campaigns or changes to products
Knowledge of basic survey design and analysis.
Strong history of identifying opportunities for developing predictive models to meet business needs.
Love of TV, Movies, Games, and Comics is a Plus!
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to pay close attention to complex detail and understand written and oral instructions.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be able to work well under time constraints.
Must be able to handle multiple tasks with changing priorities, communicating changes in scope and schedule to all parties concerned.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to maintain confidentiality.
Requisition #
177448BR
Area of Interest
Industry
Film Production and Distribution
United States - California - Burbank
Position Type
Full Time
Business Unit
Business Unit Overview
WBT manages the Studio’s enterprise systems and solutions, emerging platforms, information security, consumer intelligence, content mastering and delivery, and more.
Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers.
Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
","['xgboost', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'gbm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['xgboost', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'gbm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"ABOUT YOU
You have 7+ years of experience in a data science or engineering role and a graduate degree.
You code in R or Python, are proficient in a Data Viz tool (Tableau, Shiny, Dash) and don't mind getting your hands dirty working with structured and unstructured data from a variety of sources
You focus on Customer Experience and Media Optimization by leveraging machine learning and statistical modeling to translate ambiguous business objectives into concrete data-driven solutions.
You enjoy working on a variety of projects simultaneously and applying new techniques and are never one to rest on your past accomplishments.
What else?
Maybe you're passionate about social issues?
Or maybe you have an impressive vinyl collection?
Perhaps you spend as much time exploring nature as you do writing code?
","['dash', 'tableau', 'shini', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['dash', 'tableau', 'shini', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
+ Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
+ Build 'smart' systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
+ Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution
In the first year this role will focus on the following
+ Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
+ Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
+ Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
+ Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
+ Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers
Required Qualifications
+ Master's Degree + 3 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 5 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
+ Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
+ Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
+ Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ Master's Degree or PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
",[None],"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Data Scientist
If you are a Data Scientist with experience, please read on!
What You Will Be Doing
This resource will have access to a variety of different data sources available to the Data Products and Engineering team, entailing clickstream, financial, marketing, event, and internal data.
This individual will be responsible for exploring data sets as large as 1 petabyte (1PB) and driving business results with their data-based insights using predictive modeling.
The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and can use models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action.
Other responsibilities will include (but are not limited to) data visualization, data- driven problem solving, They have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in data sets and can brainstorm ways to improve business outcomes/determine future project focus.
They must also have experience and interest in content analysis.
What You Need for this Position
"" 4+ years of experience as a Data Scientist within a large, consumer-facing analytics environment
"" Strong python/R programming experience to extract, clean, analyze, and visualize data
"" Exposure to cloud environments (preferably AWS)
"" Strong experience utilizing Spark for data processing
"" Automation experience using Amazon S3 or other comparable storage service
"" Machine Learning experience using Tensorflow, Scikit-learn, or Spark ML
"" Experience using Amazon SageMaker for cloud machine learning
"" At least a B.S.
in Computer Science, EE or Mathematical Science.
MS or PhD preferred
What's In It for You
Great Compensation and Benefits Package
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['spark', 'aw', 'sagemak', 's3', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'aw', 'sagemak', 's3', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']"
DS,"As a data scientist, you’ll work closely with psychometricians, engineers, as well as UX designers and researchers to actualize the potential derived from combining some of the richest behavioral data sets available with cognitive data.
You'll not only get to push your own boundaries, but the boundaries of artificial intelligence.
WHAT YOU WILL OWN AND DRIVE
Perform complex statistical analyses on large data sets of unique psychometric data
Incorporate the latest findings from machine learning and psychological research into a working product
WHAT YOU NEED TO BRING TO THE TABLE
MS in Computer Science, Physics, Computational Neuroscience, or related field
4+ years of highly relevant practical experience in data science or data engineering
Demonstrated experience with a wide variety of machine learning models and techniques (e.g.
supervised and unsupervised learning, dimensionality reduction)
Exceptional command of Python and relevant libraries (Numpy, Scipy, Sklearn, etc.)
A strong understanding of the fundamental mechanics of machine learning algorithms
A portfolio of activities / a side project that showcases your intellectual curiosity
WHAT MAKES YOU STAND OUT
A PhD in Computer Science, Physics, Computational Neuroscience, or related field
Familiarity with modern infrastructure and tools (e.g.
Kubernetes, Docker, AWS) and large-scale data processing technologies (e.g.
SQL, Hadoop, Spark)
Knowledge of modern deep learning frameworks and libraries (Tensorflow, PyTorch, Theano, etc.)
Hands-on experience with behavioral and event data from video games (mainly mobile and PC) including prediction models (e.g.
churn, monetization, LTV)
Familiarity with and interest in psychometric data
Experience in a fast-paced, startup environment
The opportunity to shape a ground-breaking and important idea from the early days
A high level of ambition combined with a clear vision
Highly motivated and experienced team with the relevant domain expertise and networks
A competitive compensation package with a significant equity share
Support for training and personal development
","['kubernet', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'sklearn', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'docker', 'aw']","['deep learning', 'data', 'dimensionality reduction', 'predict', 'supervis', 'research', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",3.0,"['kubernet', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'sklearn', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'docker', 'aw', 'deep learning', 'data', 'dimensionality reduction', 'predict', 'supervis', 'research', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Mettre en place une architecture de base de données unique capable de :
· Récupérer des informations hétérogènes depuis plusieurs supports et canaux
· Structurer / Normaliser / Exploiter les données
· S’interfacer avec des applications/requêtes
· Documenter et communiquer envers des équipes de développement
Vous avez une vraie passion pour la Data Science et l’environnement des bases de données, les applications intensives, le fullstack et les graphes
Mindset orienté objectif, vous êtes force de proposition pour les problèmes posés
Savoir expliquer en termes simples les solutions et les process
Vous avez une réelle habileté à travailler en équipe et en respectant les deadlines
Outils
Modélisation : Utilisation de standards (type UML) pour la création de modèles objets et ERD
Bases de données : NoSQL, Principalement MongoDB et Neo4j
Langages : Python, GO, Java, Typescript
Opensource : Spark, React
Tooling : Github, Bitbucket
Formation / Expérience
Master Bac+5 ou équivalent
Expérience minimum de 3 ans dans un environnement data
Expérience confirmée en scripting/coding
Bon niveau d’anglais
Statut : Cadre
Type d'emploi : Temps plein, CDI
Expérience:
scripting / coding: 3 ans (Souhaité)
data scientist h/f ou similaire: 3 ans (Souhaité)
Langue:
Anglais (Souhaité)
","['nosql', 'spark', 'github', 'react', 'mongodb', 'python', 'java']","['graph', 'data']",2.0,"['nosql', 'spark', 'github', 'react', 'mongodb', 'python', 'java', 'graph', 'data']"
DS,"One of the fastest growing data analytics start-ups in Los Angeles is looking for a full-time Data Scientist.
Those who fill this role will work closely with University leadership and staff to understand their analytical needs and develop and maintain models that provide insight into enrollment, revenue, retention, marketing, and class-scheduling opportunities.
The ideal candidate will possess both superior technical ability as well as effective communication.Required Skills & Experience* Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Statistics, or related field* 3 years of experience working in a forecasting role in economics, finance, or marketing analysis* Knowledge of statistical tests and procedures such as ANOVA and multivariate regression* Demonstrated ability to conduct and interpret quantitative and qualitative analyses* Expertise leveraging R, SAS, Python, and SQL to generate and deploy modeling solutions* Experience using data visualization tools such as Tableau to analyze and present dataDesired Skills & Experience* Master's degree in Data Science, Statistics, or related field* Prior positions in higher education or working with education data* Experience implementing predictive analytics in a production setting* Prior roles performing sales forecasting and demand planning* Strong understanding of data warehouse concepts* Experience working with large structured and unstructured data setsThe Offer* Competitive Pay: Up to $160,000, DOEYou will receive the following benefits:* Generous PTO* 401k, health, dental insurance* Stock option and annual bonuses* Free coffee and snacks* Gym membership discountApplicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis now and in the future.Jobspring Partners, part of the Motion Recruitment network, provides IT Staffing Solutions (Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire) in major North American markets.
","['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['regress', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'regress', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Req ID: 177455
The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Sr. Data Scientist for the Digital Product, Platform & Strategy: Data Intelligence Operations department.
The Daily
Analyze and model internal customer data.
Build relationships and collaborate with analysts and researchers across WB.
Provide analysis, reporting, and modeling to internal organizations based on customer data.
Prepare and present results of analyses to leadership.
The Essentials
B.A./B.S.
degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Political Science, or similar quantitative field.
Quantitative oriented Masters Degree or Ph.D preferred.
Minimum of 4-5 years of experience in analytics and data science.
2+ years of experience with conducting analysis in R, Python, SAS, or similar analytical languages.
Experience with relational databases and SQL.
Experience with working in cloud based environments like AWS a plus.
Expertise in machine learning and predictive modeling approaches such as Random Forest, GBM, xgBoost, neural networks/deep learning, etc.
Skilled researcher, able to distill large bodies of research to key findings and explain them to varied audiences.
Experience developing testing plans for evaluating campaigns or changes to products
Knowledge of basic survey design and analysis.
Strong history of identifying opportunities for developing predictive models to meet business needs.
Love of TV, Movies, Games, and Comics is a Plus!
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to pay close attention to complex detail and understand written and oral instructions.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be able to work well under time constraints.
Must be able to handle multiple tasks with changing priorities, communicating changes in scope and schedule to all parties concerned.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to maintain confidentiality.
177455
","['xgboost', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'gbm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['xgboost', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'gbm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Projects support business decision making for multiple business functions.
Designs, creates, implements and manages predictive analytics that leverage large and varied data sets, using a wide range of analytical tools, methods and platforms.
SUMMARY
The Data Scientist implements machine learning algorithms, collects and analyzes information from multiple sources, identifies unique opportunities to locate and collect new data, and communicates data findings to both business and IT leaders.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Use existing machine learning tools or develop customized algorithms to solve analytical problems with incomplete data sets and deploy automated processes into production.
Conduct scalable data research on manufacturing and sales data.
Create new software designed to access and handle data more efficiently.
Train the data management team on new or updated procedures.
Formulate business problems into concrete mathematical framework, and translating analytic results into actionable business recommendations.
May write and implement procedures.
May train data management team on new or updated procedures.
Assist with projects and other job-related duties as assigned.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
QUALIFICATIONS
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field and 5 years practical related experience in machine learning and statistical modeling.
Equivalent work experience may be considered in lieu of a degree.
Master’s degree preferred.
Experience implementing real-time machine learning and data mining algorithms in large scale environments, and collecting data from/exposing data to various data sources and services (API, XML, JSON, etc.)
required.
COMPUTER SKILLS
Possess expertise in Python, developing cloud solutions on AWS, knowledge of GitHub and capable of pull and merge requests.
Ability to use MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.
LANGUAGE SKILLS
Ability to read and interpret documents such as design drawings and schematics.
Ability to write general correspondence and technical reports.
Ability to speak effectively in meetings.
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS
Ability to calculate figures and amounts such as percentages.
REASONING ABILITY
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exits.
Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, verbal, diagram or schedule form.
Ability to identify trends and develop action plans to address issues.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to handle, or feel, and talk or hear.
The employee is frequently required to sit.
The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk.
The employee must regularly lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, and ability to adjust focus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet.
","['python', 'github', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['python', 'github', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Deliver lectures and tutorials on: scientific Python, SQL, probability, statistics (Bayesian and frequentist), machine learning, and data engineering.
Lead day-long ""sprints,"" maintaining a strong presence in the classroom and helping other instructional staff
Deftly and patiently field student questions and provide feedback in lectures and office hours.
Build and refine data science curriculum and assignments.
Utilize student feedback and experimentation to continuously improve teaching and assessment methods
Evaluate new tools, packages, and tutorials for use in the curriculum.
Contribute to local evangelism, admissions, and nurture activities, such as attendance at meet-ups, speaking at conferences, leading workshops, etc.
Professional Development:
There's no better way to learn than to teach!
You'll be amazed at how much you'll develop skills you thought you were already an expert in just by helping students and planning lessons.
Opportunities to work with and learn from other data science and web development instructors in a highly collaborative and intellectually rich environment.
Rub shoulders and cross-pollinate.
Previous projects have involved: Machine Learning; Deep Learning, Data Engineering and Architecture, Applied Statistics and Statistical Modeling, Web Development Ruby on Rails, Angular, Ember, React, and Node.js and Express.
Become the best instructor you can be with ongoing training and support.
Qualifications:
Experience in industry in a data scientist or software engineer role.
Master's or PhD in a quantitative discipline such as engineering, statistics, or mathematics.
For more details on the program go to: http://www.galvanize.com/courses/data-science/#.Viqz4LQR8UU.
Outstanding communication skills.
Experience teaching a quantitative subject preferred.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['sql', 'react', 'angular', 'python', 'rubi']","['probabl', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",2.0,"['sql', 'react', 'angular', 'python', 'rubi', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Are you interested in building a data team from the ground up?
Are you interested in IoT and Energy Saving Solutions?
If so, a Glendale Startup is hiring a Seasoned Data Scientist who can also build the baseline ETL pipelines for the business.
In this role you will have the opportunity to choose the frameworks and tools that will be used, having technical freedom in the process.
The data team is an integral part of this growing SaaS startup so you will also be responsible for building out the team with new hires as well.The ideal candidate has Machine Learning/AI experience, with the ability to do data visualization and build data models, using the data to provide energy saving insights.
As this is the first data hire you will also be able to build ETL pipelines from scratch.
Any prior managerial experience or prior startup experience is a big plus.
",[None],"['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Investigate new opportunities using machine learning, data mining, statistics or analytics
Promote adoption of cutting edge analytics, implement innovative quantitative research tools and models, mentor others in the latest statistical and data science methods
To be successful in this role, you'll need:
MS/Ph.D in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Economics, Engineering, or similar quantitative discipline required.
Ph.D preferred
8+ years experience as a data scientist developing predictive business models
A proven track record of using advanced data solutions to produce effective business results
Hands on knowledge of some of the most advanced methods in machine learning, data mining, statistics, optimization, classification, forecasting and/or NLP
Expertise in SQL, previous experience with big data systems
Strong coding skills in Python, R, Matlab or similar statistical language (Python strongly preferred)
Great communication skills including communicating complex concepts to business stakeholders
A passion for discovery, problem solving and groundbreaking technology
1.
Work/Life Balance: flexible work schedule, flexible PTO, parental leave
Enrichment: professional development workshops, diversity charter groups, an orientation program, career pathing opportunities
Equal Opportunity Employer
http://instagram.com/lifeatservicetitan | https://www.themuse.com/profiles/servicetitan | https://www.builtinla.com/company/servicetitan-inc
Forbes Top 100 Software Companies, 2019
Inc 5000 Most Successful Companies in America, 2019
Inc 5000 Best Places to Work, 2019
Los Angeles Business Journal Best Places to Work, 2019
Deloitte Fast 500, 2019
Los Angeles Business Journal Top 100 Fastest Growing Private Companies, 2018
Inc 5000 Best Places to Work, 2018
Inc 5000 America's Fastest Growing Companies, 2018
Glassdoor/Battery Ventures Highest Rated Cloud Computing Companies, 2018
Mogul Top 1000 Companies Worldwide for Millennial Women 2018
Forbes Next Billion-Dollar Startup List, 2017
","['matlab', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['matlab', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
They are responsible for data preparation, model development, model deployment, and model production.
The ideal candidate is a sharp, creative, detail oriented, analytical, and highly quantitative individual with passion for data modeling, data analysis, and working with cross-functional teams.
Job Duties include, but not limited to:
Develop, maintain, and refine marketing mix models using advanced statistical methods and machine learning models.
Convert existing attribution model process from SAS to Python.
Process, cleanse, validate, and integrate data from different resources for reporting, analysis, model building, and data visualization.
Act as liaison between Client Services and Data teams for understanding requirements and explaining results.
Develop innovative tools and processes to improve team efficiency.
Check and debug any data related issues to ensure accuracy and data integrity.
Document technical findings and modeling approaches on Confluence and contribute to presentations.
Education and Experience Requirements:
BA/BS or Master’s or PhD degree in Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics, or other quantitative fields
5+ years of experience as a data scientist in statistical analysis and model development
Applied knowledge of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Strong working experience on building machine learning models including linear models and tree-based models for regression and classification problems.
Deep learning/neural networks experience is a plus but not required
Advanced statistical knowledge on probability distributions, hypothesis testing, time series models and analysis
Excellent proficiency in analytics software tools such as Python, R, or SAS
Strong Python experience for data analysis and machine learning projects using either Jupyter notebooks or IDEs
Proficient in querying databases (SQL), and experience with AWS and Snowflake.
Experience with end-to-end data science workflow and various model deployment processes
Demonstrated experience building automated ETL pipelines.
Curious and inquisitive business vantage point, with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action.
Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills and ability to communicate complex ideas and strategy to both external and internal clients.
Other Considerations:
Salary based on skills and experience
Skills will be tested upon interview
All applicants are subject to background checks and offers of employment will be pending the verification of information listed on application
All applicants will need to provide a list of professional references
**
","['snowflak', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'sa', 'aw']","['time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'econom', 'pipelin', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'etl', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['snowflak', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'sa', 'aw', 'time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'econom', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'etl', 'machine learning']"
DS,"**CANDIDATES WILL NOT BE CONSIDERED WITHOUT AN ATTACHED RESUME**
This role is responsible for data preparation, model development, model deployment, and model production.
The ideal candidate is a sharp, creative, detail oriented, analytical, and highly quantitative individual with passion for data modeling, data analysis, and working with cross-functional teams.
Job Responsibilities include, but not limited to:
Develop, maintain, and refine marketing mix models using advanced statistical methods and machine learning models.
Convert existing attribution model process from SAS to Python.
Process, cleanse, validate, and integrate data from different resources for reporting, analysis, model building, and data visualization.
Act as liaison between Client Services and Data teams for understanding requirements and explaining results.
Develop innovative tools and processes to improve team efficiency.
Check and debug any data related issues to ensure accuracy and data integrity.
Document technical findings and modeling approaches on Confluence and contribute to presentations.
Education and Experience Requirements:
BA/BS or Master’s degree in Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics, or other quantitative fields.
5+ years of experience as a Data Scientist in statistical analysis and model development.
Applied knowledge of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques.
Strong working experience on building machine learning models, including linear models and tree-based models for regression and classification problems.
Deep learning/neural networks experience is a preferred, but not required.
Advanced statistical knowledge on probability distributions, hypothesis testing, time series models and analysis.
Excellent proficiency in analytics software tools such as Python, R, or SAS.
Proficient in querying databases (SQL), and experience with AWS and Snowflake.
Experience with end-to-end data science workflow and various model deployment processes.
Demonstrated experience building automated ETL pipelines.
Curious and inquisitive business vantage point, with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action.
Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills, and ability to communicate complex ideas and strategy to both external and internal clients.
Other Considerations:
Salary based on skills and experience
Skills will be tested upon interview
All applicants are subject to background checks and offers of employment will be pending the verification of information listed on application
All applicants will need to provide a list of professional references
**NO RECRUITERS OR PHONE CALLS PLEASE**
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g.
H-1B visa status)?
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['snowflak', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'aw']","['time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'econom', 'pipelin', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'etl', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['snowflak', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'aw', 'time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'econom', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'etl', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist Instructor
Are you a fit?
Salary: $110,000 - $140,000
You will be supporting the training efforts for the fundamentals of data science .
As an instructor/trainer, you will execute the courses that teach people how to produce software on budget, on time and with a high degree of customer satisfaction.
If you are a strong Software Engineer with great technical skills and an interest in teaching others, then please read on.
Great salary!
Generous health benefits with medical, dental and vision coverage!
401(K)
Job Details
Is your background a fit?
Masters or PhD in a quantitative discipline such as statistics or mathematics
2+ years of industry experience in a data scientist role
Experience teaching a quantitative subject preferred.
This commercial group helps students of all ages to learn Data Science.
D in a STEM discipline who would love to train eager minds.
This position is based in a campus in Austin.
If you are a strong Data Scientist with great data science skills, outstanding Python skills and an interest in teaching others, then please read on.
Stay on top of the most cutting edge technologies and become the SME you always knew you were.
Interested in hearing more?
",['python'],"['statist', 'data']",2.0,"['python', 'statist', 'data']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· · Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 6+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· · Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"-------------------
-------------------
period of hyper growth.
With millions of delighted users
Very
competitive comp, equity and benefits.
for non local candidates.
---------------
---------------
mathematics.
later on in life.
you who excelled in the quantitative sciences.
Congratulations,
Hollywood is an awesome opportunity for you to further your
pursuit of big data.
--------------
Qualifications
--------------
-Graduate Degree in quantitative sciences.
-Some experience
working with global mobile or digital companies in B2B, B2C or
C2C digital business models.
client's products daily, so experience in an equivalent or larger
set of Big Data is important.
Knowledge in the following
technical areas will help you in the role: Machine learning,
Hadoop, MapReduce, Multiple Regression-Very competitive comp,
equity and benefits.
local candidates, but applicants should presently be within a
commute of Los Angeles or be willing to relocate
----------------------
Additional Information
----------------------
Compensation package will be best in class and include a great
base salary, equity, and excellent benefits.We welcome your
application online and will make every effort to respond to
qualified applicants.All of your information will be kept
confidential and assessed in accordance with EEO guidelines.
fill at http://www.eleverpro.com/executive-recruiter-jobs/
","['hadoop', 'mapreduc', 'excel']","['regress', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'mapreduc', 'excel', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Req ID: 176055
HBO Max is the future of entertainment and storytelling.
WarnerMedias new streaming entertainment offering, HBO Max is the culmination of some of the most innovative new technology and greatest creative talent in the industry.
HBO Max will also be home to key third-party library acquisitions, such as Friends, South Park and Doctor Who, and more than 50 exclusive Originals in its first year, from the likes of groundbreaking creative talent such as J.J. Abrams, Ridley Scott, Jordan Peele, Steven Soderbergh, Michael Mann, Mindy Kaling, Reese Witherspoon, Anna Kendrick, Greg Berlanti, Melissa McCarthy, Robert Zemeckis, Ellen DeGeneres, and other visionaries.
HBO Max launches in May 2020.
The Job
You will build data science models, perform advanced analytics and data mining to help business understating HBO Max consumers behaviors, analyze ROI from marketing spend and optimize advertising strategy.
The Daily
Develop analyses segmentation, propensity models, KPI deep dives, marketing efficiency, behavioral clustering, customer lifetime value and customer journey analytics.
Curate audiences and inform engagement tactics to enable differentiated, relevant marketing touches across CRM channels (email, in app, push).
Synthesize analytics and statistical approaches into easy-to-consume storylines, both visually and verbally, and provide indicated actions for executive audiences.
Capture business requirements for data and analytic solutions and collaborate with the Marketing team to ensure business requirements align with business needs.
Analyze content promotions and surface insights that will help drive viewership and a more loyal customer base.
Support day-to-day collaboration with Marketing to communicate insights and recommend data informed strategies.
The Essentials
BA/BS in statistics, mathematics, economics, industrial engineering or other quantitative discipline.
Good understanding of advertising technology and landscape, including external data providers and data management platforms.
3+ years of experience building data science models (Time Series, Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, etc.).
Experience with large data sets and analytical tools.
Proficiency in scripting languages (SQL, Python, R, etc.).
Knowledge of a dashboarding language (Tableau, Looker, etc.)
or equivalent report building experience not required but a plus Other desired qualifications: - Strong curiosity, leadership and business acumen.
Passionate about using data to drive strategy and product recommendations.
Experience in subscription-based businesses or eCommerce preferred.
Background with CRM preferred.
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to motivate, collaborate and influence.
Ability to deliver on multiple projects and meet tight deadlines.
A developed creative taste and strong instinct for stories and experiences that will capture consumers.
Actively engage in strategic conversations with social insights and community perspectives.
Ability to adapt rapidly in a fast-moving environment with shifting priorities and the ability to react quickly, dynamically, and intelligently.
Ability to effectively influence and communicate cross-functionally with all levels; exceptional verbal and written communication skills.
Strong presentation skills are a must.
The Perks
Exclusive WarnerMedia events and advance screenings
Paid time off every year to volunteer
Access to well-being tools, resources, and freebies
Access to in-house learning and development resources
Part of the WarnerMedia family of powerhouse brands
Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers.
Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
[#video#https://youtu.be/CC-seRMEo8s{#400,300#}#/video#] 176055
","['looker', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'econom', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['looker', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'econom', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Sr. Data Scientist for the DOPE: Neurotechnology team.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for developing and maintaining machine learning algorithms which correlate neurological states with audio visual content for a consumer facing ML based Neurotechnology platform.
This position will be responsible for the integrity and effectiveness of the ML algorithms and databases that power this platform.
The Daily
Hands-on design and ML development work to identify multi-channel sentic modulation across various biometric device types.
Determine/refine approaches to create a machine learning model to classify biometric sentic modulation into neurological states.
Determine/refine approaches and methods to identify noise patterns and false positives across biometric device types.
Determine/refine approaches to create a machine learning model to identify characters and objects within audio video content.
Design ML model to identify objects/characters within audio visual content.
Identify & classify biometric noise types.
Document parts of the current and future processing framework.
Work closely with other groups to onboard new biometric device types.
This includes collaborating with Television, Digital Networks, Theatrical, Business Intelligence, Talent, Content Ops, Biz Ops, Distribution, et al.
Participate in development/system/database operations as needed (devops, sysops, and DBA work).
The Essentials
10+ years developing complex algorithms for ML based systems and/or biometrics.
10+ years Digital Signal Processing experience.
10+ years Computer Vision knowledge.
10+ years Biometric device and data processing knowledge.
5+ years Python development and Bash scripting.
5+ years SQL on 1 or 2 DBMS, e.g.
PostgreSQL, MySQL, Redshift, Snowflake, or other mainstream DBMS.
Background in Video Platforms is very helpful, e.g.
NETFLIX, Google, YouTube, Amazon, Pluto TV, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, as well as Salesforce, NetSuite, SAP NetWeaver, Omniture clickstream.
Big Data related experience, e.g.
Redshift, Vertica, Presto, Spark SQL, Kafka, Kinesis, Hadoop, AWS Lambda, Glue.
Cloud experience, ideally AWS -- or alternate, e.g.
Azure or Google Cloud Compute.
Business platform API development experience with Google/YouTube & Facebook.
Background in other sw development languages, e.g.
Ruby, Java, JavaScript, Scala.
Experience w/ gaming, entertainment, and Internet monetization business models.
Basic understanding of electrical circuits.
Experience with acquiring and analyzing data from electrical measurements.
Some experience with MLs image processing.
Requisition #
177544BR
Area of Interest
Industry
Film Production and Distribution
United States - California - Burbank
Position Type
Full Time
Business Unit
Business Unit Overview
WBT manages the Studio’s enterprise systems and solutions, emerging platforms, information security, consumer intelligence, content mastering and delivery, and more.
Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers.
Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
","['lambda', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'redshift', 'mysql', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'postgresql', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'azur', 'java', 'kafka', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'sql', 'aw']","['big data', 'computer vision', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['lambda', 'scala', 'snowflak', 'redshift', 'sql', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'postgresql', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'azur', 'java', 'kafka', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'sql', 'aw', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Job Title:
Principal Data Scientist
Requisition ID:
R001629
Job Title: Principal Data Scientist
Reporting To: VP, Live Ops Analytics
Department: Live Ops Analytics
Your Platform
Your Mission
The Live Ops Analytics Team is looking for a data science expert.
As a thought leader within the Live Ops Team, your mission is to put the science into decision making.
Priorities can often change in a fast-paced environment like ours, so this role includes, but is not limited to, the following responsibilities:
Provide technical leadership and mentorship to data scientists with a wide range of backgrounds
Democratize and socialize learnings by contributing to a centralized repository that informs future game design, and is carried across titles and franchises
Player Profile
Minimum Requirements:
Advanced degree required with technical focus (Statistics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, etc.)
10+ years total experience in analytics
Exceptional technical skills with SQL, R/ Python for data analysis and experience in ML driven products
Demonstrated programming skills either in data science or software development settings a plus
Expert at deriving narrative from data and communicate the results effectively
Expert in experimentation and causal inference methodologies
Comprehensive experience with predictive and prescriptive modeling
Deep product sense, with a solid understanding of user engagement and monetization strategies in gaming, entertainment/ecommerce service providers, or mobile apps a plus
Extra Points:
Guiding teams to be agile in response to change and to solve complex problems
Being active in the industry, recognized for application of science to games & entertainment
Delivering breakthrough analytical projects resulting in measurable engagement or revenue impact
Exemplifies multi-dimensionalskill setdata science,experimentation, analysis, engineering, etc.
Being a renowned champion for best practices within the analytics, data and engineering teams
Provides context, not control, remaining highly aligned but loosely coupled
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['statist', 'predict', 'data', 'causal']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'statist', 'predict', 'data', 'causal']"
DS,"Position Summary
The Data Scientist will use data mining, statistics and machine learning to understand relationships and patterns in data, build predictive models and propose actionable solutions.
Key Responsibilities include:
Collaborate with administrative leaders, clinicians and IT specialists
Query large datasets from multiple systems
Build machine learning models
Produce technical documentation, visualizations and presentations
Lead projects with multiple work streams or complex tasks
Project management for complex tasks
Complete individual or collaborative projects independently
Provide mentorship and guidance to more junior staff
Qualifications
Basic education, experience and skills required for consideration:
Preferred Experience:
Familiarity with a health care environment and EHR data
Familiarity with genomics and medical imaging data
Time series analysis
Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Cloud services platforms like Amazon AWS and Microsoft Azure
Skills/Abilities:
Data analytics expert with measurable track record within industry or academic environment, developing and successfully implementing statistical and machine learning models for data mining, classification, prediction and clustering
Experience with relational databases and SQL queries.
Must be knowledgeable in at least one scientific computing language such as Python (e.g.
pandas, scikit-learn, genism, seaborn, tensorflow), R (e.g.
caret, dplyr, ggplot2), and Matlab
Solid experience in Machine learning (RandomForest, XGBoost/ LightGBM, etc.)
and deep learning (CNN, RNN, LSTM, etc.)
techniques
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.
#LI-DQ
","['xgboost', 'aw', 'microsoft', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'dplyr', 'seaborn', 'python', 'azur', 'caret', 'scikit', 'lightgbm', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'lstm', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'cnn', 'nlp', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['xgboost', 'aw', 'microsoft', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'dplyr', 'seaborn', 'python', 'azur', 'caret', 'scikit', 'lightgbm', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'lstm', 'nlp', 'predict', 'cnn', 'nlp', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Lead Data Scientist works on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial.
Responsibilities
The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
This role advises key executives to develop functional strategies (often segment specific) on matters of significance.
Exercises independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks, and works under minimal supervision, Uses independent judgment requiring analysis of variable factors and determining the best course of action.
+ Collaborate with key business leaders to understand business problems and formulate analytical solutions for problem solving as well as lead or collaborate with a team of data scientists, data analysts or big data engineers on analytical projects, proving benefits of solutions and helping with execution and measurement
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Act as an external facing business translator whose combined expertise in AI/ML and analytics will enable the incorporation of these practices to drive data driven decision in practice
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Deep dives across member populations to determine opportunities for improved timing or type of intervention
+ Advanced predictive analytics to help optimize the touchpoint patterns following these deepdives
+ Serve as a key participant of a cross-functional, collaborative team focused on develop consumer-centric strategies that drive value to the member and the business
Required Qualifications
+ PhD + 2 years' experience, Master's Degree + 4 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 6 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program.
+ 2+ years' experience in project, process or people leadership
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Successful demonstrated experience in working on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial
+ Advanced programming experience in Python, R, or SAS
+ Experience in creating analysis, projections, models, and presentations to support business
+ Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
+ Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks
+ Ability to works under minimal supervision, using independent judgment
+ Ability to communicate statistical & complex concepts in a simplified manner
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
+ NLP Experience
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
","['r', 'sa', 'python']","['segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'sa', 'python', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Job Title:
Senior Data Scientist, Live Ops Analytics
Requisition ID:
R001703
Job Title: Sr. Data Scientist, Live Ops Analytics
Reporting To: Manager, Live Ops Analytics
Department: Global Analytics
Your Platform
Your Mission
As a member of the Live Ops Analytics team, your mission is to put science into decision making.
Responsibilities include:
• Develop novel analytics and contribute to the vision and execution of Activisions analytic strategy by creating comprehensive analyses, innovative methodologies, and algorithms and prototypes
• Build statistical models with large datasets to derive meaningful insights that effect actionable business decisions
• Work closely with various stakeholders to investigate topics related to user experience, segmentation, retention and monetization utilizing full range of data toolkits from descriptive analytics to predictive modeling
• Measure the impact of features, promotions, store offerings, and events through experimentation and causal inference to fuel recommendations
• Democratize and socialize learnings by contributing to a centralized repository that informs future game design, and is carried across titles and franchises
• Collaborate across studio, product management, and engineering support teams to enable easier testing and experimentation
• Automate and productionize analysis and studies that improve long-term decision making
• Deliver presentations on analytic topics and results to both technical and non-technical audiences
Player Profile
Minimum Requirements:
• BA/BS degree required with technical focus (Statistics, Econometrics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering or a related quantitative field); MS/PhD a plus
• Strong technical skills with SQL, R/ Python for data analysis; demonstrated programming skills either in data science or software development settings a plus
• Experience building supervised and unsupervised data models in R or Python
• Skilled at deriving narrative from data and communicate the results effectively
• Play games, with a solid understanding of user engagement and monetization strategies in gaming, entertainment/ecommerce service providers, or mobile apps a plus
• Work experience in cross-functional teams a plus
• Deep product sense, with a solid understanding of user engagement and monetization strategies in gaming, entertainment/ecommerce service providers, or mobile apps a plus
Extra Points:
• Demonstrated business impact, with a focus on player engagement, and player experience
• Clear, concise and data-driven insights leading to business action and the optimization of systems
• Relationships & communication as an embedded team member, you build trust with the studio and are a conduit of knowledge to & from Global Analytics
• Participates in feedback conversations with supervisor and peers, and can adapt approach when needed
• Drives measurable engagement and revenue impact through analysis and statistical models
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'causal', 'econometr', 'supervis', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'causal', 'econometr', 'supervis', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Position Summary
Key Responsibilities include:
Collaborate with administrative leaders, clinicians and IT specialists to support data strategy and execution for research and clinical projects.
Lead decision support data science team in developing high quality, robust and reliable algorithms for real time monitoring and decision support tools.
Plan, resource, strategize and manage clinical decision support projects
Query and analyze large datasets from multiple systems
Evaluate different methodologies and data sources for the best approach to solve data science problems
Design and implement machine learning algorithms for predictive models
Strategize and manage moving decision support tools into production environment
Prepare scientific manuscripts, posters and abstracts for publication in journals and conferences
Lead mentorship activities, training, and professional growth development for the Clinical Data Science team.
Lead sessions and meetings to drive analytics roadmap and long-term strategy to develop health learning system.
Lead the clinical data science team and inspire innovative thinking in the analytics space and advise on current project work.
Develop best practices for scoping, building, validating and monitoring data science projects.
Performs other related duties as assigned or requested.
Qualifications
Basic education, experience and skills required for consideration:
Masters in computer science, engineering, statistics, mathematics, physics or related field
Preferred Education:
PhD
Skills/Abilities:
Experience with project management tools (Jira preferred)
Experience with relational databases and SQL programming
pandas, scikit-learn, genism, seaborn), R (e.g.
caret, dplyr, ggplot2), Matlab
Proficiency in at least one programming language (e.g.
Python, Java, C)
Ability to work independently and use creative approaches to problem- solving.
Experience in data visualization and ability to communicate results to a non-technical audience
Ability to maintain a professional attitude and demeanor during normal and pressure situations.
Able to prioritize, organize, assess and reallocate work in order to meet deadlines.
Familiarity with a health care environment and EHR data
Time series analysis
Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Gradient boosted tree libraries such as XGBoost and LightGBM
Deep neural networks
Cloud services platforms like Amazon AWS and Microsoft Azure
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.
#LI-DQ
","['xgboost', 'microsoft', 'ggplot2', 'matlab', 'dplyr', 'python', 'azur', 'lightgbm', 'java', 'r', 'caret', 'jira', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'seaborn', 'panda', 'aw', 'scikit']","['data', 'boost', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'nlp', 'visual', 'normal', 'statist', 'time series', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['xgboost', 'microsoft', 'ggplot2', 'matlab', 'dplyr', 'python', 'azur', 'lightgbm', 'java', 'r', 'caret', 'jira', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'seaborn', 'panda', 'aw', 'scikit', 'data', 'boost', 'nlp', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'nlp', 'visual', 'normal', 'statist', 'time series', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Deliver lectures and tutorials on: scientific Python, SQL, probability, statistics (Bayesian and frequentist), machine learning, and data engineering.
Lead day-long “sprints,” maintaining a strong presence in the classroom and helping other instructional staff
Deftly and patiently field student questions and provide feedback in lectures and office hours.
Build and refine data science curriculum and assignments.
Utilize student feedback and experimentation to continuously improve teaching and assessment methods
Evaluate new tools, packages, and tutorials for use in the curriculum.
Contribute to local evangelism, admissions, and nurture activities, such as attendance at meet-ups, speaking at conferences, leading workshops, etc.
Professional Development:
There’s no better way to learn than to teach!
You’ll be amazed at how much you’ll develop skills you thought you were already an expert in just by helping students and planning lessons.
Opportunities to work with and learn from other data science and web development instructors in a highly collaborative and intellectually rich environment.
Rub shoulders and cross-pollinate.
Previous projects have involved: Machine Learning; Deep Learning, Data Engineering and Architecture, Applied Statistics and Statistical Modeling, Web Development Ruby on Rails, Angular, Ember, React, and Node.js and Express.
Become the best instructor you can be with ongoing training and support.
Qualifications:
Experience in industry in a data scientist or software engineer role.
Master's or PhD in a quantitative discipline such as engineering, statistics, or mathematics.
For more details on the program go to: http://www.galvanize.com/courses/data-science/#.Viqz4LQR8UU.
Outstanding communication skills.
Experience teaching a quantitative subject preferred.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['sql', 'react', 'angular', 'python', 'rubi']","['probabl', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",2.0,"['sql', 'react', 'angular', 'python', 'rubi', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"Ready to write the best chapter of your career?
Developing new systems using Python NLP (lemmatization, stemming, named entity recognition) and updating the existing systems by adding new features to enhance the customers experience.
Interacting with stakeholders to identify the requirements and define new processes.
Closely work with the team to define the architecture of the Microservice environment and deploy systems using RESTful API’s.
Planning, development, and analysis of dialogue prediction/sentiment models, causal models of customer/agent behavior.
Analyzing and researching the current market trends for possible AI opportunities/improvements.
Qualifications
MS/PhD in a quantitative discipline (e.g.
Machine Learning, Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field).
3+ years full time employment or postdoctoral experience building and validating predictive models on structured or unstructured data.
Proficiency in Python with knowledge of basic libraries for data manipulation, machine learning, natural language processing and text mining.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms (regression, neural networks, etc.)
Understanding of deep learning algorithms and experience with related libraries such as TensorFlow, PyTorch.
Nice to Have
Experience in SQL.
Understanding of object oriented design.
Ability to craft new concepts and stay current with academic research
Experience with graph databases and graph designs.
Experience in designing/developing production level machine learning architectures (using Flask or Redis)
Role: Full-Time / Salaried
","['pytorch', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'flask', 'python']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'graph', 'neural network', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['pytorch', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'flask', 'python', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'predict', 'graph', 'nn', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist / Quantitative Researcher – High Frequency Futures
Chicago
Job Department
Position Title: Data Scientist / Quantitative Researcher – High Frequency Futures
Position Summary
The ideal candidate has direct experience in the alpha research process and understands the workflow from idea generation to production implementation.
Responsibilities
• Define key metrics for model validation.
• Back testing and production performance monitoring.
• Contribute to in-house data analysis packages and research framework development.
• Acquisition of new data sets and cleaning/maintenance of new and existing data sets.
Requirements
• Advanced knowledge of modern statistical and machine learning techniques.
• Proficiency in a scripting language such as Python, R, or MATLAB.
• Proficiency in at least one statistical package and one machine learning package in one of the above languages.
• Demonstrated experience working with tick data.
• Degree in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering, etc.
• Experience developing software systems an in object oriented language is a plus.
Sponsorship is not available for this position.
","['r', 'matlab', 'python']","['statist', 'research', 'machine learning', 'data']",1.0,"['r', 'matlab', 'python', 'statist', 'research', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"Data Scientist (Entry Level)
Who you are:
You are someone who takes pride in your work, seeks order in chaos, and wants the opportunity to work with like-minded individuals.
What you'll do:
Partner with product development teams to research, design and implement learning systems that recommend, optimize, and predict marketing campaign performance for top brands across multiple advertising platforms including YouTube (Adwords and DV360), Facebook/Instagram, LinkedIn, Snapchat, Pinterest and more
Develop algorithms and models that inform customer activities
Report progress, issues and status at daily and weekly stand-ups
Stay abreast of emerging technologies and new design approaches
Provide technical leadership both within and outside the technology team
What you need:
Bachelor's degree or higher - Quantitative field such as Computing Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, or Engineering
2+ years of strong mathematical and statistical data analysis experience
2+ years of experimental data / modeling experience
2+ years of Machine Learning experience including black box and bespoke solutions
2+ years of Python development experience
Agile software development methodology experience and test-driven development experience
Take pride in writing clean dependable algorithms
Strong ability to analyze problems and formulate effective solutions
Sharp critical thinking skills, including systems and business analysis, problem analysis and resolution, and sound judgment/decision making ability
Proven ability to work in a rapid release product environment
Masters or PhD - Quantitative field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, or Engineering
Experience with Database optimization and maintenance
Experience to develop and deploy Machine Learning and Algorithmic micro services
Direct inquiries only, no recruiters please.
",['python'],"['data', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['python', 'data', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"* Ability to write sophisticated machine learning and data analysis code in R, Matlab, or Python* Some ways previous successful candidates have demonstrated this are:* Contributing to influential Open Source Projects like sklearn, XGBoost, tidyverse, Tensorflow, pytorch, Kafka, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.
* By describing a data science model they developed that is deployed in a live setting within a resume or cover letter* Made a high quality data science project available in a public forum like GitHub or Kaggle* Published work in Data Science related journals or conferences such as ICML, NIPS, JML, KDD, and INFORMS* Experience communicating effectively with people at all levels of an organization.
* Some ways previous successful candidates have demonstrated this are:* Teaching data science to non-data scientists in an academic or professional setting* Elaborating in a cover letter or resume ways that they have professionally collaborated with others in the organization and the impact that collaboration had on the organizations KPIs* Bachelor's degree or higher in a quantitative or relevant field* Candidates must be authorized to work in the US.Nice to Have* 2+ years professional experience working in an analytics focused role* Experience writing production code in one or more of: C++, C, Java, Scala, or Spark* Experience working with IoT systems, ranging from DIY home projects to industrial IoT deployments* Have made substantive contributions to open source projects in the areas of data science or machine learning* Experience developing software projects with large teams using technologies like; git, mercurial, jenkins, travis, jira, asana, etc.
Accommodations are available on request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
","['xgboost', 'pytorch', 'jira', 'scala', 'spark', 'kafka', 'github', 'git', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'elasticsearch', 'python', 'sklearn', 'c', 'java']","['machine learning', 'data', 'kpi']",1.0,"['xgboost', 'pytorch', 'jira', 'scala', 'spark', 'kafka', 'github', 'git', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'elasticsearch', 'python', 'sklearn', 'c', 'java', 'machine learning', 'data', 'kpi']"
DS,"The data scientist role involves solving technical, data-driven Healthcare problems using computer science, mathematical, predictive modeling and statistical methods, & knowledge.
The role will focus on extending machine learning, predictive modeling, and analytic components to provide up-to-date intelligence to Healthcare providers maximizing outcomes.
An ideal candidate for this position can approach problem-solving challenges independently, has a strong attention to detail, and enjoys working in a fast-paced, collaborative, and team-based environment.Looking for some details?
* Complete familiarity with various statistical and machine learning techniques including: classification, regression, dimension reduction, clustering, and various multivariate methods* Complete familiarity with empirical approaches to estimate performance of machine learning models including: hold-out sets, cross-validation, leave-one-out testing* Understanding of orders of algorithms and how they scale* Demonstrated competency in R/Python predictive modeling* Demonstrated competency in RDBMS (e.g.
SQL Server)* Ability to code in 1+ general purpose programming language (C#, Java, etc.
)* Must be a quick-learner with the ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment* Outstanding presentation abilities and the ability to communicate with all levels of the Business* Comfortable working in newly-forming, ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability are key skills* Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills* Must possess strong analytical, problem-solving, and writing skills* Proficient in Microsoft Office applications* Detail-orientedPreferred Skills:* Master of Science degree or higher in the fields of Computer Science, Statistics, or Mathematics is preferred* An aptitude for medical informatics is preferredIn compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['microsoft', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This position is work from home (or anywhere else you have reliable internet) and can be located anywhere within the United States.
Doing this involves:
showing feasibility through data analysis,
designing and producing prototypes
deploying models to production.
Who You Are
You will be at the center of data analysis, modeling, machine learning, and data engineering and on the bleeding-edge in the ad-tech space.
The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience working on a wide range of optimization and analytics problems in ad-tech including fraud detection/mitigation, price prediction, conversion attribution, and modeling, as well as experience with the tools of the trade including SQL, Python, Hive, R, Athena, and others.
What You Will Do
Design, build and deploy algorithms to optimize the performance of advertising campaigns.
Define data requirements and gather/validate information, applying judgment and statistical tests.
Construct data narratives to convey complex ideas to non-technical stakeholders.
Be constantly learning the latest technologies and trends.
Work with analysts and stakeholders to gather, understand, and develop business initiatives and specifications.
Provide expertise and leadership on making technical decisions, thus delivering a platform that provides business value and meets end-user goals.
You’ll Be Successful Because You Are
Knowledgeable: B.S., M.S.
or Ph.D. in computer science, math, statistics or a strong quantitative educational background
Experienced: Minimum of 2 years’ experience in applied data science, machine learning or modeling
Adept with Python/Bash and some exposure to modern software development practices including GitHub/git-flow and automated testing
Experience working with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Pig, Presto, Athena or Qubole
Adaptable to any and every situation: You have a knack for being fluid and embracing change.
A quick study: swiftly demonstrate an understanding of the business, organizational structure, culture, client base, and industry.
Ability to learn new paradigms, tools, and processes quickly and thrive in a fast-paced, rapidly changing, exciting work environment
Things You Should Know
You should be comfortable and capable of sitting and/or standing at a desk for at least 8 hours.
Both retreats are “can’t miss” events (like seriously…they are mandatory).
There may also be other opportunities to travel depending on your specific role and business needs.
","['spark', 'pig', 'github', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['big data', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'pig', 'github', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"To learn more: https://www.kalderos.com/company/about
What Data Scientists Do
This starts with having trust in each other as a team, then expanding it to do this work in three primary ways: building differentiated datasets, measuring what matters, and optimizing the right process transparently.
If that means a model, great!
If that means working with design to develop a different product approach, also great!
Build, test, deploy, and maintain supervised or unsupervised learning models.
Work with internal teams that operationalize that work to ensure their output is high quality and continually improving for end users
Create internal dashboards to monitor processes and measure impact
Work with product teams to collect forward looking data points to enable future data science solutions
Build internal tools to enable team mates to scale their knowledge and increase impact
Some work experience as a Data Scientist in a full time role
Ability to write machine learning and data analysis code in R or Python
Some ways you may demonstrate this are:
Open GitHub Repositories or portfolios
Project descriptions of what you have accomplished
Kaggle competitions
Published or working papers that use data science methods
Ability to take complex information and communicate it clearly for different stakeholders, both technical and non-technical
Some ways you may demonstrate this are:
Talks or presentations you have given in the past
Speaking through your work history in a phone interview
High quality data visualizations that communicate complex information clearly
What May Set You Apart
Experience in healthcare or pharmaceuticals
Open source contributions to popular data science tools
Experience with data engineering tools such as Airflow
Experience working with Azure or similar public cloud
Experience working with SQL Server or similar databases
If you think you meet some of the list of the above, but not everything, that’s perfectly fine!
401K plan with matching
Healthcare benefits
Flexible schedule and a fair PTO system that allows for a healthy work-life balance
Opportunity to work on new technologies and learn new skills
Celebration, and education stipends
To learn more: https://www.kalderos.com/company/culture
","['github', 'airflow', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'end user', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['github', 'airflow', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'end user', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Some current and recent projects include the modeling of customer retention, lifetime values of Medicare Advantage policies and detection of anomalies in commission payments.
This is inclusive of interviewing, onboarding and each role day-to-day.
Responsibilities:
Lead quantitative analyses, working with product management, business stakeholders, and data engineers to identify and solve business problems
Provide new and creative insights through a combination of descriptive and diagnostic analytics
Test hypotheses across functions using measurable, statistically-significant methods to evaluate best performing strategies
Stay current with data analytics tools and techniques and methods for data science, statistics and optimization
Skills & Experience:
BS or BA degree in quantitative discipline such as Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Economics or Engineering
Mastery of statistics including regression, estimation and hypothesis testing
Experience with a data and analytics programming language such as Python, R, or MATLAB
Experience with Python packages NumPy, SciPy, pandas and scikit-learn
Familiarity with probabilistic modeling, including Poisson processes and renewal processes
Familiarity with optimization techniques including linear optimization, nonlinear optimization and/or network optimization
SQL experience in writing, editing and modifying complex, efficient SQL scripts
Experience implementing algorithms or models into a product
Experience guiding decision-making in a business context through a combination of descriptive and diagnostic analytics
Proven ability to take insights and turn them into models and products can drive business value
Ability to communicate complex concepts verbally and in writing to colleagues with varying degrees of analytical knowledge and understanding
Experience extracting and standardizing inconsistent data from disparate data sources
Benefits & Perks:
Open vacation policy
Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance benefits
Flexible spending accounts
Commuter and transit benefits
Professional growth opportunities
Casual dress code
Generous employee referral bonuses
Happy hours, ping-pong tournaments, and more company-sponsored events
Subsidized gym memberships
*LI-JC1
","['sql', 'matlab', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['regress', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"DescriptionThe Data Scientist 2 uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Data Scientist 2 work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.ResponsibilitiesHumana's Clinical Trend and Analytics Team is seeking a Data Scientist.
The Clinical Trend and Analytics team uses advanced scientific techniques, forecasting, and machine learning to predict financial and clinical outcomes in order to guide investments that improve health outcomes and reduce costs.
The Data Scientist leverages large sets of structured and unstructured data to develop tactical and strategic insights.
The work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.
Consumers expect more personalized and holistic experiences from their health partners.?
Ideally, this position would be located in Louisville, KY.
View the EEO is the Law poster.If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.Humana Safety and SecurityHumana will never ask, nor require a candidate provide money for work equipment and network access during the application process.
",[None],"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"This is a great opportunity to join a small team to help share your expertise but also provides you the opportunity to grow in your career.
You will be responsible for obtaining, developing and analyzing data, prove/disprove hypotheses, exploring new data sources and structures, and develop insights.
You will have the opportunity to consult with internal customers to develop business requirements and provide possible solutions and approaches to their analytic needs.
Your customers will include marketing, branding, underwriting, field leadership, senior business leaders and the data office.
* Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
* Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, marketing targeting and other business outcomes.
* Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
* Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.Job Qualifications* Strong problem-solving skills in Financial Services, with extensive familiarization in related life, health, and investment product sets.
* Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SAS, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
* Experience working with and creating data architectures, both structured and non-structured.
* Knowledge of a variety of predictive analytics and machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
* Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
* 3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
At least 7 years of experience for the Senior Data Scientist opening.
* Master's or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or equivalent experience.
* Familiar with the following software/tools:* Coding knowledge and experience with R, Python and/or SAS.
* Statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, social network analysis, etc.
* Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
* Analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Demographic providers (Wunderman, Acxiom, Claritas), Google Analytics, and other web/social data providers.
* Distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc.
* Data mapping using R, SAS, or Tableau.Thrivent provides Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) without regard to race, religion, color, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy, national origin, age, disability, marital status, citizenship status, military or veteran status, genetic information, or any other status protected by applicable local, state, or federal law.
","['spark', 'mysql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'busi', 'svm', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"(This is a 3 month Internship.
This is not a remote opportunity.
This role is located in Chicago IL.)
If you are a creative, hard-working, and fun-seeking person interested in working with a close-knit group of highly talented people, this is the right place for you.
The Role!
The Data Science & Analytics team embodies these values and works with a laser focused objective to enable data driven decision making for both internal stakeholders and external partners.
This is a challenging and high visibility position, responsible for creating these solutions as well as influencing technical direction.
Success in this role requires the ability to take on challenging problems and design & develop an amazing solution with little to no assistance.
You possess:
Leverage statistical analysis to understand what is ""acceptable"" versus ""outliers"".
Ability to successfully collaborate with both business users and engineers for effective analytical solution development and deployment.
Create automated KPI dashboards and monitoring reports.
Passion to drive actionable insights from product usage and other relevant data to measure success of experiments, diagnosis of issues, understanding of general consumer behavior.
Ability to present insights to business stakeholders through Tableau / Powerpoint / Excel in a compelling manner.
Discipline to create well documented coding and analytics packets to ensure reusability as the team expands.
Master's in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or any other Quantitative field
Bonus points for:
Experience in analytics at app-based / Consumer Tech companies
Good grasp of machine learning techniques, and their application in the real world.
Familiarity with Big Data frameworks like Snowflake, Spark and AWS services
Familiarity with Tableau or any other visualization tools
Effective communication, ability to translate and explain technical issues to non-technical team members
Love of Dogs!
.
.
.
Or just tolerance.
","['snowflak', 'spark', 'excel', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'aw']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'outlier', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['snowflak', 'spark', 'excel', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'aw', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'outlier', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"As a key hire in a new department you and the team will develop and define the end-to-end data science process that will enable the business to make data-driven decisions using different machine learning techniques, form proof of concept to deploying models in production.
What will you do:
Use SQL, R & Python, and other data tools to analyze internal and external data in order to build predictive models and provide insights to business partners.
Present highly technical information to business units not versed in such technicalities.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide on-going reports in a timely and professional manner.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that will provide efficient data and reporting solutions.
Identify business trends from big data sources to enable faster and better decision making.
Who you are:
1+ years of advanced analytic/data science/machine learning experience
MS/PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, or a related quantitative field
Proven track record of end-to-end experience in model development, testing, implementation and performance tracking
Hands-on knowledge of SQL, R, Python and Spark
Familiarity with Linux and AWS/Azure
Excellent communication, teamwork and consulting skills.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skill set.
EEO/Male/Female/Veteran/Disabled
","['linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'aw']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'aw', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Chicago, IL
Posted 2 weeks ago
The Process Monitoring, Automation and Control (PMAC) team is responsible for driving the development and implementation of advanced analytics and control solutions that deliver value for today and build capability for tomorrow.
As a member of PMAC, this role will have the opportunity to work closely with the IT organization to
develop and implement Advanced Analytics, AI, APC and IIoT solutions/capabilities in manufacturing
settings to achieve actionable insights and enable continued improvement for pharmaceutical
manufacturing and quality operations.
Responsibilities
• You will contribute to the development of the multiple use cases across manufacturing operations,
leveraging IIOT and analytics, in areas such as energy management, predictive maintenance, production
scheduling and process optimization.
• Development and implementation of analytic models and tools using advanced analytics, machine
learning and artificial intelligence;
• Work with the IIoT developers to integrate predictive/prescriptive analytics with the IIoT platform to
achieve visibility, predictability and learning across multiple automation layers from process to plant and
to enterprise
• Understand Advanced Analytics approaches in other businesses;
Qualifications
• Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering and/or Computer Science
• Hands-on experience in data science, advanced analytics, multivariate data analysis, machine learning,
artificial intelligence, and familiarity with related open source libraries (e.g.
Tensor Flow, AWS ML)
• Proficient in one or more of the following programming environments: Python (preferred), R, Matlab,
PMML, JAVA, Spark
• Familiarity with deep Learning, Neural Networks, Natural Language Processing or related fields
• Experience with cloud-based analytics platforms
• Experience with ThingWorx IIoT platform preferred
• Familiarity with industrial process control system, operations management system and/or SAP is a plus
• Pharmaceutical experience preferred but not necessary
• Independent, self-motivated personality with excellent oral and written communication skills
• Ability to work collaboratively in diverse cross-functional teams on innovative solutions and tools with
an open attitude towards fast learning
","['tensor', 'spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'java']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['tensor', 'spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'java', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Good scripting and programming skills Knowledge in Cassandra or Hadoop platform is critical.
Hands on experience with data modeling, data loading, optimization, and warehousing techniques and technologies in either of the following Teradata, Hive, Python, Spark, NoSQL, or Cassandra Experience in data ingestionextraction (Hive, SQL), data manipulation (Python, Spark, R, Hive) and machine learning development (R, Python, Spark, H2O) Ability to work on large volume of data Ability to create data for search relevancy.
Specifically Geography ndash query ndash pp data Persona ndash Geography ndash query ndash pp data Using NLP to create vector representation of query-pp attribute relation Data quality check Feature engineering techniques to remove bias, standardize and normalize data Familiarity with Ranking and classification model creation and evaluation Strongly prefer prior experience in retail e-Commerce or related domain and on Search Ranking Algorithms Strong customer service and communication skills, ability to interact with diverse team of people across business and engineering
","['h2o', 'nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'nlp', 'commun', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['h2o', 'nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'nlp', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture?
More About the Role:
Consult with business stakeholders on appropriate experimental design to answer important questions and ensure new features/initiatives are being tested rigorously
Evaluate financial impact of experiments and other business changes/initiatives
Build statistical/machine learning models to understand customer behavior and long term value
Be curious!
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with a track record of leveraging data to influence business decisions
Ability to communicate complex analyses to both technical and non-technical stakeholders, including senior leadership
Solid grasp of basic statistical concepts (regression models, statistical significance, confidence intervals, etc); advanced training in statistics and machine learning preferred
High level of proficiency using SQL (required)
Ability to perform data analysis in Python or R (required)
Understanding of data visualization best practices; Tableau experience a plus
Experience working in an e-commerce or other direct to consumer business preferred
Experience with customer LTV modeling, pricing analytics, loyalty/subscription analysis, app/website A/B testing, and/or logistics network analytics preferred
Flexible PTO.
Health and Wellness.
Learning and Career Growth.
MealPerks.
Who’s ready for some lunch?
Fun.
Social Impact.
The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster.
Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
","['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'logist', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'logist', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist 2 - Styling/Trunks Data Science & Analytics
Join a high impact, customer-obsessed data science and analytics team!
The Styling Data Science & Analytics team is on a mission to reinvent digital styling experiences through the power of data and artificial intelligence.
The ideal candidate is a creative self-starter and strong technical contributor who is always looking for new opportunities to solve business problems with data-driven tools.
What you'll do
Technical Excellence
Track record of delivering end-to-end data science products, i.e.
ability to work across the product lifecycle from research and discovery to operationalization and production.
You are familiar with the entire end-to-end ML pipeline, including a wide range of the families of techniques for each step of the ML product development.
Strong Python skills and proficiency in at least one machine learning framework and common data science libraries (e.g., spark, scikit-learn, pandas, numpy, tensorflow, pytorch, keras, theano, seaborn, matplotlib, etc.)
Good software engineering best practices, including story estimation, test driven development, code review, and version control with git.
Own medium machine learning projects driving technical decisions and making informed trade-offs that balance quick wins with long term robust solutions with minimal supervision
Your passion for machine learning, curiosity, problem solving, and innovation empower you to stay up-to-date with research and to prototype new ideas quickly
Relationships and communication
Engage with Data Science & Analytics program management and stakeholders to frame, structure and prioritize business problems where projects or tools can have the biggest impact.
Collaborate with a cross-functional agile team spanning product management, engineering, user research and design to build innovative product solutions.
Influence the product strategy by uncovering business opportunities.
Comfort and aptitude for regularly presenting progress, insights and recommendations to stakeholders and senior leadership.
Strong technical writer and documenter.
Good Python skills including proficiency with popular data science libraries (e.g., scikit-learn, pandas, numpy, etc.)
and visualization libraries (e.g., seaborn, ggplot, Altair, Plotly, etc.).
Familiarity with more specialized libraries/frameworks (e.g., tensorflow, scrapy, etc.)
is a plus.
What your background may look like
2+ years of relevant hands-on industry experience with track record of building successful end-to-end data product
Degree in a quantitative field (or equivalent experience).
MS preferred.
PhD is a plus.
Experience with SQL and NoSQL data environments and tools such as Hadoop, Spark, DynamoDB is a plus.
Experience with Amazon Web Services ecosystem is a plus.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Tremendous opportunity to work on some of the most exciting machine learning problems and learn from a large team of data science experts
Career advancement opportunities and annual stipend for continuous education
Lunch and learns
Hackathon days
State of the art workplace environment in the popular Chicago River North neighborhood.
Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, 401(k) match
Medical/Vision, Dental, Retirement and Paid Time Away
Life Insurance and Disability
Merchandise Discount and EAP Resources
A few more important points...
The job posting highlights the most critical responsibilities and requirements of the job.
It’s not all-inclusive.
There may be additional duties, responsibilities and qualifications for this job.
","['nosql', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'seaborn', 'panda', 'amazon web services', 'matplotlib', 'plotli', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['nosql', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'seaborn', 'panda', 'aw', 'matplotlib', 'plotli', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring.
Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering.
You’ll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.
Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.
",[None],"['data', 'exploratori', 'research', 'time series', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",999.0,"['data', 'exploratori', 'research', 'time series', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Des.
& CR8 Dashboards, Reports, Stories, & Dataflows in Einstein Analytics & Discovery.
Work with Salesforce Communities.
recblid bncl9ujswg0zqxp9a2k50xo76uz5d9
","['einstein', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'dashboard']",999.0,"['einstein', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'dashboard']"
DS,"Are you looking for a unique, truly innovative role?
What if it could be with one of the most impactful IT companies in the world?
You have a broad understanding of the wide range of machine learning tools for example Tensorflow, Kubeflow, AWS Sagemaker, ML Flw, Spark, etc.
You will be working with a set of architects working on various aspects of the hybrid cloud which includes public as well as private cloud services.
Were not learning a new way of doing things were defining the best way to do them.
How youll make your mark:
You will partner and collaborate with customers and internal data science teams in building capabilities for GreenLake Hybrid Cloud.
You will leverage Machine Learning algorithms to solve real-life problems.
You will analyze various data sets and solve problems from ideation to production, experimenting, training, tuning, and deploying production quality machine learning models.
You will lead key, cross-functional analytical projects, identifying and bringing together stakeholders to translate business challenges into Data Science problems.
About you:
You have 10+ years of experience in the field of data science
You have a Masters, PhD or equivalent experience in quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Physics, Artificial Intelligence, etc.)
You have expertise in at least one programming language for data analysis (e.g.
Python, R).
You are familiar with relevant ML packages for example Tensorflow, Kubeflow, Scikit-learn, Keras, pyTouch, SageMaker, MLFlow.
You have deep understanding of statistical modeling, machine learning, deep learning, or data mining concepts, and a track record of solving problems with these methods.
You are skilled in designing and testing experimentYou have experience driving the end to end lifecycle from model creation to deployment.
You are a strong written and verbal communicator with good analytical and problem solving skills.
You have proven success working on a fast paced and agile environment and have an understanding of Agile Methodologies.
You have worked with big data techniques (such as Hardoop, MapReduce, Hive, Pig, Spark).
https://www.facebook.com/HPECareers
https://twitter.com/HPE_Careers
1065050
","['mapreduc', 'kera', 'kubeflow', 'spark', 'aw', 'pig', 'mlflow', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'tune', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'kera', 'kubeflow', 'spark', 'aw', 'pig', 'mlflow', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'tune', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"GreenKey is a group of ambitious people working on audacious technology built around solving an important problem: how can voice improve workflows?
GreenKey Data Scientists have direct lines of communication with clients to have a tight feedback loop between customer problems and machine learning solutions
The ideal candidate is passionate about new opportunities and has a demonstrable track record of success in understanding business problems and crafting mathematical and statistical models to answer them.
A commitment to team work and strong communication skills (to both business and technical partners) are core requirements.
What Success Looks Like
In your first 90 days, you will:
Dive into the financial and emergency services domains
Train new ASR and NLP models to structure data from unstructured conversations
Understand the needs of GreenKey’s clients
After six months on the job, you will:
Identify new data sources and algorithms to improve NLP and ASR accuracy
One year in, you will:
Make an impact on the direction of GreenKey
About GreenKey
GreenKey is a group of engineers, data scientists, finance experts and hard workers building technology.
Traders and brokers from the top 15 financial institutions in the world
Police officers and emergency services dispatches in cities across America
Working at GreenKey
Success at GreenKey is beyond technical aptitude.
Those who demonstrate these values will find themselves surrounded by like-minded individuals ready to tackle challenges together
",[None],"['machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Do you want to work at the forefront of artificial intelligence and machine learning?
CapaxGlobal has a significant data analytics and management presence across many industries.
You work in a multidisciplinary team exploring, connecting and mining internal data sources and will develop data models using algorithms for pattern detection and forecasting.
Candidates will be exposed to a wide spectrum of high visibility projects ranging from sales effectiveness, competitive intelligence, fraud detection, time series forecasting, operational efficiency, sourcing and procurement, supply-chain optimization and financial analysis.
Travel: Up to 30%
Responsibilities
Develop visualization products to share analysis across a large group of business users.
Design strategies and propose algorithms to analyze and leverage data from existing as well as new data sources.
Continuously seek out industry best practices and develop skills to create new capabilities for data analytics at clients to improve business decisions.
Network with business stakeholders to develop a pipeline of data science projects aligned with business strategies.
Translate complex and ambiguous business problems into project charters clearly identifying technical risks and project scope.
Participate on cross-disciplinary project team of database specialists, data scientists, and business subject-matter experts to complete project deliverables.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Computational Linguistics, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Bioinformatics, Physics, Operations Research or related fields.
Master’s degree in data science, applied mathematics, or bioinformatics preferred.
Minimum 6 years relevant work experience (if Bachelor’s degree) or minimum 3 years relevant work experience (if Master’s degree) with a proven track record in driving value in a commercial setting using data science skills.
In-depth knowledge of various modeling algorithms e.g.
Linear, GLMs, trees based models, neural networks, clustering, PCA, and time series models.
Proficiency in R (e.g.
ggplot2, cluster, dplyr, caret), Python (e.g.
pandas, scikit-learn, bokeh, nltk), Spark – MLlib, H20, or other statistical tools.
Minimum 2 years experience working in a data science or machine learning environment.
In-depth knowledge of databases, data modeling, Hadoop, and distributed computing frameworks.
Experience in software development environment, Agile, and code management/versioning (e.g.
git).
Strong EDA skills and experience/knowledge.
Ability to understand complex and ambiguous business needs and applying the right tools and approaches.
Collaborative team player.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Experience developing and testing machine learning and/or statistical projects.
Strong presentation skills.
Ability to present statistical results to lay persons in an easy to understand way.
","['nltk', 'bokeh', 'spark', 'h20', 'excel', 'git', 'ggplot2', 'mllib', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'caret', 'scikit']","['risk', 'data modeling', 'glm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'pca', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['nltk', 'bokeh', 'spark', 'h20', 'excel', 'git', 'ggplot2', 'mllib', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'caret', 'scikit', 'risk', 'data modeling', 'glm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'pca', 'optim', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Chicago, Illinois, United States
Key Responsibilities:
Conduct ad hoc analysis using advanced data mining tools to support risk management, operations and marketing strategies
Work with cross-functional teams to explore new ways of finding insights from data and provide recommendations
Develop dashboards to monitor key performance indicators
Support development of companys models to optimize lending decisions by using advanced statistical modeling and simulation techniques
Support implementation of the models working closely with software engineering team
Assist with development of technical tools and platforms to standardize and streamline model development and monitoring processes
REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's, Master's or PhD in math, statistics, computer science, engineering or related field
2+ years of experience with data analytics and statistical modeling
Advanced experience with relational databases, such as SQL
Experience with Python or R
Experience working within an open source environment
Strong quantitative and problem-solving skills with key attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple projects with tight deadlines, follow through to completion, and present conclusions of analysis to senior management in an organized and thoughtful manner
Experience working with specialty finance or FinTech is a plus
Start-up experience is a plus
BENEFITS
Competitive salary and benefits package, including material equity grant
Casual dress policy
Fun, fast-paced work environment
Dynamic start-up culture
Convenient downtown Chicago office located in the heart of the city
Equal opportunity employer
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['risk', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'math', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'risk', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'math', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
In this role, you will work as a Data Scientist and problem solver.
You will be a part of a small team where you will switch assignments and projects in a disciplined and fast-paced environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Be innovative and entrepreneurial to work within a ""start-up like"" environment.
Be an advisor to the data science team and provide expertise and direction on complex analytical modeling problems
Work with cross-functional teams to help them implement solutions
Research methods to improve statistical inferences of variables across models
Solve quantitative problems
Consult on industry standard solutions as well as new innovative techniques
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"Role : Data Scientist
Knowledge and experience in API development, AI/ML, SageMaker, Data Lake, Data Analytics, Cloud Monitoring and Analytics,
Strong cloud programming skill with experience in API and AWS Lambda functions or any other scripting languages like Python / Bash using Python & Node.js
Good understanding in using AWS CLI, Cloud formation, Terraform, Ansible with troubleshooting experiences
Strong knowledge of Cloud Security practices and IAM Policy preparation for AWS
Regards,
Pranali Fulzele | Recruiter
Mobile No: +1 (512)-562-2452
Email: pranali@fisecglobal.net
Website: www.fisecglobal.net
","['lambda', 'python', 'sagemak', 'aw', 'cloud']",['data'],999.0,"['lambda', 'python', 'sagemak', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data']"
DS,"Job Title: Senior Data Scientist
Communication with customers, vendors and co-workers in a clear and professional manner is an absolute must.
Work will often require direct interaction with team members without direct supervision.
The ideal candidate will have a passion for technology with good understanding of their applicability to business, a relentless focus on the customer experience and an ability to multitask, assimilate data, make decisions and prioritize complex work while paying attention to the details.
Responsibilities Include:
Develop statistical models to across multiple industries including medical, insurance, and security data but not limited to.
Assist in developing internal tools for data analysis against the data lake.
Executes on modeling/machine learning projects effectively
Communicates findings to team and leadership ensure models are well understood and incorporated into business processes
Leverages research and applies state-of-the-art techniques to inform recommendations and decisions.
Works across the enterprise to identify and incubate business use cases.
Manage analytical modeling projects from beginning to end: data selection, cleaning and transformation; model development, implementation and interpretation; and insight application
Find innovative ways to search for meaningful patterns, trends, and relationships amongst large amounts of data and to identify the success measures, analyses and reporting processes that lead to actionable findings
Synthesize complex qualitative and quantitative data to form clear, well-supported, data-driven recommendations for non-technical audiences and present results to internal stakeholders
Work with stakeholders to understand business objectives; translate objectives to define KPIs and goals at the business and campaign level around various products
Required Skills:
5+ years of experience in Information Technology in managing implementing and supporting Data Warehousing as an ETL developer/lead
3 + years in leading ETL programs handling from the beginning of the design and development for complex projects.
Experience in applying analytical models for solving business problems in Networking and Security industry
Ability to work with NoSQL data stores (Cassandra, MongoDB, DynamoDB, etc)
Proficient in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig etc
Experience with large scale data storage and processing frameworks (e.g., Hadoop, MySQL, Big Table, MapReduce, SAS, AWS Kinesis, AWS Firehose, but not limited too)
Large-scale, distributed systems design and development
Worked on scaling, performance and scheduling and ETL techniques
Knowing how to develop in the following programing languages: Python, C, C++, Java, Ruby on Rails
Implemented data warehouse solution which leveraged ETL jobs from multiple data sources.
Informatica (ETL), and Tableau/Kibana (interactive data visualization) experience is a plus or equivalent tool sets.
Qualifications:
Total 7 to 10 years of experience and minimum 5 years of experience as a data scientist, data analyst, business intelligence analyst, or equivalent roles
University degree in Computer Science, Math, Quantitative Methods, Bayesian statistics, or related fields
Experience developing machine vision, machine learning, or artificial intelligence algorithms/models with state of the art deep learning frameworks
A graduate degree in a field such as math, computer science, statistics, engineering or machine learning, or equivalent experience.
Seasoned Technical Veteran with 5+ years as a data scientist.
Strong knowledge of data analytics and business intelligence visualization tools (e.g., Kibana,Tableau, Qlikview, PowerBI, Domo); Kibana is preferred
Demonstrated skills in coding.
Software development experience a plus.
Data mining and data analysis skills with the ability to clearly present complex information in a simple manner, discern business meaning and recommended actions to stakeholders
Knowledge of the theory and practice of machine vision and deep-learning techniques
Ability to develop new concepts and stay current with academic research.
Ability to summarize research and analysis for audiences with varying levels of expertise.
Bachelors degree or equivalent experience desirable.
Experience mentoring and developing team members of 10+ people
Vision beyond horizon to establish frameworks and standard building blocks of a future focused team and to help each team member grow.
Ability to champion ambiguous scenarios and challenges
High degree of comfort and ease with ambiguity and uncertainty
Passion for understanding clients vision and business goals
Driven to help organizations innovate via digital products
Natural sense of leadership and ownership - both in project delivery and business development settings
Problem-solver, curious, hands-on mentality
Powered by JazzHR
","['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'aw', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'powerbi', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'hive', 'c', 'sa', 'java']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'kpi', 'clean', 'supervis', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'aw', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerbi', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'hive', 'c', 'sa', 'java', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'kpi', 'clean', 'supervis', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'data warehousing']"
DS,"Data Scientist, Chicago, IL
Smarter Thinking.
Real Results.
What You’ll Definitely Need
BA degree in a closely related field with data analysis orientation.
Analytical background with a creative approach to problem solving
4+ years’ experience with Python worked in building analytical solutions using Statistical, Machine Learning, Deep Learning etc.
Proficiency with 3rd-party data visualization tools (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Good working experience in Data Analysis, Data Wrangling, Data Cleaning and Data Transformation.
Excellent working experience of machine learning on technology stacks such as Python, NumPy, SciPy, Scikit-Learn, Apache Spark and R using libraries such as e1071 and Caret
Excellent fluency in data manipulation tasks using frameworks.
such as pandas, plyr, Spark
Good understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Random Forest etc.
Knowledge of some common data science toolkits, such as Weka, NumPy, MATLAB, etc.
Broad business perspective with the ability to articulate meaningful ROI and financial impacts.
Worked on projects in the Retail, Banking & Finance and Insurance Industries.
Consultative application of analytic solutions to solve business issues
Able to engage in a consultative manner across multiple levels (c-suite to end user) with a strong executive presence, demonstrating strong
Demonstrated leadership, communication and interpersonal skills: the ability to manage and mentor functional experts and lead cross- functional teams
Don’t tick all the boxes?
Diverse culture, experiences, and skills.
Consulting Magazine - Fastest Growing Firms 2019
Built-In Top Places to Work in Chicago 2020
Best and Brightest Companies in the Nation 2019 and 2020, Best and Brightest Companies in Milwaukee 2020 and Best and Brightest Companies in Chicago 2020
Powered by JazzHR
oCJ1zhRdvn
","['spark', 'power bi', 'excel', 'matlab', 'bi', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'caret', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'random forest', 'end user', 'clean', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'caret', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'random forest', 'end user', 'clean', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Do you have a background in Data Science, Physics, Statistics or Probability Theory?
Do you have a passion for sports?
Do you live to find data driven solutions to complex problems?
What You’ll Do:
Productizing artificial intelligence based solutions along side engineers and product teams
Providing technical guidance to product teams on the artificial intelligence (machine learning and computer vision) approaches appropriate for a task
Patenting the innovative solutions
What You Need:
Bachelor’s, MS or PhD in computer science or related quantitative field.
Expertise in using Python, C++, or other programming language
Substantial experience with unstructured data sources, especially in areas such as spatiotemporal data, video/image, speech or text data
Proficiency in, at least, one modern deep learning engine such as Tensorflow, PyTorch etc.
(preferred: knowledge of using GPUs)
Proven track record of innovation in creating novel algorithms and advancing the state of the art
Passion for creating new technologies with high product impact within sport.
One Team
Committed Players
Dedicated to Client Success
Always Innovate
Be The Best
","['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'python']","['probabl', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'data', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'python', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'data', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Required Skills and Experience:
You are responsible for data related activities such as data extraction, profiling, cleansing, de-duplication, standardization, conversion, transformation and loading, data mining, warehousing, archiving and reporting.
Responsible for all activities required to ensure optimum performance and data integrity of databases in production environments, in line with the requirements.
Responsible for server based databases in development and test environments including database software installation, database creation, performance and capacity design, backup and recovery design, security design.
Qualifications: 2-5 years of experience (1 year minimum relevant experience);Bachelor’s Degree.
Should be proficient in Software Engineering Techniques, Software Engineering Architecture, Software Engineering Lifecycle and Data Management.
Should have progressing skills in Business Analysis, Business Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Architecture Knowledge and Technical Solution Design.
Role Overview:
Responsible for importing, cleaning, transforming, validating and modeling data with the purpose of understanding and drawing conclusions from data (may be presented in charts, graphs, and/or tables).
Also, design and develop relational databases for collecting and storing data and build and design data input and data collection mechanisms.
Qualifications:
3-7 years overall experience, 2 years min relevant experience in the role
Work on Azure Data Lake and help in migrating the existing processes and data from Function DB and other environments to Azure Data Lake.
Strong SQL and Databricks notebook knowledge to create views and develop analysis in datalake.
Experience in building statistical models, scoring of the models and model governance.
Hands-on experience in R/python to perform analysis of business data.
Knowledge of analytics across business functions in Retail/CPG industry
Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
(Includes Data Modeler, Data Miner.)
Responsible for importing, cleaning, transforming, validating and modeling data with the purpose of understanding and drawing conclusions from data (may be presented in charts, graphs, and/or tables).
Also, design and develop relational databases for collecting and storing data and build and design data input and data collection mechanisms.
Required Skills and Experience:
You are responsible for data related activities such as data extraction, profiling, cleansing, de-duplication, standardization, conversion, transformation and loading, data mining, warehousing, archiving and reporting.
Responsible for all activities required to ensure optimum performance and data integrity of databases in production environments, in line with the requirements.
Responsible for server based databases in development and test environments including database software installation, database creation, performance and capacity design, backup and recovery design, security design.
• Qualifications: 3 – 7 (2 years min relevant experience in the role), Bachelor’s Degree.
• Should be proficient in Software Engineering Techniques, Software Engineering Architecture, Software Engineering Lifecycle and Data Management.
• Should have progressing skills in Business Analysis, Business Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Architecture Knowledge and Technical Solution Design.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.
Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed.
Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.
People matter, results count.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'db']","['data mining', 'data', 'graph', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'db', 'data mining', 'data', 'graph', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Role Type: Data Scientist
Reports To: Chief Technology Officer
About the Role
As a Data Scientist, you will research and develop predictive models for population health.
Responsibilities
Deliver analytic insights in several business domains including population health, social determinants of health (SDoH), and health disparities in vulnerable populations.
Drive the definition, design, implementation and validation of cutting-edge algorithms to analyze disparate data sources to achieve targeted outcomes by leveraging machine-learning approaches, predictive and statistical modeling concepts, clustering and classification techniques.
Deliver insights and values from complex data structures to investigate opportunities in population health research.
Deliver on data-driven research projects through hands-on consultative approach and team effort.
Actively listen, integrate inputs from multiple sources and collaboratively translate healthcare or business inquiries into data and analysis requirements.
Drive informed decision making and be comfortable with presenting findings to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Currently based in the Chicagoland area (REQUIRED).
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Informatics, Data Science or a related quantitative field.
Familiarity with the data science lifecycle: posing a question, collecting data, exploring the data, developing models, making inferences, and communicating results.
Ability to communicate data in a compelling way to a variety of audiences and work in a multidisciplinary environment
Conduct statistical modeling and experimental design on a variety of healthcare datasets, including claims data and healthcare outcomes.
Train and validate predictive and categorical algorithms from large datasets.
Professional experience with a healthcare organization (provider, payer, social sector or government) preferred.
Experience working in a startup or entrepreneurial environment preferred.
Familiarity with public health, population health, and social determinants of health are preferred.
At least 5 years of professional experience demonstrating a trajectory of growth in software engineering, data science, or data engineering.
Advanced hands-on knowledge of programming languages R, SQL, and/or Python.
Experience in advanced machine learning topics, including Natural Language Processing, Neural Networks, regression, Deep Learning, and unsupervised learning.
Familiarity with relational databases, data visualization and database management tools.
Able to provide access to high quality open source data science projects available in a public forum such as GitHub, data.gov or Kaggle.
--------------
This is inclusive of interviewing, onboarding, and daily operations each role day-to-day.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
R, SQL, and/or Python: 3 years (Required)
statistical modeling and experimental design: 3 years (Required)
data science lifecycle: 3 years (Required)
healthcare organization: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Chicago, IL 60654 (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['r', 'github', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'github', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"You are excited to join forces and collaborate with a multi-disciplinary team of engineers and analysts.
iM Responsible For…
Analyzing and modelling structured data using advanced statistical methods, implement algorithms and software needed to perform analyses
Performing machine learning, predictive analytics, optimization, and statistical analysis methods
Structuring and solving problems, conducting and interpreting analysis independently while demonstrating analytical and quantitative skills
Performing explanatory data analyses, generating and testing working hypotheses, preparing and analyzing historical data and identifying patterns
Contributing research, and trying new techniques or experiments to analyze and interpret data from documents using standard statistical tools
iM Qualified Because I have…
2-5 years of professional experience working as a Data Scientist
A Master’s or PhD (preferred) in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Physics, Operations Research, or related fields
Experience with the theory and practice of standard NLP problems and approaches
An understanding of statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, cross validation, error analysis, statistical tests, and sampling methods
An Ability to implement, maintain, and troubleshoot big data infrastructure
Perform experimentations, draw conclusions and present recommended actions
A passion for learning, connecting and collaborating with others
Whoever you are, whatever you do, however you work.
Learn more at: www.imanage.com
Powered by JazzHR
w98J6ezvgj
",[None],"['big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Duration: 06+ Months Contract to Hire
Pay Rate: Open/Negotiable on W2
This position will accommodate working form home during the pandemic, they eventually will be going into the office.
Overview:
Leverage your “science first” mentality, curiosity, deep technical expertise, and problem-solving skills to explore, discover, and predict patterns and insights within complex data sets.
An active DoD Secret clearance is required upon start date.
Responsibilities:
Use analytical and statistical tools to evaluate data and aid in decision making.
Manipulate / create social media analytics and data to strengthen marketing campaign effectiveness
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Work with clients to prioritize research and modeling initiatives
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Support the development of a mature analytics function informed by industry best practices
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented, and collaborative environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications:
Degree (Master’s required) in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, computer science, economics, or other related business or technical discipline is required
Extensive experience in social media analytics and marketing campaign effectiveness.
Experience in Salesforce, Sprinklr, and Adobe Analytics - marketing analytics background
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Significant experience in the AI/ML lifecycle, from ideation and solution concept development, to rapid prototyping and validation in operational environments, and importantly, in the sustainment of AI/ML solutions for CI/CD.
Significant experience and knowledge of best practices in the practical application and execution of AI/ML in operational environments.
Ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions, and translate customer qualitative requirements into quantitative and technical approaches
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards using platforms such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
At least 5+ years of experience in the field
DoD Secret clearance required
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Preferred experience in the following areas:
DoD experience is preferred, in particular with human capital data and workforce analytics.o Data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics
Knowledge of AI/ML SaaS platforms (e.g., DataRobot, H2O DriverlessAI)
Unstructured text and natural language processing
Computational tools such as R, Python, SAS, SQL, and MATLAB
Anaconda, IBM Blue, and Oracle Big Data to analyze large data sets and develop automated analytics in making sense of data affecting DoD operations
Developing machine learning, data mining, statistical network, natural language processing, text analytics, and graph-based algorithms to analyze massive data sets
Supervising algorithm implementation in on-premise and cloud-based computing environments
Developing software to generate reports and visualizations that summarize data sets and provide data-driven insights
Developing and implementing statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics as well as to develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
Thank you for your time and consideration.
If you are not interested, but you know someone who may be more of a fit for this position, feel free to pass along my information.
www.BCforward.com
www.facebook.com/bcforward
This posting is not an offer of employment.
All applicants must be authorized to work in the United States and willing to cooperate with a background check and drug screen, to the extent permitted by federal and local laws up to and including both criminal and financial reviews.
The submission of intentionally false or fraudulent information in response to this job posting shall render the applicant ineligible for the position.
Any subsequent offer of employment shall be considered employment at will regardless of the anticipated assignment duration.
www.bcforward.com
","['h2o', 'power bi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'bi', 'qlik', 'cloud', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['h2o', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'cloud', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'nlp', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Illinois insurer is looking to grow its analytics team with a Data Scientist who has at least 3 years of experience and is proficient in data analysis, machine learning, and statistical modeling.
Candidate should also be proficient in high-level programming languages, data visualization, and have an understanding of healthcare.
Must be highly skills in all Microsoft applications including Access, Excel, Word and Power Point.
Actuarial designation, Masters or Ph.D. preferred.
(#48068)
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Roles And Responsibilities
Work with cross-functional teams to develop analytical approaches
Develop solution prototypes and help integrate them with the product
Basic Qualifications And Education Requirements
PhD level or equivalent experience,
Strong quantitative analytical experience, including one or more of:
Machine learning, deep learning
Statistics, Bayesian statistics, Failure time analysis
Game theory, Dynamic programming
Natural language processing
Proficient in programming with Python (at least 2 years experience).
Exposure to PyTorch and/or TensorFlow/Keras
Strong SQL skills
Competitive salary
401(K) match
Benefits package that includes medical and dental (Healthy Actions Reimbursement)
Wellness initiatives
Career advancement
Seniority Level
Entry level
Industry
Information Technology & Services
Computer Software
Financial Services
Employment Type
Full-time
Job Functions
Engineering
Information Technology
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $87,829.00 - $122,372.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
www.haletestingsolutions.com
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python']","['deep learning', 'natural language processing', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",3.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'deep learning', 'nlp', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"Data Scientist \- Life Sciences
*Functional Area:** **Division:** **DSL\-Data Science and Learning Division**
*Employment Category:** **Regular** **Shift:**
*Level \(Grade\):** **RD6** Share: **Facebook** **LinkedIn** **Twitter**
In this exciting area of research, you will be applying machine learning techniques, with an emphasis on deep learning techniques, to problems in the life sciences with an emphasis on using computational approaches for detecting patterns in a variety of contexts including cancer, brain injury, infectious disease, genome engineering and microbial community datasets\.
Problems typically involve the construction of computational models for phenotype prediction from data that includes genomic data and other omics data\.
You will report on results of research including publishing scholarly papers in scientific journals, give presentations at symposia, conferences, meetings, and seminars\.
You will also participate in the preparation of reports and proposals required by funding agencies to obtain and continue funding support\.
+ Minimum bachelor's degree in Bioinformatics, CS, or Biology
+ Fluency in scientific programming languages
+ Experience with bioinformatics analysis techniques and tools
+ Familiarity working in a Unix environment
+ Experience on high performance computing platforms and newer GPU systems
+ Experience processing NGS sequence data, familiarity with bacterial genomics, or demonstrated work in microbiology
+ Knowledge of artificial intelligence across machine learning, deep learning and statistics
+ Strong analytical and problem\-solving skills
+ Understanding of computational algorithms to support DNA sequence alignment, small nucleotide polymorphism detection, gene expression quantification and/or small molecule \(drug\) structure
+ Experience working on protected health information including electronic health records
+ Familiarity with regulatory policies and procedures surrounding electronic protected health information required
+ Ability to write research publications
+ Considerable collaborative skills, including the ability to interact well with external and internal collaborators
+ United States citizenship is a requirement on some projects
+ Ability to think independently and innovatively to develop exceptional technical solutions required
",['unix'],"['deep learning', 'sequenc', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']",1.0,"['unix', 'deep learning', 'sequenc', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']"
DS,"Learn and work on meaningful initiatives with some of the best and brightest in the market research industry.
This position exists within the Methodology team, a core function in Research Science that is responsible for building models and code that help achieve quality outcomes.
Also helpful is experience triangulating estimates from disparate data sources with different sample frames, levels of measurement, and frequency of collection.
The ideal candidate will be an experienced statistical programmer using R who also has experience working with survey and sales data, refining and developing methodological improvements, and familiarity with or willingness to learn Agile or Lean approaches to developing new product improvements.
Provide peer mentoring of other team members via code reviews, pair programming, unit test/acceptance test reviews, and brainstorming sessions.
Adopt and continue to improve usage of development practices and patterns, such as test-driven development, version control, and use of agile management tools.
Conduct original research-on-research (e.g., through simulations and/or evaluations of historical data) to improve methodologies, processes, and data integrity for both survey and scanner (point-of-sale) data.
Graduate-level experience preferred.
6+ years of work experience, with solid breadth and depth of knowledge of statistical and analytic techniques.
Excellent time management and creative problem solving skills.
Experience with data analysis in R is required.
Experience with additional languages and/or more extensive proficiency in R preferred.
Excellent written and oral communication skills, with the ability to communicate effectively to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Experience with one or more development methodologies (Agile, Lean, Scrum) is preferred.
Experience with tools for managing software development is preferred (tools such as JIRA, Confluence, Github/Gitlab issue tracker, Trello, Team Foundation Server/DevOps Server, etc).
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.
","['r', 'github', 'jira', 'excel']","['data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'github', 'jira', 'excel', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Responsible for the development and implementation of machine learning algorithms and techniques to solve business problems and optimize member experiences.
Primary duties may include are but not limited to: Design machine learning projects to address specific business problems determined by consultation with business partners.
Work with data-sets of varying degrees of size and complexity including both structured and unstructured data.
Piping and processing massive data-streams in distributed computing environments such as Hadoop to facilitate analysis.
Implements batch and real-time model scoring to drive actions.
Develop sophisticated visualization of analysis output for business users.
BS/MA/MS/PhD in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Machine Learning, Econometrics, Physics, Biostatistics or related Quantitative disciplines.
5 years experience in predictive analytics and advanced expertise with software such as Python, or any combination of education and experience which would provide an equivalent background.
Experience leading end-to-end data science project implementation.
Experience in the health-care sector.
Experience in Deep Learning strongly preferred.
","['hadoop', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'econometr']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'econometr']"
DS,"Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture?
As a member of this highly collaborative team, you will get to partner with stakeholders all across the business to solve diverse, novel and highly challenging problems.
The team’s responsibilities are uniquely broad; they encompass topics such as delivery timing estimation, driver payment strategies, dynamic market balancing and smarter driver dispatching.
A successful candidate is a motivated individual with strong model, algorithm, and software development, and communication skills.
They should hold themselves to a high standard for coding best practices and a passion for pushing their team to new heights by designing new tools and evangelizing durable and efficient solutions for deploying large scale machine learning models and algorithms.
Ideally, the candidate would strive to remain abreast with related science technologies, show leadership in charting new avenues for automation through data science and the rare ability to appropriately balance short term gains with long term goals.
You will develop and maintain strong relationships with software engineering teams consuming your algorithm and model outputs.
You should have:
Master’s degree in a quantitative or technical field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science or Computer Engineering
4 years of industry experience in a data science role or adjacent position
Expert knowledge with Python scripting language and SQL.
Experience with the entire pipeline of deploying machine-learning algorithms including their development, validation, implementation, and production launch.
Demonstrable proficiency in basic statistics, linear algebra, and calculus as they relate to machine learning concepts.
Interest in coding best practices, both in acquiring them, developing them, and evangelizing them to teammates and others.
Strong ability to distill and communicate complex technical concepts and solutions at a level appropriate for the intended audience.
Got These?
Even Better:
Ph.D. in aforementioned quantitative or technical field or 6 years of industry directly relevant industry experience.
Past successes processing, analyzing, and modeling GPS data or geotraces.
Experience with big data: extraction, processing, filtering, and presenting large data quantities using cloud technologies like AWS.
Familiarity with utilizing a clustered distributed-data processing tool such as Spark, Dask or Hive.
Expert level knowledge of experimental statistics, analysis and best practices.
Flexible PTO.
Health and Wellness.
Learning and Career Growth.
MealPerks.
Who’s ready for some lunch?
Fun.
Social Impact.
The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster.
Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
","['dask', 'python', 'spark', 'sql', 'aw', 'hive', 'cloud']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['dask', 'python', 'spark', 'sql', 'aw', 'hive', 'cloud', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Cat Digital’s Advanced Data Quality team is looking for a talented and motived Principal Data Scientist to drive platform data quality improvements by developing and delivering ML/AI models to address the most challenging data quality issues.
Competent to perform all programming, project management, and development assignments without close supervision; normally assigned the more complex aspects of systems work.
Lead role in complex projects spanning across multiple system components.
Work in all phases of product creation process including creating technical requirements, project planning, identifying dependencies, system architecture and development.
Investigation and root cause analysis of software and system defects.
Focus on productivity, quality and competitiveness of major technology initiatives.
Organize and drive configuration management activities of the development process.
Works directly on complex application/technical problem identification and resolution, including responding to off-shift and weekend support calls.
Works independently on complex systems or infrastructure components that may be used by one or more applications or systems.
Drives data pipeline development focused around delivering high quality data.
Mentor and assist software engineers, providing technical assistance and direction as needed.
Maintains high standards of software quality by establishing good practices and habits.
Identifies and encourage areas for growth and improvement.
Communicate with peer engineering teams to help direct development, debugging, and testing of data for accuracy, integrity, interoperability, and completeness.
Performs integrated testing and customer acceptance testing of components that requires careful planning and execution to ensure timely, quality results.
#LI
Qualifications
Basic qualifications
MS or PhD degree in quantitative discipline such as mathematics, statistics, data science, computer science, engineering
7+ years of experience in designing and implementing data processing and machine learning frameworks
7+ years of experience with Python, NoSQL and relational databases
3+ years of experience as principal engineer
3+ years of experience with AWS stack
Top candidates will also have:
Proven experience in most of the following:
Compiling and standardizing diverse, non-sanitized datasets.
Working with structured and unstructured data.
Developing classification and regression models.
Unsupervised learning algorithms.
Natural language processing.
Customized statistical algorithm development and deployment.
Experience integrating analytical models with existing data pipelines.
Proven experience with AWS full-stack development and services such as Athena, CloudFormation, DynamoDB, Fargate, EC2, EMR, Lambda, RDS, S3, SageMaker.
Thorough knowledge of statistical approaches, quantitative analytic methods, data management techniques, and/or related digital technologies, and the ability to handle complex issues.
Experience with dashboard development and design using data visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI, Kibana
Experience in some of the following:
Designing, developing, deploying and maintaining software at scale.
Experience delivering productionized software solutions.
Deploying software using CI/CD tools such as Jenkins, GoCD, Azure DevOps etc.
Deploying and maintaining software using public clouds such as AWS
Developing software applications using relational and NoSQL databases.
Experience working within an Agile framework
Solid knowledge of computer science fundamentals like data structures and algorithms.
Exhibit strong initiative and teamwork skills, and a demonstrated track record of growing and learning through experience.
Demonstrate strong communication and presentation skills, with the ability to articulate conclusions to customers who have limited knowledge and experience with quantitative analytical methods.
Ability to work under pressure and within time constraints.
Passion for technology and an eagerness to contribute to a team-oriented environment.
Challenges include meeting expectations in delivering results, learning to refine solutions to better fit complex situations, making timely decisions, and communicating effectively with all project stakeholders.
#LI
]]>
","['nosql', 'lambda', 'power bi', 'ec2', 'aw', 'sagemak', 'bi', 'tableau', 's3', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'natural language processing', 'supervis', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['nosql', 'lambda', 'powerbi', 'ec2', 'aw', 'sagemak', 'tableau', 's3', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'nlp', 'supervis', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"To democratize data science so organizations can stop guessing and make decisions based on numbers and scientific fact.
Are you interested in using data science to solve new and challenging problems in innovative ways — like helping cities, states, and the federal government use data to improve citizen services and outcomes?
**This is a temporary, full-time, salaried position with benefits slated to end Dec. 31, 2020.
There is a possibility of extension if the business requires it.
**
Responsibilities
An Applied Data Scientist is responsible for the end-to-end execution of client engagements utilizing data science, which includes:
Unifying large 1st- and 3rd-party datasets and building predictive models
Deriving clear, actionable, and timely insights from analyses
Creating client-ready materials and solutions for stakeholders of varying technical experience or familiarity with methods
Working with cross-functional teams of data scientists and software engineers where necessary to create and implement solutions
Other job responsibilities of an Applied Data Scientist include:
Creatively identifying opportunities in the solution delivery process for scalable applications, and collaborating with other teams to further construct these tools
Maintaining a continuous and independent education of cutting-edge statistical techniques and programming languages
Travel requirements: <5>
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in an analytical subject (statistics, math, economics, physics, engineering, business, political or social science, computer science, etc.)
Proven affinity for and experience working with large or messy data sets
SQL experience a plus
Experience with statistical programming languages (R, Python, etc.)
and proven ability to work pragmatically with statistical concepts
Experience with presentation or data visualization software, such as Microsoft PPT, Tableau, Shiny, etc.
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Preferred Qualifications
Familiarity with software development tools and practices (Git, code review, etc.)
The opportunity to be part of a growing tech startup focused on solving interesting and meaningful problems, invested in internal promotion, and committed to fostering a diverse, equal and inclusive workplace.
Competitive benefits, including unlimited PTO, 401K match with immediate vesting, health, dental, and vision benefits, paid parental leave, breastfeeding support including breastmilk shipping services for traveling moms, flexible work from home policy, commuter benefits, wellness initiatives including weekly group meditations, monthly on-site massage therapy, and pet insurance.
If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please contact internalrecruiting@civisanalytics.com
In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States.
EEO IS THE LAW
EEO Supplement
Pay Transparency
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['data', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"What you bring to the team:
Assess the potential usefulness and validity of new ML and DL approaches and data sources.
Develop proof-of-concept prototypes to prove out hypotheses.
Manage experience with data, including complex queries, exploratory data analysis, data visualization, advanced modeling and communication of applicable insights to audiences at varying levels of technical sophistication.
Qualifications
Desirable Skills and Experience:
Must have at least 3 years of professional experience outside of academic or internship settings.
Prior research, data science modeling and taking machine learning features to market.
Outstanding quantitative background (e.g.
statistics, math, machine learning, operations research, etc.
): Bachelors degree required, masters is a plus.
Familiarity with technical tools for analysis - Python (with Pandas, Scikit-learn, etc.
), SQL, etc.
Prior experience using natural language processing techniques is a plus.
Previous software development experience is required, including usage of version control systems such as git and writing tests
Research mindset with a bias towards action.
You are able to structure a project from idea to experimentation to prototype to implementation.
Must be a passionate and attentive self-starter, a great communicator, and possess the ability to follow-through initiatives to completion.
You have a great work ethic and love the responsibility of being held accountable for the results.
Additional Information
Perks/Benefits:
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision insurance.
Flexible paid time off (PTO) policy, plus sick days.
Ongoing professional development opportunities by level and function.
Your choice of Windows or Mac laptop.
Onsite gym.
Casual dress in a fun, friendly and collaborative work environment.
The ability to have significant impact every day.
","['git', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'scikit']","['machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'account', 'exploratori', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['git', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'scikit', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'account', 'exploratori', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Overview
Leverage your science first mentality, curiosity, deep technical expertise, and problem-solving skills to explore, discover, and predict patterns and insights within complex data sets.
Responsibilities
Use analytical and statistical tools to evaluate data and aid in decision making.
Manipulate / create social media analytics and data to strengthen marketing campaign effectiveness.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Work with clients to prioritize research and modeling initiatives• Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Support the development of a mature analytics function informed by industry best practices.
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented, and collaborative environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications
Active Secret Clearance.
Degree (Masters required) in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, computer science, economics, or other related business or technical discipline is required.
Extensive experience in social media analytics and marketing campaign effectiveness.
Experience in Salesforce, Sprinklr, and Adobe Analytics - marketing analytics background.
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn).
Significant experience in the AI/ML lifecycle, from ideation and solution concept development, to rapid prototyping and validation in operational environments, and importantly, in the sustainment of AI/ML solutions for CI/CD.
Significant experience and knowledge of best practices in the practical application and execution of AI/ML in operational environments.
Ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions, and translate customer qualitative requirements into quantitative and technical approaches.
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards using platforms such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact.
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections.
At least 5+ years of experience in the field.
DoD Secret clearance required.
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Preferred Experience
DoD experience is preferred, in particular with human capital data and workforce analytics.
Data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analyticso Knowledge of AI/ML SaaS platforms (e.g., DataRobot, H2O DriverlessAI).
Unstructured text and natural language processingo Computational tools such as R, Python, SAS, SQL, and MATLABo Anaconda, IBM Blue, and Oracle Big Data to analyze large data sets and develop automated analytics in making sense of data affecting DoD operations.
Developing machine learning, data mining, statistical network, natural language processing, text analytics, and graph-based algorithms to analyze massive data setso Supervising algorithm implementation in on-premise and cloud-based computing environments.
Developing software to generate reports and visualizations that summarize data sets and provide data-driven insights.
Developing and implementing statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics as well as to develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions.
","['h2o', 'power bi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'bi', 'qlik', 'cloud', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'econom', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['h2o', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'cloud', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'nlp', 'predict', 'econom', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"A Chicago based IOT start up with a new round of series A funding is looking to expand their engineering team to handles the uptick in sales.
You will be working on an IOT enabled Saas to help take smart buildings to the next level in the commercial real estate business.
This is a cloud-based platform for building managers, operators, and tenants to view data in a centralized system.
Essentially the platform is a data driven tool that uses geofencing and predictive analysis to improve insights and create engagement between users.They are looking for someone who wants to get in on something from the ground up.
The tech stack over there is .Net core, Angular 8 and Azure though you will be more focused on Python, R, SQL, Spark, NLP, and some other tools that you will help drive the decision making on.Required Skills & Experience* 3+ years of professional experience in data science or machine learning* 3+ years professional experience in Python* Professional experience in Spark or similar tools* Experience in NLP* Experience leading a teamDesired Skills & Experience* Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field* Excellent written and oral communicationWhat You Will Be DoingTech Breakdown* 10% architecture/Planning* 20% Team Collaboration* 70% data scienceThe Offer* Competitive Salary: Up to $160,000You will receive the following benefits:* Medical Insurance & Health Savings Account (HSA)* 401(k)* Paid Sick Time Leave* Pre-tax Commuter BenefitApplicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis now and in the future.Jobspring Partners, part of the Motion Recruitment network, provides IT Staffing Solutions (Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire) in major North American markets.
You will be working on an IOT enabled Saas to help take smart buildings to the next level in the commercial real estate business.
This is a cloud-based platform for building managers, operators, and tenants to view data in a centralized system.
Essentially the platform is a data driven tool that uses geofencing and predictive analysis to improve insights and create engagement between users.They are looking for someone who wants to get in on something from the ground up.
The tech stack over there is .Net core, Angular 8 and Azure though you will be more focused on Python, R, SQL, Spark, NLP, and some other tools that you will help drive the decision making on.Required Skills & Experience* 3+ years of professional experience in data science or machine learning* 3+ years professional experience in Python* Professional experience in Spark or similar tools* Experience in NLP* Experience leading a teamDesired Skills & Experience* Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field* Excellent written and oral communicationWhat You Will Be DoingTech Breakdown* 10% architecture/Planning* 20% Team Collaboration* 70% data scienceThe Offer* Competitive Salary: Up to $160,000You will receive the following benefits:* Medical Insurance & Health Savings Account (HSA)* 401(k)* Paid Sick Time Leave* Pre-tax Commuter BenefitApplicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis now and in the future.Jobspring Partners, part of the Motion Recruitment network, provides IT Staffing Solutions (Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire) in major North American markets.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'angular', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'nlp', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'angular', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'nlp', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Do you have a background in Data Science, Physics, Statistics or Probability Theory?
Do you have a passion for sports?
Do you live to find data driven solutions to complex problems?
What You'll Do:
Productizing artificial intelligence based solutions along side engineers and product teams
Providing technical guidance to product teams on the artificial intelligence (machine learning and computer vision) approaches appropriate for a task
Patenting the innovative solutions
What You Need:
Bachelor's, MS or PhD in computer science or related quantitative field.
Expertise in using Python, C++, or other programming language
Substantial experience with unstructured data sources, especially in areas such as spatiotemporal data, video/image, speech or text data
Proficiency in, at least, one modern deep learning engine such as Tensorflow, PyTorch etc.
(preferred: knowledge of using GPUs)
Proven track record of innovation in creating novel algorithms and advancing the state of the art
Passion for creating new technologies with high product impact within sport.
One Team
Committed Players
Dedicated to Client Success
Always Innovate
Be The Best
","['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'python']","['probabl', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'data', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'python', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'data', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist
Job Type: Full Time/ Contract to Hire
Salary: Open
Requirements:
• Minimum 5-10 years of hands-on experience with statistical software tools: SQL, R, Python
• 3+ years- experience in business analytics, forecasting or business planning with emphasis on analytical modeling, quantitative reasoning and metrics reporting
• Experience working with large data sets in order to extract business insights or build predictive models
• Proficiency in one or more statistical tools/languages - Python, Scala, R SPSS or SAS and related packages like Pandas, SciPy/Scikit-learn, NumPy etc.
• Good data intuition / analysis skills; sql, plsql knowledge must
• Banking / Financial Sectors (preferred / not a must)
","['scala', 'sql', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'spss', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'sa']","['data', 'predict', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist']",999.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'spss', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'sa', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist']"
DS,"WHAT IS THE OPPORTUNITY?
The Data Scientist works with management and business partners to support the development and implementation of statistical models & advanced analytical solutions.
Personal and Business Banking on the value of data and analytics.
The incumbent will get to work with and support multiple lines of business around the enterprise to help them achieve their objectives.
WHAT WILL YOU DO?
+ Support Senior Management on analytical projects of varying sizes and complexities, including: + Participate in business partner interviews, brainstorming sessions, and workshops to capture business objectives and prioritize opportunities + Research & leverage state of art modeling techniques, participates in modeling innovation.
+ Identify best analytical techniques that can be effectively applied to achieve business objectives and interpret next best action through data driven insights + Building end to end automated analytic solutions that are intuitive, simple to maintain, and drive real business outcomes + Leads the development and implementation of innovative analytical solutions, including customer segmentation, optimization, prescriptive analytics and machine learning algorithm & recommendations to solve business problems.
+ Experience in building response models & propensity scores.
+ Knowledge of Python, R, Spark or HiveQL will be preferred + Knowledge of machine learning techniques like Gradient Boosting, Random Forest, SVM, Pathing & Attribution etc.
is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Accommodations are available on request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
To request accommodation, please contact your recruiter.
","['r', 'spark', 'python']","['data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'optim', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']",999.0,"['r', 'spark', 'python', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'optim', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Position Summary
analytics.
The VP, Lead Data Scientist
the effectiveness of client acquisition, development and retention.
They will collaborate across the Global
Distribution, Product, Marketing, Client Servicing and Technology teams and
lead a team of onshore and offshore data science and engineering resources.
Primary Responsibilities
Lead
a team of data scientists and engineers onshore and offshore to deliver data
Collaborate
with the organization to create use cases for predictive and prescriptive
analytics
Design
and develop analyses based on prioritized use cases
Identify
and use appropriate investigative and analytical technologies to interpret and
verify results
Develop
engage with clients
and learn a wide variety of tools and languages to achieve results (e.g.,
Python, R, SPSS, Hadoop)
Lead
the integration of data and predictive models into decision making across the
organization
Utilize
effective project planning techniques to break down complex projects into tasks
and ensure deadlines are kept
Communicate
findings to team and leadership to ensure models are well understood and
Document
model development and maintain models in appropriate platforms in partnership
with technology
Cultivate
an innovation mindset within the team and the organization to continue learning
and driving data into the core of decision making
Define requirements for data science environment
and tools required to be successful.
Ensure these requirements are met and environment maintained in
partnership with technology.
Requires minimum 5 years experience in advanced analytics, model building and deployment, and machine learning
Advanced degree in relevant field required (computer science, statistics, applied mathematics)
Experience in normalization of data, data mining, and tools
Experience in building and maintaining environments and platforms required for effective data sciences efforts
Experience with third party API integration and visualization capabilities
Strong executive presence, with the ability to communicate effectively with stakeholders at all levels
Demonstrated leadership skills and ability to work across multiple teams and platforms in a matrixed organization
Additional Information
Requisition ID: 1726953
","['hadoop', 'r', 'spss', 'python']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['hadoop', 'r', 'spss', 'python', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Domain Experience:
3+ years-experience in machine learning and predictive analytics
Strong knowledge of statistics and predictive methods such as SEM, multiple and logistic regression, Bayesian modeling, support vector machines, neural net training, tree induction techniques like CHAID, CART, random forest, random tree, etc.
Able to translate complexÂdataÂinto actionable insights and recommendations.
Strong understanding of the Financial Services is required.
Experience with financial models, risk models, marketing cross-sell, up-sell, retention, and customer lifetime value models preferred.
15 years plus Real world experience in monetizing models and making money (Retail or Distribution industry)
Â
Soft Skills:
Multi-tasking and priority setting â ability to effectively manage multiple projects of varying complexity.
Ability to work independently and as part of a team.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Technical Skills/Experience:
Experience with statistical modeling
Practical experience in preparingÂdataÂfor machine learning
Practical experience in using and designing regression, SVM, clustering, and other classification models.
Nice to have experience in optimization
Nice to have experience in Spark, Tensorflow, parallel computation
Experience with largeÂdataÂstores, both SQL and noSQL (e.g.
Hadoop)
Python, R, Matlab
Node.js, Scala for services, Postgres for theÂdatabase
Kubernetes, for deployment and Devops
AWS for infrastructure, leveraging EC2, S3, SWF, CloudFront, Route53, and much more
Proven capabilities in presenting technical findings to non-technical audiences
Â
Â
","['kubernet', 'nosql', 'scala', 'spark', 'ec2', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'net', 'r', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hadoop', 'postgr']","['risk', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'logist', 'cluster', 'random forest', 'predict', 'optim', 'svm', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['kubernet', 'nosql', 'scala', 'spark', 'ec2', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'net', 'r', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hadoop', 'risk', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'logist', 'cluster', 'random forest', 'predict', 'optim', 'svm', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"If you are passionate about making a difference in the work you do, being recognized for your talent and expertise in solving complex and challenging analytical/data problems while contributing to the success of key strategic initiatives, consider growing your career with a Fortune 10 healthcare leader!
The essential roles and responsibilities of the role are:
Collaborating with key internal and external stakeholders to gather and analyze needs and requirements to design and implement robust analytic solutions to support the identified needs;
Developing and executing strategic plans to use advanced analytics in conjunction with patient and provider interventions to improve clinical and cost outcomes;
Leveraging pharmacy and medical claims data as well as identifying and utilizing other data sources (EMR, lab results, clinical data and notes, consumer purchasing data, digital engagement data, etc.)
to provide actionable, relevant, and timely analytic insight;
Accessing, manipulating, analyzing, and visualizing data from large databases using a variety of tools and techniques, such SQL, Python, R, and/or Tableau;
Conducting analyses of the data, ranging from descriptive data exploration to advanced statistical modeling;
Assessing existing available data, identifying data gaps, and collaborating with the data strategy team, IT, business partners, and outside vendors to develop approaches to closing the data gaps;
Collaborating with business and analytic resources across multiple teams in a matrix organization to accomplish project goals;
Constructing persuasive presentations and gaining consensus among a diverse group of individuals;
Constructing and delivering written reports of the analytic findings in a variety of formats (reports, PPT, including visualization of data and findings), formulating recommendations, and effectively presenting the results to potential non-analytic audiences;
Communicating complex technical subjects to technical and non-technical audiences.
Required Qualifications
Problem solving skills and experience constructing analytic solutions to business problems;
Developing innovative analytic approaches leveraging available internal and external data sources;
Experience interacting with and influencing decision-making by business audiences;
Ability to quickly develop knowledge and understanding of new domains and underlying data sources;
Solid understanding and hands-on experience working with large data sources, particularly pharmacy or medical claims and clinical program data, focusing on efficient data extraction from large databases, data manipulation, and insight generation;
Solid understanding and hands-on experience with SQL, Python, R, Tableau and/or other data, statistical, and data visualization tools and techniques, and ability to investigate and adapt emerging analytic tools and solutions into the analytic standard operating procedures;
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including conveying analytic concepts and findings to executive and non-technical audiences with the goal of obtaining feedback and defining next steps to make the analytic insights actionable.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with campaign design and consumer market research, such as survey design, implementing large-scale campaigns, and performing A/B testing;
Experience applying behavioral economic concepts to drive behavior change;
Developing roadmaps, business cases, and project plans;
Managing projects and processes, including coordinating activates across diverse departments and ensuring that contributions across different teams are aligned and integrated as part of overall delivery;
Experience developing methodology to measure program and intervention outcomes;
Experience conducting data analysis in a healthcare setting;
Working knowledge of healthcare industry products/services and operations.
Education
A graduate degree strongly preferred.
Business Overview
If technical issues are preventing you from applying to a position, contact Kenexa Helpdesk at 1-855-338-5609 or cvshealthsupport@us.ibm.com.
For technical issues with the Virtual Job Tryout assessment, contact the Shaker Help Desk at 1-877-987-5352.
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Do you share Hornblower's passion for providing amazing experiences?
If you're an enthusiastic team player who thrives in an environment where communication, creativity, and cooperation are encouraged, this may just be the opportunity for you.
S/he will develop real-time dashboards, provide insights to support strategic initiatives, and produce predictions that will enable evidence-based decision-support.
In addition, this individual will assist in the design and development of analytics and reporting solutions based on users' needs.
This is a great opportunity for someone who is excited about transforming data into actionable insights to support the fight against the COVID-19 epidemic.Essential Duties & Responsibilities* Transform data into actionable insights* Collect, analyze, and model available data to address reporting and analysis needs.
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'commun']",999.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'commun']"
DS,"Sr. Data Scientist (Multiple Openings) - 63682
Data Science - USA Chicago, Illinois
In this role, you will be responsible for:
Gather business requirements and create technical requirements for statistical analytics solutions.
Create data processing systems for production purposes.
Present material to internal department stakeholders.
Partner with the Software Engineering department to build best-of-class Cloud-based analytical solutions based on the Agile solutions development methodology.
Implement statistical and econometric models.
Analyze (i.e., to determine the quality of) econometric models, and implement and analyze supervised and unsupervised learning approaches.
Prototype and design analytic methods.
Conduct research to identify new quality assurance measures.
Train and mentor (without supervisory authority) 1-2 Data Scientists.
Involves domestic travel, 1-2 times per year, for up to 2-3 days per trip.
Tools used include: SQL, Python, Pandas, Scikit Learn, R, Spark MLib and Scala.
Minimum Requirements:
Master’s degree in statistics, mathematics, economics, or a related hard science, social science or engineering field with a quantitative focus, such as computer science or engineering, physics, chemistry or sociology (foreign equivalent degree acceptable) plus 3 years of experience in conducting data modeling and statistical analysis using large and complex (at least 10 GB) datasets (would also accept a Ph.D. in such a field plus 1 year of experience).
This must include: 3 years of experience (or 1 year of experience after a Ph.D.) in/with: gathering data requirements for statistical, econometric and/or predictive analytics research that drives market research/marketing analytics product innovation and implementation; handling large volumes (at least 10 GB) of structured and unstructured data; Python and its libraries (such as Pandas, Numypy and/or SciKit Learn), SQL, Spark, and R, all via a Cloud-based platform (such as AWS and/or Azure).
1 year of experience in/with: building efficient data processing pipelines for analytical systems; and Airflow.
Must be willing to travel domestically, 1-2 times per year, for 2-3 days per trip.
#LI-DNP
Today’s data is tomorrow’s marketplace revelation.
Job Type: Regular
Secondary Locations: , , ,
Travel: Yes, 5% of the Time
","['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'airflow', 'sql', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['data modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'econometr', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'econom', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'airflow', 'sql', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'data modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'econometr', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'econom', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise.
Perform data collection for Data Science operations including Machine Learning.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting, and other business outcomes.
Assess Model accuracy using common metrics (AUC, F1, etc.)
and explain the results to client stakeholders.
Your Expertise:
3-5 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
Cloud experience in a major platform, such as AWS, GCP, or Azure.
Experience using Data Science languages (R, Python) to manipulate data and draw insights.
Knowledge of a variety of Machine Learning and advanced analytical techniques and their real world advantages/drawbacks.
Familiarity with the following software/tools: Python, C, Java, Jupyter Notebooks, SQL, ML platforms (H2O, DataRobot), distributed data (Map/Reduce, Hadoop), and visualization (Tableau, qlikview)
Must have a Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Technology, Computer Information Systems, Computer Applications, Engineering, or a related field.
Your X-Factor:
Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical thinker with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.
Why Were Proud To Be Mavens!
Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018, 2017
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year
Ready to Learn More?
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories
","['h2o', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'jupyt', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'gcp', 'java']","['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['h2o', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'jupyt', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'gcp', 'java', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The MIS Data Scientist documents, reviews, analyzes and evaluates business processes, systems and user needs; formulates requirements to parallel overall business strategies.
Types of analysis and reporting may include: Senior management, operations, capacity and turn time modeling, workflow analysis, process improvement, compliance, financial and/or a variety of other function specific purposes.
Identify process improvements, effects of change implementation and financial impact on the business.
Performs a variety of complicated tasks with a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Ability to develop Qlik Reporting and/or.NET or REACT Applications will also be a plus.
**Qualifications**+ Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.+ Strong data analysis/quantitative/technical aptitude with ability to quickly learn new metrics, processes, and dataset.+ Expert++ level in analyzing data and be able to classify groups, predict trends and get meaning out of data.+ Hands-on experience with one or more statistical analysis tools like R, Python, MATLAB, etc (must have)+ 3-5 years of experience, preferably across diverse Finance/MIS/Analytical and Operations roles.
","['excel', 'matlab', 'react', 'r', 'qlik', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['excel', 'matlab', 'react', 'r', 'qlik', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Please Enable Cookies to Continue
Welcome page
Returning Candidate?
Log back in!
Data Scientist
US-IL-Northbrook
Job ID
2020-17946
# of Openings
1
Job Category
Information Technology
What you’ll learn & achieve:
Use advanced mathematical and statistical concepts and theories to collect and analyze data and construct solutions to complex business problems.
Identify what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes such as sensors, open data, and social media feeds.
Perform advanced statistical analysis on experimental or business data to identify, validate and quantify trends or patterns.
Design experiments, test hypotheses, and build models to explore complex business and safety science systems.
Construct advanced predictive models, algorithms and probability engines to support data analysis or product functions.
Write methodology, analysis and data insights for research papers, proposals and presentations.
Synthesize all aspects of a data science project to lead non-technical audiences through the goals, methods and implications of the project.
Leverage knowledge in machine learning, natural language processing, mathematical and statistical analyses, and technologies such as R, MongoDB, Elastic Search and open source analysis tools.
Work with business leaders and researchers to suggest other projects and initiatives that will advance the organizations goals.
What makes you a great fit:
Master’s degree in data science, predictive analytics, mathematics or statistics and 3 years of experience in data analytics or data science.
Must have work experience with each of the following: 1.)
predictive modeling using machine learning including neural networks Bayesian, k-means and related algorithms; 2.)
implement natural language processing algorithms to detect patterns in large volumes of unstructured data using BERT, Spark, scikit learn, NLTK and SpaCy; 3.)
conduct mathematical and statistical analyses to uncover relationships between variables using R, multivariate, logistic and other regression methods; and 4.)
aggregate, prepare and pre-process large volumes of unrelated data for use in Data Lakes that implement MongoDB, Elastic Search and open source analysis tools.
.
Options
Share
Email this job to a friendRefer
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment.
Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
EEO is the Law
E-Verify Poster (English)
Right to Work Poster (English)
Citizenship is required for most positions.
If you experience technical difficulties during the application process, please click here
Software Powered by iCIMS
www.icims.com
","['nltk', 'spark', 'r', 'mongodb', 'spaci', 'scikit']","['probabl', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",2.0,"['nltk', 'spark', 'r', 'mongodb', 'spaci', 'scikit', 'probabl', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'nlp', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"The Data Scientist (Senior Manager level) will be part of the Enterprise BI team at 1-800-Flowers.com, Inc.
This individual will manage one or more analysts and focus on customer-level advanced analytics for the direct-to-consumer and business-to-business channels.
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
As a hands-on analytics leader, deliver actionable insights while prioritizing and managing the workload of junior analysts
Collaborate with business owners and propose appropriate analytics solutions to address critical business questions
Create Tableau dashboards to empower business owners
Develop advanced analytics solutions to address some open business questions, e.g.,
Multi-Brand Customer Segmentation
Next Best Offer/ Next Best Brand
Channel Attribution
Customer Retention
Key Competencies:
Strong analytical mind, problem-solving skills and foundation in Statistics
Ability to collaborate well with individuals on-site and in remote offices
Intermediate to advanced level of expertise using SAS, SQL, Tableau, Python
Outstanding analytical skill set: a clear expert in the Analytics/ Data Science field
Experience working with large volumes of data, combining and reconciling data from different sources
Experience in MS Office applications with very strong Excel skills
Requirements:
Minimum B.S.
in Mathematics, Statistics, Data Analytics or related quant field
5+ years in a similar analytical role generating insights through data analytics
Strong communication skills: both written and verbal
Ability to work independently on multiple concurrent assignments
Self-driven for continual learning and ongoing training/development
Highly organized, detail-oriented
Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python', 'sa']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'python', 'sa', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
+ Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
+ Build 'smart' systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
+ Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution
In the first year this role will focus on the following
+ Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
+ Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
+ Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
+ Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
+ Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers
Required Qualifications
+ Master's Degree + 3 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 5 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
+ Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
+ Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
+ Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ Master's Degree or PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
",[None],"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Let's change the way the world thinks about money!
Join the revolution!
About the role:
For this role, you will be part of a team that builds cutting-edge trading products in the cryptocurrency industry.
You will collaborate and lead projects with product management, engineering, marketing, and growth teams.
If you value having a seat at the table and want to make a big impact on guiding the direction of marketing and growth at one of the top crypto exchanges in the world, this role is for you.
Requirements
A degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Physical Sciences, Economics, Math or a related technical field.
5+ years industry experience in data science or analytics
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using Python, R, and/or SQL
Experience using statistics and predictive analytics to solve complex business problems.
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job.
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Familiarity with other data tools such as Hive, Vertica, Tableau & Ruby is a plus
Responsibilities
Drive cross functional analytic projects from beginning to end: build relationships with partner teams, frame and structure questions, collect and analyze data, summarize and present key insights in support of decision making.
Work with engineers to evangelize data best practices and implement analytics solutions.
Collaborate with business leaders, subject matter experts, and decision makers to develop success criteria and optimize new products, features, policies, and models.
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for leadership and product management.
Develop anomaly detection, and data modelling tools to monitor key performance indicators to improve the efficiency of the products.
Design experiments for product teams to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement.
Build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks.
","['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'rubi', 'hive']","['hypothesi', 'etl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'rubi', 'hive', 'hypothesi', 'etl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"FNAs clients include the worlds largest central banks, financial market infrastructures, leading financial institutions and government agencies
Make an impact on the global stage!
Youll help the world's largest and most influential financial institutions by delivering solutions to some of their topmost predicaments.
Were looking for Data Scientists who enjoy autonomy and working remotely with some travel to interface with clients for implementations, training and use case exploration.
You consider Advanced Analytics, Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Big Data, Business Intelligence, and Data Visualization your playground.
You have hands-on experience delivering successful projects and solutions to customers In-Cloud and On-premise installations.
Being part of a team of collaborative, brilliant, passionate, hard-working & humble colleagues who embrace working from anywhere there is a solid internet connection
Fully supportive of your personal and professional growth with a £1k/yr annual stipend for continuing education
You will own projects from end to end, stamp your name to important work and document use cases in technical reports, white papers, etc.
Publish!
Key Areas of Responsibility:
This will be achieved both remotely and on-site with clients
With time, the Data Scientist will be customer facing to develop and present customer specific use cases clearly and concisely, communicate analyses, recommendations, status and results to existing customers and prospects at business management and executive level
Partner with cross-functional teams to solve business problems at scale and identify trends/opportunities for the customers
Customer Excellence - Effectively help to resolve relevant customer support requests in a professional and timely manner
Required profile:
The right candidates will have experience and knowledge of Machine Learning concepts and will be allowed the freedom to explore new concepts to help develop future products
Youve executed in highly complex situations, delivered measurable business value, and exhibit strategic business acumen
Must have 2+ years commercial experience as a Data Scientist
2+ years experience with machine learning and predictive modeling within large datasets
2+ years experience with R/Python/MatLab/SQL or similar
Experience on projects applying network science/graph analytics
The right candidate will be naturally inquisitive, analytical and have good attention to detail.
You should have the ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical personnel and not be afraid to present creative, data-driven ideas to stakeholders
Passion and curiosity for what is happening within RegTech/FinTech/SupTech, Big Data, Graph Databases, Data Analysis and especially Graph Analytics
You like to get things done with speed and efficiency
Business level written and spoken English is a minimum
Ability to travel approximately 25% of the time (Domestic and International)
Nice To Haves:
MS or PhD level qualification in mathematics, statistics, physics, engineering or related applied quantitative field
Bi-lingual business-level language capability
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'bi', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'powerbi', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"What’s significantly better than working on a typical data science team?
(well, statistically significant that is).
So, if your confident that you want to make a direct impact in your next job today, then please keep on reading.
Responsibilities
Here are just a few different responsibilities you can expect off the bat:
Work with IT teams, management and/or data scientists to determine organizational goals
Identify new opportunities for process improvement
Some Characteristics That Define You
Analytical.
Patient.
As a data scientist, you know that you work with extremely large data sets on a daily basis.
Creative.
Student.
Business-Savvy.
A bachelor’s degree/pursuing a bachelor's degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics, information systems, or a related field
Experience with statistical modeling
Fundamental knowledge of R and/or SAS languages
Benefits
Comprehensive medical & dental insurance
Generous PTO, including sick days & holidays
A state-of-the-art office environment
Year-round gym memberships
Paid continuing education
Casual dress code
Flexible scheduling
Free-Lunch-Friday
","['r', 'sa']","['statist', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['r', 'sa', 'statist', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Data Scientist
6 Month Contract to hire
Elmhurst, IL
Not able to provide sponsorship for now or in the future
This opportunity includes a competitive compensation package including medical, dental, visual benefits, remote capability, 401k and PTO options.
This also includes free parking and a business casual environment.
Responsibilities include:
Provide new insights into businesses through statistical analysis, data mining, data visualization, and to create solutions
Work heavily within SQL
Work with SAS, ETL, data processing, programming and data analytics
Work with BI tools including PowerBI or Tableau
Utilize Python programming language
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Requirements:
Minimum of 7 years of experience working as a Data Scientist extracting data, processing, and performing data analytics
Strong data capturing experience with SQL
Previous exposure in PowerBI or Tableau
Previous SAS, Python, R, or Java programming language experience
Healthcare exposure (Bonus)
Ability to present findings, models, tables, presentations to stakeholders, executives, upper management
","['sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"To democratize data science so organizations can stop guessing and make decisions based on numbers and scientific fact.
About the Role
They are critical components of the project team and are expected to take leadership in understanding how to design and implement data science solutions for each client's unique situation.
This position will be part of the ADS Public Sector team, which most commonly works with state and local governments, federal agencies, and public utilities.
You will also be a mentor to other data scientists, potentially managing newer hires, contributing to internal assets, and fostering learning and collaboration.
**This is a temporary, full-time, salaried position with benefits slated to end Dec. 31, 2020.
There is a possibility of extension if the business requires it.
**
Responsibilities
Enhance, find patterns in, and build predictive models on large data sets
Work with the Applied Data Science Lead to create deliverables such as data assets, pipelines, dashboards, and presentations that are client-ready, clear, and error-free
Work with the Applied Data Science Lead to develop business opportunities, proposals, and pitches for new work throughout the public sector market
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in an analytical subject (statistics, math, economics, sociology, psychology, physics, etc.)
or equivalent
Minimum of 4 years of related work experience
Proven business results using both SQL as well as either R or Python
Experience with machine learning techniques
Experience with persuasive writing and presentation
Demonstrated ability to work independently and in teams
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Preferred Qualifications:
MA or MS in an analytical subject
Experience leading projects, including managing the work of colleagues
Proven affinity for and experience mentoring teammates
Experience with collaborative coding tools including Docker and Github
Significant experience fielding and analyzing web panel surveys
The opportunity to be part of a growing tech startup focused on solving interesting and meaningful problems, invested in internal promotion, and committed to fostering a diverse, equal and inclusive workplace.
Competitive benefits, including unlimited PTO, 401K match with immediate vesting, health, dental, and vision benefits, paid parental leave, breastfeeding support including breastmilk shipping services for traveling moms, flexible work from home policy, commuter benefits, wellness initiatives including weekly group meditations, monthly on-site massage therapy, and pet insurance.
If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please contact internalrecruiting@civisanalytics.com
In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States.
EEO IS THE LAW
EEO Supplement
Pay Transparency
","['github', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'docker']","['machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['github', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'docker', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"To learn more: https://www.kalderos.com/company/about
What Senior Data Scientists Do
This starts with having trust in each other as a team, then expanding it to do this work in three primary ways: building differentiated datasets, measuring what matters, and optimizing the right process transparently.
If that means a model, great!
If that means working with design to develop a different product approach, also great!
Build, test, deploy, and maintain supervised or unsupervised learning models.
Work with internal teams that operationalize that work to ensure their output is high quality and continually improving for end-users
Lead data science projects technically, while gathering requirements and keeping stakeholders informed of progress.
Create and evangelize technical best practices for the data science team so that other team members can fall into the pit of success.
Ensure model quality is high and ensure others can do so as well
Have an eye towards the future, ensuring that the team stays ahead of the curve internally and externally by generating buy-in for new things to try, or rethinking old ways of doing things.
4+ years of work experience as a Data Scientist in a full-time role in which you have owned significant portions of projects
Ability to write high-quality machine learning and data analysis code in R or Python that have been used in software products
Some ways you may demonstrate this are:
Describing models you have deployed and its measured impact over a baseline
Open GitHub Repositories or portfolios
Talking through lessons learned and pitfalls of a deployed model
Listing technologies you have used to deploy a model
Ability to take complex information and communicate it clearly for different stakeholders, both technical and non-technical
Some ways you may demonstrate this are:
Talks or presentations you have given in the past
Speaking through your work history in a phone interview
High-quality data visualizations that communicate complex information clearly
What May Set You Apart
Experience in healthcare or pharmaceuticals
Open source contributions to popular data science tools
Experience with data engineering tools such as Airflow
Experience working with Azure or similar public cloud
Experience working with SQL Server or similar databases
Experience with JIRA and project management methodologies
If you think you meet some of the list of the above, but not everything, that’s perfectly fine!
401K plan with matching
Healthcare Benefits
Flexible Schedule and a fair PTO system that allows for a healthy work life balance
Opportunity to work on new technologies and learn new skills
Celebration, education, and training stipend
To learn more: https://www.kalderos.com/company/culture
","['github', 'airflow', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'jira', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['github', 'airflow', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'jira', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Your impact as a Senior Data Scientist
Intellectual curiosity, creativity, honesty, and professionalism are critical traits for success in this role.
Job Responsibilities:
Run a data science/modeling project from start to finish with help from domain experts and other coworkers.
Represent the leadership and management of IP Solutions in a way that mirrors the adopted mission, core values, and culture of IP Solutions.
Help all business units on an as-needed basis achieve and surpass sales, profitability, cash flow, and business goals and objectives.
Assist in providing timely, accurate and complete reports on the progress of IP market-making efforts.
Ensure delivery of timely, innovative, accurate, and best in class solutions.
You Bring Knowledge and Expertise
Required Experience:
Technical Skills:
2-5 years Experience with data mining tools such as Python, R, or Matlab
2-5 years Experience with data analysis and statistical packages (NumPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, PyMC etc.)
2-5 years Experience building mathematical/statistical models
Experience working with a variety of data sources such as SQL, AWS, Azure, BigQuery, etc.
Natural Language Processing experience a plus
Non-technical Skills:
Ability to understand and communicate complex ideas effectively to technical and non-technical audiences
Ability to cooperate effectively with people at all levels in the organization
Impeccable standards of honesty and accuracy; high degree of self-motivation
Represent attributes of stewardship, humility, integrity, trust, and gratitude
Be a role model who develops others by providing timely feedback and coaching
Highly articulate and precise English speaking and writing skills
Education:
Undergrad with significant quantitative coursework
Degree(s) should be from top-100 national universities, engineering schools, and/or liberal arts colleges – or -
Work experience or internships with top-tier companies or governmental organizations
A competitive total rewards package, continuing education & training, and tremendous potential with a growing worldwide organization.
They make a difference, work with the best, own their potential, and value one another.
Background checks may include some or all of the following based on the nature of the position: SSN/SIN validation, education verification, employment verification, and criminal check, search against global sanctions and government watch lists, fingerprint verification, credit check, and/or drug test.
You will be notified during the hiring process which checks are required by the position.
DISCLAIMER:
2476034
","['bigqueri', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'azur', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'aw']","['data mining', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['bigqueri', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'azur', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'aw', 'data mining', 'data', 'nlp', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Data Scientist Azure Deep Learning Azure Machine Learning GC or Contract-to-hire 70-80 an hour on a W2 W2 Only Important Role This candidate must be sharp and communication skills must be exceptional Deep Learning and machine learning Microsoft Azure (Cloud) ndash must be strong with 2+ years of experience Azure Machine Learning Data Science and Big Data - Statistics, Market Research, Market Analysis, Analytics, Data Visualization, Statistical Modeling SQL, workflow management tools Microsoft Azure Python (programming) Claim Management experience (insurance) Advanced analytics ndash technologies T-SQL, SQL Server, SSIS, Data Factory , Power BI, Hybernate, C
","['power bi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'python', 'azur', 'c', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'python', 'azur', 'c', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Overview
Sound good?
Primary Responsibilities
This role will help shape the future by utilizing their knowledge and expertise of machine learning and big data to challenge the status quo and provide creative solutions to business problems.
Essential Functions
Research, build and maintain machine learning applications including structured and unstructured data, regression, classification, dimensionality reduction, and clustering
Collect, structure and analyze internal and external data sources with scalability in mind
Control data science projects from end to end with the ability to communicate results to upper management and key stakeholders
Identify and implement improvements in existing tools or processes using advanced technological approaches
Serve as the resident data expert and share best practices/approaches for machine learning techniques, big data, data modeling, and cloud computing
Minimum Requirements, Qualifications, Additional Skills, Aptitude
Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative field (Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science) or related fields
5+ years of experience in data analytics, business analytics or business intelligence
1+ years of experience designing and implementing machine learning solutions that drive business value
Excellent understanding of machine learning models such as regression, classification (logistic regression, naïve Bayes and tree-based models) and clustering (k-means and hierarchical)
Experience in feature engineering, dimensionality reduction and data manipulation to feed machine learning models
Ability to employ machine learning and predictive models to derive actionable business insights and value using data
Proven history of owning analytics projects from initial problem discovery through final solution
Proficient programing experience using Python, R or SAS with a focus on data wrangling and machine learning
Experienced in writing complex queries to extract and write data using SQL
Effectively communicate and present results of analysis using visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI or Qlikview
Experience integrating external data via APIs or web scraping
Preferred Experience and Abilities:
Master's Degree in a quantitative field (Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics)
Exposure to big data tools such as Spark, Scala or Hadoop
Understanding of cloud computing environments and tools (AWS/MS Azure)
Basic understanding of artificial intelligence models (neural networks, deep learning, Bayesian networks)
Understanding of Natural Language Processing (NLP) techniques
Understanding of Time Series analysis techniques
Requisition ID
2020-7576
","['scala', 'spark', 'power bi', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'sa', 'cloud']","['big data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'logist', 'dimensionality reduction', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'research', 'nlp', 'econom', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'econometr']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'sa', 'cloud', 'big data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'logist', 'dimensionality reduction', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'research', 'nlp', 'econom', 'nn', 'busi', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'econometr']"
DS,"Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise.
Perform data collection for Data Science operations including Machine Learning.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting, and other business outcomes.
Assess Model accuracy using common metrics (AUC, F1, etc.)
and explain the results to client stakeholders.
Your Expertise:
7+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
Cloud experience in a major platform, such as AWS, GCP, or Azure.
Experience using Data Science languages (R, Python) to manipulate data and draw insights.
Knowledge of a variety of Machine Learning and advanced analytical techniques and their real world advantages/drawbacks.
Familiarity with the following software/tools: Python, C, Java, Jupyter Notebooks, SQL, ML platforms (H2O, DataRobot), distributed data (Map/Reduce, Hadoop), and visualization (Tableau, qikview)
Must have a bachelors degree in related field.
Your X-Factor:
Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical thinker with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.
Why Were Proud To Be Mavens!
Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE, 2018
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work, 2017 & 2018
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year
Ready to Learn More?
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories
","['h2o', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'jupyt', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'gcp', 'java']","['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['h2o', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'jupyt', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'gcp', 'java', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"This is a unique opportunity where you will get a chance to work with an established and rapidly evolving platforms that handles millions of requests and massive amounts of events, and other data.
In this position, you will be responsible for taking on new initiatives to automate, enhance, maintain, and scale services in a rapidly-scaling environment.
This is a fast-paced role with high growth, visibility, impact, and where many of the decisions for new projects will be driven by you and your team from inception through production.
The details
The ideal candidate is a seasoned data scientist with diversified experiences across several industries, who's held various positions within analytics or engineering functions.
Since a major requirement for this role is to understand, author, and deploy production code, the ideal candidate should also be experienced with processing large quantities of data, building algorithms alongside software engineers, and foundationally rooted in applied statistics.
Responsibilities- What you get to do!
Perform as a Sr. Data Scientist by leading execution and technical planning within the organization and team, and mentoring other Data Scientists
Ideate and implement discoveries to build new product features and data products and improve existing methodologies and algorithms
Integrate within Product, Data, and Engineering teams to identify, investigate and deliver solutions related to product and back-end data issues
Lead and deliver complex projects involving heavy data and statistical modeling (e.g.
sampling, segmentation, classification, predictive modeling, etc.)
Regularly communicate outcomes, new initiatives and improvements, etc.
to stakeholders
Serve as a data science subject matter expert for both internal and external clients
BS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics, Physics, or other behavioral and/or equivalent quantitative science
5+ years of industry experience as a data scientist (or equivalent role)
Proficiency in Python and SQL
Highly autonomous, versatile, intellectually curious and resilient within a dynamic and fast-paced organization
Outstanding written and verbal data storytelling, demonstrated consulting skill and ability to tailor communication style and depth to a variety of audiences
Author technical proposals, presentations, reports, and articles and present research to internal stakeholders and various settings
Experience with defining key product metrics, setting team goals, and building internal tools to monitor progress against KPI's
Experience with applied statistics across various data types and sizes
Conduct and analyze complex survey/panel data including developing data files, conducting quality reviews, data editing, documentation, weighting, and imputation
Extra, Nice to haves
Masters/ PhD in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics, Physics or equivalent quantitative science
Experience with developing, deploying and maintaining back-end production code, including (but not limited to) applied ML frameworks and applications (e.g.
SciKit Learn, TensorFlow, etc.)
Proven track record of delivering solutions to a production environment
Solid understanding of SQL and transactional databases (e.g.
MySQL, Postgres, etc.
), and experience with building data models and/or improving warehouse architecture
Experience with understanding, analyzing and modeling user data and behavioral trends
Enthusiasm for identifying and pursuing new business and product opportunities; unleashing creativity especially in a team environment
Experience working with marketing insights, shopping data or in the retail industry
Ownership over data and environments in an industry leading product.
Market competitive total compensation package.
Volunteer time off and charitable donation matching.
Strong support for career growth, including mentorship programs, leadership training, access to conferences and employee resources groups.
Regular hackathons to build your own projects and Engineering Lunch and Learns.
Great benefits package including health/vision/dental, unlimited PTO, flexible schedule, 401K matching, travel reimbursement, and more.
Don't worry if you think that you don't meet all the qualifications here.
","['sql', 'mysql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'postgr']","['classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'scikit', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.
Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.
Primary Responsibilities:
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
3+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum.
Here's the idea.
For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter.
Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.
Job Keywords: Senior Data Scientist, Telecommute, Telecommuter
","['h2o', 'd3', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['h2o', 'd3', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This is a great opportunity for someone who is excited about transforming data into actionable insights to support the fight against the COVID-19 epidemic.
Essential Duties& Responsibilities
Transform data into actionable insights
Additional job duties assigned
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree in Mathematics, Biostatistics, Analytics, Statistics, Computer Science, Data Science, Public Health, Epidemiology, or Life Science
2+ years of experience in health-related data analysis
Experience with data visualization software (e.g., Tableau, PowerBI, Google Data Studio)
Additional Qualifications
Experience with AWS, GCP or Azure ML tooling
Experience with Docker
Experience building ETL pipelines
","['tableau', 'docker', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'azur', 'gcp']","['etl', 'data', 'biostatist', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['tableau', 'docker', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'azur', 'gcp', 'etl', 'data', 'biostatist', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"What you'll learn & achieve:Use advanced mathematical and statistical concepts and theories to collect and analyze data and construct solutions to complex business problems.
Identify what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes such as sensors, open data, and social media feeds.
Perform advanced statistical analysis on experimental or business data to identify, validate and quantify trends or patterns.
Design experiments, test hypotheses, and build models to explore complex business and safety science systems.
Construct advanced predictive models, algorithms and probability engines to support data analysis or product functions.
Write methodology, analysis and data insights for research papers, proposals and presentations.
Synthesize all aspects of a data science project to lead non-technical audiences through the goals, methods and implications of the project.
Leverage knowledge in machine learning, natural language processing, mathematical and statistical analyses, and technologies such as R, MongoDB, Elastic Search and open source analysis tools.
Work with business leaders and researchers to suggest other projects and initiatives that will advance the organizations goals.
*This position qualifies for Underwriters Laboratories Inc.'s employee referral policy program.What makes you a great fit:Master's degree in data science, predictive analytics, mathematics or statistics and 3 years of experience in data analytics or data science.Must have work experience with each of the following: 1.)
predictive modeling using machine learning including neural networks Bayesian, k-means and related algorithms; 2.)
implement natural language processing algorithms to detect patterns in large volumes of unstructured data using BERT, Spark, scikit learn, NLTK and SpaCy; 3.)
conduct mathematical and statistical analyses to uncover relationships between variables using R, multivariate, logistic and other regression methods; and 4.)
Citizenship is required for most positions.LocationUS-IL-NorthbrookJob ID2020-17946# of Openings1Job CategoryInformation Technology
","['nltk', 'spark', 'r', 'mongodb', 'spaci', 'scikit']","['probabl', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",2.0,"['nltk', 'spark', 'r', 'mongodb', 'spaci', 'scikit', 'probabl', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'nlp', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"Work in a collaborative environment with global teams to drive client engagements in a broad range of industries to design and build scalable AI and Machine Learning solutions to solve business problems and create value by leveraging client data
• Provide guidance on engagements to ensure successful delivery while balancing internal initiatives
• Provide engineering services for PoCs, pilots, production
• Lead projects in IoT architecture with data science
• Provide end-to-end prototype and transformation solutions.
Contribute to thought leadership and facilitate client relations across network of existing and potential clients.
• Participate in client discussions, interact with CxOs at client organization to articulate the value of data science approaches, different AI service offerings and guide them on implementation of the same.
• Quickly understand client needs, scope of work effort, assemble teams, manage delivery, and articulate findings to client executives
• Mentor, lead and develop junior staff, including performance appraisals and career pathing
• Review and analyze developed models for complete, robustness and meeting of client needs
• Assist in growing data science practice by meeting business goals through client prospecting, responding to proposals, identifying and closing opportunities within identified client accounts.
Qualifications:
• MS or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other closely related field
• Strong mathematics skill
• 5 years data science experience in an IoT environment
• 5 years as a Solutions Architect
• 6 years professional work experience as a data scientist or on advanced analytics / statistics projects with 5 years’ experience in one of the following sectors: Aerospace & Defense, Automotive, Banking, Consumer Products & Retail, Financial Services, Healthcare, High Tech, Industrial Products, Insurance, Life Sciences, Manufacturing, Public Sector, Telecom, Media & Entertainment, and Energy & Utilities.
• Application development cycle in an IoT environment, CI/CD pipeline
• Knowledge of the device connectivity protocols, WiFi, Bluetooth, MQTT, CoAP, Websockets, REST API, HMI, MWM and device security.
• Hands-on experience building mobile (iOS, Android) and WebUI applications using React, React Native
• Experience with at least one of the major cloud platforms: AWS, Azure, GCP
• Application of Graph data models and algorithms as well as graph databases such as Neo4j
• Excellent team-oriented and interpersonal skills, with a strong interest for consulting
• Outstanding communication skills with the ability to clearly articulate findings and present solutions to business partners
Preferred Qualifications:
• Experience with Deep Learning methods in NLP & Computer Vision, Sentiment analysis, topic modeling and graph theory and databases
• Experience with common data science tools such as Python, R, Pytorch, TensorFlow, Keras, NLTK, Spacy, or Neo4j, and a good understanding of modelling platforms (Azure AutoML, SageMaker, DataBricks, DataRobot and H2O.ai)
• Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems: Spark, Hadoop, MapReduce, Pig, Kafka
Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
Enterprise Architects define and ensure a comprehensive and coherent view across Business, Information, Systems and Technology.
They go beyond designing IT systems to deliver business change, which may also be supported and enabled by IT.
Enterprise Architects define services from a business perspective, both with and without automation.
They make an initial grouping of services in components, using principles based on objectives and constraints.
They have deep business and industry expertise, are familiar with industry standards, and can work at the boardroom and senior management level.
Required Skills and Experience:
You design and manage complete enterprise solutions.
You demonstrate leadership of topics in the architect community and show a passion for technology and business acumen.
You work as a stream lead at CIO/CTO level in a major client organization.
You are seen as a role model in the community.
• Qualification: 12 years of experience, Bachelor’s Degree.
• Certification: Has TOGAF 9 and has IAF level 1 and is seeking level 2.
• Should be master in Functional Architecture Design.
• Should have experience in Business Knowledge, Integration & Orchestration, Technical Solution Design, Risk & Quality Management.
• Should be proficient in Business Analysis & Software Engineering.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.
Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed.
Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.
People matter, results count.
","['mapreduc', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'spaci', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'gcp', 'kera', 'kafka', 'pig', 'r', 'cloud', 'sagemak', 'react', 'aw']","['risk', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'pipelin', 'econom', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'spaci', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'gcp', 'kera', 'kafka', 'pig', 'r', 'cloud', 'sagemak', 'react', 'aw', 'risk', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'pipelin', 'econom', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Need a Senior Python Data Scientist with experience in IOT analytics, Machine Learning libraries.
Resource will have experience using machine sensor telematics data.
Successful candidate will have
* Solid experience with Python and data science libraries such as NumPy, SciPy, scikit-learn
* Expertise in advanced machine learning libraries such as TensorFlow
* Experience applying machine learning for computer vision including deep learning methods
* Experience in computer vision using OpenCV, ROS is a highly desired
* Knowledge in embedded systems definite plus
Candidate Responsibilities
- Deliver product analytics solutions including job site analytics/simulation, computer vision for aftermarket and autonomy, and digital twin.
- Requirement sessions – Agile/scrum methodologies
Education Requirements: MS degree or PhD in Engineering.
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $50.00 per hour
Schedule:
Day shift
COVID-19 considerations:
Temporarily remote
Experience:
computer vision software: 2 years (Preferred)
advanced machine learning: 3 years (Required)
Python: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
7 - 11 months
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['tensorflow', 'scipi', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data']",2.0,"['tensorflow', 'scipi', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Position Overview
This position is a part of the Intelligent Automation (Cognitive Automation using Digital Virtual Assistants & Conversational AI ) Team.
The individual will perform and supervise as lead Virtual Assistant (VA) SME for Conversational design & Natural Language Processing/Understanding (NLP/NLU) design, development, testing, and continuous improvement.
This will include critically analyzing the design of conversation flows and training data along with technical code based on the business requirements and other risk factors, including recommendations to address data deficits for improved precision on intent classification of data.
The candidate should have strong business analysis background with conversation, language, grammar proficiency, and a strong level of English language comprehension.
The candidate should also have a desire to be involved in all aspects of the VA lifecycle: from blank canvas possibilities through concept prototyping to client discovery, implementation, and maturation.
Key Conversational AI Designer Responsibilities
• Foster user-centered design and research culture, values, and methodologies.
• Support multiple concurrent client projects and a small team of colleagues.
• Garner VA insights and opportunities through workshops, research, and interviews.
• Design business processes led by an understanding of end user wants and needs.
• Develop conversational copy by planning, writing and editing dialogue that creates a more human-like conversational experience.
• Train machine learning models that enable a Virtual Assistant to continuously improve in its understanding of and responses to natural language dialog.
• Review client chat logs, transcripts, recordings and research to improve implementations.
• Work towards continual process improvement and measurement/ benchmarking, with the goal of scaling solutions across business units.
• Uphold and evolve internal knowledge creation, content standards, and best practices.
• Be the “Go-To” person for Conversational Design advice, guidance, and assistance
Key NLP/NLU Designer & Analyst Responsibilities
• Develop an enterprise approach to intents/entities recognition including best practices for utterance-to-intents/entities design, mapping and learning.
• Drive improvements in quality, classification, information structure, and natural language understanding
• Provide in-depth NLP/NLU analysis and design for developing effective Machine Learning models
• Own the creation and governance of methods used to design and optimize models and advise on how to make measurable improvements.
• Work with business and MIS teams to create NLP training and test data: collect utterances, identify patterns & concepts.
• Stay current on advances within the industry in order to disseminate intent education to team members and partners
• Monitor & analyze chat history for continuous improvements
• Setup & enable MIS teams to conduct effective NLU regression testing
• Be the “Go-To” person for NLP/NLU advice, guidance, and assistance
Leads the implementation of analytical projects that leverage vast amounts of structured and unstructured data to extract actionable business insights.
Directs the data gathering, data processing and data mining of large and complex datasets.
Leads the development of algorithms using advanced mathematical and statistical techniques like machine learning to predict business outcomes and recommend optimal actions to management.
Leads analytical experiments in a methodical manner to find opportunities for product and process optimization.
Presents business insights to management using visualization technologies and data storytelling.
Partners with Data Architects, Data Analysts, Data Engineers and Visualization Experts to develop data-driven solutions for the business.
Customer Focused - Knowledgeable of the values and practices that align customer needs and satisfaction as primary considerations in all business decisions and able to leverage that information in creating customized customer solutions.
Competencies
Data Architecture – Knowledge and ability to create models and standards to govern which data is collected, and how it is stored, arranged, integrated, and put to use in data systems and in organizations.Data Mining – Knowledge of tools, techniques and practices in data mining technologies used to acquire essential business information.Disruptive Innovation – Knowledge of concepts, principles, and approaches of disruptive innovation; ability to adopt the knowledge into related processes and practices.Information Capture – Knowledge of the processes and the ability to identify, capture and document relevant business information in an auditable, organized, understandable and easily retrievable manner.Machine Learning – Knowledge of principles, technologies and algorithms of machine learning; ability to develop, implement and deliver related systems, products and services.Modeling: Data, Process, Events, Objects – Knowledge of and the ability to use tools and techniques for analyzing and documenting logical relationships among data, processes or events.Prototyping – Knowledge of and ability to implement prototyping disciplines, tools and techniques in evolutionary models within the target environment.Query and Database Access Tools – Knowledge of and the ability to use, support and access facilities for extracting and formatting a database management system.
Work Experience
Roles at this level typically require a university / college degree, with 5+ years of industry-relevant experience.
Specific certifications are often required.
In lieu of a degree, a comparable combination of education and experience (including military service) may be considered.
Education
Masters
Disability Accommodations Statement:
The Human Resources Service Center hours of operation are Monday - Friday 9:00 AM to 5:00 PM ET.
Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO):
California Residents
",[None],"['risk', 'regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['risk', 'regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'nlp', 'end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 6+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Lead Data Scientist works on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial.
Responsibilities
The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
This role advises key executives to develop functional strategies (often segment specific) on matters of significance.
Exercises independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks, and works under minimal supervision, Uses independent judgment requiring analysis of variable factors and determining the best course of action.
+ Collaborate with key business leaders to understand business problems and formulate analytical solutions for problem solving as well as lead or collaborate with a team of data scientists, data analysts or big data engineers on analytical projects, proving benefits of solutions and helping with execution and measurement
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Act as an external facing business translator whose combined expertise in AI/ML and analytics will enable the incorporation of these practices to drive data driven decision in practice
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Deep dives across member populations to determine opportunities for improved timing or type of intervention
+ Advanced predictive analytics to help optimize the touchpoint patterns following these deepdives
+ Serve as a key participant of a cross-functional, collaborative team focused on develop consumer-centric strategies that drive value to the member and the business
Required Qualifications
+ PhD + 2 years' experience, Master's Degree + 4 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 6 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program.
+ 2+ years' experience in project, process or people leadership
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Successful demonstrated experience in working on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial
+ Advanced programming experience in Python, R, or SAS
+ Experience in creating analysis, projections, models, and presentations to support business
+ Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
+ Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks
+ Ability to works under minimal supervision, using independent judgment
+ Ability to communicate statistical & complex concepts in a simplified manner
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
+ NLP Experience
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
","['r', 'sa', 'python']","['segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'sa', 'python', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Requirements/Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in quantitative fields (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
Deep understanding of predictive modeling, machine-learning, clustering and classification techniques, and algorithms
Python, Pandas, Numpy, Matplotib Scikit coding skills
Fluency in a programming language (Python, C,C++,R Spark, SQL)
Good understanding of the Cloud (AWS/GCP/Azure) environments
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Job Type: Full-time
Experience:
Machine Learning: 3 years (Required)
Cloud environment: 2 years (Preferred)
Python: 3 years (Required)
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'gcp', 'r', 'c', 'panda', 'python', 'azur', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'cluster', 'predict', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'gcp', 'r', 'c', 'panda', 'python', 'azur', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'cluster', 'predict', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Hi,
If interested share profiles asap
Title: Data Scientist - Sr. Analyst
Duration:6Months
(only GC/GC EAD/C)
The Data Scientist – Sr. Analyst will work on the SRG product recommendation engine for their eCommerce site.
This person will be required to have good communication, the ability to understand business problems and use cases and have three or more years of relevant experience
Skills
Mandatory Technical Skills: R, Python, machine learning algorithms, Hadoop
Nice to have technical skills: Scala, Spark
Duties
","['scala', 'spark', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c']","['machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"You will be responsible for providing advanced analytic insight and thought leadership to support the needs of senior executives and their teams.
You will support the ongoing development and maintenance of a data warehouse of relevant internal and external data "" from customer and transaction data to macroeconomic factors.
Additionally, you will take part in providing indirect leadership and ongoing coaching and development to more junior members of the Data Analytics team.
Each day will be unique, requiring an ability to think strategically and on your feet, be creative, take initiative, and employ a diverse set of skills.WHO YOU ARE
Knowledgeable, Analytical, and Solution-Oriented.
Without a doubt, you(TM)ve got strong quantitative skills and are comfortable analyzing large data set, spotting trends and patterns, and synthesizing relevant observations.
You use a hypothesis-driven approach to engage in analysis that will deliver on your client questions.
You like thinking outside the box to come up with innovative points of view on new challenges, relying on your previous analytic work and experience to help guide you along the way.
Results-Oriented.
You demonstrate an inherent sense of urgency to drive great results, while being precise in executing your work.
You are facile with creating and communicating a clear project plan, tracking progress, and keeping your business partners in the loop along the way.
Intellectually Curious.
You're inherently interested in the ""why"" so that you can identify opportunities that represent unconventional solutions to the problems you are trying to solve.
Strong Communicator.
Your writing and speaking skills are concise, articulate, and effective, providing an ability to interact with all levels/various teams across the organization, be understood, and develop trust and rapport within the organization.
Technologically Savvy.
Microsoft Excel is a basic tool to you that you know like the back of your hand.
You also have a strong skill set in R, Python, ArcGIS, machine learning, neural networks and/or other advanced analytics tools and techniques.
A Trusted Team Player.
You enjoy partnering with others and build constructive working relationships that foster the collaboration necessary to deliver great results.
You are accountable to your teammates and follow through on commitments.
Organized and Confident.
You are flexible, composed, and able to prioritize multiple tasks and deadlines simultaneously, while confidently interacting with a variety of individuals, across all levels of the organization.
You handle pressure well and do so with confidence.
WHAT YOU(TM)LL DO
Utilize a hypothesis-driven approach, as well as both quantitative and qualitative primary research methods, to engage in analysis and develop soundly reasoned conclusions that identify or explain demographic, social and other trends, underlying needs, and preferences of existing and potential residents, and any other forces impacting the business.
Critically evaluate research questions by formulating hypotheses and work plans (data sources, timing, resources, collaborators, output etc.)
Prepare narratives, briefs, and more formal reports that concisely communicate relevant findings and conclusions in a timely manner, while providing transparency into the methods used.
Perform critical self-reviews of work with exceptional attention to detail (content, logic and presentation/communication quality) before delivering completed research.
Establish and maintain regular, responsive, and timely communications with internal business partners to meet the internal long-range research/consulting objectives and respond to all internal data analytics needs and requests.
Prepare presentations, narratives, and briefs that communicate relevant ndings and conclusions concisely, with limited jargon, and in a timely manner.
Assist with the design testing, and execution of strategic pilots to measure and verify the validity of the analysis and subsequent recommendations.
Develop and maintain relationships with appropriate third party market research providers and constantly evaluate quality to recommend changes where appropriate.
Help to build, document, and maintain best practices, including but not limited to codebase management, work and issue tracking, testing and quality control/assurance measures, data dictionaries, and a documentation hub for both production level code and ad hoc analyses.
As assigned, participates in planning and design of non-analytics strategic initiatives to ensure useful information capture is included in execution plans.
Informally lead/coach more junior members of the Data Analytics team.
PREVIOUS EXPERIENCE & REQUIREMENTS
Advanced degree required: Masters degree with 2-3 years experience or PhD 1+ years of experience.
The degree should be in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Machine Learning, or a related data centric field or equivalent experience is required.
Deep technical and data science expertise, including experience in the following:
Analytical methods: Statistical modeling, supervised and unsupervised machine learning, natural language processing, deep learning, optimization techniques, etc.
Analytics tools: Experience with SQL, Python and/or R, data processing (Spark, Hadoop/Hive, etc.
), machine learning libraries (scikit-learn, caret, etc.
), GIS tools, data visualization (Tableau, PowerBI, various web app frameworks)
Experience building in-production models, including associated scripting, error handling and documentation.
Industry experience in real estate, retail, transportation is a plus, as well as geospatial analytics and/or consulting.
Solid understanding of economic, financial, and general business concepts and terminology is required.
Strong people skills with both a client and team-orientation.
Demonstrated strong communication skills, both written and verbal, as well as listening.
Must have experience probing for needs, providing an intellectual counterparty (e.g.
devil(TM)s advocate, challenge status quo, etc.)
in a constructive manner, and communicating technical content in a concise and easy to understand way.
Must also be articulate and have experience in presenting information and findings.
Excellent problem-solving and quantitative skills, including the ability to disaggregate issues, identify root causes, and recommend plausible solutions.
Ability to utilize, create, and analyze GIS and other location-based data and analysis, a plus.
Tolerance for ambiguity required.
Must be available for overnight travel (approximately 10%)
","['hive', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'caret']","['hypothesi', 'analyz', 'account', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'geospati', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'gi']",2.0,"['hive', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'caret', 'hypothesi', 'analyz', 'account', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'geospati', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'gi']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Chicago, Illinois, United States
The individual must be self-directed and comfortable working with cross functional teams.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop, improve and test companys models to optimize lending decisions by using advanced statistical modeling and simulation techniques
Support implementation of the models working closely with software engineering team
Research, test and operationalize new analytics techniques and data sources to improve portfolio performance
Conduct ad hoc analysis using advanced data mining tools to support risk management, operations and marketing strategies
Assist with development of technical tools and platforms to standardize and streamline model development and monitoring processes
Work with cross-functional teams to explore new ways of finding insights from data and provide recommendations.
REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's, Master's or PhD in math, statistics, computer science, engineering or related field
5+ years of experience with data analytics and statistical modeling
Advanced programming skills in Python
Experience building machine learning models
Experience working with relational databases, such as SQL
Experience working within an open source environment
Strong quantitative and problem-solving skills with key attention to detail
Strong project management and organizational skills and the ability to work independently in a fast-paced, quickly changing environment
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
Experience working with specialty finance or FinTech is a plus
Start-up experience is a plus
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the U.S. on a full-time basis
BENEFITS
Competitive salary and benefits package, including material equity grant
Casual dress policy
Fun, fast-paced work environment
Dynamic start-up culture
Convenient downtown Chicago office located in the heart of the city
Equal opportunity employer
","['sql', 'python']","['risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Job title: Senior Data Scientist
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary:
Negotiable
Job published: 2020-01-15
Job ID: 41634
You will not be required to have any prior knowledge of the financial markets for this role.
Responsibilities:
Converting human pattern recognition and decision-making processes into automated aspects of the trading workflow.
Finding innovative solutions to known problems that will support and expand the core business.
Defining best practices within the analytics team regarding prototyping and scaling solutions.
Assisting software developers in translating research results to production.
Mentoring junior researchers on the analytics and trading teams.
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in either machine learning, deep learning, stats, compute science/engineering, with at least 2 of those years focused on machine learning or deep learning.
A demonstrated track record of applying ML techniques to real-world problems.
Extensive knowledge of statistical modeling.
An interest in staying up-to-date with recent advances in machine learning.
The ability to collaborate with subject matter experts in defining appropriate features and metrics for a given model.
The confidence to take the lead on a project, work through the practical business decisions involved, and carry it to completion in a timely manner.
Comfort implementing new models from papers.
Experience working with large, noisy, or incomplete data sets.
Expertise in Python (Pytorch and Tensorflow preferred) and SQL.
Education:
Degree in machine learning, statistics, mathematics, computer science, or other quantitative disciplines
If you would like to be considered for the position of Senior Data Scientist or wish to discuss the role further then please leave your details below.
","['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'sql', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'sql', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"This is Temp to Hire position.
Responsibilities: Use analytical and statistical tools to evaluate data and aid in decision making.
Manipulate / create social media analytics and data to strengthen marketing campaign effectiveness
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Work with clients to prioritize research and modeling initiatives
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Support the development of a mature analytics function informed by industry best practices
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented, and collaborative environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.
Qualifications: DoD Secret clearance required
Degree (Masters required) in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, computer science, economics, or other related business or technical discipline is required
At least 5+ years of experience in the field
Extensive experience in social media analytics and marketing campaign effectiveness.
Experience in Salesforce, Sprinklr, and Adobe Analytics - marketing analytics background
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Significant experience in the AI/ML lifecycle, from ideation and solution concept development, to rapid prototyping and validation in operational environments, and importantly, in the sustainment of AI/ML solutions for CI/CD.
Significant experience and knowledge of best practices in the practical application and execution of AI/ML in operational environments.
Ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions, and translate customer qualitative requirements into quantitative and technical approaches
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards using platforms such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Pass all necessary background checks Preferred experience in the following areas: o DoD experience is preferred, in particular with human capital data and workforce analytics.
o Data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics o Knowledge of AI/ML SaaS platforms (e.g., DataRobot, H2O DriverlessAI) o Unstructured text and natural language processing o Computational tools such as R, Python, SAS, SQL, and MATLAB o Anaconda, IBM Blue, and Oracle Big Data to analyze large data sets and develop automated analytics in making sense of data affecting DoD operations o Developing machine learning, data mining, statistical network, natural language processing, text analytics, and graph-based algorithms to analyze massive data sets o Supervising algorithm implementation in on-premise and cloud-based computing environments o Developing software to generate reports and visualizations that summarize data sets and provide data-driven insights o Developing and implementing statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics as well as to develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
","['h2o', 'power bi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'bi', 'qlik', 'cloud', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['h2o', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'cloud', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'nlp', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"JOB BRIEF
The Decision Sciences team sits within Enterprise Business Analytics Center of Excellence to support the advanced analytics and modeling needs for sales, marketing, finance, digital, financial wellness and operations of Key Bank’s consumer bank.
The Senior Data Scientist will lead the development, validation, documentation, execution and measurement of complex and high-impact statistical and machine learning models, leveraging cutting edge quantitative and computational techniques and technologies.
The ideal candidate should be able to work effectively with internal clients to better understand their business needs, dissect complex problems, propose appropriate quantitative solutions, analyze the needs and behaviors of present and prospective customers, and develop data-driven solutions to improve customer experience and achieve business objectives.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS
Translate business partner’s needs into advanced analytics projects and prioritize projects based on expected tactical and/or strategic business impact to quickly achieve goals
Generate deep insights through the analysis of data and understanding of business processes and turn them into actionable recommendations
Perform advanced quantitative and statistical analysis and machine learning of large datasets to identify trends, patterns, and correlations that can be used to support client centric initiatives at various stages of customer lifecycle including acquisition, activation, utilization, relationship deepening and retention
Know what type of algorithm to use and how to implement them
Build and deploy prototype solutions to demonstrate ideas and prove concepts
Proactively seek, build and consolidate new data inputs to improve model performance
Perform model validation and documentation of newly-developed predictive models to ensure they follow good modeling practices and are in compliance with Model Governance Policy, Guidelines and OCC requirements
Conducting annual model validations to ensure models are working as intended and the existing validation activities are sufficient
Develop presentations to summarize and communicate key messages to senior management sponsors and other stakeholders
Become subject matter expert and trusted advisor in advanced analytics and modeling
Collaborate with others in the organization to develop new ideas and brain storm potential solutions
Mentor junior team members when needed
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Solid quantitative/programming backgronud with a graduate degree (Phd or Master) in quantitative fields such as Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, Finance, Computer Science, or Operations Research
5+ years hands on experience developing and applying statistical/predictive methods using large data sets
Hands on experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence
Excellent quantitative, analytical and problem solving skills.
Solid Knowledge of statistical analysis (regression, decision trees, clustering, experimental design etc.)
as well as machine learning algorithms to solve real world problems
Ability to write code and develop production-ready analytical applications
Significant experience working with large scale structured and unstructured data
Intellectual curiosity, inquisitive nature and desire to deepen knowledge
Extensive experience in Python, R, SAS, SQL, BigSQL, etc.
Working knowledge of Spark, PySpark, SparkSQL, MLlib
Experience in working in cloud environment preferred
Strong written and oral communication skills, proven ability to convey the results of complex analyses in a clear and concise manner using business language.
Good project management skills (clear goal setting, well-organized, detailed planning, and ability for tight-timeline deliverables)
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Consultative experience is a plus
Retail and Financial services industry experience preferred
Able to translate ambiguous business problems into a conceptual mathematical framework
Effective communication and presentation skills
Can work both independently and collaboratively
FLSA STATUS:Exempt
KeyCorp is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer committed to engaging a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.
42339BR
","['spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'mllib', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'correl', 'data', 'experimental design', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'mllib', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'cloud', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'correl', 'data', 'experimental design', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Todays unprecedented global supply chain upheavals underscore how important the transportation industry is.
The challenges in this industry are big and exciting!
Each member of the team can make a tremendous impact both technically and culturally.
About the Role
The transportation industry has no shortage of complex problems requiring creative, data-intensive solutions in order to effectively and efficiently automate operations at scale.
In this role, you will be expected to work autonomously and contribute to several high impact projects including Masterys advanced matching and tour management engines.
Responsibilities
Build model-based optimization, simulation, and/or predictive tools to enable Masterys customers to efficiently match freight at scale
Closely collaborate with fellow Engineers and Product Managers and interact with stakeholders across the organization
Write clean, maintainable, and well-tested code
Help build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Requirements
3+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist or graduate degree in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, or Transporation Engineering plus 1 year of industry experience
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Expertise in the use of commercial solvers (e.g.
CPLEX, Gurobi, XPRESS) and working knowledge of open-source solvers (e.g.
PuLP, Google OR Tools)
Adept at interacting with technical and non-technical audiences
Practical experience implementing optimization models and tools
Strong sense of responsibility with a bias towards action
Comfortable self-directing and prioritizing your own work
Experience working with cloud-based infrastructure
Proficiency in Python
Deep understanding of LP, MIP, QP and stochastic optimization methods, preferred
Experience working with ML models in production environments, preferred
Experience leading technical projects, preferred
Benefits
Legal, AD&D, Additional Life and other employee assistance benefits.
","['excel', 'cloud', 'python']","['data', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'python', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'commun']"
DS,"No hierarchies.
No siloes.
No egos.
That takes the right team.
And that’s where you come in.
Ready for the next step on your career journey?
Responsibilities:
Client Delivery
Oversee advanced analytics work and architect predictive models for clients in a variety of industries, I.e.
Healthcare, Retail, Financial Services, Manufacturing, Energy & Utilities, etc.
Act as a thought leader and engage with client analytics SMEs to collaborate in the build and deployment of deep data solutions
Oversee multiple concurrent analytics engagements, including leading junior consultants and communicating/reporting project status to key client stakeholders (budget, risks, issues, etc.)
Make key decisions regarding the direction of your projects including tools, approach, and methodology
Define responsibilities, work tasks, and targets for each consultant according to the technical work plan
Assess stakeholder interests and plan and execute strategies to address their needs while quickly responding to client requests for immediate issues and driving projects to completion
Practice Development
Engage in developing and marketing analytics platforms-as-a-service solutions, repeatable models, and other data science offerings
Complete case studies for all engagements and document for future use
Develop more junior data science consultants who will be working under your guidance to deliver on client work
Attract top tier talent (MS/PhD programs, competing firms, etc.)
Business Development (Desired)
Understand client business needs and requirements and help turn those goals into concrete projects and detailed proposals
Create work plans, pricing estimates, and risk assessments for prospective analytics projects
Actively build a professional and affiliate network in the local and greater data science communities
Qualifications:
MS or bachelor’s degree in related Mathematics, Computer Science/Engineering, Statistics, Econometrics, etc.
or equivalent experience required
9-11+ years of experience in data analysis, architecture, or science capacity; 5+ years of experience working in a data science capacity, or managing/coaching one or more data scientists
Technology/Management Consulting experience preferred, not required
Proficient understanding of AI/ML concepts, and other contemporary data science logic; proven experience with advanced analytics and/or data mining tools
Confident in the application of AI, ML, and/or NLP solutions to solve complex business problems across a variety of industries
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Skilled in programming languages like Python, R, Java, SQL, Scala, etc.
Familiarity with relational databases like SQL Server, as well as BI/data visualization tools such as Power BI, Tableau, and/or QlikView
Confident project management ability including leading consultants, requirements analysis, scheduling, providing scope, mitigating issues, risk management, change management, and strategic planning & analysis
Comfortable leading concurrent consulting projects at a high level, often ~2-4 engagements simultaneously
Strong communication skills to be able to work with clients and present to C-level executives
Bonus technologies:
NoSQL – HBase, Cassandra, Accumulo, Mongo, Neo4j, etc.
Big Data – Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, PIG, Mahout, etc.
Cloud/Data – Azure, AWS, Azure ML, Amazon ML, AWS DeepLens, AWS EMR, etc.
Ability to travel roughly ~50%
Ready to get started?
Senior Data Scientist
222 W Adams St, 11th Floor
Chicago, Illinois, 60606
United States
No hierarchies.
No siloes.
No egos.
That takes the right team.
And that’s where you come in.
Ready for the next step on your career journey?
Responsibilities:
Client Delivery
Oversee advanced analytics work and architect predictive models for clients in a variety of industries, I.e.
Healthcare, Retail, Financial Services, Manufacturing, Energy & Utilities, etc.
Act as a thought leader and engage with client analytics SMEs to collaborate in the build and deployment of deep data solutions
Oversee multiple concurrent analytics engagements, including leading junior consultants and communicating/reporting project status to key client stakeholders (budget, risks, issues, etc.)
Make key decisions regarding the direction of your projects including tools, approach, and methodology
Define responsibilities, work tasks, and targets for each consultant according to the technical work plan
Assess stakeholder interests and plan and execute strategies to address their needs while quickly responding to client requests for immediate issues and driving projects to completion
Practice Development
Engage in developing and marketing analytics platforms-as-a-service solutions, repeatable models, and other data science offerings
Complete case studies for all engagements and document for future use
Develop more junior data science consultants who will be working under your guidance to deliver on client work
Attract top tier talent (MS/PhD programs, competing firms, etc.)
Business Development (Desired)
Understand client business needs and requirements and help turn those goals into concrete projects and detailed proposals
Create work plans, pricing estimates, and risk assessments for prospective analytics projects
Actively build a professional and affiliate network in the local and greater data science communities
Qualifications:
MS or bachelor’s degree in related Mathematics, Computer Science/Engineering, Statistics, Econometrics, etc.
or equivalent experience required
9-11+ years of experience in data analysis, architecture, or science capacity; 5+ years of experience working in a data science capacity, or managing/coaching one or more data scientists
Technology/Management Consulting experience preferred, not required
Proficient understanding of AI/ML concepts, and other contemporary data science logic; proven experience with advanced analytics and/or data mining tools
Confident in the application of AI, ML, and/or NLP solutions to solve complex business problems across a variety of industries
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Skilled in programming languages like Python, R, Java, SQL, Scala, etc.
Familiarity with relational databases like SQL Server, as well as BI/data visualization tools such as Power BI, Tableau, and/or QlikView
Confident project management ability including leading consultants, requirements analysis, scheduling, providing scope, mitigating issues, risk management, change management, and strategic planning & analysis
Comfortable leading concurrent consulting projects at a high level, often ~2-4 engagements simultaneously
Strong communication skills to be able to work with clients and present to C-level executives
Bonus technologies:
NoSQL – HBase, Cassandra, Accumulo, Mongo, Neo4j, etc.
Big Data – Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, PIG, Mahout, etc.
Cloud/Data – Azure, AWS, Azure ML, Amazon ML, AWS DeepLens, AWS EMR, etc.
Ability to travel roughly ~50%
Ready to get started?
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'mahout', 'python', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'java', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'power bi', 'r', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'bi', 'aw']","['risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'predict', 'econometr', 'neural network', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'mahout', 'python', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'java', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'powerbi', 'r', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'aw', 'risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'predict', 'econometr', 'nn', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"You'll be part of a fiercely collaborative technology team charged with creating digital solutions that are transforming the way employers and job seekers connect.
Developing next-generation applications and products for some of the most recognized brands in the world.
All this in an environment that constantly challenges you to push beyond boundaries and enhance your expertisewith the support of a global team of industry experts.
Sound like a fit for your talent and passion?
Read on.
What does a Sr. Data Scientist do?
Building machine learning models to optimize campaign performance at massive scale
Identifying, creating, and transforming informative features based on historical and real time data
Leading the technical direction of the Data Science team, in parallel with the VP, Product
Working with Product to define data collection and modeling frameworks
Coordinating and working closely with engineering to put models and algorithms into production
Working collaboratively with other Data Science teams in cross product efforts
Deep understanding of statistical and machine learning models (logistic regression, decision trees, SVMs, etc.)
and clustering and classification techniques
Proven experience building models and placing models into production
Experience in optimization problems, and solving those problems at scale
Well versed in statistical programming languages such as R, Python
Familiarity with relational databases such as Postgres and Amazon Redshift, and accessing data via SQL
Degree in a technical field such as computer science, artificial intelligence, engineering
Graduate work in machine learning a plus, or relevant work experience
Experience in Ad Tech data science principles a huge plus
Data driven leader, ready to provide technical direction to a team from Day 1
Knows and loves the startup world - quick thinking and acting with minimal/no supervision
Self-driven, independent, creative and eager to learn new skills
Ability to work effectively with incomplete information
Great communication skills
Embraces the remote nature of the future of work
","['redshift', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'postgr']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'logist', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'optim', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['redshift', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'logist', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'optim', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Passionate about precision medicine and advancing the healthcare industry?Recent advancements in underlying technology have finally made it possible for AI to impact clinical care in a meaningful way.
This position requires experience with both clinical and research data workflows.
Your work will be part of the foundation of the next layer of research questions: you will be responsible for implementing and/or developing bioinformatics tools to address biological questions that query cancer datasets, and for communicating results and scientific findings on a regular basis, using appropriate communication and visualization tools commonly used in biological research.Requirements:* Advanced degree (Masters or PhD) in biostatistics, bioinformatics, immunology, computational biology, statistics, computer science, or related field, or 5+ years experience working with genomic and clinical data in cancer* Demonstrated expertise and/or peer-reviewed contributions to statistical modeling, data mining and/or machine learning* Fluency in R or python and/or other programming languages* 5+ years experience working with clinical cancer data (progression free vs overall survival, clinical trial design, data imputation and managing missing variable bias, etc)* Excellent project management skills: defining research questions, writing scientific roadmaps, tracking progress against those roadmaps, aligning scientific results with business outcomes* Demonstrated ability to communicate technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders* Collaborative mindset, an eagerness to learn and a high integrity work ethic* Experience managing and mentoring direct reports and cross-functional teamsNice-to-have:* Familiarity with standard bioinformatics pipelines* Familiarity with the oncology pharmaceutical landscape* Experience doing inferential statistics on observational data* Experience putting data science workflows into production* Experience with version control, software testing, AWS technical stack* External outreach or education (consulting, giving talks, teaching, open source contributions)
","['aw', 'r', 'excel', 'python']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'pipelin', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['aw', 'r', 'excel', 'python', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'pipelin', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Manages and is responsible for the successful delivery of the algorithms, statistical models, and reporting tools to meet business needs.
• Develops complex algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes.
• Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve multiple and complex business problems.
Utilizing advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses and specialized expertise in the organization and/or industry.
• Applies analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced statistical techniques.
• Manages large and complex analytical projects from data exploration, model building, performance evaluation and testing.
• Behaves as mentor to junior team members to provide technical advice.
• Collaborates with business partners to develop technical /business approaches and new or enhanced technical tools.
• Interacts with internal and external peers and management to share highly complex information related to areas of expertise and/or to gain acceptance of new or enhanced technology / business solutions.
Required Qualifications
• 7-10 years of progressively complex related experience.
• Demonstrates proficiency in all areas of mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling and advanced in-depth specialization in some areas.
• Deep knowledge of advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.
Demonstrates strong ability to communicate technical concepts and implications to business partners.
• Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.
• Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.
Preferred Qualifications
• Experience with programs and interventions that drive medication adherence
• Experience conducting data analysis in a healthcare setting
• Experience with campaign design and implementation
• Experience applying behavioral economic concepts to drive behavior change
Education
A graduate degree preferred.
Business Overview
If technical issues are preventing you from applying to a position, contact Kenexa Helpdesk at 1-855-338-5609 or cvshealthsupport@us.ibm.com.
For technical issues with the Virtual Job Tryout, contact the Modern Hire Help Desk at 1-877-451-1695 or cvs_support@modernhire.com.
",['excel'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['excel', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Key job functions include, but are not limited to, the following:
Select several potential appropriate modeling approaches for a given analytic problem (machine learning methods such as ensemble models, decision trees; operations research; statistical modeling such as multivariate techniques).
Efficiently implement the models in a variety of modeling tools, achieving highly accurate models.
Collaborate with analytic, data engineering, business and clinical partners to deploy advanced analytic solutions into the operational environments.
Develop sound analytic plans based on available data sources, business partner needs, and required timelines.
Manage deliverables across multiple projects in a deadline-driven environment and project related to a wide variety of business settings and clinical needs.
Present analytic findings in a variety of formats (reports, PPT, graphs, figures and tables), formulating recommendations, and effectively presenting the results to non-analytic audiences.
Required Qualifications
A minimum of 7 years of professional post-graduate experience in constructing, validating, and executing modeling and optimization solutions.
Experience in translating business problems across disciplines into advanced analytic projects with measurable business value.
Experience with theoretical modeling approaches and matching analytic modeling approaches to a wide range of business applications
Fluent and recent hands-on experiences in R, Python, SAS, etc.
Experience with computer development languages (Java, C++).
Experience deploying capabilities across a wide range of business disciplines.
Demonstrated effective project management and time management skills.
A strong curiosity to explore and uncover hidden relationships in data, and a proactive desire to translate findings into actionable business insights.
Familiarity with navigating in both a relational (Teradata-based) and non-relational (Hadoop) environment.
Preferred Qualifications
Practical experience developing large-scale decision support tools based on optimization technology (e.g., Linear Programming (LP), Mixed Integer Programming (MIP), Non-Linear Programming (NLP), etc.)
Experience working with administrative claims data
Analytic experience in the healthcare administration industry
Education
PhD in Operation Research, Transportation Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, or directly related field.
Will also consider candidates with a Masters degree in these fields, plus 10+ years of relevant post graduate professional paid work experience with an outstanding track record of developing and deploying advanced quantitative analytics to support business objectives.
Business Overview
If technical issues are preventing you from applying to a position, contact Kenexa Helpdesk at 1-855-338-5609 or cvshealthsupport@us.ibm.com.
For technical issues with the Virtual Job Tryout, contact the Modern Hire Help Desk at 1-877-451-1695 or cvs_support@modernhire.com.
","['r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa', 'java']","['decision tree', 'data', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa', 'java', 'decision tree', 'data', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"If you are passionate about making a difference in the work you do, being recognized for your talent and expertise in solving complex and challenging analytical/data problems while contributing to the success of key strategic initiatives, consider growing your career with a Fortune 10 healthcare leader!
As a member of the Enterprise Analytics organization you will be responsible for the leadership and coordination of critical cross-functional analytic initiatives aimed at driving best-in-class analytic solutions to improve medication adherence.
The essential roles and responsibilities of the role are:
Collaborating with key internal and external stakeholders to gather and analyze needs and requirements to design and implement robust analytic solutions to support the identified needs;
Developing and executing strategic plans to use advanced analytics in conjunction with patient interventions to improve medication adherence outcomes;
Leveraging pharmacy and medical claims data as well as identifying and utilizing other data sources (EMR, lab results, clinical data and notes, consumer purchasing data, digital engagement data, etc.)
to provide actionable, relevant, and timely analytic insight;
Accessing, manipulating, analyzing, and visualizing data from large databases using a variety of tools and techniques, such SQL, Python, R, SAS, and/or Tableau;
Conducting analyses of the data, ranging from descriptive data exploration to advanced statistical modeling;
Designing experiments to perform A/B testing and establishing specifications to develop an automated system of measurement;
Assessing existing available data, identifying data gaps, and collaborating with the data strategy team, IT, business partners, and outside vendors to develop approaches to closing the data gaps;
Collaborating with business and analytic resources across multiple teams in a matrix organization to accomplish project goals;
Constructing persuasive presentations and gaining consensus among a diverse group of individuals;
Constructing and delivering written reports of the analytic findings in a variety of formats (reports, PPT, including visualization of data and findings), formulating recommendations, and effectively presenting the results to potential non-analytic audiences;
Communicating complex technical subjects to technical and non-technical audiences.
Required Qualifications
Problem solving skills and experience constructing analytic solutions to business problems;
Developing innovative analytic approaches leveraging available internal and external data sources;
Experience interacting with and influencing decision-making by business audiences;
Ability to quickly develop knowledge and understanding of new domains and underlying data sources;
Solid understanding and hands-on experience working with large data sources, particularly pharmacy or medical claims and clinical program data, focusing on efficient data extraction from large databases, data manipulation, and insight generation;
Solid understanding and hands-on experience with SAS, SQL, Python, R, Tableau and/or other data, statistical, and data visualization tools and techniques, and ability to investigate and adapt emerging analytic tools and solutions into the analytic standard operating procedures;
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including conveying analytic concepts and findings to executive and non-technical audiences with the goal of obtaining feedback and defining next steps to make the analytic insights actionable.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience working with business partners in product, IT, and marketing
Experience with campaign design and consumer market research, such as survey design, implementing large-scale campaigns, and performing A/B testing;
Experience applying behavioral economic concepts to drive behavior change;
Developing roadmaps, business cases, and project plans;
Managing projects and processes, including coordinating activates across diverse departments and ensuring that contributions across different teams are aligned and integrated as part of overall delivery;
Experience developing methodology to measure program and intervention outcomes;
Experience with programs and interventions that drive medication adherence;
Experience conducting data analysis in a healthcare setting;
Working knowledge of healthcare industry products/services and operations
Education
PhD in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Economics, Biophysics or directly related fields.
Will also consider candidates with a Masters degree in these fields, plus 2+ years of relevant post graduate professional paid work experience with an outstanding track record of developing and deploying advanced quantitative analytics to support business objectives.
Business Overview
If technical issues are preventing you from applying to a position, contact Kenexa Helpdesk at 1-855-338-5609 or cvshealthsupport@us.ibm.com.
For technical issues with the Virtual Job Tryout, contact the Modern Hire Help Desk at 1-877-451-1695 or cvs_support@modernhire.com.
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['data', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Chicago Data Scientist
As part of the AI & Analytics group, you will work in a collaborative environment with internal and client resources to understand key business goals, build solutions, and present findings to client executives while solving real-world problems.
Role & Responsibilities:
Work in a collaborative environment with global teams to drive client engagements in a broad range of industries to design and build scalable AI and Machine Learning solutions to solve business problems and create value by leveraging client data
Work with team to quickly understand client needs, develop solutions, and collaboratively present findings to client executives
Collaborate with team to provide data-driven recommendations and solutions to clients by clearly articulating complex technical concepts through generation and delivery of presentations
Analyze and model both structured and unstructured data to generate value
Use industry expertise and data science experience to uncover new opportunities with clients’ data
Perform EDA and feature engineering to both inform the development of statistical models and generate improve model performance and flexibility
Candidates should be flexible / willing to work across this delivery landscape which includes and not limited to Agile Applications Development, Support and Deployment.
(Includes Data Modeler, Data Miner.)
Responsible for importing, cleaning, transforming, validating and modeling data with the purpose of understanding and drawing conclusions from data (may be presented in charts, graphs, and/or tables).
Also, design and develop relational databases for collecting and storing data and build and design data input and data collection mechanisms.
Required Skills and Experience:
You are responsible for data related activities such as data extraction, profiling, cleansing, de-duplication, standardization, conversion, transformation and loading, data mining, warehousing, archiving and reporting.
Responsible for all activities required to ensure optimum performance and data integrity of databases in production environments, in line with the requirements.
Responsible for providing support of server based databases in development and test environments including database software installation, database creation, performance and capacity design, backup and recovery design, security design, providing Analytical feedback as appropriate.
Qualifications
1 -2 years industry experience, with work in a quant or data scientist field preferred
Master’s degree or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other closely related field
Excellent team-oriented and interpersonal skills, with a strong interest for consulting
Outstanding communication skills with the ability to clearly articulate findings and present solutions to business partners
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with one or two of the following: Deep Learning methods, NLP, computer vision, sentiment analysis, topic modeling and graph theory and databases
Experience with common data science tools such as Python, R, PyTorch, TensorFlow, Keras, NLTK, Spacy, or Neo4j, and a good understanding of modelling platforms (Azure AutoML, SageMaker, DataBricks, DataRobot and H2O.ai)
Experience working with big data distributed programming languages, and ecosystems: Spark, Hadoop, MapReduce, Pig, Kafka
Familiarity with Cloud-based environments such as AWS (S3/EC2), Azure, Google Cloud
Knowledge of other coding languages such as Java, Matlab, SAS, C
Experience with building and deploying predictive and prescriptive analytics modelss Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Architecture Knowledge and Technical Solution Design.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.
Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed.
Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant : http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.
People matter, results count.
","['mapreduc', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'spaci', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'java', 'kera', 'kafka', 'pig', 'ec2', 'r', 'c', 'sa', 'cloud', 'sagemak', 'aw']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'spaci', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'java', 'kera', 'kafka', 'pig', 'ec2', 'r', 'c', 'sa', 'cloud', 'sagemak', 'aw', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"What you’ll do:
Set the standards and approaches for applying data science.
Attract and retain superstar data scientists.
Coach and mentor data scientists.
Develop and Maintain the platform and solution architecture in service of the simple, fast, and cost-effective realization of data science in the industrial world.
Responsibilities:
As Chief Data Scientist, your responsibilities may include, but are not limited to, the following:
Ownership of Data Science tools, technologies and solution patterns built for scale, re-usability, and continuous improvement.
Publish best practices and standards of excellence.
Mentor Data Scientists company-wide.
Challenge the status quo and continuously reinvent the application of data science with a strong bias towards simplification, re-usability, and network effects.
Qualifications:
PhD or Masters degree in Data Science or related field
11+ years of system building experience
6+ years of people management experience
A passion for new approaches to Data Science at scale.
A passion for solving customer problems and helping them win.
Experience building and deploying data science in a production environment.
A strong reputation as a Data Science thought leader.
Strong passion for technology and building great systems
Excellent communication skills
Agile methodology practitioner
Ability to work quickly and collaboratively in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Preferred skills:
Ph.D. in related field
Experience as an open-source contributor
Startup and/or Product Experience
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
Accommodations are available upon request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data']",2.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"Do you have a background in Data Science, Physics, Statistics or Probability Theory?
Do you have a passion for sports?
Do you live to find data driven solutions to complex problems?
What You’ll Do:
Productizing artificial intelligence based solutions along side engineers and product teams
Providing technical guidance to product teams on the artificial intelligence (machine learning and computer vision) approaches appropriate for a task
Patenting the innovative solutions
What You Need:
Bachelor’s, MS or PhD in computer science or related quantitative field.
3+ years of real-world experience with machine learning algorithms for classification, regression, clustering, reinforcement learning, or related areas
Expertise in using Python, C++, or other programming language
Substantial experience with unstructured data sources, especially in areas such as spatiotemporal data, video/image, speech or text data
Proficiency in, at least, one modern deep learning engine such as Tensorflow, PyTorch etc.
(preferred: knowledge of using GPUs)
Proven track record of innovation in creating novel algorithms and advancing the state of the art
Passion for creating new technologies with high product impact within sport.
One Team
Committed Players
Dedicated to Client Success
Always Innovate
Be The Best
@black_in_ai
@women_in_ai
@_LXAI
","['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'python']","['probabl', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'computer vision', 'data', 'reinforc', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'python', 'probabl', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'computer vision', 'data', 'reinforc', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Experience the challenges, rewards and opportunity of working for one of the world’s largest providers of products and services to the global energy industry.
Overview:
Job Responsibilities:
Efficiently extract large scale complex business data (time series data, structured/unstructured) from various data sources and prepare them for data analytics.
Partner with product experts, leverage common open source Machine Learning/Deep Learning packages for identifying data patterns/trends or building predictive models.
Deploy solutions to business units using software technologies to generate measurable values for businesses.
Grasp the application of the latest machine learning & artificial intelligence open source packages, cloud and distributed computing technologies to ensure the best technologies are implemented to meet businesses’ data challenges.
Required Qualifications:
Undergraduate degree in Data Science, Computer Science, or Math, or Statistics.
7 years of experiences with a minimum of 2 years experiences in extracting the data, using common classification or regression open source packages through R or Python.
Has basic knowledge with big data platforms like Hadoop, Hive, or Phoenix, as well as knowledge in parallel programming, and distributed computing frameworks like Spark.
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science, or Engineering:
5 years of experiences with a Master’s degree
2 years of experiences with a PhD degree.
Has experience with open source machine learning packages and deep learning packages provided by Microsoft Azure, Amazon AWS, or Google GCP (such as Scikit-learn, Azure ML, TensorFlow, Sagemaker).
Interview process:
Potential candidates are required to pass a data challenge test before on-site interview can be scheduled.
Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, citizenship, marital status, sex/gender, sexual preference/ orientation, gender identity, age, veteran status, national origin, or any other status protected by law or regulation.
3000 N. Sam Houston Parkway E., Houston, Texas, 77032, United States
Job Details
Requisition Number: 87825
Experience Level: Experienced Hire
Job Family: Engineering/Science/Technology
Product Service Line: Global R&D
Full Time / Part Time: Full Time
Additional Locations for this position:
Compensation Information
Compensation is competitive and commensurate with experience.
","['spark', 'microsoft', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'gcp', 'scikit', 'aw']","['regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'microsoft', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'gcp', 'scikit', 'aw', 'regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Zip Code:
77077
Minimum Level of Education:
Bachelors Degree
Minimum Years of Experience:
4 Years
Employment Type:
Full Time
Travel Percentage:
OVERVIEW:
JOB SUMMARY
RESPONSIBILITIES
Identify necessary data elements and their sources, leverage appropriate tools to acquire and consolidate large volumes of data from different internal and external sources, and identify and resolve any irrelevant, corrupt, missing, or incongruent data
Identify and use appropriate advanced analytic tools, technologies and platforms to execute analysis against business requirements, including the ability to scale, deploy and distribute models across the enterprise as needed.
Develop performance scorecards and dashboards to monitor the adoption, implementation, and impact of models and strategies.
Work with LABS and Business Technology resources on API and front end integration.
Collaborate with business process owners to validate model outputs and construct an appropriate training
QUALIFICATIONS
Education
Masters or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Neuroscience or another technical field with a focus on quantitative research OR
Bachelors with 18 months+ of relevant job experience
Experience
2+ years of experience accessing and manipulating data in SQL or NoSQL database environments
1+ years of experience with scientific scripting languages (e.g., Python, R, SAS) and/or object-oriented programming (e.g., C++, Java)
2+ years of experience with Bayesian statistics, regression analysis (beyond linear regression), supervised learning, unsupervised learning or time-series analysis required
1-4 years of overall analytics experience, can be inclusive of post-graduate work
Professional Skills
Experience accessing and manipulating data in SQL or NoSQL database environments
Experience with scientific scripting languages (e.g., Python, R, SAS) and/or object-oriented programming (e.g., C++, Java)
Experience with regression analysis (beyond linear regression), supervised learning, unsupervised learning or time-series analysis required
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States.
","['nosql', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'data', 'dashboard', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis']",1.0,"['nosql', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'data', 'dashboard', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Vacancy Number: 26111
Date Posted: May 18, 2020
Data Scientist
About the role
This role requires a unique skillset with the ability to merge the rapid developments of computer science and machine learning with the rich depth of disparate and complex data sets such as 3D spatial geoscience data, time series operations data, and legacy unstructured data.
This is individual contributor role in which you will be developing algorithms to integrate and analyse data sets as part of a multi-disciplinary team and building Proofs of Concepts and Minimum Viable Products proving out new and innovative concepts.
In this role you will:
Work under the supervision of senior data scientists, geoscientists and engineers.
Develop machine learning and artificial intelligence algorithms to extract insights from complex, disparate and sometimes sparse data sets.
Develop Proofs of Concepts and Minimum Viable Products capable of delivering analytic insights to end users.
Collaborate with other team members and the business to understand problem statements and formulate approaches for solving specific business challenges
Assist with the build out and maintenance of an AWS development environment.
Research and identify potential technology solutions from external partners
Attend relevant industry and technology conferences/seminars and bring back learnings for sharing to the broader Innovation Team and Petroleum Business.
Foster attitude that value and promote innovation.
About you
Bachelors (Master is preferred) degree in STEM major from accredited institution.
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills with a thirst to learn new areas.
3+ years’ experience in
","['excel', 'aw']","['data', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['excel', 'aw', 'data', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Located in Houstons Energy Corridor, the center neighbors the nations leading petroleum engineering universities, labs, manufacturers, and service companies.
Basic Function
Develop algorithms, models and prototype solutions to address challenging scientific and engineering problems for exploration and production (E&P) applications.
Serve as a bridge between machine learning (ML), data science and subject matter applications.
Duties & Responsibilities
Develop machine learning algorithms and perform advanced statistical analyses of engineering data to obtain insights into trends and opportunities
Develop and maintain appropriate databases
Research and deliver proof of concepts solutions, responding to clear and specific business needs
Serve as a bridge between machine learning/data science and subject matter applications
Bridge the gap between prototype development and scalable production applications when needed
Develop proper unit test frameworks for artificial intelligence (AI) and ML and provides high level documentation
Communicate appropriate algorithm research and prototype development best practices back to the machine learning group, to improve learning and future capabilities
Publish and present work in journals and at conferences
Develop and maintain statistical reports and visual presentations for management
Perform other duties and participate in special projects as assigned
Education & Experience
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Applied Mathematics & Statistics, Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence, or Geosciences required; Masters degree and/or Ph.D. strongly preferred
Must have at least three (3) years of relevant experience in data science including at least two (2) years in AI or ML
Strong fundamental understanding of various modern machine-learning methods or computational physics/geosciences/chemistry background, along with significant machine learning knowledge is desirable
Ability to:
compile, correlate, and compute results from large data sets
develop machine learning algorithms and perform advanced statistical analyses
effectively collaborate with research and business partners across disciplines and cultures
demonstrate technical writing skills and develop logical and clearly defined reports and presentations
make oral/graphic presentations to collaboration partners
show a history of active participation in technical society activities preferred
Proficient with business software applications
Experience in a few of the following areas: deep neural networks, reinforcement learning, Markov Random Fields, Bayesian networks, semi-supervised learning, computer vision, image processing, signal processing, distributed computing, and/or numerical optimization
Substantial programming experience is expected, preferably in Python
Experiences with one or more of the following is highly desirable: familiarity with ML frameworks such as Tensorflow, Keras, Pytorch, MXNet, operationalizing ML models, cloud computing (e.g.
Google Cloud, AWS, etc.
), GPU computing environment
Experience with big-data technologies such as Hadoop/Spark is a plus
Experience in oil and gas application is a plus.
Must be able to comprehend and communicate accurately, clearly and concisely in English
NO THIRD PARTY CANDIDATES ACCEPTED
Powered by JazzHR
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'aw', 'mxnet', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'cloud']","['computer vision', 'correl', 'data', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'neural network', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",1.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'aw', 'mxnet', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'cloud', 'computer vision', 'correl', 'data', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'nn', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Your customers are world-class seismic imagers who strive to image the subsurface with a high degree of accuracy and resolution.
Interest in data mining and machine learning is key, since these are the two areas where you may specialize.
You will participate as an engineer on a development team, writing, testing, and deploying code to achieve your goals.
The stakes are high, but your impact can be higher.
Must have current U.S. work authorization or qualify for sponsorship
Qualifications
Ph.D.in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Physics or a closely related field but an equivalent combination of educationand experience will be considered
Proven Machine Learning experience
Professional experience with Deep Learning Neural Network building
Demonstrated experience with Deep Learning Framework such as Tensorflow and Keras
Experience and/or education in at least one of the fields of Big Data, Data Mining, Predictive/Prescriptive Analytics, Optimization, Exploratory Analysis & Visualization
Knowledge of relational databases, data modeling, and schema normalization techniques
Familiar with SQL
Passion for solving complex data engineering and modeling tasks
Ability to perform testing based on different hypotheses to determine the impact on key performance indicators
Excellent analytical skills and the ability to work in a collaborative team environment
Preferred:
Experience in programming (high performance computing is a plus) and developing databases
Knowledge and experience with UNIX (Linux), Java, and XML
Knowledge of Perl, R, and Spark
Expertise in designing and implementing efficient algorithms
EOE
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'neural network', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",3.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'nn', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
Primary responsibilities include:
Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Participate in the development of documentation.
This role conducts experimentation in various data science techniques, developing, executing, and maintaining scripts and prototypes to analyze, interpret, visualize, and gain knowledge from numerous data sets individually or in combination to meet mission needs.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Experience using the statistical computer language Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
#CJ
","['jira', 'python']","['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['jira', 'python', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"One the world can’t live without.
Your Responsibilities:
Working with Big Data infrastructure, Engineering, and Operations, you will develop a scalable and sustainable analytics process.
Your Data Science responsibilities will include Data mining, Feature Extractions, Model Selection, Model Optimization, Validation, and Model Deployment.
You will engage in knowledge management and effective solution delivery.
You will assess risk, benefit, and cost of pre-existing and suggested engineering practices.
Requirements and Preferences:
Are you a motivated self-starter with the dedication to work independently and as part of a team, and an ability to multi-task?
Do you have the flexibility and adaptability, to make decisions quickly?
Do you thrive in dynamic environments with multiple changing priorities, where prioritization and time management are necessary tools?
You have 2-5 years of successful technical experience in the domain of predictive analytics (e.g.
machine learning, data mining, distributed computing, and statistics related work); preferably in the Oil & Gas industry.
Your strong academic qualifications include an advanced degree in a quantitative discipline (Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.
); preferably a PhD.
A consistent track record in data driven reliability and operation efficiency is a plus.
You have programming experience with Python or R, and experience with big data.
Having background with industrial equipment is a large plus.
(Rotating machinery, reciprocating machinery, hydraulic systems, structural components, etc...)
Experience with commercial cloud services are also a plus.
(AWS, Azure, and/or Google)
You have proven technical, analytical, and empirical skills.
You have a proven history of conducting research and producing viable solutions for engineering problems.
You are skilled in problem analysis and resolution, impact verification, troubleshooting, coaching, facilitation experience, and diagnosing problems across multiple disciplines.
You excel in organizational and analytical skills; you're able to focus and deliver precise results, yet understand impacts across multiple projects and systems.
You have spent time developing with machine learning and statistical models.
","['python', 'r', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud']","['risk', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['python', 'r', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud', 'risk', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"CGG is currently looking for a creative and results-focused individual who enjoys working on open-ended problems.
Your customers are world-class seismic imagers who strive to image the subsurface with a high degree of accuracy and resolution.
Interest in data mining and machine learning is key, since these are the two areas where you may specialize.
You will participate as an engineer on a development team, writing, testing, and deploying code to achieve your goals.
The stakes are high, but your impact can be higher.
Must have current U.S. work authorization or qualify for sponsorship
Qualifications
Ph.D.in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Physics or a closely related field but an equivalent combination of educationand experience will be considered
Proven Machine Learning experience
Professional experience with Deep Learning Neural Network building
Demonstrated experience with Deep Learning Framework such as Tensorflow and Keras
Experience and/or education in at least one of the fields of Big Data, Data Mining, Predictive/Prescriptive Analytics, Optimization, Exploratory Analysis & Visualization
Knowledge of relational databases, data modeling, and schema normalization techniques
Familiar with SQL
Passion for solving complex data engineering and modeling tasks
Ability to perform testing based on different hypotheses to determine the impact on key performance indicators
Excellent analytical skills and the ability to work in a collaborative team environment
Preferred:
Experience in programming (high performance computing is a plus) and developing databases
Knowledge and experience with UNIX (Linux), Java, and XML
Knowledge of Perl, R, and Spark
Expertise in designing and implementing efficient algorithms
EOE
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'neural network', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",3.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'nn', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Your customers are world-class seismic imagers who strive to image the subsurface with a high degree of accuracy and resolution.
Interest in data mining and machine learning is key, since these are the two areas where you may specialize.
You will participate as an engineer on a development team, writing, testing, and deploying code to achieve your goals.
The stakes are high, but your impact can be higher.
Must have current U.S. work authorization or qualify for sponsorship
Qualifications
Ph.D.in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Physics or a closely related field but an equivalent combination of educationand experience will be considered
Proven Machine Learning experience
Professional experience with Deep Learning Neural Network building
Demonstrated experience with Deep Learning Framework such as Tensorflow and Keras
Experience and/or education in at least one of the fields of Big Data, Data Mining, Predictive/Prescriptive Analytics, Optimization, Exploratory Analysis & Visualization
Knowledge of relational databases, data modeling, and schema normalization techniques
Familiar with SQL
Passion for solving complex data engineering and modeling tasks
Ability to perform testing based on different hypotheses to determine the impact on key performance indicators
Excellent analytical skills and the ability to work in a collaborative team environment
Preferred:
Experience in programming (high performance computing is a plus) and developing databases
Knowledge and experience with UNIX (Linux), Java, and XML
Knowledge of Perl, R, and Spark
Expertise in designing and implementing efficient algorithms
EOE
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'neural network', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",3.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'nn', 'normal', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"In this role, you will be a key member of the actuarial team to provide analytical support for the various underwriting units including, but not limited to, pricing and claims support, budget support, and providing key statistics on results to underwriting units.
The work will be technical and analytical.
",[None],['statist'],999.0,['statist']
DS,"You will work with advanced hardware, software and techniques to develop computational algorithms and statistical methods that find patterns and relationships in large volumes of data.
Data Scientists clearly communicate their conclusions to a diverse audience and become experts through Agency-sponsored continuing education, attendance at academic and technical conferences as well as collaboration with the Intelligence Community.
DDI focuses on developing the workforce with cutting-edge skills, investing in IT infrastructure, and modernizing the way the Agency does business.
Learn more about the Directorate of Digital Innovation.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree
Experience in a science, technology, engineering or mathematics (STEM) related field, such as:
Computational social science
Computer science
Data analytics
Economics
Engineering
Geospatial analysis
Mathematics
Operations research
Quantitative finance
Statistics
GPA of at least 3.0 on a 4-point scale
Experience with real world data through thesis research, internships, or work experience
Creativity
Initiative
Integrity
Leadership abilities
Problem solving skills
Ability to work in a diverse team environment
Desired Qualifications:
Advanced degree in a data science equivalent field or sub-field
Experience working with data rich problems through research or programs
Experience with computer programming or user experience/user interface
Ability to successfully complete projects with large or incomplete data and provide solutions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
All applicants must successfully complete:
A thorough medical and psychological exam
A polygraph interview
A comprehensive background investigation
To be considered suitable for Agency employment, applicants must generally not have used illegal drugs within the last 12 months.
The issue of illegal drug use prior to 12 months ago is carefully evaluated during the medical and security processing.
You can add up to four (4) positions.
The positions will appear in the cart once you have created an account.
DO NOT submit multiple applications; this will only slow the review of your application and delay processing.
Please read the Application Instructions carefully before you begin the online application process.
Important application instructions for this position:
The following items must be attached to your on-line application (PDF format preferred):
Resume
Cover letter in which you specify your qualifications for this position.
Please address why you want to work in this role and what differentiates you from other applicants.
Unofficial transcripts for all degrees
You can excerpt longer papers.
Their interest, however, may not be benign or in your best interest.
Once you reveal your interest you lose control of that information.
",[None],"['data', 'geospati', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['data', 'geospati', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Zip Code:
77077
Minimum Level of Education:
Bachelor’s Degree
Minimum Years of Experience:
10+ Years
Employment Type:
Full Time
Travel Percentage:
OVERVIEW:
JOB SUMMARY
Each engine will have multiple models as components.
To lead the development of this engine, the role will require expert ability in mathematical modeling; analytical and heuristic solution methods; the ability to synthesize, visualize and communicate results; and create a tool at scale to drive the recommended course of action.
This role will require close collaboration (with functions, operating companies, specialty companies or geographies and technology teams) to align around the sequencing of priorities and ensure the appropriate path to value.
This role is expected to help create models in addition to coaching team members in model creation.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Ensure the data mined, cleansed and engineered for models is accurate and appropriate.
Able to bring forward new and different data sets to help solve problems.
Identify and use appropriate advanced analytic tools, technologies and platforms to solve business problems, create the roadmap for the engine- sequencing models overtime, create or direct the creation of the models\algorithms needed, tune the models to ensure the appropriate business outcome.
Ensure the performance scorecards and dashboards created to monitor adoption, implementation, and impact of models and strategies are adequate and are being shared throughout the enterprise
Work with LABS and Business Technology resources on API and front end integration.
Collaborate with business process owners to validate model outputs and construct an appropriate training
Work with data scientists and associate data scientists to ensure the correct data sets, calculations and analytic method being employed to solve a given problem.
Act as a magnet for data science talent.
QUALIFICATIONS
Education
Master’s or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Neuroscience or another technical field, OR
Bachelors with 7+ years of relevant job experience
Experience:
4+ years of experience accessing and manipulating data in SQL or NoSQL database environments
2+ years of experience with scientific scripting languages (e.g., Python, R, SAS) and/or object-oriented programming (e.g., C++, Java)
3+ years of experience with Bayesian statistics, regression analysis (beyond linear regression), supervised learning, unsupervised learning or time-series analysis required
7-10 years of overall analytics experience can be inclusive of post-graduate work
Professional Skills
Excellent listening, written, and verbal communication skills, with the ability to create alignment across a diverse set of stakeholders
Executive-level presentation skills, with the ability to tailor communication for specific audiences and the ability to motivate and empower team
Excellent problem-solving skills, using an analytical and logical approach to solve complex problems
Self-starter that thrives in a fast-paced environment while delivering high quality and service levels
Strong business and technical acumen
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States.
","['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'sequenc', 'data', 'dashboard', 'cleans', 'tune', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'sequenc', 'data', 'dashboard', 'cleans', 'tune', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Are you currently seeking a challenging Data Scientist opportunity to help develop text analytics capabilities?
In this role, you will be a key member of the actuarial team to provide analytical support for the various underwriting units including, but not limited to, pricing and claims support, budget support, and providing key statistics on results to underwriting units.
The work will be technical and analytical.
The individual will be doing predictive and data analytics.
Performance Objective:
Collaborate with the actuarial team to develop text analytics capabilities
Design, build and validate models using simple and advanced modeling techniques to help business leaders quantify risks and make better decisions
Support cross-functional teams to implement models
Effectively collaborate with business stakeholders across the organization to understand business processes and problems to develop effective analytical solutions
Develop monitoring solutions for business stakeholders after model implementations to monitor the accuracy of predictions, proper usage, and business impact
Expectations:
Within the first 30 days, become familiar with TMHCC’s policies and procedures
Within the first 60 days, take ownership to develop text analytics capabilities
Qualifications:
Experience with Natural Language Processing (Text Analytics)
Experience with Python or “R” or similar data analysis programming language
Flexibility to work outside of normal business hours and a willingness to learn
Sound analytical skills as well as problem-solving aptitude
Must be an exceptional communicator and able to make connections across the organization
Educational requirements: the ideal candidate will have a Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Actuarial Science, Mathematics, Statistics or related field, or the equivalent education and/or experience.
A Ph.D. would be preferred.
#LI
#GD
#CB
","['r', 'python']","['risk', 'text analytics', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'risk', 'text analytics', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Vacancy Number: 26112
Date Posted: May 18, 2020
Senior Data Scientist
About the role
This role requires a unique skillset with the ability to merge the rapid developments of computer science and machine learning with the rich depth of disparate and complex data sets such as 3D spatial geoscience data, time series operations data, and legacy unstructured data.
This is individual contributor role in which you will be developing algorithms to integrate and analyse data sets as part of a multi-disciplinary team and building Proofs of Concepts and Minimum Viable Products proving out new and innovative concepts.
In this role you will:
Work under the supervision of data science lead, geoscientists and engineers.
Develop machine learning and artificial intelligence algorithms to extract insights from complex, disparate and sometimes sparse data sets.
Develop Proofs of Concepts and Minimum Viable Products capable of delivering analytic insights to end users.
Collaborate with other team members and the business to understand problem statements and formulate approaches for solving specific business challenges
Assist with the build out and maintenance of an AWS development environment.
Research and identify potential technology solutions from external partners
Attend relevant industry and technology conferences/seminars and bring back learnings for sharing to the broader Innovation Team and Petroleum Business.
Foster attitude that value and promote innovation.
About you
Masters (Ph.D. is preferred) degree in STEM major from accredited institution.
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills with a thirst to learn new areas.
7+ years’ experience in
","['excel', 'aw']","['data', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['excel', 'aw', 'data', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Reach out to me on 734-400-0958 OR abbas@infotreeglobal.com
W2 Candidates Only
Job Title: Data Scientist
Duration: 6 Months Contract
• 10-12 years of Hands-on experience in NLP, Machine Learning (ML) and Deep Learning (DL)
• Identify, retrieve, manipulate, relate and/or exploit multiple structured data and unstructured data sets from various sources, including building or generating new data sets as appropriate
• Should be hands on with text classification, document similarity, information retrieval (using ML and DL)
• Must have built production ready systems for data science
• Must have experience in creating and hosting scalable Restful APIs using python
• Interpret and evaluate the results of data science models and/or algorithms, understanding the meaning, limitation and scope of the results,
• A good understanding of NLP- ML-DL and the ability to build models quickly using the appropriate framework
• Understanding the right evaluation metrics for the NLP problems
• Ability to scale the DL/ML Models for the production
• Ability to containerize the ML models
",['python'],"['deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'nlp', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['python', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'nlp', 'machine learning']"
DS,"This analysis will be used for detection of crop response to sync management techniques, fertilizers and other crop production inputs; development of crop and pest management aids based on aerial images in large production fields; validation of small plot data collected by aerial sensors with established ground-based information.
Analysis will also focus on identifying opportunities for new and existing weather models to create value in supply reliability; parent line production; crop management.
Results should translate production problems into data-driven analytics / machine-learning tasks and building related products which automate the operational functions in production and manufacturing areas.
Candidates should have experience in building advanced analytics models across one or more areas of Predictive/Prescriptive Analytics, and Image Processing; Expertise in analytical packages such as Python, R, Statistical packages like Statistica, Minitab; applied experience in various machine learning techniques (e.g.
Neural Networks).
Requirements: Masters in Statistics, Mathematics, Machine Learning, Agricultural Statistics or Climatology.
PhD is Preferred.
","['r', 'python']","['data', 'predict', 'neural network', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'data', 'predict', 'nn', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The Data Scientist will report to the Manager of Risk Engineering.The primary duties of this role are as follows:Design, development, and implementation of new data driven solutions to support Quantitative Risk Analysis (QRA) model and integrity assessment planningDesign, development, and implementation of new data processes to extract, cleanse, integrate, and conform disparate pipeline data sources from across the organization for loading into dimensional data modelsPerform technical design reviews and improvements of existing data processes and data modelsEnsure data architecture will support current and future business requirementsEnsure unit test is completed and meets the test plan requirements, system testing is completed, and system is implemented correctlyCreate and maintain thorough documentation of system architecture and processesIdentify and present potential pipeline integrity process improvements and follow-through with implementation once stakeholder/management agreement for the improvement is obtainedProvide support for other aspects of integrity related programs, processes, and procedures as required Position may be filled at various levels depending on years of experience.
Position Requirements
Position Requirements 3-5 years' experience designing and implementing data driven solutionsExpert knowledge of SQL (including SQL tuning), T-SQL, and other statistical computer languages to manipulate data and draw insightsExperience working in multiple environments (DEV/QA/PROD)Experience using version control toolsAbility to clearly document processes, ETL metadata, and architecture documentsStrong written and verbal communication skills with staff at various levels of technical knowledgeDemonstrates excellent analytical, critical thinking, and problem-solving skillsDemonstrates strong time management and organizational skillsAbility to self-motivate, set goals, prioritize and meet deadlinesBachelor's Degree or higher in Computer Science, Engineering, or other relevant fieldAbility and willingness to perform all essential functions of the position including those listed aboveAbility to effectively organize, plan, prioritize, document, and complete work independentlyMaintain a regular, dependable attendance and high level of performanceWork ConditionsMust be willing and able to work in a corporate environmentExtended periods of sitting may be required Preferred Experience, Skills and Knowledge10+ years' experience designing and implementing data driven solutionsPrior experience with data warehouse modeling, design, development, and implementationExpert knowledge in relational and dimensional data modeling and database design skillsPrior experience working with pipeline industry datasets or implementing a QRA modelFamiliarity with pipeline linear referencing conceptsExperience with ETL and data warehousing of spatial data setsExperience with Safe Software's FME Desktop and FME ServerExperience with distributed data/computing toolsKnowledge of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'etl', 'data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'cleans', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'etl', 'data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'cleans', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Summary
In addition, you will work closely with internal and external clients to understand their business needs and then work closely with their data environments to find the necessary pieces for solutioning needs.
Essential Functions
Engage in all aspects of release cycles including requirements review, work estimation, design, implementation, testing and review
Identify gaps in requirements or designs and present options to address them
Work with the product team to understand end-users requirements, formulate use cases, and translate them into pragmatic and effective technical solutions
Dive into difficult technical problems and successfully deliver results on schedule
Collaborate with Engineering and Product team to design new programs
Candidate Profile
Full Stack
Hands-on experience in coding and software development in a previous professional internship or work experience
Experience building APIs
Experience with modern front-end design and Javascript frameworks
Proficiency with SQL and NoSQL database technologies
Experience with Big Data storage and processing techniques, including Hadoop, Spark.
Experience with data visualization frameworks
A track record of successfully completing projects on time and delivering on schedules and commitments
Strong problem-solving skills and a passion for solving complex challenges
Ability to work independently and within a team
Proven ability to learn quickly and adapt under pressure
Self-started who can drive through ambiguity and thrives in a fast-paced, dynamic early growth start-up environment
Data Science
Ability to leverage a wide variety of data science tools and frameworks
Experience in modelling analytics solutions for complex use-cases
Proficiency in modern Machine Learning libraries (Tensorflow/Keras/PyTorch)
Strong understanding of fundamental statistics and an ability to translate business requirements into analytical models
Some exposure to deep learning/reinforcement learning models
Proficiency in R/Python
Supervisory Responsibility
This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
Work Environment
This position operates in a professional office environment.
This role routinely uses standard
office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear.
The employee frequently is required to stand, walk; use hands to finger, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms.
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work
This is a full-time internship position.
Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5:30 p.m.
Travel
This position requires minimal (<10>
Required Education and Experience
Pursuing a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or possesses extensive development and programming experience and coursework
Background in data science/statistics along
Self-Start who loves to innovate and solve business problems
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Positive personality
Preferred Required Education and Experience
Masters in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related field;
Preferred: Data Scientist experience
Experience in ETL, databases
Strong understanding of AI and ML (NLG, NLP, etc.)
Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Java or C++ is an asset
Analytical mind and business acumen
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Additional Eligibility Qualifications
None required for this position.
Work Authorization
EEO Statement
Other Duties
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
","['nosql', 'pytorch', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'reinforc', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['nosql', 'pytorch', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'reinforc', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Data Scientist North America CoE
The role will create solutions to business challenges through the use of advanced statistical analysis, data mining, and data visualization techniques.
Responsibilities:
Identifies the data the business should be collecting, devises methods of instrumenting the businesss system in order to extract this information
Designs, implements, and evaluates advanced statistical models and approaches for application in the businesss most complex issues
Conduct software development, software integration, statistical analysis, modeling, and simulations in a rapid DevOps environment.
Deploy new data science capabilities through existing toolsets.
Cleansing of large unstructured data and enabling analytical capability in order to query the data and address various business needs
Takes initiative to experiment with various technologies and tools with vision of creating innovative data driven insights for the business at the quickest pace possible.
Staying on top of the industrys trends, in order to provide forward-thinking recommendations
.
Requirements:
Ph.D. or Masters with experience in any mathematical sciences
Strong programming skills and experience working with tools such as R, Python Programming, Open Source, visualizations, and so forth.
Demonstrated skills in SQL server reporting services, analysis services, integration services, Tableau, or other data visualization tools.
Strong skill in statistical techniques inclusive of cluster-analysis test design, regressions, and forecasting methodologies as well as substantial familiarity in big data and standardizing and A/B testing.
Experience cleaning labeled data in preparation for use in machine learning
Ability to create parallel processing operations by managing the number of processors used in an operation given memory limitations
Knowledge of cloud based data platforms such as Snowflake, Redshift, BigQuery etc..
","['snowflak', 'redshift', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'cluster', 'cleans', 'clean', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['snowflak', 'redshift', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'cluster', 'cleans', 'clean', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Design and develop statistical models with Big Data, IoT, ERP, Supply Chain, etc.
to drive major operational business decisions
Understand customer and business requirements and implement reliable technical solutions for non-technical end users.
Identify opportunities to improve data collection, reporting, and analysis based on business needs.
Regularly interface with client sponsors and team members to meet project deadlines and provide clear communication with the team.
Provide documentation and explanation of technical solutions in a professional manner
Ability to create and deliver presentations in the Data Science and Advanced Analytics space
Ability to take complex problems/concepts and simplify down for a variety of audiences
Requirements
Strong and proven background of analytical, mathematical and critical thinking
Passion for data analytics, modeling, programming, and machine learning.
Strong Python and/or R programming experience.
Exposure to data ETL, storage, and manipulation tools including SQL, XML/JSON, and APIs
4+ years of experience in Data Science or related field.
BS or MS in Computer Science, Computational Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, Data Science, Statistics or equivalent
Travels to client sites.
Delighters
Having examples of scaling production-facing applications or open-source contributions.
2+ years of consulting experience
Experience using Big Data and Cloud technologies
Familiarity with Spark and Data Lakes
Prior experience in the Oil and Gas industry
Benefits
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'erp', 'cloud']","['etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'erp', 'cloud', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Overview
You will be responsible for providing expert advice on novel 'omics analysis approaches, data integration and manipulation, and pattern discovery techniques.
Responsibilities
Team members who fill Data Scientist roles in this team will be responsible for creating and implementing strategies for data integration and for the analysis and visualization of multi-'omic data sets while using best practices in reproducible research and cloud-based computing.
Specific efforts will include:
Implementing high-quality and state-of-the art data science and computational biology approaches to the analysis of multi-'omic data
Developing, testing, and implementing methods related to machine learning and other approaches to pattern discovery with 'omics data
Integrating information from diverse sources
Provide thought leadership with regard to data science methods as they relate to microbiome and multi'omics analyses
Analysis of internally generated microbiome data for unique and specialized projects
Working collaboratively with scientists located across multiple geographic sites to solve challenges related to data integration, analysis, and management
Ongoing career development through the publishing of manuscripts, creation of white papers, and attendance at conferences/workshops
Qualifications
Graduate-level education or post-graduate training in computational biology, statistics, data science, bioinformatics, microbiology, or related field
Graduate and/or post-graduate experience working with complex data sets and evaluating and implementing novel approaches for their analysis and visualization
Proficient in R, Python, and Unix
Experience with cloud computing (e.g., Amazon Web Services including EC2, S3, & EC2)
Practical experience with coding best practices and reproducible research
Strong knowledge of statistics and passion for data analysis and visualizations
Ability to manage time and meet deadlines on multiple projects of diverse scope
Self-driven with keen attention to detail and documentation
Strong communication skills and ability to work effectively with team members
Preference will be given to candidates with:
Wet lab biology and/or microbiome sequence analysis experience
Demonstrated experience with multi'omic data sets
3+ years of post-graduate experience in an academic or industry laboratory setting
All employment decisions, policies and practices are in accordance with applicable federal, state and local anti-discrimination laws.
","['unix', 'ec2', 's3', 'r', 'amazon web services', 'python', 'cloud']","['sequenc', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']",2.0,"['unix', 'ec2', 's3', 'r', 'aw', 'python', 'cloud', 'sequenc', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']"
DS,"Position Responsibilities
The Data Scientist will report to the Manager of Risk Engineering.
The primary duties of this role are as follows:
Design, development, and implementation of new data driven solutions to support Quantitative Risk Analysis (QRA) model and integrity assessment planning
Design, development, and implementation of new data processes to extract, cleanse, integrate, and conform disparate pipeline data sources from across the organization for loading into dimensional data models
Perform technical design reviews and improvements of existing data processes and data models
Ensure data architecture will support current and future business requirements
Ensure unit test is completed and meets the test plan requirements, system testing is completed, and system is implemented correctly
Create and maintain thorough documentation of system architecture and processes
Identify and present potential pipeline integrity process improvements and follow-through with implementation once stakeholder/management agreement for the improvement is obtained
Provide support for other aspects of integrity related programs, processes, and procedures as required
*Position may be filled at various levels depending on years of experience.
Position Requirements
Position Requirements
3-5 years’ experience designing and implementing data driven solutions
Expert knowledge of SQL (including SQL tuning), T-SQL, and other statistical computer languages to manipulate data and draw insights
Experience working in multiple environments (DEV/QA/PROD)
Experience using version control tools
Ability to clearly document processes, ETL metadata, and architecture documents
Strong written and verbal communication skills with staff at various levels of technical knowledge
Demonstrates excellent analytical, critical thinking, and problem-solving skills
Demonstrates strong time management and organizational skills
Ability to self-motivate, set goals, prioritize and meet deadlines
Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Computer Science, Engineering, or other relevant field
Ability and willingness to perform all essential functions of the position including those listed above
Ability to effectively organize, plan, prioritize, document, and complete work independently
Maintain a regular, dependable attendance and high level of performance
Work Conditions
Must be willing and able to work in a corporate environment
Extended periods of sitting may be required
Preferred Experience, Skills and Knowledge
10+ years’ experience designing and implementing data driven solutions
Prior experience with data warehouse modeling, design, development, and implementation
Expert knowledge in relational and dimensional data modeling and database design skills
Prior experience working with pipeline industry datasets or implementing a QRA model
Familiarity with pipeline linear referencing concepts
Experience with ETL and data warehousing of spatial data sets
Experience with Safe Software’s FME Desktop and FME Server
Experience with distributed data/computing tools
Knowledge of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
Master’s Degree or higher in Computer Science, Engineering or other relevant field
Demonstrated ability to identify gaps in processes and follow through with solutions
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'etl', 'data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'cleans', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'etl', 'data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'cleans', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Summary
In addition, you will work closely with internal and external clients to understand their business needs and then work closely with their data environments to find the necessary pieces for solutioning needs.
Essential Functions
Engage in all aspects of release cycles including requirements review, work estimation, design, implementation, testing and review
Identify gaps in requirements or designs and present options to address them
Work with the product team to understand end-users requirements, formulate use cases, and translate them into pragmatic and effective technical solutions
Dive into difficult technical problems and successfully deliver results on schedule
Collaborate with Engineering and Product team to design new programs
Candidate Profile
Full Stack
Hands-on experience in coding and software development in a previous professional internship or work experience
Experience building APIs
Experience with modern front-end design and Javascript frameworks
Proficiency with SQL and NoSQL database technologies
Experience with Big Data storage and processing techniques, including Hadoop, Spark.
Experience with data visualization frameworks
A track record of successfully completing projects on time and delivering on schedules and commitments
Strong problem-solving skills and a passion for solving complex challenges
Ability to work independently and within a team
Proven ability to learn quickly and adapt under pressure
Self-started who can drive through ambiguity and thrives in a fast-paced, dynamic early growth start-up environment
Data Science
Ability to leverage a wide variety of data science tools and frameworks
Experience in modelling analytics solutions for complex use-cases
Proficiency in modern Machine Learning libraries (Tensorflow/Keras/PyTorch)
Strong understanding of fundamental statistics and an ability to translate business requirements into analytical models
Some exposure to deep learning/reinforcement learning models
Proficiency in R/Python
Supervisory Responsibility
This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
Work Environment
This position operates in a professional office environment.
This role routinely uses standard
office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear.
The employee frequently is required to stand, walk; use hands to finger, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms.
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work
This is a full-time internship position.
Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5:30 p.m.
Travel
This position requires minimal (<10>
Required Education and Experience
Pursuing a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or possesses extensive development and programming experience and coursework
Background in data science/statistics along
Self-Start who loves to innovate and solve business problems
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Positive personality
Preferred Required Education and Experience
Masters in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related field;
Preferred: Data Scientist experience
Experience in ETL, databases
Strong understanding of AI and ML (NLG, NLP, etc.)
Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Java or C++ is an asset
Analytical mind and business acumen
Problem-solving aptitude
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Additional Eligibility Qualifications
None required for this position.
Work Authorization
EEO Statement
Other Duties
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
","['nosql', 'pytorch', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'reinforc', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['nosql', 'pytorch', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'reinforc', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"dedicated to delivering an investment experience that helps people get more out
of life.
If you're looking for challenging work, smart colleagues, and a global
*This role is a remote position.
The Department
and deliver an investment experience that helps people get more out of life.
This mission is fueled by inventive and cohesive teams, which thrive on
collaboration and shared trust, and leverage diversity of thought.
promoting continuous learning and development, offering opportunities to work
with emerging technologies and creating the space to discover.
innovate, operate effectively in an agile environment, challenge the status
quo, and are driven to succeed.
Your Role
seeking a globally minded Principal Data Scientist to spearhead development and
day, but in this position, you wont be crunching regular ol market data;
youll be responsible for trying to combine financial data with AI models and
emerging tech to create something new and exciting in the world of FinTech.
Sounds intense, right?!
It is, but youll also have
incredible opportunities for experimentation, so before you submit your
application, here are some other things you should know about the position:
deliver a superior investment experience, and excellence is par.
That being said while you may be a lone mad scientist with forward-thinking
In this position youll be expected to translate your
ideas to your team and motivate them to execute, and to execute at the pace of
technology FAST.
This position will be well-suited for someone who is a
dreamer and executer who values speed and innovation.
Do you love your work in
data?
Good, because this position will be demanding and will challenge you in
position will enable you to do amazing things.
You will be responsible for:
You like Big Data, and you
cannot lie.
This is essential because you will be responsible for
designing, developing, and implementing Big Data platforms using Cloud
architecture with structured and unstructured data sources.
You will be
clarity to the chaos.
You can bring the complex
algorithms your dreams are made of and make them a reality, and you can
easily analyze and translate the complex models and algorithms of others
dreams.
Perform machine learning
and statistical analysis methods, such as classification, collaborative
filtering, association rules, sentiment analysis, topic modeling,
time-series analysis, regression, statistical inference, and validation
methods
Analyze and model
structured data using advanced statistical methods and implement
algorithms and software needed to perform analyses
Build recommendation
engines, sentiment analyzers and classifiers for unstructured and
semi-structured data
Perform explanatory data
analysis, generate and test working hypotheses, prepare and analyze
historical data to identify patterns
Design rich data visualizations
Utilize state-of-the-art
methods for data mining
Extend IVZ data with third
party sources of information, as required
Process, cleanse, and
verify the integrity of data used for analysis
Perform ad-hoc analysis
and present results in a clear manner
The experience you bring:
10 to 15 years
professional experience
4+ years in financial
services preferred
7+ years of experience
with top-tier firms in big data analytics, management consulting,
or comparable role in corporate setting
4+ years of experience
with machine learning
5+ years of experience
with SQL
Excellent understanding of
machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes,
SVM, Decision Forests, etc.
Good applied statistics
skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Extensive predictive
analytics experience with Python
In-depth knowledge of
statistical software packages (e.g.
SAS and R)
Experience with data visualization
tools
Experience with big
data technologies such as Hadoop, R, and Java / MapReduce
Experience with NoSQL
databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, DynamoDB
Experience with data and
machine learning services using Azure, Amazon Web Services (AWS), and / or
Google Cloud
Familiar with Agile
software development (Scrum is a plus)
DevOps knowledge is a plus
Skills / other personal attributes required:
Comfortable working with
ambiguity (e.g.
imperfect data, loosely defined concepts, ideas, or goals)
and translating these into more tangible outputs
Strong analytical and
critical thinking skills
Self-motivated.
Capable of
working with little or no supervision
Strong written and verbal
communication skills
Enjoy exciting and thought
provoking work and have a strong desire to learn and progress
Ability to handle multiple
tasks and requests
Must demonstrate a
positive, team-focused attitude
Ability to react
positively under pressure to meet tight deadlines
Good inter-personal skills
combined with willingness to listen
Structured, focused
approach to work, with attention to detail
Flexible able to meet
changing requirements and priorities
Maintenance of up-to-date
knowledge in the appropriate technical areas
Able to work in a global, multicultural
environment
FORMAL EDUCATION: (minimum requirement to perform
job duties)
PHD of Statistics,
Computer Science or other similar advanced degrees from a top tier
educational institution preferred
Whats in it for you?
benefit offerings including:
Flexible time off and
opportunities for a flexible work schedule
401(K) matching of 100% up
to the first 6% with additional supplemental contribution
Health & wellbeing
benefits
Parental Leave benefits
Employee stock purchase
plan
this role.
It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive
inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of
The job holder may be required to perform other
duties as deemed appropriate by their manager from time to time.
are proud to be an equal opportunity employer.
All qualified applicants will
receive consideration for employment without regard to race, creed, color,
religion, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, marital status,
national origin, citizenship status, disability, age, or veteran status.
equal opportunity employment efforts comply with all applicable U.S. state and
federal laws governing non-discrimination in employment.
","['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'r', 'amazon web services', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'bay', 'data', 'analyz', 'machine learning', 'cleans', 'predict', 'nn', 'supervis', 'svm', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'bay', 'data', 'analyz', 'machine learning', 'cleans', 'predict', 'nn', 'supervis', 'svm', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"One of the world’s leading financial consultative service providers are looking for Data Sceintists to join their team.
Roles & Responsibilities
Identify and process various sources of client/third-party financial data
Analyse sets of data to identify structures, patterns and trends
Use patterns in data to propose solutions and strategies for client problems
Create and present findings to senior management team and other stakeholders, as and when required
Essential Requirements
5+ years of relevant experience (e.g.
Data Scientist, Data Analyst, Statistician, Economist, etc.)
Working knowledge of machine learning algorithms and technologies
A great knowledge and/or experience of business intelligence tools (e.g.
VBA, SQL, Tableau, etc.)
MSc or higher in Data Science, Statistics, Economics or a related field
Experience delivering agile solutions to various small and large clients
Strong problem-solving skills
Excellent attention to detail
Impeccable listening skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Able to create and maintain strong working relationships with both internal and external colleagues and clients
Great planning and organisational skills
A desire for continuous learning and professional improvement
Desirable Skills
Experience working within the financial services (or similar) sector
Knowledge of cloud computing technologies (MS Azure, Amazon AWS, etc.)
A working knowledge of Python programming
Experience providing advisory or consultation services to client
Benefits:
Work from home opportunities
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $50,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year
","['aw', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"a.dialogApplyBtn {
display: none;
}
Sr. Data Scientist
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Req ID:
72984
Facility:
One Houston Center-130
Department:
Digital Transformation
Division:
Global Business Services
Basic Function
Through working closely with other Data Scientists, Data Engineers, business domain experts, and IT, the Sr. Data Scientist will have the opportunity to provide significant tangible business value through developing and deploying scalable Advanced Analytics capabilities on high value problems.
Roles & Responsibilities
Place emphasis on delivering value through advanced analytics solutions, through excellent problem solving, development, and implementation of scalable data science solutions
Work collaboratively with business SMEs (Process Engineers, Automation Engineers, Reliability Engineers, other business domain experts) in creating advanced data science solutions on high impact problems
Algorithm and ML solution deployment and maintenance for chemical manufacturing domains including predictive maintenance, reliability, preventing downtime, industrial automation and optimization, demand forecasting, and improving health and safety
Leverage statistical analysis, mathematical modeling, pattern recognition, and ML and deep learning frameworks to deliver advanced analytics projects
Leverage advanced technologies and code development standards to deliver scalable production solutions
Network internally and externally to build relationships that foster technology transfer and collaboration
Assist with the promotion of digital transformation, training and development of other Data Scientists, Citizen Data Scientists, and other peers throughout the organization
Min.
Qualifications
MS degree in Computer Science, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computational Mathematics, Statistics, or related technical field (PhD strongly preferred)
4+ years professional hands on technical experience developing and implementing Data Science solutions
Demonstrated ability to drive a project, and work both independently and in a team
High level of enthusiasm and a love of data and software development
Strong quantitative and problem-solving skills, including strong mathematical, statistical, and technical knowledge and skills
Strong Python programming skills
Applied Machine Learning experience (Regression, Time Series, Probabilistic modeling, Supervised Classification, and Unsupervised Learning)
Strong experience with modern ML and Deep Learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, and Keras
Strong experience with modern ML and Data Science libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, Scikit-Learn, NLTK, Seaborn, Dplyr
Excellent understanding of ML techniques & algorithms, such as ANNs, SVM, GBM, Decision Forests, Clustering algorithms
Experience with Deep Learning architectures such as Autoencoders, CNNs, RNNs, GANs
Specialty skills in large scale computing, cluster computing, and cloud computing (Azure preferably)
Experience with GPU technology, Git, and software development testing frameworks
Specialized experience in various Data Science domains, such as Predictive Maintenance, Forecasting, Real Time streaming analytics, Image Analysis leveraging deep learning methodologies, and optimization
Experience working with large structured and unstructured data and technologies
Preferred Qualifications
PhD strongly preferred
6+ years professional hands on technical experience developing and implementing Data Science solutions
Strong programming and scripting skills in JavaScript, C#, C++, Java, Julia, or Scala
Experience with Azure DevOps, Jupyter Notebooks, or VS Code
Experience with Linux, MapReduce, NVIDIA data science development stacks, and CUDA programming
Proficiency in Real Time historian data, SQL, NoSQL, and NewSQL database technologies
Competencies
Builds effective teams
Collaborates
Cultivates innovation
Customer focus
Demonstrates courage
Drives results
Ensures accountability
Instills trust and exemplifies integrity
Nearest Major Market: Houston
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'julia', 'linux', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'dplyr', 'python', 'javascript', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'git', 'azur', 'numpi', 'java', 'nosql', 'kera', 'jupyt', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'seaborn', 'panda', 'scikit']","['predict', 'account', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'time series', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'gbm', 'classif', 'data', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'regress', 'cluster', 'cnn', 'optim', 'forecast', 'busi', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'julia', 'linux', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'dplyr', 'python', 'javascript', 'nltk', 'pytorch', 'git', 'azur', 'numpi', 'java', 'nosql', 'kera', 'jupyt', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'seaborn', 'panda', 'scikit', 'predict', 'account', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'time series', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'gbm', 'classif', 'data', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'regress', 'cluster', 'cnn', 'optim', 'forecast', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"This nationwide portfolio of communications infrastructure connects cities and communities to essential data, technology and wireless service– bringing information, ideas and innovations to the people and businesses that need them.
Position Title: Principal Data Scientist - 8E
Position Summary
The data scientist collaborates cross-functionally with business and technology partners, developing data products that leverage advanced machine learning techniques, answering top-priority data questions across the enterprise.
They explore and consult on the business value of external datasets in collaboration with domain experts.
They are curious by nature and possess a versatile array of skills needed to tackle data wrangling, exploratory analysis, feature engineering, model prototyping, and production deployment.
Essential Job Functions
Develop advanced machine learning models to produce insights, predictions, and forecasts, in collaboration with domain experts across a variety of disciplines (e.g.
sales, operations, RF engineering, real estate acquisitions, finance, IT)
Rapidly conduct exploratory data analysis& model prototyping leveraging big data environments
Domain expert in statistics and machine learning
Integrate external and internal data as needed
Work with data engineers to design and construct data pipelines for reproducible analysis
Conduct multivariate statistical analyses such as linear or logistic regression, segmentation/cluster analysis, discrete choice/conjoint, decision trees, factor analysis, and database/data mining in order to identify significant differences in relationships among sources of information
Develop models utilizing advanced techniques as needed, e.g.
ensemble methods and deep learning
Identify and advise on relationships and trends in data, and any factors that could affect research results
Create analytical workflows to process large amounts of data for statistical modeling and graphic analysis, adapting statistical methods as necessary in order to solve specific problems.
Present results of analyses, including design of client-friendly graphs, charts, tables and other data visualizations
Ability to explain models to business partners in non-technical language
Education/Certifications
M.S.
or Ph.D. degree in mathematics, computer science, or related quantitative discipline
Experience/Minimum Requirements
A minimum of three (7) years of work experience in a related quantitative position
Experience with common data science libraries (e.g.
scikit-learn, caret, MLlib)
Experience with deep learning libraries (e.g.
TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe)
Experience with data analysis& manipulation tools (e.g.
NumPy, Pandas, dplyr)
Experience with data visualization tools (e.g.
ggplot2, matplotlib, plotly, PowerBI, Tableau)
Experience with distributed data& computing platforms to solve big-data challenges (e.g.
Apache Spark)
Experience on cloud platforms (e.g.
GCP, AWS, Azure)
Other Skills/Abilities
Strong communication skills, including the ability to present analytical insights to a non-technical audience
Mentor junior technical staff
Strong attention to detail, organizational skills and interpersonal skills
Domain experience a plus
Working Conditions: Works in a normal office setting with no exposure to adverse environmental conditions.
","['kera', 'spark', 'tableau', 'gcp', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'mllib', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'caff', 'azur', 'caret', 'numpi', 'cloud']","['big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'data', 'logist', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'cluster', 'graph', 'research', 'forecast', 'pipelin', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'normal', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'tableau', 'gcp', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'mllib', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'caff', 'azur', 'caret', 'numpi', 'cloud', 'big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'data', 'logist', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'cluster', 'graph', 'research', 'forecast', 'pipelin', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'normal', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 6+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The Role
Your Impact
Design and develop new machine learning and cognitive computing applications for the chemicals and refining industries
Collaborate with customers, product managers, designers and developers to understand customer needs and translate them into product requirements and specifications
Contribute to Aspen Technology’s intellectual property footprint in the space of AI
What You'll Need
Master’s degree in Science or Engineering with a strong quantitative focus, such as Statistics, Computer Science, Data Science, Chemometrics, Econometrics, AI, or a related quantitative field; PhD preferred.
5+ years of experience in data analysis and software development/programming
Strong track record of experience in Python programming, including data science specific packages, such as Pandas, Numpy, TensorFlow, PyTorch, Scikit-Learn etc.
Knowledge in C++ or C# is preferred, Julia is a bonus.
A track record of academic publications related to data science, AI and/or process optimization is preferred.
So are a public GitHub stack and contributions to open source packages.
Experience with time series analysis, predictive analytics, machine learning algorithms, data mining, cognitive computing
Familiarity with big data and cloud technologies
Familiarity with chemical engineering or related fields is a big plus
Problem-solving ability and attention to details
Excellent interpersonal, communication, writing, and presentation skills
Demonstrated ability to convey complex information in a clear and concise manner
","['pytorch', 'julia', 'github', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'c', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",2.0,"['pytorch', 'julia', 'github', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'c', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Job Responsibilities and Duties
Responsibilities:
Lead model development, providing methodology, strategy, ideas, architect, and solutions for real-word, industrial-scale and mission-critical business operations
Develop AI/ML models for business applications
Build and integrate models into a full-functioning AI business software
Interact with business clients, understand business requirements, propose AI software solutions to meet the business requirements, deliver and present AI software to clients
Understand the data set used for the modeling, prepare and preprocess data sets, train and test models and perform model feature engineering
Communicate effectively with team members, management, and clients
Requirements
Proven ability to work with large structured and unstructured datasets
Demonstrable, hands-on experience in developing advanced analytics algorithms/models, including time series forecasting, machine learning and deep learning, image processing, natural language processing, and speech recognition
Excellent hands-on code development skills in Python
Good Knowledge of Machine Learning frameworks and packages, including Keras, TensorFlow, MXnet, Scikit-Learn and cloud technology (Amazon, Azure, etc.)
Experiences in Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Computer Vision, and Natural Language Processing
PhD degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related disciplines
At least 3 years of Artificial Intelligence
At least 3 years of Machine Learning
Background in Property and Casulity Insurance a big plus!
Additional Qualifications
Parallel and distributed processing experience is a plus
Expertise in data Extraction Transformation and Loading (ETL) is a strong plus (Spark, Hadoop, SQL) in big data environments.
Domain knowledge in financial and insurance industries is a big plus
The candidate must be able to work out of the Houston Texas office but remote work will be considered for extremely strong candidate
You must have a PHD to be considered for this position.
Benefits
Compensation package (base salary + performance bonus + stock options) commensurate with experience.
Industry (tech/software industry) standard benefits package - medical, dental, vision, 401(k) plan, work-from-home (if applicable), flexible holidays, and more.
but remote work will be considered for extremely strong candidate
","['kera', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Excited by using massive amounts of data to develop Machine Learning (ML) and Deep Learning (DL) models?
Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI)?
Eager to learn from many different enterprises use cases of AWS ML and DL?
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
It will be a person who likes to have fun, loves to learn, and wants to innovate in the world of AI.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML / DL project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models to deliver business impact to the organization.
· Assist customers with identifying model drift and retraining models.
· Research and implement novel ML and DL approaches, including using FPGA.
This is a customer facing role.
You will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services when needed.
Basic Qualifications
· A Bachelor or Masters Degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent experience
· 12+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science and analysis
· Previous experience in a ML or data scientist role and a track record of building ML or DL models
· Experience developing IoT and Mobile solutions
· Develop advanced IoT and real-time streaming solutions and have a passion for diving into code.
· Experience using Python and/or R
· Knowledge of SparkML
· Able to write production level code, which is well-written and explainable
· Experience using ML libraries, such as scikit-learn, caret, mlr, mllib
· Experience working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets
· Experience diving into data to discover hidden patterns
· Familiarity with using data visualization tools
· Knowledge and experience of writing and tuning SQL
· Past and current experience writing and speaking about complex technical concepts to broad audiences in a simplified format
· Experience giving data presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· 8+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling and analysis
· Programming languages, such as Java or C/C++
· Ability to develop experimental and analytic plans for data modeling processes, use of strong baselines, ability to accurately determine cause and effect relations
· Consulting experience and track record of helping customers with their AI needs
· Publications or presentation in recognized Machine Learning, Deep Learning and Data Mining journals/conferences
· Experience with AWS technologies like Redshift, S3, EC2, Data Pipeline, & EMR
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
· Strong written and verbal communication skills
","['ec2', 'aw', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'mlr', 'r', 'mllib', 'python', 'caret', 'c', 'scikit', 'java']","['data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['ec2', 'aw', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'mlr', 'r', 'mllib', 'python', 'caret', 'c', 'scikit', 'java', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Develop decision support and predictive solutions for customers and staff.
Leverage AI for pattern recognition and beyond
Optimize business outcomes
Gain insights from big data
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will collaborate with a large, multi-disciplinary team of solution architects, engineers and data scientists on a wide range of business problems.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Work with large, complex data sets.
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Work on advanced analytics areas like deep learning and complex statistical data analysis
Interaction with senior leadership and other business leaders to provide business recommendations with effective presentations of findings, including visual displays of quantitative information
Develop analysis, forecasting and optimization methods/models to provide the business solution to internal customers
Research and develop internal capabilities to enhance the skill-sets on latest data science developments, work towards producing innovative solutions to the existing challenges
Perform quality control of deliverables
Provide thought leadership in algorithmic and process innovations, and contribute to creativity in solving unconventional problems
Job Requirements
Qualifications:
Analysis
Experience with writing SQL queries, performing basic conversion and transformations (e.g.
formatting date string), and obtaining statistical summaries by using windowing functions.
Experience with usage of R/RStudio, Python, Jupyter Notebook
Experience with version control tool like Git
Strong experience with Excel and PowerPoint to present results
Ability to write scripts to automate ETL tasks
Problem Solving
Ability to run standard model algorithms in Python, to perform: classification/regression, clustering, basic text analytics, image recognition, etc.
E.g.
run a classification problem using random forest, and obtain the variable importance, produce performance metrics/KPIs; run a k-means clustering problem, produce a KPI to quantify the goodness of clusters
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem
Experience with charting tools & knowledge of the proper charting tool to use, such as Excel.
For instance, when to use box-and-whiskers plot, when to use waterfall.
Ability to zoom-in to smaller data sets or display subcategories
Capable of running multiple scenarios and pick up the optimal solution
Capable of understanding advanced mathematical or physical explanations, to implement or execute the requested tasks.
E.g.
Fourier Transform, Power Spectral Density, Monte Carlo simulation, etc.
Actively participates and contributes in brain-storming session.
Can work seamlessly with people from other disciplines: IT engineers, SMEs, stakeholders.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations
Experience in AI / Deep Learning for text/image/video analytics preferred
Experience in Cloud Computing and data streaming preferred
Team & Business Skills
Consistently improves communication skills, both verbally and in written materials
Demonstrated creativity in problem solving
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction.
Demonstrated willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Flexibility in task switching.
For instance, when there is urgent requests or change of projects, can accommodate the changes without protesting
Mindful of iterations and quality check in a smaller team, before presenting results to larger audience
Raises critical issues when detected
Educational Requirements:
Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science, economics, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering or other STEM fields)
Work Experience
5+ years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field.
(e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / data engineer).
Work Days:
Normal work days are Monday through Friday.
Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.
Work Hours:
Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.
Not ready to
","['excel', 'git', 'rstudio', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'classif', 'data', 'kpi', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'econom', 'busi', 'normal', 'etl', 'recommend']",3.0,"['excel', 'git', 'r', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'classif', 'data', 'kpi', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'econom', 'busi', 'normal', 'etl', 'recommend']"
DS,"Data Scientist
If you are a Data Scientist with experience, please read on!
What You Will Be Doing
Developing algorithms for building information for example, spatial and natural language
Develop data analysis algorithms for Facility Operations
Develop data collection and management modules
Develop low maintenance code
Be a technical authority to drive best practices for critical programs
Work with facility managers to assess applications
What You Need for this Position
Bachelors in Computer Science or equivalent experience
3+ years of Software Development using Python, Matlab or similar
Scripting using JavaScript/AJAX
Passion for investigative product insight
Machine Learning, NLP, pattern recognition
MS Windows Server or similar
Relational database management systems, MYSQL
Agile Project Management
Great communication and quality teamwork.
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['mysql', 'javascript', 'matlab', 'python']","['machine learning', 'commun', 'data', 'nlp']",1.0,"['sql', 'javascript', 'matlab', 'python', 'machine learning', 'commun', 'data', 'nlp']"
DS,"DescriptionThe Data Scientist 2 uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Data Scientist 2 work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.ResponsibilitiesHumana's Clinical Trend and Analytics Team is seeking a Data Scientist.
The Clinical Trend and Analytics team uses advanced scientific techniques, forecasting, and machine learning to predict financial and clinical outcomes in order to guide investments that improve health outcomes and reduce costs.
The Data Scientist leverages large sets of structured and unstructured data to develop tactical and strategic insights.
The work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.
Consumers expect more personalized and holistic experiences from their health partners.?
Ideally, this position would be located in Louisville, KY.
View the EEO is the Law poster.If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.Humana Safety and SecurityHumana will never ask, nor require a candidate provide money for work equipment and network access during the application process.
",[None],"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide Data Science leadership to the customer success team, sales and executive team
Unlock new opportunities for growth by discovering insights, automate processes, and predictive modeling
Execute Product driven data projects from database to analysis to insights to presentations
Write efficient SQL code and build effective Excel models to fuel analytical frameworks and dashboards
Perform variance analyses against critical benchmarks to identify the root cause behind feature adoption and usage trends
Build/modify/maintain dashboards and reports to regularly communicate key metrics and KPIs
REQUIREMENTS
Minimum 4+ years of experience using data to facilitate Product decisions – Product Analytics role or Growth roles
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Business/Economics, STEM Degrees or similar fields
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"Position Summary
The Data Scientist uses real estate industry consumer data, statistical and financial concepts, and open source tools to uncover trends, stories and business insights.
Essential Functions
Use consumer data, statistical and financial concepts, and open source tools to uncover trends, stories and business insights.
Have a deep understanding of Machine Learning models and help create performance reporting around those models.
Partner with Finance/Marketing/Product teams to find opportunities and suggest data driven solutions.
Craft statistical/ machine learning models to gain insights from data and communicate results to partners.
Tell stories that describe analytical results and insights in meetings of all sizes with diverse audiences.
Performing ad-hoc analysis using SQL/R and presenting results in a clear manner.
Identify, research, and analyze new data sources to improve model accuracy.
Contributes to market share growth and profitability by recommending changes to products, pricing, risk management.
Performs all functions according to established policies, procedures, regulatory and accreditation requirements, as well as applicable professional standards.
Note: The essential functions are intended to describe the general content of and requirements of this position and are not intended to be an exhaustive statement of duties.
Specific tasks or responsibilities will be documented as outlined by the incumbent's immediate manager.
Scope and Complexity
Physical Demands/Environment Factors (Examples Listed)
Requires extensive sitting with periodic standing and walking.
May be required to lift up to 20 pounds.
Requires significant use of personal computer, phone and general office equipment.
Needs adequate visual acuity, ability to grasp and handle objects.
Needs ability to communicate effectively through reading, writing, and speaking in person or on telephone.
May require off-site travel; possible out-of-state travel
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree with 5 years of work experience, involving quantitative data analysis and complex problem solving.
Deep understanding of statistics (e.g.
Hypothesis testing, Regression trees etc.)
Have complete command of SQL, and either Python or R, along with some experience with visualization software like Power BI or libraries in R.
Have extensive experience directly querying multi-terabyte-sized data sets (with Azure Data Warehouse) including clickstream data (like Google Analytics) and raw data from non-standard platforms.
Have practice with terminology, and measurement issues related to experimentation, along with a history of applying advanced analytical approaches to derive insights from the data.
Have a strong written, verbal, and visual communication skills to concisely communicate in a way that provides context, offers insights, and minimizes misinterpretation.
Self-motivated to stay on top of new tools, technologies and concepts
Truth seeking, dispassionate in analysis of data, and able to follow the story and conclusion to where the evidence leads
Must be able to work on multiple projects concurrently, have a bias towards driving actions and results, and maintain a healthy balance between aggressive delivery and analytical rigor
Preferred Qualifications
Master's degree or higher in a quantitative field (e.g.
science, engineering, economics, finance, statistics, or similar) and have 2 years of work experience involving quantitative data analysis and complex problem solving.
Previous real estate experience a plus
","['power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'r', 'python', 'azur']","['risk', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'risk', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Qualifications
Master's degree in computer science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or any other technical discipline.
3+ years of software development experience in: Pyspark, Python, Hive.
2+ years Machine Learning / Data Science in real world use cases with deep understanding of the algorithms.
Exposure to Neural Network models such as LSTM, RNN, CNN and Auto encoders.
Understanding of CICD pipeline and software version control
Required Skills:
Has ability to synthesize, research and combine ideas into a creating a machine learning model for business problems.
Advanced degree in computer science, mathematics, statistics or any relevant quantitative field.
Deep understanding and hands-on industry experience of Machine Learning algorithms, deep learning, dimension reductions, model evaluation metrics, time series models, natural language processing, clustering
Ability to balance between speed, reliability and interpretability.
Experience designing and implementing software solutions using Python/Pyspark.
Has knowledge of product deployment using the concepts of DevOps leveraging CI/CD pipeline.
Ability to tune system/ model performance using engineering principles and machine learning concepts to achieve desired scalability and throughput.
","['pyspark', 'hive', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'lstm', 'natural language processing', 'cnn', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['pyspark', 'hive', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'lstm', 'nlp', 'cnn', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Overview
BRG experts provide sophisticated economic, financial, and analytical advice across a wide range of disciplines, including antitrust and competition policy, complex damages, finance, healthcare, intellectual property, restructuring, valuation, and workforce issues.
BRG Healthcare Analytics professionals bring extensive industry experience to deliver data-driven, independent, and innovative approaches to complex legal, regulatory, and business challenges.
BRG Healthcare Analytics professionals bring extensive industry experience to deliver data-driven, independent, and innovative approaches to complex legal, regulatory, and business challenges.
The Junior Staff position is a mid-level consulting staff position.
This position requires a highly motivated problem solver with solid analytical ability, strong organizational skills, and a desire to advance within the organization.
The work of a Junior Staff member will involve both execution and oversight of engagement work streams that may be either qualitative or quantitative in nature.
Headquartered in Emeryville, California, BRG currently has over 40 offices across the United States and internationally.
Responsibilities
• Plan and manage of all aspects of small to medium-sized client engagements and discrete segments of larger projects.
• Delegate assignments to staff, instruct and monitor progress, and review work product for completeness and accuracy.
• Develop analyses and financial models using transactional data and/or financial data.
• Generate client deliverables and make valuable contributions to expert reports.
• Manage client relationships and communicate results and work product as appropriate.
• Demonstrate creativity and efficient use of relevant software tools, analytical methods, and computer models to develop solutions.
• Prioritize assignments and responsibilities in order to meet goals and deadlines.
Qualifications
• A degree (e.g., BS, BBA, MBA, M.A., M.S., etc.)
with a focus in business analytics (accounting, finance, economics, information systems) or equivalent experience.
• 2-6 years of work experience with a focus on data analytics.
• Proven capability with MS Excel and relational database program(s) (e.g., SAS, SPSS, Stata, MS SQL Server, MS Access).
A desire to expand those capabilities is required, as is the ability to train others to use such tools.
• Desire and ability to manage processes and projects.
• Commitment to producing high-quality analysis and attention to detail.
• Strong verbal and written communication skills.
• Desire to work within a team environment.
BRG is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.
All qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.
41 CFR 60-1.35(c)
","['excel', 'sql', 'spss', 'c', 'sa']","['healthcar', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom', 'segment']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'spss', 'c', 'sa', 'healthcar', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom', 'segment']"
DS,"The ideal candidate's favorite words are learning, data, scale, and agility.
You will leverage your strong collaboration skills and ability to extract valuable insights from highly complex data sets to ask the right questions and find the right answers.
Responsibilities
Analyze raw data: assessing quality, cleansing, structuring for downstream processing
Design accurate and scalable prediction algorithms
Collaborate with engineering team to bring analytical prototypes to production
Generate actionable insights for business improvements
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, etc.)
At least 1 - 2 years' of experience in quantitative analytics or data modeling
Deep understanding of predictive modeling, machine-learning, clustering and classification techniques, and algorithms
Fluency in a programming language (Python, C,C++, Java, SQL)
Familiarity with Big Data frameworks and visualization tools (Cassandra, Hadoop, Spark, Tableau)
","['spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'java']","['big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'cluster', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'java', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'cluster', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Publishers then have more time to do what they do best: create content.
This will be the lead role with primary responsibility for developing strategies and algorithms aimed primarily at optimizing publisher revenue.
This will include developing strategies around ad delivery, publisher content, and ad network selection to name a few.
You will accomplish these goals in a data-driven manner by developing and implementing predictive algorithms and deriving insights from big data.
You will also collaborate with other teams within the organization, communicate findings to key stakeholders and evangelize data-driven business decisions.
Responsibilities:
Manage multiple projects in parallel and oversee their completion from start to finish, setting goals and project milestones
Promote best practices for statistical analyses and machine learning modeling
Help determine what metrics are critical to the organization, construct predictive models to optimize those metrics, and build out those projects into useful data products
Communicate results to key stakeholders
Basic Qualifications:
Graduate degree in a quantitative discipline (PhD preferred)
10+ years of work experience in advanced data analytics/data science
2+ years of experience managing/leading a team of data scientists with a track record of overseeing multiple data science and machine learning projects at all stages: from idea generation to objectives formulation to implementation and deliverables
2+ years of advertising or marketing related work
Experience with data exploration, data cleaning, implementation of advanced statistical and machine learning algorithms (e.g., time-series analysis and forecasting, clustering, and advanced classification and regression techniques such as decision trees, neural networks, deep learning, and ensemble algorithms), as well as rigorous model validation and evaluation
Fluency in Python and at least 1 of the following programming languages: Java, R, C, C++, or SAS
2-5+ years of experience with design and management of relational (SQL) and data warehouse paradigms; familiarity with Google Cloud Platform a plus
Knowledge of Spark, Cassandra or Hadoop is a plus
Excellent interpersonal and leadership skills with the ability to develop and guide team members to deliver actionable results
Excellent verbal, written and formal presentation skills
Comfortable interacting across multiple teams and management levels within the organization
Previous background in the media landscape (linear, digital, or social) is a plus
What you can expect in return:
Full-Time, Salaried Position
Medical, Dental, and Vision benefits
The opportunity to be part of something BIG
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.
This role is not eligible for visa sponsorship
","['spark', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'c', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'neural network', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['spark', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'google cloud', 'c', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'nn', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.We believe that great outcomes are everything.
* Participate in the development of documentation.
* This role conducts experimentation in various data science techniques, developing, executing, and maintaining scripts and prototypes to analyze, interpret, visualize, and gain knowledge from numerous data sets individually or in combination to meet mission needs.
* Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
* Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
* Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
* Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
* Experience using the statistical computer language Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
#CJ
","['jira', 'python']","['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['jira', 'python', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns Combine models through ensemble modeling Present information using data visualization techniques Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data Qualifications Business acumen and communication skills to gather the data requirement from the business 3+ years of related professional work experience Theoretical and execution background of Data Science with specific focus on Machine Learning Experience testing and validating models and assessing the trade-offs between different modeling techniques and specifications Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources Strong analytics and problem-solving skills needed.
Can take the data and come up with a solution specific to the use case Experience in applying statistical learning methods to solve business problems Experience working with complex andor large data sets Practical ability to visualize data, communicate the data, and utilize it effectively Programming skills - 2 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar) Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig, Sqoop.
Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, Hbase and SQL databases and unstructured data stores Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Nave Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, etc.
NLP NLU experience preferred.
","['nosql', 'pig', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hive']","['bay', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'nn', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['nosql', 'pig', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hive', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'nn', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"MULTIPLE POSITIONS AVAILABLE
Position Title: Data Scientist III
Position Responsibilities:
Interact with various software and business groups to develop an understanding of their business requirements and operational processes.
Build quantitative mathematical models to represent a wide range of cloud software optimization, capacity planning and logistics systems.
Implement these models and tools through the use of modeling languages and by engineering code in software languages such as Python, Scala, Java, C++, C# or C. Gather data required for analysis and mathematical model building by writing ad-hoc scripts and database queries.
Perform quantitative, economic, and numerical analysis of the performance of these systems under uncertainty using statistical and optimization tools.
Create computer simulations to support operational decision-making.
Identify areas with potential for improvement and work with internal teams to generate requirements that can realize these improvements.
Design optimal or near optimal solution methodologies to be used by in-house decision support tools and software.
Create software prototypes to verify and validate the devised solutions methodologies; integrate the prototypes into production systems using standard software development tools and methodologies.
Basic Qualifications
Position Requirements:
Masters or foreign equivalent in Operations Research, Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, or a related technical field, and six months of research or work experience as a Research Scientist, Data Scientist, Research Assistant, Software Engineer, or a related occupation.
Five years of research or work experience must include each of the following: programming with a major programming language such as Python, Java, C, C# or C++; experience with SQL and Statistical Computing tools R, SPSS, or SAS; clustering and time series modeling; experience developing and optimizing models; graph analytics; experience with the application of statistics and probability in analyzing test results; experience with design, application, and optimization of complex high dimensional models; and experience with problem solving and data analysis on large datasets.
Preferred Qualifications
Applicants must meet all of the above listed requirements for this position.
","['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'spss', 'c', 'sa', 'java']","['probabl', 'data', 'cluster', 'logist', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'spss', 'c', 'sa', 'java', 'probabl', 'data', 'cluster', 'logist', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Â
Role: Data Scientist
Position â Fulltime/Permanent
Â
Details:
The ideal candidate should have strong programing experience in Python and Spark..
Responsibilities:
Perform data modelling using advanced statistical analysis, unstructured data processing and developing predictive models.
Implement statistical and data mining techniques e.g hypothesis testing, machine learning and retrieval processes on a large amount of data to identify trends, patterns and other retrieval information.
Implement different machine learning techniques: Generalized Linear and Non- Linear models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, Gradient Boosted Machines, Text Mining, Deep Learning, Neural Networks, Supervised and Unsupervised methods using python and spark.
Lead the development of high -performance algorithms for predictive analytics, Testing and implementing these algorithms in scalable, product-ready code
Work with machine learning frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, H2O, Keras, TensorFlow.
Perform model evaluation, tuning and performance and scalability of scientific techniques and communicate the findings
Technology Skillset required:
Python
Spark
Pyspark
HIVE
SQL
Good to have
Neural Networking
H2O
Keras
TensorFlow
","['h2o', 'kera', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'data mining', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'tune', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'time series', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['h2o', 'kera', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'tune', 'supervis', 'nn', 'time series', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Scope:
Data Scientist to help build classification, regression ML models for predictive analytics and anomaly detection
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for the Customer Success team
Must have DS skills:
Data cleaning, Data wrangling, Data Visualization, Intellectual Curiosity, Business acumen, Communication Skills, Probability and Statistics, Machine Learning
Experience building (from scratch) Machine Learning (ML) models that can be put to production (with the support of data engineering and S.W engineering teams)
Professional experience building machine learning models (candidates will need to articulate detail project experience from research, model selection, action and results)
Statistics knowledge
Tools/Environment must haves:
Azure Data-bricks environment/environment experience,
Python Programming skills – 3 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
SQL – 2- 3 years
Spark ML – domain knowledge
Visualization tools: Power BI or similar
Responsibilities:
Build machine-learning models
Create regression, classification models; Work with engineering teams to deploy robust, highly available decision pipelines based on your models.
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Combine models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Qualifications:
Business acumen and communication skills to gather the data requirement from the business
3+ years of related professional work experience
Theoretical and execution background of Data Science with specific focus on Machine Learning
Experience testing and validating models and assessing the trade-offs between different modeling techniques and specifications
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Strong analytics and problem-solving skills needed.
Can take the data and come up with a solution specific to the use case
Experience in applying statistical learning methods to solve business problems
Experience working with complex and/or large data sets
Practical ability to visualize data, communicate the data, and utilize it effectively
Programming skills – 2 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig, Sqoop.
Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, Hbase and SQL databases and unstructured data stores
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naïve Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, etc.
NLP / NLU experience preferred.
","['nosql', 'spark', 'pig', 'cassandra', 'power bi', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'bi', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'azur', 'hive']","['predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'probabl', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'clean', 'research', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali']",999.0,"['nosql', 'spark', 'pig', 'cassandra', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'azur', 'hive', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'probabl', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'clean', 'research', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali']"
DS,"Preventable illnesses still kill tens of thousands of people every year, however there is hope.
Through vaccines, public health prevention programs and data intelligence, the impact of the flu, pneumonia, measles, whooping cough, cervical cancer, and many more diseases is diminished.
The battle is fought every day to ensure that communities are prepared, proactive, and empowered for any event or outbreak from bioterrorism and newly emerging disease, such as COVID-19, to the old diseases that never left.
Your Role and Impact
You will work with the analytics team in developing machine learning algorithms to automate and scale a variety of processes and explore business use cases where machine learning algorithms can be implemented.
This is a great opportunity to join a team that is on the cutting edge of healthcare analytics.
About You
• You have a Masters or PhD in Applied Mathematics, Statistics or Computer Science
• You have experience with statistical computer languages (R, Python) and can manipulate data and draw insight and conclusions from large data sets
• You have experience developing advanced quantitative models using a variety of programs and software to support predictive assessments and other advanced mathematical techniques (ex.
Neural Network, Random Forest, linear regression)
• You have 5 or more years in predictive modeling and large data analysis (healthcare industry preferred)
• You can easily communicate business interpretations of data to a wide variety of audiences in easy-to-understand terms
• You enjoy working in a highly collaborative environment where bringing new ideas and fresh perspectives is part of the culture
• Benefits?
Ours are outstanding.
Some of the highlights include a 100% company-paid medical plan, 401(k) matching, work-from-home perks, casual dress code, and an amazing amount of paid time off.
You'll be choosing a long-standing industry leader who has a 32+ year history but a start-up mentality.
And you'll be choosing to join a team of people determined to reduce the impact of preventable disease and empower people throughout the healthcare ecosystem worldwide.
-----
Must be a United States citizen or have authorization to work in the United States as defined by the Immigration Act of 1986.
Keywords:Predictive Analytics, Statistical Analysis, Data Analytics, Machine Learning
","['r', 'python']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Phoenix, AZ
Qualification:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or Business Analytics
Experience:
Master degree in business analytics will be accepted in lieu of experience
Technology:
Python/Algorithms, Machine Learning, NLP, Data Mining
Travel:
Role/Skills:
R, Python, SAS, SQL/Hive, Machine Learning (Predictive Modeling), Natural Language Processing, Cyber Security, Exploratory Data Analysis, Model Interpretability.
Responsibilities:
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'sa']","['data mining', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'nlp', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'sa', 'data mining', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'nlp', 'machine learning']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Experience in developing implementing data science models specifically time series experience.
Proven ability to do hands-on development using Python, Hive and Spark and delivering models into production
","['hive', 'spark', 'python']","['time series', 'data']",999.0,"['hive', 'spark', 'python', 'time series', 'data']"
DS,"VISION STATEMENT
Competitive annual salary
Excellent work-life balance
Flexible schedule available
PTO
A small executive team with promotion opportunities
A fun, casual work environment that encourages innovative thinkers
This position will collaborate with executives and other business departments to execute a variety of analytical projects to improve processes and create efficiencies.
PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyze complex data sets to reduce costs and improve customer experience.
Create systems for gathering, extracting, preparing data from multiple sources.
Evaluate call center services and consumer experiences with measurable data points.
Understand operational key performance indicators, report trends and patterns.
Effectively communicate analysis with proper measurements and testing.
Formulate enhancements through system optimizations and continual data analysis.
Champion process improvements assessing pre-and post-process change.
Collaborate across Operations, Compliance, IT, Finance, or other departments.
Display leadership through punctuality, professionalism while performing required duties.
Reinforce a workplace culture of positivity, inclusion, cooperation, and respect.
Other related duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS
Master's or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field.
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Proven experience solving complex business problems using Statistical and Machine Learning techniques.
Strong SQL and data-wrangling skills – experience building datasets from scratch.
Experience using statistical computer languages (Python, R) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working in a startup environment a plus.
MEASURE OF SUCCESS
Ability to understand business and applications, capture, organize and present data for making better decisions and creating competitive advantages.
Ability to enhance call center services and consumer applications with streamlined data components to improve services through effective measurement and analysis.
Ability to scope, manage and execute assigned projects with effective data visualization.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Experience:
Data Science: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Fully Remote
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
No weekends
https://www.soarenmanagement.com/
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"null
Title: Data Scientist
Duration: Full Time
Preferably looking for 8+ years of experience candidate.
SQL
Python
R language
Hadoop
Availability to Join:
Availability for the first Telephonic Interview:
Candidate must be authorized to work in the United States
","['hadoop', 'r', 'sql', 'python']",['data'],999.0,"['hadoop', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'data']"
DS,"The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience in developing and deploying deep learning models, designing and executing A/B tests, and creating integrated feedback mechanisms for test and learn.
POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with stakeholders to define objectives and measure success, establish KPIs and measurement methodologies
Provide expertise to non-analytical peers within Marketing, Product and Engineering
Develop experimental designs to support test and learn
Size the impact of the models on key business measures
Build machine learning models using Python which can recommend optimal product, offer, content and information.
Provide actionable insights to drive key decisions across the marketing organization using a range of analytical/statistical techniques from descriptive analysis to predictive/explanatory models
Be a self-starter, eager to learn, and motivated by a passion for developing the best possible solutions to problems
REQUIREMENTS:
MS or Ph.D. or equivalent experience in a quantitative field such as computer or data science, economics, applied statistics or life sciences
3+ years of experience in developing and deploying machine learning and deep learning models in a professional setting
Knowledgeable about recent advancement in the field and possess a strong research mindset
Domains of expertise should include at least one of the following: collaborative filtering, content-based recommender systems, link-click prediction, NLP for information retrieval, computer vision or predictive customer targeting.
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as Tensorflow, Keras and/or Pytorch and developing statistical studies in Python/Jupyter
Advanced SQL skills
Practical experience with distributed data platforms: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, SPARK
Usage of cloud compute solutions, eg.
AWS, GCS or Azure
Experience with version control systems such as Github
Hands-on experience with Unix
","['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'aw', 'github', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'jupyt', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'computer vision', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'kpi', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",2.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'aw', 'github', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'jupyt', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'kpi', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
DS,"Purpose of Job
Leads a team of Data Scientists responsible for advanced analytical solutions that include predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to that generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications.
Utilizes technical acumen and in-depth understanding of business processes and practices to influence the creation and execution of operational and strategic plans.
Partners with IT and other areas to build major improvements to analytical processes and systems.
Advises Senior Leadership on the development of data science solutions and long-term goals and or strategies.
Maintains relationships with academic and industry thought leaders to ensure the enterprise has access to cutting-edge thinking and technologies.
Job Requirements
Collaborates with other analytical leaders to fulfill the strategic direction of the business through data and information exploration, research of emerging technologies or analytical techniques and long-term defined/project specific strategic assignments.
Identifies additional resource needs ranging from IT investments, 3rd party support or additional analysts.
Understands the business direction, environment and strategies, to identify and recommend solutions that influence decision makers and drive change.
Directs the design and construction of large and complex data sets from large amounts of structured and unstructured data (internal and external) to enable analytical solutions.
Builds and leads a high performing team of experts in advanced analytics.
Develops team reputation as highly skilled experts in the field of data science.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field OR 6 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
8 or more years of experience in predictive modeling, large data analysis and computer science
3 or more years of direct management experience
Experience in stochastic modeling, machine learning, and other advanced mathematical techniques (e.g., neural nets, simulation, graph analysis)
Expert in at least one compiled language (e.g., Java, C) and one dynamic scripting language (e.g., Python, PERL, Ruby)
A strong track record of communicating results, insights, and technical solutions to Senior Executive Management (or equivalent)
*Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
This will take approximately 5 minutes.
Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.
Preferred Requirements:
Evidence of successful development and implementation of data science solutions
Prior experience working in an IT organization
2+ years of prior people management experience
Experience of working in a cloud environment
Understanding of model risk governance as laid out in SR 11-7
For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have managers approval prior to posting.
","['python', 'net', 'cloud', 'perl', 'rubi', 'c', 'java']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['python', 'net', 'cloud', 'perl', 'rubi', 'c', 'java', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Data Scientist
10558
Phoenix, AZ
2/11/2020 1:10:00 PM
IT
Contractor - W2
Preferably a MS or a PHD degree in computer science, computer engineering, or other technical discipline
Data Science : Must have deep knowledge of Natural language processing and techniques, Voice and Text data engineering and developing models for NLP.
Capability of writing, debugging and compiling codes in multiple Machine Learning environment and not limited to Python/Pyspark, Apache Spark, R Spark etc.
At least 2-4 years of experience in the following areas.
Complete grip on Python environment and libraries (scikit, nltk, pandas and numpy).
Working knowledge of R & Spark is a plus.
Proven experience of solving complex business problems using Machine Learning techniques like Regression, Classification, Supervised or Unsupervised Recommenders, Deep iterative learning, Neural Nets etc.
Deep knowledge of Statistics and Math’s, and ability to dissect problems from the first principle.
Exposure to fields like Linear Algebra, Bayesian Statistics, Group theory is desirable.
Experience of working in Distributed/Cluster computing environment is desirable.
Ability to work in cross functional teams.
Excellent data presentation and visualization skills
Hands on knowledge of SQL/ Hive QL is desirable
2+ years of software development experience with be a plus
Ability to effectively interpret technical and business objectives and challenges and articulate solutions
Willingness to learn new technologies and exploit them to their optimal potential
At the core of Software Engineering
Agile Practices
Porting/Software Configuration
Programming Languages and Frameworks
Business Analysis
Analytical Thinking
Business Product Knowledge
Job Requirements
","['nltk', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hive', 'numpi']","['regress', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'natural language processing', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nltk', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hive', 'numpi', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'nlp', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Jr. Data Scientist/Engineer
Duration: Long Term
Interview mode: Telephonic and Webcam
This is a Jr. Role client need 2-3 years of experience
Develops and/or uses algorithms and statistical predictive models.
Creates models using ML / AI techniques to predict risk and identify actionable insights.
Experience with common data science toolkits - Scikit-learn, TensorFlow, Spark MLlib, etc.
Collaborative approach with a focus on teamwork shared success
Familiarity with Git (in GitHub, GitLab, or Bitbucket)
Experience working in a Big Data environment
Great verbal and written communication / presentation skills
Excellent applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Data-oriented, problem solving personality
BS or MS in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, Analytics or another related field
","['spark', 'github', 'excel', 'git', 'tensorflow', 'mllib', 'scikit']","['risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'github', 'excel', 'git', 'tensorflow', 'mllib', 'scikit', 'risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Role : Data Scientist
Client : Amex / Impetus
Rate : $50-$52
JD :
At least 6+ years of IT experience.
Experience in developing & implementing data science models specifically time series experience.
Proven ability to do hands-on development using Python, Hive and Spark and delivering models into production
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $45.00 - $50.00 per hour
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['hive', 'spark', 'python']","['time series', 'data']",999.0,"['hive', 'spark', 'python', 'time series', 'data']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
+ Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
+ Build 'smart' systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
+ Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution
In the first year this role will focus on the following
+ Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
+ Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
+ Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
+ Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
+ Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers
Required Qualifications
+ Master's Degree + 3 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 5 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
+ Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
+ Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
+ Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ Master's Degree or PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
",[None],"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Hands on experience in predictive analytics and statistical tools, machine learning algorithms and big data tools
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets using various regression, classification or clustering ML approaches
Create visualizations to visually represent data for consumption by different audiences
",[None],"['regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Salary
$70,380.80 - $105,571.20 Annually
AZ 85296, AZ
Job Type
Full Time
Department
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job Number
20-0191
Closing
7/3/2020 11:59 PM Arizona
But there is more work to be done!
The Economic Development Data Scientist reports to the Economic Development Deputy Director.
Essential Duties and Job Responsibilities :
Gathering, conducting, analyzing, and interpreting research, making recommendations based on the data, and providing research results in a form that can be interpreted and understood by appropriate stakeholders
Building automated pipelines to collect, analyze and present information and make it easily accessible to internal and external stakeholders
Interpreting data, analysis and insight into maps, reports and presentations
Data mining, cleansing and warehousing
Analyzing and manipulating data to generate insight
Working with internal and external stakeholders to collect and analyze data for economic development related request
Evaluating and implementing effective data management and visualization tools based on industry standards and best practices
Other duties as assigned.
About You
Technology and automation tools and workflows, and data visualization programs
Data quality, transformation and data asset management and platform APIs, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Objective-C and other programming languages and general programming concepts
Commercial real estate markets, workforce characteristics, and taxation
Public policy related to economic development
Microsoft Office products, Customer Relationship Management systems and other relevant software
...and you are skilled in:
Navigating undocumented and new data sources, consistently delivering accurate data
Automating recurring analysis and building reusable processes to speed up future analysis
Planning and coordinating multiple projects and activities
Written and verbal communication regarding technical and complex concepts and the ability to present in a way that can be understood by others who are not experts in those areas.
Bachelor's Degree in Data Science/Analytics, Computer Information Systems, Economics, Urban Planning, Finance, Business or a closely related field
A valid Arizona driver's license
Up For the Challenge?
Let's get this adventure started!
This position is an At-Will position and is FLSA Exempt - ineligible for overtime compensation.
ADA and Other Requirements :
Physical Demands and Working Conditions - Sedentary Work:
Also requires fingering, grasping, feeling, talking, hearing, seeing and repetitive motions.
For more information on additional benefits, please Click Here .
","['javascript', 'c', 'microsoft']","['data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'financ', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['javascript', 'c', 'microsoft', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'financ', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Collaborate with business domain subject matter experts in various departments to understand the problem and the objectives.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Research and devise innovative statistical models for data analysis
Build predictive models, neural networks, and machine-learning algorithms
Combined models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Propose data science solutions and strategies to business problems
Ensure solutions are feasible to implement and achieve the objectives.
BS in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Math or related discipline; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is desirable
Prior experience as a Data Scientist
Minimum 2 years of experience in data mining, machine learning, neural networks or other data science technique
Strong proficiency with R, SQL, and Python including the Tensorflow, Keras, and XGBoost libraries
Experience with Excel and PowerPoint
Strong quantitative, math, and problem solving skills
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Strong business acumen and ability to interface effectively with management team
Curious and creative mind that seeks continuous improvement
#LI-SB1
Bachelor's Degree
","['kera', 'xgboost', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'python']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['kera', 'xgboost', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Core Responsibilities
Leads the execution of large scale, more complex analytics projects.
Applies significant quality control and risk assessment of the model, methodologies, outputs, and processes for major data science projects.
Leads and executes deep dive diagnostic, predictive, and prescriptive analytics to support data-driven business decision making.
Creates alternative model approaches to assess complex model design and advance future capabilities.
Mentors and develops junior data scientists and analysts.
Identifies and diagnoses data inconsistencies and errors, documents data assumptions, and forages to fill data gaps.
Engages with senior leadership to understand and probe business processes in order to develop hypotheses.
Brings structure to requests and translates requirements into an analytic approach.
Guides test design, research design, and model validation.
Provides statistical consultation services.
Prepares and delivers insight presentations and action recommendations.
Communicates complex analytical findings and implications to business leaders.
Participates in special projects and performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Minimum of eight years related work experience in analytical roles.
Experience with data wrangling required - Programming skills to access, transform and prepare large scale data for statistical modeling.
Experience utilizing statistical and machine learning methods required.
Undergraduate degree in Analytics, Applied Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related analytical field of study or equivalent combination of training and experience.
Graduate degree preferred.
It starts with values.
Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return.
And so can you.
Let’s make it count.
Inclusion Statement
",[None],"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",1.0,"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
DS,"The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Lead Data Scientist works on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial.
Responsibilities
The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
This role advises key executives to develop functional strategies (often segment specific) on matters of significance.
Exercises independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks, and works under minimal supervision, Uses independent judgment requiring analysis of variable factors and determining the best course of action.
+ Collaborate with key business leaders to understand business problems and formulate analytical solutions for problem solving as well as lead or collaborate with a team of data scientists, data analysts or big data engineers on analytical projects, proving benefits of solutions and helping with execution and measurement
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Act as an external facing business translator whose combined expertise in AI/ML and analytics will enable the incorporation of these practices to drive data driven decision in practice
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Deep dives across member populations to determine opportunities for improved timing or type of intervention
+ Advanced predictive analytics to help optimize the touchpoint patterns following these deepdives
+ Serve as a key participant of a cross-functional, collaborative team focused on develop consumer-centric strategies that drive value to the member and the business
Required Qualifications
+ PhD + 2 years' experience, Master's Degree + 4 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 6 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program.
+ 2+ years' experience in project, process or people leadership
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Successful demonstrated experience in working on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial
+ Advanced programming experience in Python, R, or SAS
+ Experience in creating analysis, projections, models, and presentations to support business
+ Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
+ Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks
+ Ability to works under minimal supervision, using independent judgment
+ Ability to communicate statistical & complex concepts in a simplified manner
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
+ NLP Experience
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
","['r', 'sa', 'python']","['segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'sa', 'python', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Role:Data scientist with python
contract
skills:: Python,pandas,numpy,jupiter
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
","['numpi', 'python']",['data'],999.0,"['numpi', 'python', 'data']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Data Scientist
HIGHLIGHTS
Position Type:Contract (6 Months)
Hourly/Salary: $70-80/hour on W2
Scope:
Data Scientist to help build classification, regression ML models for predictive analytics and anomaly detection
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for the Customer Success team
Must have DS skills:
Data cleaning, Data wrangling, Data Visualization, Intellectual Curiosity, Business acumen, Communication Skills, Probability and Statistics, Machine Learning
Experience building (from scratch) Machine Learning (ML) models that can be put to production (with the support of data engineering and S.W engineering teams)
Professional experience building machine learning models (candidates will need to articulate detail project experience from research, model selection, action and results)
Statistics knowledge
Tools/Environment must haves:
Azure Data-bricks environment/environment experience,
Python Programming skills – 3 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
SQL – 2- 3 years
Spark ML – domain knowledge
Visualization tools: Power BI or similar
Responsibilities:
Build machine-learning models
Create regression, classification models; Work with engineering teams to deploy robust, highly available decision pipelines based on your models.
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Combine models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Qualifications:
Business acumen and communication skills to gather the data requirement from the business
3+ years of related professional work experience
Theoretical and execution background of Data Science with specific focus on Machine Learning
Experience testing and validating models and assessing the trade-offs between different modeling techniques and specifications
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Strong analytics and problem-solving skills needed.
Can take the data and come up with a solution specific to the use case
Experience in applying statistical learning methods to solve business problems
Experience working with complex and/or large data sets
Practical ability to visualize data, communicate the data, and utilize it effectively
Programming skills – 2 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig, Sqoop.
Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, Hbase and SQL databases and unstructured data stores
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naïve Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, etc.
NLP / NLU experience preferred.
","['nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'power bi', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'bi', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'azur', 'hive']","['predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'probabl', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'clean', 'research', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali']",999.0,"['nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'azur', 'hive', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'probabl', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'clean', 'research', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali']"
DS,"Role: Data Scientist Contractor- 6 months (ext.
Data Science projects:
Sales forecasting and revenue forecast – using multiple regression
ML projects for Customer Success: Predict customer attrition; use several data points to predict attrition/ or will they renew
Models:
Classification, Regression models primarily
Key skills needed :
Data cleaning, Data wrangling, Data Visualization, Intellectual Curiosity, Business acumen, Communication Skills, Probability and Statistics, Machine Learning
Tools/Environment must haves:
Azure Databricks environment/environment experience,
Python Programming skills – 3 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
SQL – 2- 3 years
Spark ML – domain knowledge
Visualization tools: Power BI or similar
","['spark', 'power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'panda', 'python', 'azur']","['probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['spark', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'azur', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"An amazing Senior Leadership opportunity to join an innovative organization
that has 60 years in business and a national presence, currently building out
their Data Science practice and looking for a Principal/Senior Data Scientistt
join their leadership team with a strong focus on servant leadership and
utilizing the newest technologies to successfully guide business decisions.
Scientist, primary responsibilities include:
Strong ability to provide thought leadership in algorithmic and process
innovations, contribute to creativity in solving unconventional problems
Advanced knowledge of working with large, complex data sets.
Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements
specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and
presentations.
Passion for work on advanced analytics areas (i.e.
deep learning and
complex statistical data analysis)
Provide business recommendations and interaction with senior leadership
and other business leaders using effective presentations of findings,
including visual displays of quantitative information
Research and develop internal capabilities to enhance the skill sets on
latest data science developments, work towards producing innovative
solutions to the existing challenges
Qualifications:
Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science,
economics, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial
engineering, or other STEM fields) AND
5+ years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field.
(e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / data engineer).
Raises critical issues when detected
Experience with writing SQL queries, performing basic conversion and
transformations
Experience with usage of R/RStudio, Python, Jupyter Notebook
Ability to run standard model algorithms in Python, to perform
classification/regression, clustering, basic text analytics, image
recognition, etc.
Experience in AI / Deep Learning for text/image/video analytics and/or
cloud Computing and/or data streamingpreferred
Must be authorized to work in the United States without restrictions or
the need of sponsorship.
For immediate consideration email your most resume to .
","['rstudio', 'sql', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'classif', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",3.0,"['r', 'sql', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'classif', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
DS,"Job DescriptionAs a member of the Enterprise Data & Analytics Team, the Data Scientist is an everyday partner with multiple departments, including Global Marketing, Category Management, Shared Services & Finance, Global Technology, and Business Unit Leadership.
This is a unique opportunity to work on a new, growing team within a large organization.The Data Scientist is responsible for delivering advanced analytics projects that drive business results.
The ideal candidate should possess the ability to contribute to all aspects of project work, including interpreting business questions and desired outcomes, selecting the appropriate methodology, data cleaning, exploratory data analysis, model building, and creation of polished deliverables that are suitable for internal and external presentation.We are looking for an individual who is a proven problem solver with exceptional critical thinking ability.
The candidate should have a high sense of curiosity and be comfortable with ambiguity when faced with a difficult challenge.
Additionally, the candidate should possess the abilities to collaborate with others and simply and effectively communicate complex concepts with a non-technical audience.RESPONSIBILITIES/ACCOUNTABILITIES:* Develop advanced analytics and predictive models from design through implementation in the areas of pricing and promotion, marketing, merchandising, and other areas of the business as needed* Utilize data mining and statistical techniques to derive business value from store, product, operations, financial, and customer transactional data* Clearly and concisely explain complex analytical findings to non-analytical peers and business leaders* Provide a strong analytical voice to the rest of the business and be an advocate for using analytics to solve problems and create business value* Conduct ad-hoc analyses as required* Other duties as assignedKNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND OTHER QUALIFICATIONS REQUIRED:* Working knowledge of R, Python, or other analytical programming language* Ability to query large data sets using SQL or Spark; experience with cloud-based environments preferred* Experience using Data visualization software such as Tableau or Power BI* Working knowledge of statistical and machine learning techniques such as regression, time series forecasting, clustering, optimization, etc.
* Strong interpersonal skills, including the ability to communicate the business benefits of analytics* Availability to travel up to 25% of the timeEDUCATION/TRAINING REQUIRED:* Bachelor's degree required, preferably with a quantitative focus (Statistics, Business Analytics, Data Science, Math, Economics, etc.
","['spark', 'power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['regress', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['spark', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'regress', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Data Scientist - Sr
FLSA Classification: Full Time, Exempt
Summary
Responsibilities/Requirements
Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases visualized through multi-dimensional interfaces.
Handle processing and index requests against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams.
Possess strong mathematical skills along with an extensive Data Scientist with Geospatial / Machine Learning background.
Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree with 8-10 years of relevant experience, Master’s Degree with 6-8 years, or PhD with 3-5 years.
Clearance
TS with current SCI or SCI eligibility
Current CI Poly or eligibility
",[None],"['classif', 'data', 'geospati', 'visual', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['classif', 'data', 'geospati', 'visual', 'machine learning']"
DS,"People who love what they do and who they do it for.
Providing consulting services in operational support, intelligence collection, reporting, and data governance, R2C is a leader in delivering solutions for high priority national security concerns.
Are you ready for a change?
R2C is seeking Data Scientists to support a client's technical requirements on a mission focused program within a challenging, dynamic setting located in the Washington Metropolitan Area.
Almost all companies say they have a culture of inclusiveness and that they value employee input, but R2C puts that statement to work every day.
It’s time for a change.
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph
Participate with iterative software development teams
Design, develop, and test code for a production system and demonstration capabilities
Develop iterative screen mock-ups
Provide demonstrations and detailed walk through to technical and non-technical audiences
Develop technical documentation and briefing materials to support program
Prepare Design and implement advanced code and table configurations for complex data sets
Compile data analysis and conduct needs assessments using deployed tools
Stay current on enterprise metadata collection tools
Experience programming with Python, Linux, and Bash
Experience with machine learning techniques including natural language processing
Experience with analytic methods and tools in applied mathematics, data modeling or probability and statistics
Experience using advanced Microsoft Excel methods
Experience with SQL in Oracle
Experience presenting complex, technical findings
Experience working with diverse data types
Experience with version controls systems such as Github
Experience to cleanse and process (Extract, Transform, Load – ETL) large raw data sets
Experience with developing data visualizations
Experience with creative problem-solving skills to address procedural and administrative issues within the assigned problem set
Experience with web analytics processing and procedures
Familiarity with Amazon Web Services infrastructure and/or the Commercial Cloud Services (C2S) environment
Experience suing Apache Hadoop and/or Apache Spark stack for big data processing
Experience using Docker, Kubernetes, and/or other similar data visualization tools
Experience in Agile software development teams using scrum techniques
Located in Arlington, VA, R2C offers expertise on a variety of national security topics, with specific focus on operational support, technical operations, policies and management of large volumes of data, analysis of large amounts of data, & effective approaches to evaluating and sharing data, and innovative techniques for information collection.
R2C is dedicated to fostering, cultivating and preserving a culture of diversity and inclusion.
#CJ
","['kubernet', 'linux', 'spark', 'github', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'amazon web services', 'python', 'hadoop', 'docker', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['probabl', 'etl', 'big data', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['kubernet', 'linux', 'spark', 'github', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'aw', 'python', 'hadoop', 'docker', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'probabl', 'etl', 'big data', 'data', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Data Scientist - SME
FLSA Classification: Full Time, Exempt
Summary
Responsibilities/Requirements
Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases visualized through multi-dimensional interfaces.
Handle processing and index requests against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams.
Possess strong mathematical skills along with an extensive Data Scientist with Geospatial / Machine Learning background.
Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree with 10-12 years of relevant experience, Master’s Degree with 8-10 years, or PhD with 5-7 years.
Clearance
TS with current SCI or SCI eligibility
Current CI Poly or eligibility
",[None],"['classif', 'data', 'geospati', 'visual', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['classif', 'data', 'geospati', 'visual', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Job DescriptionJOB SUMMARY:As a member of the Enterprise Data & Analytics Team, the Data Scientist is an everyday partner with multiple departments, including Global Marketing, Category Management, Shared Services & Finance, Global Technology, and Business Unit Leadership.
This is a unique opportunity to work on a new, growing team within a large organization.The Manager is responsible for leading large-scale advanced analytics projects that drive business results.
The ideal candidate should possess the ability to lead all aspects of project work, including interpreting business questions and desired outcomes, selecting the appropriate methodology, data cleaning, exploratory data analysis, model building, and creation of polished deliverables that are suitable for internal and external presentation.We are looking for an individual who is a proven problem solver with exceptional critical thinking ability.
The candidate should have a high sense of curiosity and be comfortable with ambiguity when faced with a difficult challenge.
Additionally, the candidate should possess the abilities to collaborate with others and simply and effectively communicate complex concepts with a non-technical audience.RESPONSIBILITIES/ACCOUNTABILITIES:* Lead advanced analytics and predictive model development from design through implementation in the areas of retail, pricing and promotion, marketing, merchandising, and other areas of the business as needed* Utilize data mining and statistical techniques to derive business value from store, product, operations, financial, and customer transactional data* Clearly and concisely explain complex analytical findings to non-analytical peers and business leaders* Along with the Director and Senior Director, help to define how the Enterprise Data & Analytics team works with different business units to achieve desired outcomes* Provide a strong analytical voice to the rest of the business and be an advocate for using analytics to solve problems and create business value* Attract, retain, and develop other team members; provide feedback on areas for development* Conduct ad-hoc analyses as required* Other duties as assignedKNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND OTHER QUALIFICATIONS REQUIRED:* Demonstrated knowledge of R, Python, or other analytical programming language* Ability to query large data sets using SQL or Spark; experience with cloud-based environments preferred* Experience using Data visualization software such as Tableau or Power BI* Experience applying statistical and machine learning techniques such as regression, time series forecasting, clustering, optimization, etc.
* Strong interpersonal skills, including the ability to communicate the business benefits of analytics* Availability to travel up to 25% of the timeEDUCATION/TRAINING REQUIRED:* Bachelor's degree required, preferably with a quantitative focus (Statistics, Business Analytics, Data Science, Math, Economics, etc.
","['spark', 'power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['regress', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['spark', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'regress', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Title: Real World Science, Data Scientist
Working here means being entrepreneurial, thinking big and working together to make the impossible a reality.
Were focused on the potential of science to address the unmet needs of patients around the world.
The Real World Science & Digital team is a growing group within AstraZenecas global Evidence function which is driving the scientific use of Real World Data to accelerate the way patients access innovative medicines.
Real World Data Scientists who are successful in this role will work on challenging problems, using innovative approaches to accelerate the delivery of Real World Insights and Evidence for key internal and external stakeholders.
The ideal candidate for this role will bring a proven track record of delivering value through the leverage of routinely collected data from healthcare settings to provide health analytics and insights in a range of contexts including Public Health, Pharmaceutical Research and Development and Commercial/ Payer.
They will collaborate with colleagues in Epidemiology, Statistics and Payer, giving scientific and technical guidance on study design, RW data selection and best practice in RW data utilization.
In addition, they will assist in advancing and shaping AZs Real World Science data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors, informatics support for data acquisitions in a range of Therapeutic Areas.
The role will promote best practice in Real World Data Science across multiple domains, and/or stakeholder groups.
Typical Accountabilities
Collaborate with Payer and Epidemiology teams to maximise the value derived from large observational research data
Deliver analyses of data from EMR, claims and primary observational data required by TA RWE strategies
Support the development of IVS strategies and selection of optimised contact models for prioritised markets through analysis of RWD
Provide scientific guidance on the application of Real World Evidence and observational research data to address issues across the Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals business units
Provide technical input, options and directions to strategic decisions made by AZ observational study teams on study design, data partner selection and best practices in RWE data utilization
Support technical teams to provide access to analytical tools and develop visual analytics to enable self-serving applications for end customers
Provide clear technical input, options, and direction to strategic decisions on RWE platform and capability build
Assist in building a capability that becomes a source of sustained competitive advantage for AZ in identifying, acquiring, integrating and mining diverse RW data from multiple geographic and healthcare system sources to support evidence generation and real-world studies
Evaluate and assess strengths and weaknesses of external RW data sources, and potential partners for advancing the data strategy for specific therapeutic areas
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience
Key Relationships to reach solutions
Internal (to AZ or team)
Payer Evidence & Planning
Epidemiologists
Observational Research teams
Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals Medical Affairs Leads
Product and portfolio strategy
Medical Evidence Planning
Key experts in Data science /Analytics environments at AZ, and external partner organizations.
External (to AZ)
AZ RWS existing, prospective or potential partner organizations,
Key academic collaborators and thought leaders
Essential Requirements
PhD or MS in data science or other advanced degree in life sciences with post doctoral or other training/work in Medical/Health Informatics or related field
Experience in real-world evidence and familiarity with health economics/epidemiology, and quantitative science such as health outcome modelling
Expertise in EMR/Health IT, disease registries, and insurance claims databases
Expertise in clinical data standards, medical terminologies and controlled vocabularies used in healthcare data and ontologies (ICD9/10/ReadCode)
Experience in supporting pharmacoepidemiology studies with proven track record of advancing approaches with data science
Experience in Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) generation and execution for observational studies
Expertise in methods development and application using statistical languages such as R/Matlab/SAS/SQL/Hadoop/Python
Experience in advanced visualisation and visual analytics of routinely collected healthcare data
Desirable
Expertise in data mining approaches within healthcare settings generating insight from routinely collected healthcare data
A history of patient care or equivalent background of working at a patient care setting that allows the candidate to bring medical perspective into real-world evidence generation and observational studies
Demonstrated ability to build long-term relationships with stakeholders at senior levels, understand relevant scientific/business challenges at a deep level and translate into a programme of informatics activities to deliver defined value
Ability to lead & manage multi-disciplinary data science projects
Strong track record of delivering large, cross functional projects
Experience working in a global organization and delivering global solutions
Use of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence in the generation of hypotheses within Real World Data
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
If you are a Senior Data Analyst with RWE experience, please read on!
1.
2.
Opportunity to work on complex and interesting Medical Data
3.
Great growth opportunities and comp package!
What You Need for this Position
- RWE
- Real World Experience
- R
- Healthcare Analytics
- Predictive Modeling
- Predictive Analytics
- OHDSI
- OMOP
- Data Science
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
",['r'],"['predict', 'data', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['r', 'predict', 'data', 'healthcar']"
DS,"LOC_ROBERTS-Roberts Ctr Pediatric Research Req ID: 67961
Shift: Days
Employment Status: Regular - Full Time
Job Summary
), unstructured (narrative notes), high-frequency waveform data (e.g., ECG, EEG), time-series data, genomic data, and environmental/community data.
Job Responsibilities
1.
Implement/Develop NLP and/ML algorithms
Retrieve clinical data from Epic EHR system and relevant databases
Identify clinical findings and social factors through NLP and ML
Provide code and corresponding documents on a regular basis
Required Education and Experience
Required Education: Bachelors in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Preferred Education, Experience & Cert/Lic
Preferred Education: Masters in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Non-degree graduate coursework such as a graduate certificate in Analytics, Statistics, or Data Science preferred.
Additional Technical Requirements
• Innovative thinking • Strong communication and organizational skills
• Experience with relational SQL (and NoSQL) databases: Oracle, Postgres (and/or MongoDB).
• Experience with open-sourced tools.
• Experience with programming languages: Java, Python, R, etc.
Preferred:
o Experience database management and queries
o Experience developing NLP and/or ML tools.
VEVRAA Federal Contractor/Seeking priority referrals for protected veterans.
Talent Acquisition
2716 South Street, 6th Floor
Phone: 866-820-9288
Email:TalentAcquisition@email.chop.edu
","['nosql', 'java', 'sql', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'oracl', 'postgr']","['data', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['nosql', 'java', 'sql', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'oracl', 'data', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Prudential Center in downtown Newark, N.J. hosts more than 175 concerts, family shows and special events annually and is the fourth-ranked sports and entertainment venue in the U.S. by Pollstar and Billboard.
It is home to the New Jersey Devils, a renowned NHL franchise with three Stanley Cup championships and a proud, passionate fan base.
* Contribute to the development of basketball thought and workflow optimization of the department and the organization as a whole.QUALIFICATIONS (educational, experience and basic knowledge requirements):* Bachelor's degree or higher in technical discipline (sport science, data science, computer science, statistics, biostatistics, etc.
)* Master's Degree (applied mathematics, statistical analysis, statistical science, data science, biostatistics, etc.)
preferred* PhD Degree preferred* 3+ years of experience in a research or applied oriented position* Training in and/or experience with data engineering, ETL processes and database architecture (RStudio, Python, SQL, and the like) as well as with Data Visualization programs* Training in and/or experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques (e.g.
","['rstudio', 'sql', 'python']","['etl', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'etl', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Business Unit:
The ideal candidate will be passionate about data-driven decision making, able to perform analyses on large unstructured and structured data sets and quickly grasp new technologies.
The ideal candidate must be comfortable working in a dynamic team and addressing large audiences.
They will be applying data mining and modeling techniques, statistical analysis, and building high quality dashboards and presentations to provide insights to the executive leadership team.
They will provide input into strategy, analysis methods, and tool selection.
Core responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Uses analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, extracting impactful insights using sophisticated statistical techniques such as data analysis, data mining, optimization tools, and machine learning techniques and statistics (
Develops and executes statistical and mathematical solutions to business problems to support larger initiatives under the direction of senior team members.
Produce analysis of historical patterns in customer behaviors and product performance from complex real-world behavioral data.
Develop and deploy predictive models based on historical data that provide future predictions about customer behavior.
Constructs forecasts, recommendations and strategic/tactical plans based on applying data science techniques to business data.
Build results and presentations that report methodology and results of analysis.
Build customer centric models and optimization tools to support large scale projects that utilize online & offline data, structured & unstructured data, set top box data, and media/behavioral/attitudinal data.
Consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance.
Regular, consistent and punctual attendance.
Must be able to work nights and weekends, variable schedule(s) as necessary.
Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Win as a team - make big things happen by working together and being open to new insights
Get results and growth
Respect and promote inclusion and diversity
At least a Bachelor's degree in analytical field (Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Engineering)
2 to 5 years of proven experience working as a BI/data analyst/Data scientist or similar role
Scripting and Programming skills (Spark SCALA, Python, PySpark, R)
Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Quicksight, Qlick
Experience with Predictive Modeling and Machine Learning
Experience working with relational databases, SQL
Exposure to big data tools and cloud technologies such as AWS
Analytical, creative, and innovative approach to solving problems
Strong written and verbal communication
Positive and upbeat demeanor
Ability to work in a constantly evolving and fast paced environment
Proactive, highly organized, and able to prioritize and run multiple tasks
Ability to establish and maintain strong working relationships and achieve results by working collaboratively with others
","['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"This historic, Ivy League school consistently ranks among the top 10 universities in the annual U.S. News & World Report survey.
Penn has 12 highly-regarded schools that provide opportunities for undergraduate, graduate and continuing education, all influenced by Penn's distinctive interdisciplinary approach to scholarship and learning.
Posted Job Title
Data Scientist
Job Profile Title
Data Analyst C
http://www.med.upenn.edu/
The work involves testing, validating and extending advanced image processing algorithms, preparing and extending processing pipelines, and applying these pipelines on magnetic resonance brain imaging datasets from various studies involving both structural and functional data.
Experience with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) analysis is required.
Working ConditionsOffice, Library, Computer RoomPhysical EffortTypically sitting at desk or table
Department / School
Pay Range
$50,684.00 - $138,391.00
Special Requirements Background check required after a conditional job offer is made.
",['c'],"['data', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['c', 'data', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist
End CustomerÂâ Comcast
Pay Rate: $80/hr C2C
***No OPT EAD***
***Non locals are fine, only WebEx Video interview
Data Scientist
Â Xfinity Mobile, available exclusively to its cable customers, allows existing Internet customers to add wireless cellphone services to their current product bundle.
Â The Xfinity Mobile Business Intelligence team is looking for a Data Scientist who can dive into unknown data and do deep analysis â prove causation or prove data is related and therefore one causes the other.
You must be that person who can create value out of data.
Â The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action.
Such a person proactively fetches information from various sources and analyzes it for better understanding about how the business performs.
Additionally, they can utilize AI tools to automate certain processes within the Xfinity Mobile.Â
This person must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations.
They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights.
They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams.
The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.
This Data Scientist must possess the skill-sets necessary to hit the ground running and must be willing to learn about the mobile phone business while solving problems quickly and efficiently.
Â
See Yourself:
Â Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Â Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
Â Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Â Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Â
Minimum Requirements
Â Four-year degree in a related Computer Science, Math or Statistical field of study.
Â 7+ continuous years of professional experience as a Data Scientist.
Â Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Â Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SQL, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Â Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Â Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Â Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
Â A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Â Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Â SUPERB communication skills with an emphasis on writing and interpreting abilities
Â Excellent presentation skills.
Must have the ability to confirm complex data into digestible formats for non-technical business teams.
","['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']","['regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'java', 'regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
Primary responsibilities include:
Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Participate in the development of documentation.
This role conducts experimentation in various data science techniques, developing, executing, and maintaining scripts and prototypes to analyze, interpret, visualize, and gain knowledge from numerous data sets individually or in combination to meet mission needs.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Experience using the statistical computer language Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
#CJ
","['jira', 'python']","['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['jira', 'python', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Prudential Center in downtown Newark, N.J. hosts more than 175 concerts, family shows and special events annually and is the fourth-ranked sports and entertainment venue in the U.S. by Pollstar and Billboard.
It is home to the New Jersey Devils, a renowned NHL franchise with three Stanley Cup championships and a proud, passionate fan base.
Prudential Center is also home to the brand-new GRAMMY Museum Experience, the first and only of its kind on the east coast.
The 76ers have attracted the industrys top leadership talent from the NBA, NFL, NHL, MLB, MLS, UFC and NCAA, resulting in one of the most exciting, rewarding, and dynamic work environments within the sports industry.
Philadelphia 76ers L.P. is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE).
Position Summary: The Sport and Data Scientist will work in the Philadelphia 76ers Performance Department.
A successful applicant will have a strong technical foundation and be passionate about better understanding the game of basketball.
Responsibilities include, but not limited to:
Lead the exploitation of the player-tracking dataset, converting 2-Dimensions and 3-Dimensions raw data into physical, technical and tactical basketball concepts and insights
Develop models to accurately evaluate and forecast player and team performance
Contribute to the development of basketball thought and workflow optimization of the department and the organization as a whole.
QUALIFICATIONS (educational, experience and basic knowledge requirements):
Bachelors degree or higher in technical discipline (sport science, data science, computer science, statistics, biostatistics, etc.)
Masters Degree (applied mathematics, statistical analysis, statistical science, data science, biostatistics, etc.)
preferred
PhD Degree preferred
3+ years of experience in a research or applied oriented position
Training in and/or experience with data engineering, ETL processes and database architecture (RStudio, Python, SQL, and the like) as well as with Data Visualization programs
Training in and/or experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques (e.g.
regression models, decision trees, neural networks, and clustering methods) and other modeling techniques
Demonstrated passion for basketball and familiarity with basketball rules and terminology
Be a critical thinker, eager to both give and receive feedback
Be team-oriented, focused on team results not individual accomplishment
Embrace a dynamic, changing, diversified workload
]]>
","['rstudio', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'etl', 'decision tree', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'etl', 'decision tree', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Do you want to work at the forefront of artificial intelligence and machine learning?
CapaxGlobal has a significant data analytics and management presence across many industries.
You work in a multidisciplinary team exploring, connecting and mining internal data sources and will develop data models using algorithms for pattern detection and forecasting.
Candidates will be exposed to a wide spectrum of high visibility projects ranging from sales effectiveness, competitive intelligence, fraud detection, time series forecasting, operational efficiency, sourcing and procurement, supply-chain optimization and financial analysis.
Travel: Up to 30%
Responsibilities
Develop visualization products to share analysis across a large group of business users.
Design strategies and propose algorithms to analyze and leverage data from existing as well as new data sources.
Continuously seek out industry best practices and develop skills to create new capabilities for data analytics at clients to improve business decisions.
Network with business stakeholders to develop a pipeline of data science projects aligned with business strategies.
Translate complex and ambiguous business problems into project charters clearly identifying technical risks and project scope.
Participate on cross-disciplinary project team of database specialists, data scientists, and business subject-matter experts to complete project deliverables.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Computational Linguistics, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Bioinformatics, Physics, Operations Research or related fields.
Master’s degree in data science, applied mathematics, or bioinformatics preferred.
Minimum 6 years relevant work experience (if Bachelor’s degree) or minimum 3 years relevant work experience (if Master’s degree) with a proven track record in driving value in a commercial setting using data science skills.
In-depth knowledge of various modeling algorithms e.g.
Linear, GLMs, trees based models, neural networks, clustering, PCA, and time series models.
Proficiency in R (e.g.
ggplot2, cluster, dplyr, caret), Python (e.g.
pandas, scikit-learn, bokeh, nltk), Spark – MLlib, H20, or other statistical tools.
Minimum 2 years experience working in a data science or machine learning environment.
In-depth knowledge of databases, data modeling, Hadoop, and distributed computing frameworks.
Experience in software development environment, Agile, and code management/versioning (e.g.
git).
Strong EDA skills and experience/knowledge.
Ability to understand complex and ambiguous business needs and applying the right tools and approaches.
Collaborative team player.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Experience developing and testing machine learning and/or statistical projects.
Strong presentation skills.
Ability to present statistical results to lay persons in an easy to understand way.
","['nltk', 'bokeh', 'spark', 'h20', 'excel', 'git', 'ggplot2', 'mllib', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'caret', 'scikit']","['risk', 'data modeling', 'glm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'pca', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['nltk', 'bokeh', 'spark', 'h20', 'excel', 'git', 'ggplot2', 'mllib', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'caret', 'scikit', 'risk', 'data modeling', 'glm', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'pca', 'optim', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Clarivate Analytics is a global leader in providing trusted insights and analytics to accelerate the pace of innovation.
Join the team that is improving the way the world creates, protects, and advances innovation.
Major responsibilities:
Researches and identifies Machine Learning (ML) and Natural Language Processing (NLP) methods and algorithms to solve specific problems to improve user experience on Clarivate data and websites
Implements these methods and devises appropriate test plans to validate and compare the different approaches
Identifies new applications of ML and NLP in the context of Clarivate extensive sets of content and data
Explores existing data for insights and recommends additional sources of data for improvements
Technical /Professional Skills & Competencies:
Excellent understanding of ML, NLP and statistical methodologies
Excellent programming skills (Java/Python/R/Sas)
Ability to test ideas and adapt methods quickly end to end from data extraction to implementation and validation
Experience with information retrieval algorithms and recommended systems a big plus
Education and Background:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or similar.
MS preferred
Relevant work experience preferred
Ability to work with data engineers and product teams
.
It is the policy of Clarivate to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, pregnancy, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
","['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['data', 'natural language processing', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'data', 'nlp', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.
• Work with Sr. Data Scientists on Digital Engineering tasks including use of Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML) methods, techniques, and tools.
This includes technically working on multiple projects in a matrix environment while creating new programs and starting new projects.
• Work with AI and big data technologist/architect to explore new or assess known technology to solve specific natural language processing (NLP) related problems
• Customize and optimize models with various techniques (quantization/binarization, pruning, etc) to reduce model size and computation cycles while keeping similar performance.
• MS or Ph.D. in CS or EE with 3+ years of experience in AI/big data algorithm development (B.S.
with requisite experience will be considered)
• Solid knowledge of AI/ML and/or Deep Learning in general and experience with one or more specific fields related to NLP or NLU
• Solid theoretic knowledge with AI/ML and experience with customizing, re-training and evaluating models to solve domain specific problems
• Experience with commonly used NLP toolkits (e.g.
NLTK, SpaCy, Gensim) is a big plus
• Highly Experienced in Computer Programming (Python, C, Mathematica, etc.)
• Linked Data, Triple Stores, Ontology Modeling
• Expert Systems
• Knowledge Management, Digital Libraries
• Highly proficient in Linux, High-Performance Computing
• Strong knowledge of Cybersecurity
One must have good written communication, interpersonal, problem-solving, analytical, mathematical, and organizational skills.
Ability to follow directions is a must.
Applicants must be able to work well alone and as part of a team.
A Security Clearance or the ability to obtain one will be required.
U.S.
Citizenship required.
","['nltk', 'linux', 'python', 'spaci', 'c']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'nlp', 'commun']",1.0,"['nltk', 'linux', 'python', 'spaci', 'c', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'nlp', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"SummaryProvide data management and statistical analysis in Big Data environment.
Assist in development of tools and processes to manage, integrate and synthesize large data sets and deliver business rules and recommendations to functional business units and product managers
Responsibilities and Duties
Perform analyses, development and provide data mining in a large data warehouse environment which includes data design, database architecture, Meta data and repository creation.
Extensive use data mining and data analysis tools.
Review and validate data loaded into the data warehouse for accuracy
Provide technical consulting to users of data warehouses and advises users on conflicts and inappropriate data usage
Gather and assess business information needs and prepare system requirements
Interact with user community to develop and produce reporting requirements
Responsible for prototyping solutions, preparing test scripts, and conducting tests and for data replication, extraction, loading, cleansing, and data modeling for data warehouses
Maintain knowledge of software tools, languages, scripts, and shells that effectively support the data warehouse environment in different operating system environments
Make recommendations towards the development of new code or reuse of existing code.
Responsibilities may also include participation in component and data architecture design, performance monitoring, product evaluation and buy versus build recommendations
#LI-JS1
Requirements
7+ years of programming/systems analysis experience
5+ years of experience with business intelligence and stat tools and systems
Strong experience in Relational Database Management Systems (RDBMS) and data warehouse front-end tools
Extensive knowledge of data warehouse and data mart concepts
Experience in systems analysis and design
Solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies
BS in Computer Science, IS, or other related field.
Or equivalent work experience
Technical Skills Required
Stat & Data Tools "" Python, Machine Learning, SQL, Spark, Data Visualization
Data & Cloud Tools "" Hadoop, AWS Big Data Stack (S3, Spark, Lambda, Presto, Athena, Kinesis, Redshift)
Scripting Tools "" Linux/Unix, Shell Scripts
","['unix', 'lambda', 'linux', 'spark', 'aw', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['unix', 'lambda', 'linux', 'spark', 'aw', 'redshift', 'sql', 's3', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
DS,"What You Will A Part Of:
The IT Data Science Analyst is responsible for developing and maintaining the divisional data stores needed to provide crucial business insights across the Division.
This role will require strong partnership with regional and functional analysts to develop, and execute, various reporting, analytics, and dashboard initiatives.
What You Will Do:
Direct interaction with the business to understand and analyze business problems, derive insights and recommend solutions
Working independently, or with functional analysts, to create reports, data sets and mechanisms to provide visibility to business data
Executing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner
Collaborate with IT and business partners to ensure data quality, integrity, and accuracy across the global LCD data stores
Establish good working relationships with peers in other divisions and explore joint system and process improvement opportunities.
Maintain MS SQL Server database environments (security, tables, views, packages, SQL Agent jobs, SSAS database, Integration Services)
Develop/Maintain PowerBI dashboards for sales and finance team utilization
How You Will Get Here:
Data-oriented personality
Great communication skills
Experience with data visualization tools, such as PowerBI, Tableau or Cognos
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL
Experience with NoSQL databases
Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Experience with common data science toolkits
Good scripting and programming skills
Ability to partner with management at all levels and to lead major projects and initiatives
Strong communication skills and ability to work effectively across a matrix organization
BA/BS degree in finance, mathematics, computer science or other business related disciplines
Life Sciences experience preferred
Key Success Factors:
Strong organizational and communication skills, and proven ability to adapt style to different situations and people
Must be a business partner, not merely a technical expert - this position plays an active role providing actionable insight into the Clinical Trials Division
Strong analytical skills - and ability to use those skills to influence and drive change
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills (both verbal and written).
Ability to interact professionally with a diverse group including VPs, directors, managers, subject matter experts and end-users.
Self-motivated; bias for action
Global experience
10% travel requirement
","['nosql', 'cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerbi']","['regress', 'data', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['nosql', 'cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerbi', 'regress', 'data', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"AIVA works alongside operators, loan officers and lenders to make their jobs more efficient.
Each quarter, she reads millions of documents and then summarizes significant data points for her colleagues to review.
Although she's early in her career, she already has cut down certain manual tasks from 30 minutes to just 8 minutes!
Her make-up is well beyond mainstream workflow automationRPA.
There is room for a range of skills.
Uses large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and uses models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action.
Responsible for using a variety of data miningdata analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, usingcreating algorithms and creatingrunning simulations.
Use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data.
Drives business results with data-based insights and discovers solutions hidden in large data sets improve business outcomes.
Assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Uses predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
Develops a testing framework and test model quality.
Coordinates with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develops processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Performs other related duties as required.
EDUCATIONAL GUIDELINES Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Finance or the equivalent combination of education, training, or work experience.
Master's degree or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field is strongly preferred.
GENERAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS ABILITIES Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques Experience using statistical computer languages (Pig, Python, SQL, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications strongly preferred.
Experience working with and creating data architectures strongly preferred.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantagesdrawbacks a plus.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
a plus.
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams Coding knowledge and experience with several languages C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
a plus.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers such as Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, etc.
a plus.
Experience with distributed datacomputing tools such as MapReduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc a plus.
Experience visualizingpresenting data for stakeholders using tools such as Periscope, Business Objects, D3, etc.
a plus.
Intermediate professional level role.
Works with financial models of increasing complexity using advanced mathematical, analytical or econometric tools.
Defines and discerns key aspects of problems that require intricate analysis and research, and develops complex solutions within a broad technical and business context.
Works on small to large, complex projects that require increased skill in multiple technical environments.
Works on multiple projects as a project team member or sometimes as a project lead.
May coach more junior technical staff.
Typically requires five (5) or more years of related work experience in developing mathematical formulas, algorithms and computer programs to create complex models of market trends and risks.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, age, and protected veteran or military family status.
","['hive', 'mapreduc', 'd3', 'spark', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'mysql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']","['risk', 'regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",1.0,"['hive', 'mapreduc', 'd3', 'spark', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'c', 'java', 'risk', 'regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Posted Jun 20, 2020
Ref R-
Discipline Information Technology, Business/Data Analytics
Hotbed Pharm Country
Required Education Doctorate/PHD/MD
Position Type Full time
You need to sign in or create an account to save
Come join a strong and collaborative team that focuses on delivering on service requests, quick wins & strategic applications of advanced analytics and artificial intelligence!
Key Responsibilities:
Planning and developing analytics projects based on business requirements, and developing and applying advanced statistical algorithms for analysis of large-scale high-dimensional data across various business domains.
Collaborates with process teams to elicit and understand requirements, challenges and potential solutions
Utilizes processes and systems to extract knowledge and insights from either structured or unstructured data
Matures project/single-site solutions to global enterprise solutions and provides documentation, training, and ongoing support
Stays current with latest research and technology ideas; evaluates technologies for design, simulation, engineering, runtime etc.
Educates and transfers technologies to other business units for implementation
Required Skills & Experience:
University degree in a technical field relevant to business process engineering; Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering (Ph.D. or MS) preferred
3+ years' experience in reporting and analytics
Demonstrated experience with the Hadoop stack (Hadoop/Spark Paradigms)
Strong background in predictive analytics, machine learning, and data mining
Strong foundation in database languages and data science languages
Experience working with real-world, large-scale and high-dimensional data sets
More searches like this
Information Technology jobs in King of Prussia
Business/Data Analytics jobs in King of Prussia
","['hadoop', 'r', 'spark']","['data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",3.0,"['hadoop', 'r', 'spark', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"About InterDigitalInterDigital develops fundamental wireless and video technologies that are at the core of mobile devices, networks, and services worldwide.
* Interpret and analyze data to provide historical reporting, metrics tracking, adhoc reports and predictive models.
* Generate dashboards and visualizations that can easily be interpreted.
* Provide operational reporting for process and cost improvement projects and ROI evaluations.
* Analyze error trends to determine root causes and implement solutions to address them.
* Communicate results and explain advanced statistical content to key decision makers.
* Develop strategy for long term data platform architecture.
* Experience working in probability and statistics, time-series analysis, as well as experience in the use of machine learning applications and techniques.
* Prior experience working with a financial organization and developing financial reporting required.
* Experience with Microsoft Excel, Access, Flow, PowerPoint, OneNote and SharePoint.
* Experience in managing cross functional teams a plus* Must be able to demonstrate a thorough understanding of business priorities and realizes the criticality of being a business partner* Ability to prioritize and work on several tasks simultaneously* Solid written and communication skills.
* Effectively communicate and interact with both functional and technical personnel in solving complex business and technical problems* Ability to complete tasks within critical timelines and work well in a fast-paced, high-energy environment.
* Able to proactively work alone and within a team environment.Location: Conshohocken, PAInterDigital is committed to a policy of Equal Employment Opportunity and will not engage in or tolerate unlawful discrimination against an applicant or employee on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, immigrant status, military status, veteran status, sex, sexual orientation, gender (including gender identity and/or expression), pregnancy, age, physical or mental disability, genetic information, atypical heredity cellular or blood trait, marital status, family status, domestic partner or civil union status or any other legally recognized protected basis under federal, state or local laws, regulations or ordinances.
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, compensation, benefits, training, assignments, evaluations, coaching, promotion, discipline, discharge and layoff.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"This usually involves statistical and non-statistical modeling, simulations, optimization, and A/B testing.Relevant areas include consumer behavior, customer journey, e-commerce, television, marketing, and operations.
Qurate Retail Group believes in a third way to shop -- beyond transactional ecommerce or traditional brick-and-mortar stores -- and is #1 in video commerce,#3 in ecommerce in North America and #3 in mobile commerce in the U.S. (according to Internet Retailer).
For more information, visit www.qurateretailgroup.com.
",[None],"['optim', 'statist']",999.0,"['optim', 'statist']"
DS,"The Device Software Product Management team is responsible for the management of software strategy & roadmap for all Comcast & Sky devices.
This generally includes a broad set of responsibilities including: strategy development, product discovery of new technologies, external & internal partnerships, software roadmap definition, management and prioritization for new and existing devices.
As a data scientist, you will play a pivotal role in improving Comcast’s WiFi product!
You will collaborate with a multi-disciplinary team of engineers, architects, product managers and external partners to derive key insights that will be used for decision making, producing reports for both internal consumption and TPX SLT and driving device/platform requirements and improvements!
Core Responsibilities:
Synthesize trends into insights to make product recommendations with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of partners through visual display of quantitative information
Build and prototype analysis pipeline iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Develop understanding of Comcast data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for both product and platform development.
Establish performance baselines, develop and deploy predictive models to forecast improvements, keep track of benefits realization as new features are developed & deployed
May serve as team leader.
Mentors and trains junior team members.
Qualifications:
MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., data analytics, statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, computer science, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering).
3-5 years of meaningful work experience in data analysis or related field.
(e.g., as an engineer, data scientist)
Strong sense of independence and intellectual curiosity.
Ability to think, communicate and execute from big picture strategy to execution details
Strong foundation in data analytics, statistics and machine learning
Experience in writing code in SQL & Python (Scala, Unix)
Experience in operating in Big Data Pipelines (Spark, Hive, SQL engines) batch and streaming
Experience in developing and deploying Machine Learning models and data story telling with visualizations
Preferred qualifications:
PhD degree in a quantitative discipline as listed in Minimum Qualifications
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets (Spark)
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations.
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem.
Proven effective written and verbal communication skills.
Displayed leadership and self-direction.
Showcased willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
","['unix', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'python', 'hive']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['unix', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'python', 'hive', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The ideal candidate will love working with data; be extremely curious; have good analytical intuition; want to get their hands dirty; want to lead a small, innovative team that directly affects the bottom line; and want to work from an ownership perspective by operating cross-functionally to implement solutions.
Candidate will have experience and knowledge in the following areas:
Managing/developing analysts: significant experience in leading a team of advanced analysts is very important to this job.
Analysis and modeling: significant experience in data analysis and advanced statistical modeling.
It is also beneficial if the candidate has experience with natural language processing and blockchain technologies.
Below are some of the analytical tools the person should know well or have used.
Advanced statistical techniques: OLS Regression, Logistic Regression, MNL Regression, Survival analysis, Bayesian analysis, Boosting, Random Forest, SVM
Statistical/reporting/Analytical tools: Python, R, Qlik, Excel (advanced experience at using Excel to do simulations)
Databases: SQL Server, MS Access
","['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'qlik', 'python']","['regress', 'logist', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'natural language processing', 'svm', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'blockchain']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'qlik', 'python', 'regress', 'logist', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'nlp', 'svm', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'blockchain']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Do you love Sports?
They have a well-established team and are looking for someone who wants to be a part of their team.
They've created an application for online gaming and currently looking to bring on a Data Scientist.
They have hundreds of thousands of data that's well-structured in a data warehouse, so you will be responsible to gather all the data and make predictions.
Someone with Python is ideal, but they are open to R as well.Required Skills & Experience* At least 3 years' experience working as a Data Scientist* NumPy, SciPy, Scikit-learn, and Pandas* Strong Python or R experience* Software Engineering Background* Machine Learning* Tensorflow* Keras* AWSWhat You Will Be DoingTech Breakdown* 50% programming* 50% predictive analyticsDaily Responsibilities* 100% Hands OnThe Offer* Competitive Salary: Up to $140K/year, DOEYou will receive the following benefits:* Educational assistance* Medical Insurance, Vision, and Dental* 401(k)* Catered lunches* WFH options/ Remote flex* SEPTA accessibleApplicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis now and in the future.Workbridge Associates, part of the Motion Recruitment network, provides IT Staffing Solutions (Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire) in major North American markets.
","['kera', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['machine learning', 'predict', 'data']",999.0,"['kera', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'data']"
DS,"Qualifications
Minimum Required Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s
degree required; Master’s degree in
Statistics, Data Science preferred.
Minimum of
5 years professional experience in a role with comparable
responsibilities.
Experience
in data modeling and machine learning is highly desirable.
Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Strong
working knowledge of application of statistics, programming, data
modeling, and advanced mathematics to business questions for data analysis
Proven
experience in a data science programming language (e.g.
Python, R, SAS
etc.)
and other data science-related tools (e.g.
SQL, Tableau, Google
Analytics)
In depth
knowledge in one or more of the following technical areas is preferred:
Snowflake, AWS EMR, Spark, etc.
Experience
of building statistical and machine learning models (such as linear
regression, logistical regression, random forest, k-nearest neighbors,
deep learning etc.)
Experience
of working with healthcare data is preferred
Proven
ability to deliver accurate work products in a cross-functional matrix
environment spanning data warehousing, data modeling, and data analytics
while managing multiple competing priorities
Sound
analytical skills and demonstrated proficiency in developing detailed
analysis and models
Ability to
quickly adapt to changing priorities and generate
Additional Information
Requisition ID: 153925
","['snowflak', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'aw']","['regress', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data warehousing', 'logist', 'data', 'random forest', 'nearest neighbors', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['snowflak', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'aw', 'regress', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data warehousing', 'logist', 'data', 'random forest', 'nearest neighbors', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Primary Responsibility
The Senior Data Scientist will turn raw data into insights using expertise in exploratory and predictive analytics.
This hands-on analytical role will partner with scientists, bioinformaticians, IT specialists and clinicians to develop data models, perform complex data-driven analysis, create custom and template reports, and build repeatable data pipelines.
Key responsibilities include:
Hands-on interpret data and analyse results from multiple sources across research, manufacturing and clinical to inform T-cell product development and improve patient experience
Design data analytics methods and other strategies that optimize data efficiency and quality across the enterprise
Use highly specialized software tools and techniques to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that could be valuable for descriptive, diagnostic and predictive analytics efforts
Create statistical and machine learning algorithms and/or data pipelines, and assess their effectiveness through solid validation workflows
Communicate data analysis results with sophisticated visualisation methods, traditional paper-write up and oral presentation
The Senior Data Scientist will be highly visible and expected to significantly contribute to broader data analytic outcomes.
This role blends a strong business sense with IT expertise, bioinformatics, immunology, and mathematics to provide insight scientific and clinical challenges with advancing T-cell therapy.
IT infrastructure and enterprise architecture activities will be managed and supported by others.
Key Responsibilities
Interpretation and translation of findings (20%)
Design and maintenance of relevant databases, data pipelines, operational data sets and records.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases (10%)
Partner with stakeholders to influence data generation, capture and analysis (10%)
Qualifications & Experience
Required
Masters degree in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Information Technology, Biostatistics or related formal informatics training in healthcare/life sciences
15 years relevant experience within industry
Experienced in using multiple data science methodologies to solve complex business problems
Expertise in algorithmic implementation, statistical programming and multi-mode data manipulation
Strong troubleshooting and problem solving skills
Thrive in a fast-paced, innovative environment
Able to rapidly pivot between planned analysis and off-script / ad-hoc needs
Basic immunological understanding
Prior experience in complex biotechnology and / or pharmaceuticals industry
Desirable
Experience in Linux operation system, and comfortable using a variety of software programs
Programming expertise with Python, R, Matlab, SAS, etc.
Skills & Compentencies
Required
Strong foundation in mathematics, statistical analysis, programming, data mining, database management, database schema design, data security, data visualization, and applied data science
Expert in SQL and database schema design and container management
Fluency in a scripting or computing language (e.g.
Python, Scala, C++, Java, etc.)
Experience manipulating data sets through commercial and open source software (e.g.
R, SAS, Databricks, Tableau, Spotfire)
Superior verbal and written communication skills with the ability to effectively advocate technical solutions to scientists, clinical teams and business audiences
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, ability to self-motivate, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Knowledge of how to analyze and manage large data sets as well as strategies for visualizing and communicating results to solve business needs and make strategic decisions
Recognize and act on solutions fit for purpose (e.g.
early stage versus late state versus clinical)
Passion and creativity to solve scientific problems through the lens of data analysis
Excellent numeracy and English language skills (both written and verbal)
Attention to detail, good time management skills, able to engage with urgency (when required)
Able to work independently after training
Desirable
Experience in full AI/ML life-cycle from model development, training, deployment, testing, refining and iterating.
Highly collaborative and supportive of business and of its ideals and strategies
Vendor and technology neutral more interested in business outcomes than in personal preferences
Practical in approach to decision making, recommendations and problem solving that is principle-based
An understanding of the principles of oncology / immune oncology
","['scala', 'linux', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'information technology', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'pipelin', 'exploratori', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['scala', 'linux', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'information technology', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'pipelin', 'exploratori', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Join the team that is improving the way the world creates, protects, and advances innovation.
Major responsibilities:
Implements these methods and devises appropriate test plans to validate and compare the different approaches
Explores existing data for insights and recommends additional sources of data for improvements
Technical /Professional Skills & Competencies:
Excellent understanding of ML, NLP and statistical methodologies
Excellent programming skills (Java/Python/R/Sas)
Ability to test ideas and adapt methods quickly end to end from data extraction to implementation and validation
Experience with information retrieval algorithms and recommended systems a big plus
Education and Background:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or similar.
MS preferred
Relevant work experience preferred
Ability to work with data engineers and product teams
.
","['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['statist', 'recommend', 'data', 'nlp']",1.0,"['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'statist', 'recommend', 'data', 'nlp']"
DS,"As a Retention Data Scientist, you will be delivering solutions while leveraging your experience in machine learning.
You will bring a curiosity about how the consumers search in information and match that with a strong technical ability to analyze large data sets, reveal insights, and turn the insights into recommendations
You will have a deep understanding of the mortgage lending industry and the levers that can be pulled to improve business outcomes based on data analysis and modeling.
In this role, you will:
Partner with a cross-functional team of data scientists, software engineers, and product managers to deliver a product customers love
Leverage a broad stack of technologies — Hadoop, Spark, H20.ai, Django, Sagemaker and other cloud AI platforms, containerization and more — to reveal the insights hidden within huge volumes of numeric and textual data
Build machine learning models through all phases of development, from design through training, evaluation, validation, and implementation
Flex your interpersonal skills to translate the complexity of your work into tangible business goals
The Ideal Candidate is:
Customer first.
You continually research and evaluate emerging technologies.
You thrive on bringing definition to big, undefined problems.
You love asking questions and pushing hard to find answers.
A leader.
You challenge conventional thinking and work with stakeholders to identify and improve the status quo.
Your passionate about talent development for your own team and beyond.
You have hands-on experience developing data science solutions using open-source tools and cloud computing platforms.
Statistically-minded.
You’ve built models, validated them, and backtested them.
You know how to interpret a confusion matrix or a ROC curve.
You have experience with clustering, classification, sentiment analysis, time series, and deep learning.
A data guru.
“Big data” doesn’t phase you.
You have the skills to retrieve, combine, and analyze data from a variety of sources and structures.
You know understanding the data is often the key to great data science.
You will be successful in this role if you have:
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Math or another STEM discipline.
Master's or advanced degree preferred.
Understand how mortgage lending works across origination and servicing.
5-10 years of related experience, including hands-on experience analyzing data and applying machine learning techniques to build models that are integrated into applications
10-20 years’ experience overall, including data mining & analysis, software or product development, software or systems engineering
Key Skills:
;
Experience building and running stable, scalable pipelines to structure and to integrate across the Big Data Vs on premise and in the cloud
Experience with elastic storage and categorizing data in a data lake repository
Experience with designing, building, and deploying MLOps pipelines
Experience using statistical computer languages such as R and Python.
Strong analytical and algorithmic skills
Ability to work in a collaborative team context.
Preferred Qualifications
MS in Statistics, Computer Science or another STEM discipline
2-3 years of Experience with ML or experience with AI planning or multi-agent algorithms
Experience with ML frameworks such as SciKit-Learn, TensorFlow, Keras, etc.
Strong programming experience in Python, Java, C++, etc.
Experience in developing and operationalizing systems that include advanced algorithmic components
","['kera', 'spark', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'django', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'django', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The data science team is a relatively small team and you will have been a huge part in helping lead the charge towards having a data-driven engineering team.
This role will be responsible for improving the data products already built but will also be responsible for spearheading new models and measurements.
Identify and specify data needs and quality requirements to support modeling
Research, design and implement descriptive, predictive, and inferential models using statistical and machine learning techniques.
Evaluate, document, and communicate research processes, analyses, and results to peers, and leadership
Curiosity and ability to convert complex problems into concrete requirements and build innovative solutions
University degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, or similar field
Experience working in a software engineering team
4+ years professional experience as a Data Scientist
Proficiency in Python and preferably also R
Proficiency in SQL
Experience in deploying data products in an enterprise environment
Ability to communicate clearly and efficiently with technical and non-technical stakeholders
BONUS POINTS
You have a PhD in Data Science, Statistics, or a statistics-heavy discipline
Experience in building recommender systems
Experience in sequence-to-sequence modeling, especially as applied to time-series data or Natural Language Understanding applications
Experience with, or knowledge in, Bayesian methods
You bring a passion for sports or betting
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['sequenc', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",3.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'sequenc', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Site Name: USA - Pennsylvania - Upper Providence, UK - Hertfordshire - Stevenage
Posted Date: Jun 23 2020
The Human Genetics team leverages major scientific and technological advances, including investment in biobanks linked to large-scale human health databases, cutting-edge informatics platforms, breakthrough understanding of biological pathways, functional genomics capabilities built upon rapid progress in gene editing, and leading industry-academia partnerships, in order to identify the best targets and to continue evaluation of targets through their life in the pipeline.
This research will leverage industry-leading data and compute resources, to address important drug discovery and development challenges, to directly impact GSKs R&D pipeline, and to publish in top scientific journals.
The selected Genomic Data Scientist(s) will:
Develop and implement robust software platforms to efficiently ingest, curate, query and analyze, human genetic, genomic, and clinical/phenotypic data, to inform target selection and validation decisions across a range of disease areas.
Leverage the opportunities and efficiencies afforded by access to hybrid cloud-based, distributed ecosystem of technologies
Guide creative solutions to challenging scientific questions from early proof-of-concept stages to production deployments
Develop analytics tools and applications to enhance the productivity of scientists within Human Genetics and across the Research organization.
Why you?
Basic Qualifications:
Masters or equivalent experience in genetics, bioinformatics, or related life sciences applications.
Enterprise, industry experience in SQL and either R or Python software development, with track record of developing production quality software pipelines, applications, or packages/libraries.
Experience working in a distributed data and compute environment (e.g.
Apache Hadoop ecosystem).
Experience with Apache SparkTM is a significant advantage.
Proficient in management and analysis of large volumes of genetic/genomic data and results
Excellent communication and influencing skills and developing leadership skills for working with multidisciplinary teams and with international colleagues.
Preferred Qualifications:
If you have the following characteristics, it would be a plus:
Ability to discuss genomic data types and analyses used in early target discovery.
Experience with data and/or results from large scale genetic association studies (e.g.
GWAS or PheWAS) or large scale functional genomic data.
Experience with complex longitudinal human clinical/phenotype data, e.g.
from electronic health records, epidemiological cohorts, or clinical trials.
These include Patient focus, Transparency, Respect, Integrity along with Courage, Accountability, Development, and Teamwork.
Agile and distributed decision-making using evidence and applying judgement to balance pace, rigour and risk.
Managing individual and team performance.
Committed to delivering high quality results, overcoming challenges, focusing on what matters, execution.
Implementing change initiatives and leading change.
Sustaining energy and well-being, building resilience in teams.
Continuously looking for opportunities to learn, build skills and share learning both internally and externally.
Developing people and building a talent pipeline.
Translating strategy into action - a compelling narrative, motivating others, setting objectives and delegation.
Building strong relationships and collaboration, managing trusted stakeholder relationships internally and externally.
Budgeting and forecasting, commercial and financial acumen.
GSKGenetics
Important notice to Employment businesses/ Agencies
For more information, please visit GSKs Transparency Reporting For the Record site.
","['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'cloud', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Overview
Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Provide software life cycle support following System Engineering Process (SEP) with applicable Capability Maturity Model Integrated (CMMI) and Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) standards and specifications.
Develop and/or modify control system cybersecurity software and hardware solutions.
Establish methodologies for capturing and managing data associated with complex integrated HM&E, Combat, Navigation, and C4I systems.
Develop and/or modify logical data models enabling and enforcing concordance and mapping between system, subsystem, interface, mission thread, process, and other data sets.
Develop and/or modify logical data models that store data elements to support data call responses, information flow analyses, operations analysis, performance evaluations, mission thread analysis, cybersecurity assessments, and engineering change evaluations.
Work with stakeholders as required to conduct systems and data research in support of development and sustainment of data models and/or simulations.
Utilize Knowledge Representation & Reasoning (KR&R) tools and techniques to support development, modification, and application of data models linking critical systems concepts to critical cybersecurity data elements and mission concepts
Modify and use databases
Qualifications
Bachelors Degree in Electrical, Mechanical or Computer Engineering from an ABET accredited college/university
Seven (7) years of professional experience within industry as a systems engineer, electrical, computer and /or electronics engineer.
Two (2) years of experience in MATLAB, SIMULINK, R, Python or other analytical programming language.
One (1) year of experience developing or applying Machine Learning and/or Knowledge Representation & Reasoning (KR&R) tools, techniques, and/or algorithms
Two (2) years of professional experience developing software using one or more high-level languages such as C/C++ or Java.
Ability to obtain and maintain a secret clearance
EEO Statement
","['matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['research', 'machine learning', 'data', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'research', 'machine learning', 'data', 'hardwar']"
DS,"LOC_MAIN-Main Hospital Req ID: 74962
Shift: Days
Employment Status: Regular - Full Time
Job Summary
This is a full-time position located in Philadelphia, PA, USA.
You will join a cross-functional agile Data Ops team that integrates clinical data sources to build dashboards, predictive models, and web apps.
You will also:
Perform exploratory data analysis and predictive modeling in pediatric biomedical research using machine learning, statistical, and mathematical analysis incorporating heterogeneous and complex data type independently based on milestone assignments from senior staff
Contribute to assessing and implementing computational, algorithmic, and predictive analytics approaches to address assigned biomedical research questions in areas such as clinical decision support and population health surveillance.
Contribute to the experimental design, execution, test and critical evaluation of methods as applied to translational data science research projects.
Use a flexible, analytical approach to extract optimal value from biomedical data.
Contribute to design and conduct of continuous validation plans for production systems that incorporate models and algorithms, providing guidelines and support for large-scale implementation.
Contribute to the creation, adoption, and adherence to best practice methodologies for performing data analysis and predictive modeling experiments.
Job Responsibilities
Implement computational algorithms and experiments for test and evaluation; interprets data to assess algorithm performance.
Make significant contributions to the formulation of analysis plans and associated documentation of methods that meet stringent criteria for reproducibility and measures of significance.
Develop high-quality code implementing models and algorithms as application programming interfaces or other service-oriented software implementations.
Participate in communication of research methods, implementation, and results to varied audience of clinicians, scientists, analysts, and programmers.
Work closely with applications research group to translate models and algorithms into engineered production applications.
Contribute to manuscript writing for results publication, authors abstracts, and presents at professional conferences.
Required Education and Experience
Required Education: Bachelors in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Required Experience: At least three (3) years of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, machine learning, or mathematical modeling projects.
Preferred Education, Experience & Cert/Lic
Preferred Education: Masters in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Non-degree graduate coursework such as a graduate certificate in Analytics, Statistics, or Data Science.
Preferred Experience: Four (4) or more years of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, machine learning, or mathematical modeling projects.
Additional Technical Requirements
Experience and demonstrated ability acquiring new technical/analytic skills and domain knowledge to support successful contribution to research and development projects is required.
Experience formulating or contributing to the formulation of analysis plans and selection of appropriate methods.
Experience using existing machine learning and analytic tools such as ScikitLearn, Weka, R, and Mathematica in either applied educational or professional projects is required.
Experience writing code in either applied educational or professional projects using one or more of the following languages: Python, Scala, Java is required.
Familiarity with relational databases (e.g.
Postgres, MySQL) strongly preferred.
Familiarity RESTful web services application programming interfaces preferred.
Strong verbal and written communications skills with the demonstrated ability to explain complex technical concepts to a lay audience.
Applied statistics or mathematical modeling experience preferred.
Natural language processing experience particularly in the biological and medical domains preferred.
Experience using distributed computing technologies (e.g.
Akka, MapReduce, Cuda) preferred.
Familiarity with graph, key value, and document data stores (e.g.
Neo4j, Hadoop, MongoDB) preferred.
Experience creating informative visualizations for complex, high dimensional data preferred.
Experience with probabilistic graphical models, time series predictive models, Markov models preferred.
In an effort to achieve this goal, employment at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, other than for positions with regularly scheduled hours in New Jersey, is contingent upon an attestation that the job applicant does not use tobacco products or nicotine in any form and a negative nicotine screen (the latter occurs after a job offer).
Children's Hospital of Philadelphia is an equal opportunity employer.
VEVRAA Federal Contractor/Seeking priority referrals for protected veterans.
Talent Acquisition
2716 South Street, 6th Floor
Philadelphia, PA 19146
Phone: 866-820-9288
Email:TalentAcquisition@email.chop.edu
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'mysql', 'scikitlearn', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['experimental design', 'data', 'dashboard', 'machine learning', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'exploratori', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'sql', 'scikitlearn', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'experimental design', 'data', 'dashboard', 'machine learning', 'nlp', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'exploratori', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Business Unit:
The ideal candidate must be comfortable working in a dynamic team and presenting to large audiences.
They will be applying data mining and modeling techniques, statistical analysis, and building high quality dashboards and presentations to provide insights to the executive leadership team.
They will also provide input into strategy, analysis methods, and tool selection.
Core responsibilities include but are not limited to:
+ Developing and executing statistical and mathematical solutions to business problems.
Framing problem, developing roadmap, and communicating intended approach and quantitative methods to develop solution.
+ Improving products and services or solving problems using best practice and knowledge of internal and or external business issues.
+ Using analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, extracting actionable insights using advanced statistical techniques such as data analysis, data mining, optimization tools, and machine learning techniques and statistics.
+ Developing and deploying predictive models based on historical data that provide future predictions about customer experience.
+ Building forecasts, recommendations and strategic/tactical plans based on applying data science techniques to business data.
+ Showing consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance.
+ Serving as a team leader within a work group or on cross-functional teams as well as mentoring and training junior team members.
+ Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
+ Graduate degree in analytical field (Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Engineering...)
+ 5 to 8 years of relevant experience working as a BI/data analyst/Data scientist or similar role
+ Scripting and Programming skills (Spark SCALA, Python, PySpark, R...)
+ Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Quicksight, Qlick
+ Experience with Predictive Modeling and Machine Learning
+ Experience working with relational databases, SQL
+ Exposure to big data tools and cloud technologies such as AWS
+ Analytical, creative, and innovative approach to solving problems
+ Strong written and verbal communication
+ Positive and energetic attitude
+ Ability to work in a rapidly changing and fast paced environment
+ Self-motivated, highly organized, and able to prioritize and manage multiple tasks
+ Ability to establish and maintain strong working relationships and achieve results by working collaboratively with others
","['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"POSITION SUMMARY:
You will work closely with product managers and business partners to identify opportunities to innovate using Machine Learning, Information Retrieval, NLP and Predictive Analytics.
You will own one or more research areas, represent the team in executive-level meetings, mentor other scientists and engineers in the team, and lead the research and delivery of models in close collaboration with scientists and engineers.
The right candidate will have a deep technical background along with mentorship and leadership experience, and a proven track record of proposing innovative features and platforms, securing funding for their ideas, and delivering significant, quantifiable business impact.
The candidate will have exceptional interpersonal and negotiation skills, the ability to earn the trust of others, and the ability to move fast and make effective decisions in the presence of significant ambiguity.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
Masters degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering or a related field
Excellent understanding of ML, NLP, Deep Learning, and statistical methodologies
Excellent programming skills (Java/Python/R/SaS) and understanding of computational complexity and data structures
4-5 years proven track record in the application of ML and NLP in an industrial setting
Excellent analytical and quantitative skills and strong bias towards data-driven decision making
Proven ability to understand complex business problems, identifying opportunities for ML / AI and launching models in production
Ability to understand and discuss architectural concepts, tradeoffs and new opportunities with technical team members
Strong communication and collaboration skills, with a proven ability to work across functions and influence senior leaders
Ability to comfortably and confidently present to all levels and to work with both technical and non-technical stakeholders across multiple business units including at the executive level
Proven track record of innovating on behalf of customers and using metrics to prove new ideas and to drive prioritization and funding decisions
Ability to test ideas and adapt methods quickly end to end from data extraction to implementation and validation
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Academic concentration in Machine Learning
Experience working in agile enabled teams
Familiarity with academic research, patents, trademarks or life sciences data sets
Experience with search engines, classification algorithms, recommendation systems, and relevance evaluation methodologies a plus
","['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"This agricultural focused client is looking to provide solutions that are designed to give farmers and customers novel insights on how to protect their crops against a range of pest pressures.
There solutions allow growers to make faster, better and more informed decisions than ever before.
The agriculture team is building a portfolio of new applications and services.
This role is located at the client’s corporate headquarters in Philadelphia, PA.
Responsibilities:
● Drive and execute the vision for data science strategy supporting a wide spectrum of
rapid prototyping in digital agriculture space.
● Demonstrate and communicate a passion for owning and building sustainable data
unlocks new opportunities
● Lead and participate in discussions to make the right scientific or technical trade-offs to
meet long-term strategic and short-term tactical business needs
● Collaborate and nurture cross-functional relationships with data scientists, data
engineers, application developers and business stakeholders to understand data needs
and build reliable solutions
● Mentor and grow a team of data scientists and help accelerate data driven culture
Qualifications:
● MS/Ph.D.
in computer science, machine learning, statistics, applied mathematics,
Physics, agronomy/climatology or other scientific or computational disciplines
● Applied experience of various machine learning techniques (e.g.
Neural Networks, Tree
based learning, Clustering etc.)
● Hands on experience working on large data sets with expertise in data mining, predictive
modeling, statistical analysis
● Experience with distributed systems such as Hadoop/MapReduce, Spark etc.
and
modeling on cloud platforms (AWS/Azure/GCP)
● Fluency with at least one of the modern distributed ML frameworks such as TensorFlow,
PyTorch, Keras, H2O etc.
● Demonstrated expertise in SQL and one or more languages commonly used in data
Python/R/Scala proficiency is strongly preferred
● Experience with packages such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, dplyr etc.
● Passionate about data driven story telling using visualization tools like Tableau,
Power BI, Looker etc.
● Demonstrated experience building and deploying production ready machine learning
models
● Comfortable with multi-tasking in a fast paced and fun environment
Preferred Qualifications:
● Hands on experience working with large data sets (Spark, Hadoop, Hive, Redshift, etc.)
● Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data
● Additional experience in one or more core analytic methods such as predictive modeling,
customer segmentation/clustering, voice of customer applications, personalization,
image recognition, supply chain optimization etc.
● Good understanding of data privacy, GDPR and best practices around data encryption
● Working knowledge of DevOps model, automated workflows, associated CI/CD
components and containers (git, Jenkins, Docker, Kubernetes etc.)
● Well-versed in articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data
● Project management experience managing vendors and system integrators to lead data
engagements and drive adoption
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'redshift', 'tensorflow', 'dplyr', 'python', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'gcp', 'numpi', 'kubernet', 'kera', 'power bi', 'r', 'cloud', 'h2o', 'looker', 'sql', 'bi', 'panda', 'aw', 'docker', 'scikit']","['data mining', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'redshift', 'tensorflow', 'dplyr', 'python', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'hive', 'gcp', 'numpi', 'kubernet', 'kera', 'powerbi', 'r', 'cloud', 'h2o', 'looker', 'sql', 'panda', 'aw', 'docker', 'scikit', 'data mining', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']"
DS,"When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created an account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Please Capitalize first letter of your First and Last Name.
Please avoid using fully capitalized text for your First and/or Last Name.
NOTE: If your name is hyphenated or has multiple capitalization, please use the same format as your government ID.
The individual in this role will be responsible for end to end data sourcing and quality, and optimization of the lead selection process.
The incumbent will leverage advance data mining skills and predictive analytics to improve matching algorithms and develop new targeting attributes and strategies.
Additionally, this position will serve as the BFS lead on integrating the credit targeting data and platform with the global sales lead generation and CRM platforms.
Role:
Work with Marketing to develop innovative go to market strategies including multi-channel, contact management, and model use strategies
Work directly with channel and campaign managers to optimize direct response marketing (Direct Mail, E-Mail, Digital) and OB/IB Sales channels
Maintain campaign selection logic, generate campaign files and coordinate secure/encrypted delivery
Manage technical aspects of marketing platform with a primary focus on marketing automation.
Evaluate new technologies and data sources to improve and optimize marketing and sales team performance
Be responsible for conducting rigorous data analysis on existing and new data sources to identify growth opportunities for the Business Financing Solutions team
Partner with internal technology and data management partners and vendors to continually improve data quality, data value, and speed to market
Identify marketing performance KPI’s and monitor performance through reports / dashboards and ad hoc analysis
Present findings and recommendations to senior-level stakeholders
Job Requirements:
At least 6-8+ years of relevant work experience analyzing large, multi-dimensional data sets and synthesizing data insights into actionable recommendations
Direct response marketing experience is a requirement, specifically in marketing automation
Data driven mind-set, with an advanced degree in a quantitative discipline such as Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics or Economics; Masters preferred
Proven track record of deploying advanced analytic tools and processes to drive business results
Experience across marketing, business intelligence and/or other analytical domains
Proven ability to work independently and take direction from multiple stakeholders
Exceptional written and verbal communication skills
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
Conshohocken, Pennsylvania, United States of America
Additional Locations:
Wilmington
",[None],"['data mining', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['data mining', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"This historic, Ivy League school consistently ranks among the top 10 universities in the annual U.S. News & World Report survey.
Penn has 12 highly-regarded schools that provide opportunities for undergraduate, graduate and continuing education, all influenced by Penn's distinctive interdisciplinary approach to scholarship and learning.
Posted Job Title
Library Data Scientist
Job Profile Title
Data Analyst D
· To help inform practice and organizational norms regarding data ethics and foster trust with Library users as regards personal privacy, security, and academic freedom; and
Duties
The position will include the following duties and expectations:
· Contribution to and leading research and development projects related to library data analysis, metrics, and privacy protection.
· Project coordination and project management duties relevant to research initiatives.
· Collaborating with units across the Libraries in library-related data collection activities.
· Provide data management and statistical expertise, including:
Managing, analyzing, and interpreting data collected from transactional systems, administrative databases, catalog systems, citation and indexing databases, researcher activity systems, bibliometric and rights databases, surveys, and other data sources;
Sharing research findings through presentations and publications.
Qualifications
· Masters degree in the Social Sciences or a related field, with advanced training in applied statistics or equivalent experience preferred.
A PhD and either a masters relevant to work in an academic library or 2-3 years relevant experience in an academic library desirable.
· Preferred: Demonstrated teaching or staff-mentoring experience in topics relating to data analysis and scientific programming.
** Please include a resume and cover letter as one attachment when applying***
Department / School
Pay Range
$59,703.00 - $168,837.00
Special Requirements Background check required after a conditional job offer is made.
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data', 'analyz']",1.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data', 'analyz']"
DS,"LOC_ROBERTS-Roberts Ctr Pediatric Research Req ID: 79322
Shift: Days
Employment Status: Regular - Full Time
Job Summary
Thank you for your interest in the Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia.
Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the recruitment process for this position has been placed ON HOLD.
When the status of the position returns to active, and if your resume is selected for a department interview, you will be notified.
The successful applicant will work with a growing multidisciplinary team of clinicians, radiologists, neuroscientists, molecular biologists, data scientists, engineers, and other researchers to conduct innovative translational research focused on pediatric brain tumors.
The qualified candidate is expected to work independently and as part of a team, with good written and oral communication skills.
Job Responsibilities
The successful candidate will be involved in image processing in various projects ranging from finding imaging signatures, to monitor the pediatric brain tumor microenvironment using MRI and PET molecular imaging techniques, to large-scale imaging genomic bioinformatic analysis on multidimensional data.
The position is open for research associate or instructor level and the salary and rank will be determined by the candidate’s resume and experience level.
Required Education and Experience
Required Education: Masters in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Required Experience: At least five (5) years of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, machine learning, or mathematical modeling projects.
Preferred Education, Experience & Cert/Lic
Preferred Education: PhD in Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or a related field.
Non-degree graduate coursework such as a graduate certificate in Analytics, Statistics, or Data Science preferred.
Preferred Experience: Six (6) or more years of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, machine learning, or mathematical modeling projects.
Additional Technical Requirements
- Ability to utilize or build mathematical and algorithmic models on medical images and implement them is preferred.
The preferred skills include computational modeling ability and programming ability (Python, MATLAB, C++,, etc.).
Previous biomedical image analysis experience and a strong relevant publication track record is preferred.
In an effort to achieve this goal, employment at Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, other than for positions with regularly scheduled hours in New Jersey, is contingent upon an attestation that the job applicant does not use tobacco products or nicotine in any form and a negative nicotine screen (the latter occurs after a job offer).
Children's Hospital of Philadelphia is an equal opportunity employer.
VEVRAA Federal Contractor/Seeking priority referrals for protected veterans.
Talent Acquisition
2716 South Street, 6th Floor
Philadelphia, PA 19146
Phone: 866-820-9288
Email:TalentAcquisition@email.chop.edu
","['matlab', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']",2.0,"['matlab', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']"
DS,"This usually involves statistical and non-statistical modeling, simulations, optimization, and A/B testing.
Relevant areas include consumer behavior, customer journey, e-commerce, television, marketing, and operations.
Example projects include marketing mix optimization, airtime optimization, price elasticity estimation, and direct-response marketing targeting and effectiveness measurement.
What you’ll do:
Construct analytic data sets for exploration, modeling, insight generation
Conduct in-depth data analysis, data and prepare visualizations summarizing key features of the data
Develop accurate models for forecasting and inference
Develop test designs, hypotheses, success metrics, and test requirements, and execute test analysis
Work with stakeholders to define business questions and success criteria
Present results and consult the business on next steps
Conduct change management for new methodologies
Research best practices, technologies, tools, and trends
Guide and mentor other analytics team members (Center of Excellence)
Work with IT on productionalization, data accuracy
Develop novel techniques or maintain legacy codes when needed
Who you are:
Advanced degree (Master’s/PhD) in Statistics, Economics, Computer Science or other quantitative discipline
Expertise in various statistical methodologies such as regression analysis, cluster analysis, decision trees, factor analysis/principal component analysis, time series, survival models
2+ years experience in data integration with SQL
2+ years experience in statistical programming in SAS (strongly preferred) and/or R, Python
Experience in data visualization and exploration tools (Tableau preferred)
Strong statistical knowledge and knowledge of test design
Experience distilling and presenting complex concepts to a business audience
2+ years experience using web analytics programs such as Coremetrics (preferred) or Google Analytics
2+ years experience using A/B and Multivariate testing tools; experience with A/B testing analysis preferred
#LI-CF1
About QVC, Inc
Every day, in nine countries, QVC engages millions of shoppers in a journey of discovery through an ever-changing collection of familiar brands and fresh new products, from home and fashion to beauty, electronics and jewelry.
Worldwide, QVC engages shoppers on 14 broadcast networks reaching approximately 370 million homes, seven websites, and 220 social pages.
Visit corporate.qvc.com to learn more.
For more information, visit www.qurateretailgroup.com.
QVC, Q, and the Q Ribbon Logo are registered service marks of ER Marks, Inc.
EEO
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'multivariate testing', 'econom']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'multivariate testing', 'econom']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist
Duration: 2-3+ months
Job ID: 8885216
Data scientist experience
Clinical Health
Python
Thank You,
Shibu Singha
Manager - Service Delivery
3155 North Point Pkwy Bldg.
G
Suite 130, Alpharetta GA 30005
Phone: 770-702-0134
Shibu.S@avacend.com
Required Skills
Data scientist experience
Clinical Health
Python
Required Experience
PHILADELPHIA, US-PA
",['python'],['data'],999.0,"['python', 'data']"
DS,"The position’s main responsibility will be to gather, format, and analyze information from Navy Hull, Mechanical, and Electrical (HM&E) systems.
The position will require knowledge of machine learning methods and tools, as well as techniques such as natural language processing (NLP) and Optical Character Recognition (OCR).
Candidates should be comfortable leading an engineering team, designing new software solutions, and interfacing with customers.
*Temporarily remote, once restrictions are lifted will be reporting to an office.
PRINCIPAL DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop and test software, using Python and/or Java, to provide statistical analysis for various shipboard systems.
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor of Science Degree in an engineering discipline - Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Software Engineering or Computer Science is required
Fluent with scripting in Python
Strong management skills
2-5 years of experience in a data science role
SPECIAL REQUIREMENTS:
Successful applicants must either have an active government security clearance or the ability to receive approval upon position acceptance.
SKILLS AND ABILITIES:
Essential Skills:
Software development in Python
Experience with machine learning and/or artificial intelligence
Experience with at least one of the following problem types: Time-series classification, regression analysis, optimization, clustering
Software development and operation within Linux and Unix based systems
Experience managing software baselines using version control tools such as SubVersion or Git
Strong technical writing skills and attention to detail for documentation
Willingness to lead a team and convey technical problems and solutions to a variety of team members
Additional Preferred Skills:
Experience with one or more of the following: Natural Language Processing (NLP), Optical Character Recognition (OCR), Selenium, Beautiful Soup
Experience with machine learning tools and frameworks, including TensorFlow, scikit-learn, Pandas, and NumPy
Experience with rotating machinery, industrial automation and controls, or vibrations analysis.
Travel:
This position may require up to approximately 5% travel.
Philadelphia, PA
Equal Employment Opportunity Policy:
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layout, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
","['unix', 'linux', 'git', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java']","['regress', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'optim', 'ocr', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'git', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'optim', 'ocr', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"This work will transform how financial advice is made accessible to the masses.
You will team up with business stakeholders to prioritize innovation ideas and work with other data scientists to develop and deliver breakthrough solutions.
In addition, you will coach, mentor, and guide junior data scientists to help them excel and advance their career development.
Requirements
In this role you will
Your Team:
The team works closely with subject matter experts in investment methodology and economic theory.
Impact
Your Challenge:
You will be challenged to be influential and make a positive difference on a global scale, working on a team that is purely focused on AI/ML Research.
Strong communication skills are essential to deliver your message globally across various stakeholders/teams with diverse backgrounds and focus areas spanning research, development, engineering, business, and management.
You will be working in a very agile, dynamic environment leading/supporting ongoing activities while starting new ones.
Therefore, success in this role requires excellent multitasking and time management skills.
Qualifications
What it takes
PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Machine Learning, Data Science, Electrical Engineering or related field, with 2+ years of experience in developing and implementing AI/ML related projects
Strong technical skills on machine learning/AI with proven track record.
These technical skills include, but not limited to, regression techniques, neural networks, decision trees, clustering, pattern recognition, probability theory, stochastic systems, Bayesian inference, statistical techniques, deep learning, supervised learning, unsupervised learning
Strong technical knowledge on big data technologies, cloud, and opensource software tools
Outstanding track record of successful solutions design in the digital space
Experienced in using AI/ML platforms, technologies, techniques (e.g.
TensorFlow, Apache MXnet, Theano, Keras, CNTK, scikit-learn, H2O, Spark MLlib, etc).
Proficiency with SQL and NoSQL databases
Proficiency with scalable data extraction tools (e.g.
Cassandra, MongoDB)
Proficiency with Scala, Spark, Java and/or SAS
It starts with values.
Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return.
And so can you.
Let’s make it count.
Inclusion Statement
","['h2o', 'nosql', 'kera', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'cntk', 'tensorflow', 'mongodb', 'mllib', 'scikit', 'java']","['probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",3.0,"['h2o', 'nosql', 'kera', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'cntk', 'tensorflow', 'mongodb', 'mllib', 'scikit', 'java', 'probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"----------
ARE YOU READY TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE FUTURE OF VIDEO, DIGITAL MEDIA AND ECOMMERCE?
In today's digital environment there is currently no way to connect the dots between “want and have” within real-time video and currently consumer tolerance for advertising is diminishing.
Multi-Platform
Maximize Revenue
Customers have the ability to monetize viewer engagements through discovery within video.
Own the Funnel
Gain insights into audience behavior, so you can shape and own your audience funnel.
Are you interested in shaping the future of content, digital media and ecommerce?
Do you want to help scientifically data engineer the next generation of how technology sparks consumer emotional connections with people, places, and things while blending media, eCommerce?
You will be working within a high skilled, cross functional and Agile development and engineering team and be responsible for the hands on data science and data engineering delivery of innovative components within the technology and software platform.
You will be developing a next generation platform designed for advanced Ecommerce and marketplace engagements within and around video and audio content monetization experiences.
You will be developing data driven solutions, specifically in the adaptation of Ecommerce environments, strategies and payments.
The majority of the work is in audio processing.
You will be responsible for implementing a modern Automatic Content Recognition (ACR) Experience.
Reports to the CTO and be able to perform code reviews.
Qualifications
You must have 6+ years of data science and data engineering experience and consider yourself the top 10% of all engineers in the industry.
You must have Automatic Content Recognition experience.
You must have hands-on production level Python or Node.js data engineering experience.
You must have hands-on production level MongoDB experience.
You must have GCP (Google Cloud Platform) experience.
You must have Terraform, Github, Asana, Postgres, MongoDB and RethinkDB experience.
Additional Information
Interview Process:
Screening Interview with Chief Recruiting Officer - Michael C. Bertoni
Interview with CTO/Tech Lead
Onsite Interview(s)
Offer
","['github', 'mongodb', 'python', 'cloud', 'google cloud', 'gcp', 'postgr']",['data'],999.0,"['github', 'mongodb', 'python', 'cloud', 'google cloud', 'gcp', 'sql', 'data']"
DS,"The ideal candidate must be comfortable working in a dynamic team and presenting to large audiences.
They will be applying data mining and modeling techniques, statistical analysis, and building high quality dashboards and presentations to provide insights to the executive leadership team.
They will also provide input into strategy, analysis methods, and tool selection.
Core responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Developing and executing statistical and mathematical solutions to business problems.
Framing problem, developing roadmap, and communicating intended approach and quantitative methods to develop solution.
Using analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, extracting actionable insights using advanced statistical techniques such as data analysis, data mining, optimization tools, and machine learning techniques and statistics.
Developing and deploying predictive models based on historical data that provide future predictions about customer experience.
Building forecasts, recommendations and strategic/tactical plans based on applying data science techniques to business data.
Showing consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance.
Serving as a team leader within a work group or on cross-functional teams as well as mentoring and training junior team members.
Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Graduate degree in analytical field (Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Engineering…)
5 to 8 years of relevant experience working as a BI/data analyst/Data scientist or similar role
Scripting and Programming skills (Spark SCALA, Python, PySpark, R…)
Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Quicksight, Qlick
Experience with Predictive Modeling and Machine Learning
Experience working with relational databases, SQL
Exposure to big data tools and cloud technologies such as AWS
Analytical, creative, and innovative approach to solving problems
Strong written and verbal communication
Positive and energetic attitude
Ability to work in a rapidly changing and fast paced environment
Self-motivated, highly organized, and able to prioritize and manage multiple tasks
Ability to establish and maintain strong working relationships and achieve results by working collaboratively with others
","['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'pyspark', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Are you interested in shaping the future of content, digital media and ecommerce?
Do you want to help scientifically data engineer the next generation of how technology sparks consumer emotional connections with people, places, and things while blending media, eCommerce?
You will be working within a high skilled, cross functional and Agile development and engineering team and be responsible for the hands on data science and data engineering delivery of innovative components within the technology and software platform.
You will be developing a next generation platform designed for advanced Ecommerce and marketplace engagements within and around video and audio content monetization experiences.
You will be developing data driven solutions, specifically in the adaptation of Ecommerce environments, strategies and payments.
The majority of the work is in audio processing.
You will be responsible for implementing a modern Automatic Content Recognition (ACR) Experience.
Reports to the CTO and be able to perform code reviews.
Qualifications
You must have 6+ years of data science and data engineering experience and consider yourself the top 10% of all engineers in the industry.
You must have Automatic Content Recognition experience.
You must have hands-on production level Python or Node.js data engineering experience.
You must have hands-on production level MongoDB experience.
You must have GCP (Google Cloud Platform) experience.
You must have Terraform, Github, Asana, Postgres, MongoDB and RethinkDB experience.
Additional Information
Interview Process:
Screening Interview with Chief Recruiting Officer - Michael C. Bertoni
Interview with CTO/Tech Lead
Onsite Interview(s)
Offer
","['github', 'mongodb', 'python', 'cloud', 'google cloud', 'gcp', 'postgr']",['data'],999.0,"['github', 'mongodb', 'python', 'cloud', 'google cloud', 'gcp', 'sql', 'data']"
DS,"Make it count.
Requirements
In This Role You Will:
Lead meaningful marketing science projects that provide deep insights into marketing needs and performance, and ultimately, drive better marketing return on investment and business outcomes.
Applies significant quality control and risk assessment of the model, methodologies, outputs and processes.
Identify ways of demonstrating data to address marketing challenges and opportunities.
Demonstrate subject matter expertise and develop core Marketing ML solutions such as Marketing mix models, Multi-touch attribution algorithms, Next best action solutions, Channel optimization, etc.to guide business partners and leaders in marketing planning and execution
Drive innovative marketing models and applications through continuously improve and grow CAI Marketing ML capabilities to better support marketing core goals and metrics
Impact
Reimagine the investment experience
Your real passion for data, along with your ability to communicate complex ideas through storytelling and visualization, will supply to the development of new ways of doing business.
Qualifications
What it Takes:
Graduate degree (ideally a PhD) in a quantitative/analytical field such as Data Science, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Physics or other relevant scientific field
A minimum of five years of relevant professional experience in dynamic analytical roles, combinational of machine learning, data sciences and marketing analytics
Deep understanding and experience of building models using Deep Learning, Machine Learning and Simulation methods
Experienced in developing and deploying marketing mix-models, multi-channel attribution algorithms and marketing measurement & optimization solutions
Strong proficiency in Python, R, Spark (Scala, PySpark) and data visualization tools such as D3.js
Maintains flexibility in meeting deadlines and expectations in the face of shifting priorities
It starts with values.
Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return.
And so can you.
Let’s make it count.
Inclusion Statement
","['scala', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'r', 'python']","['risk', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'r', 'python', 'risk', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Core Responsibilities
Leads the execution of large scale, more complex analytics projects.
Applies significant quality control and risk assessment of the model, methodologies, outputs, and processes for major data science projects.
Leads and executes deep dive diagnostic, predictive, and prescriptive analytics to support data-driven business decision making.
Creates alternative model approaches to assess complex model design and advance future capabilities.
Mentors and develops junior data scientists and analysts.
Identifies and diagnoses data inconsistencies and errors, documents data assumptions, and forages to fill data gaps.
Engages with senior leadership to understand and probe business processes in order to develop hypotheses.
Brings structure to requests and translates requirements into an analytic approach.
Guides test design, research design, and model validation.
Provides statistical consultation services.
Prepares and delivers insight presentations and action recommendations.
Communicates complex analytical findings and implications to business leaders.
Participates in special projects and performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Minimum of eight years related work experience in analytical roles.
Experience with data wrangling required - Programming skills to access, transform and prepare large scale data for statistical modeling.
Experience utilizing statistical and machine learning methods required.
Undergraduate degree in Analytics, Applied Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related analytical field of study or equivalent combination of training and experience.
Graduate degree preferred.
It starts with values.
Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return.
And so can you.
Let’s make it count.
Inclusion Statement
",[None],"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",1.0,"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
DS,"All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.
Responsibilities • Work with Sr. Data Scientists on Digital Engineering tasks including use of Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML) methods, techniques, and tools.
This includes technically working on multiple projects in a matrix environment while creating new programs and starting new projects.
Qualifications • MS or Ph.D. in CS or EE with 3+ years of experience in AI/big data algorithm development (B.S.
with requisite experience will be considered) • Solid knowledge of AI/ML and/or Deep Learning in general and experience with one or more specific fields related to NLP or NLU • Solid theoretic knowledge with AI/ML and experience with customizing, re-training and evaluating models to solve domain specific problems • Experience with commonly used NLP toolkits (e.g.
NLTK, SpaCy, Gensim) is a big plus • Highly Experienced in Computer Programming (Python, C, Mathematica, etc.)
• Linked Data, Triple Stores, Ontology Modeling • Expert Systems • Knowledge Management, Digital Libraries • Highly proficient in Linux, High-Performance Computing • Strong knowledge of Cybersecurity One must have good written communication, interpersonal, problem-solving, analytical, mathematical, and organizational skills.
Ability to follow directions is a must.
Applicants must be able to work well alone and as part of a team.
A Security Clearance or the ability to obtain one will be required.
U.S.
Citizenship required.
","['nltk', 'linux', 'python', 'spaci', 'c']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'nlp', 'commun']",1.0,"['nltk', 'linux', 'python', 'spaci', 'c', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'nlp', 'commun']"
DS,"Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy.
Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid.
Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom, enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.
When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created an account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Please Capitalize first letter of your First and Last Name.
Please avoid using fully capitalized text for your First and/or Last Name.
NOTE: If your name is hyphenated or has multiple capitalization, please use the same format as your government ID.
The incumbent will also be responsible for developing and delivering ad-hoc analytic studies that will directly support the objectives of the General Managers and Marketing Team in each region.
The leader will work with the management team to develop new analytics capabilities and insights in order to support growth in the local markets.
Role:
Coordinate with Marketing and Portfolio Managers to understand business objectives, identify best business practices, and to develop analytic plans to drive results
Work with Marketing to develop innovative go to market strategies including targeting and segmentation strategies, model use and strategy, and develop robust tracking and performance measurement processes
Work directly with channel managers to optimize direct response marketing (Direct Mail, E-Mail, Digital) and OB/IB Sales channels
Be responsible for conducting rigorous data analysis to help improve customer experiences and identify growth opportunities for the Business Financing Solutions team
Work cross-functionally with and provide analytic support to Product, Risk, Engineering, and Marketing towards a common business lending initiative
Identify product metrics and monitor performance through reports / dashboards and ad hoc analysis
Develop a robust testing agenda to ensure continued evolution of marketing programs and offers.
Present findings and recommendations to senior-level stakeholders
Support launch of new markets and new business lending products
Job Requirements:
At least 6-8+ years of relevant work experience analysing large, multi-dimensional data sets and synthesizing data insights into actionable recommendations
Direct response marketing experience is a requirement
Data driven mind-set, with an advanced degree in a quantitative discipline such as Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics or Economics; Masters or MBA preferred
Proven track record of deploying advanced analytic tools and processes to drive business results
Experience across product, marketing, business intelligence and/or other analytical domains
Proven ability to work independently and take direction from multiple stakeholders
Exceptional written and verbal communication skills
Demonstrated customer orientation in his/her approach to both strategy and execution.
Must implicitly understand what is necessary to create value for consumers.
Excellent people and stakeholder management skills, to include strong influencing skills and ability to navigate a global and matrixed organization
Team Player.
Committed to joint success of all teammates
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
Conshohocken, Pennsylvania, United States of America
Additional Locations:
Wilmington
PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",2.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Do you have a love for gaming?
They've created an application for online gaming.
They are currently looking to bring on a Data Scientist to predict behaviors in users.
They have hundreds of thousands of data that's well-structured in a data warehouse, so you will be responsible to gather all of the data and make predictions.
Someone with Python is ideal, but they are open to R as well.
You'll be the very first Data Scientist hired, so you will have a lot of autonomy to choose which tools to use.Required Skills & Experience* At least 3 years' experience working as a Data Scientist* Strong Python or R experience* Software Engineering* NumPy, SciPy, Scikit-learn, and Pandas* Machine Learning* Tensorflow* Keras* AWS* Predictive analytics* Monitoring and troubleshooting experienceWhat You Will Be DoingTech Breakdown* 50% programming* 50% predictive analyticsDaily Responsibilities* 100% Hands onThe Offer* Competitive Salary: Up to $130K/year, DOEYou will receive the following benefits:* Medical Insurance, Vision, and Dental* 401(k)* Educational assistance* Catered lunches* SEPTA accessible* Work from Home opportunities
","['kera', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'aw']","['machine learning', 'predict', 'data']",999.0,"['kera', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'aw', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'data']"
DS,"Leverage Artificial Intelligence to innovate the world of digital advice
The team works closely with subject matter experts in investment methodology and economic theory.
Requirements
In this role, your will:
You will be challenged to be influential and make a positive difference on a global scale, working on a team that is purely focused on AI/ML Research.
Further, you will need to establish yourself as a thought leader and the go-to person in your area of expertise, i.e.
AI/ML in financial advice.
Strong communication skills are essential to deliver your message globally across various stakeholders/teams with diverse backgrounds and focus areas spanning research, development, engineering, business, and management.
You will be working in a very agile, dynamic environment leading/supporting ongoing activities while starting new ones.
Therefore, success in this role requires excellent multitasking and time management skills.
Qualifications:
What it takes:
PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Machine Learning, Data Science, Electrical Engineering or related field, with 10+ years of experience in developing and implementing AI/ML related projects
Strong technical skills on machine learning/AI with proven track record.
These technical skills include, but not limited to, regression techniques, neural networks, decision trees, clustering, pattern recognition, probability theory, stochastic systems, Bayesian inference, statistical techniques, deep learning, supervised learning, unsupervised learning
Strong technical knowledge on big data technologies, cloud, and opensource software tools
Outstanding track record of successful solutions design in the digital space
A strong track record of starting new activity areas and E2E management of projects related to analytics enabled solutions and transferring to production as appropriate
Working with partners and /or affiliations, track record in establishing partnerships
Desirable experience in multicultural/global team and influencing decisions at the highest management levels.
Experienced in using AI/ML platforms, technologies, techniques (e.g.
TensorFlow, Apache MXnet, Theano, Keras, CNTK, scikit-learn, H2O, Spark MLlib, etc).
Proficiency with SQL and NoSQL databases
Proficiency with scalable data extraction tools (e.g.
Cassandra, MongoDB)
Proficiency with Scala, Spark, Java and/or SAS
It starts with values.
Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return.
And so can you.
Let’s make it count.
Inclusion Statement
","['h2o', 'nosql', 'kera', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'cntk', 'tensorflow', 'mongodb', 'mllib', 'scikit', 'java']","['probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",3.0,"['h2o', 'nosql', 'kera', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'cntk', 'tensorflow', 'mongodb', 'mllib', 'scikit', 'java', 'probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'bayesian', 'supervis', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"Job Summary (Primary function)
The Data Scientist participates in the development of advanced analytics solutions for Commercial Operations, Field Sales, Medical Affairs, and other consumers across the organization.
This role executes and delivers machine learning-based projects to the organization.
Essential Functions of the Job (Key responsibilities)
Contribute to an emerging data science practice focusing on problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, machine learning, and operationalization.
Develop statistical and machine learning models for POC and production-ready applications using RapidMiner, R, and Python.
Articulate real-world advantages or drawbacks of recommended approaches to business users.
Share technical solutions and product ideas with the team through design review, pair programming, code/model reviews, and tech talks.
Conduct exploratory analysis of new datasets, produce descriptive statistics, explain phenomena based on data, and develop data engineering opportunities for integration.
Daily use of one or more of the following commercial/open-source data discovery/analysis platforms: Jupyter Notebook, RStudio, RapidMiner, Microsoft Azure, and neo4j.
Qualifications (Minimal acceptable level of education, work experience, and competency)
Bachelor's degree required in data science, computer science, mathematics or relevant data science field; advanced degree preferred but not required.
Minimum 3 - 5 years of relevant project experience in successfully contributing to and/or executing data science projects.
Industry experience preferred within the business domains of customer behavior prediction, customer journey analytics, marketing analytics, and/or social network analysis.
Proven coding knowledge and proficiency in at least one of the following languages: R, Python, SAS, MATLAB.
Strong SQL skills and experience with relational databases required; experience with graph databases and Cypher preferred but not required.
Basic to substantial experience in building solutions utilizing text analytics, customer journey analytics, marketing analytics, and recommendation engines.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: hierarchical clustering, network analysis, regression, random forest, text mining, NLP, and data visualization.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications.
Management reserves the right to change or modify such duties as required.
Learn more at:
","['rapidmin', 'microsoft', 'rstudio', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'sa']","['regress', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'graph', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['rapidmin', 'microsoft', 'r', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'sa', 'regress', 'text analytics', 'data mining', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'graph', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Perform validations of templates used for microplate data acquisition and analysis following pre-defined procedures.
Calculation verifications and documentation of validation in documentum system
Ensure GXP-compliance and data integrity in analytical data systems and processes.
Collaborate closely with scientist and qualities to ensure timely verification of templates.
Qualifications
Experience with GXP compliance is required
Experience with Softmax Pro is preferred
Experience with laboratory analysis, preferably plate based assays.
Experience with data management, Lab Information Management Systems preferred
Excellent organizational & planning skills, and must be detail-oriented and adept with calculations
Excellent skills in Microsoft Excel are required
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Authorization to work in the United States indefinitely without restriction or sponsorship
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"Senior data scientist with experience in life sciences data specifically in commercial
Domain knowledge - Life science/Healthcare.
(worked in this domain will be Preferred )
Should have experience in dealing with Adept in prescriptive, predictive and descriptive analytics;
Well acquainted with Regression, ML Algorithms like Classification, Clustering and Machine Learning techniques like Decision Trees, Random Forests, Neural Network, SVM
Should have competency in Pharmaceutical Commercial Analytics & Patient Analytics/Physician segmentation.- Latin class analysis
Â
Technical Skills:
Exposure to ML tools and should be able to fine tune the algorithms .
Experience in Sage maker (Preferred)
Alteryx, Python, R, Tableau, Alteryx, Scala, Spark, Cloud Platforms, SQL,
Experience on any Visualization tools will be added advantage (Graph DB)
Â
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'db', 'cloud']","['regress', 'segment', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'random forest', 'predict', 'graph', 'neural network', 'svm', 'visual', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'db', 'cloud', 'regress', 'segment', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'random forest', 'predict', 'graph', 'nn', 'svm', 'visual', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This will span across the digital eco-system, including: search, external affiliates, display marketing, and home pages.
He or she will be a recognized technical authority for digital targeting.
Developed communication and diplomacy skills are required in order to guide, influence and convince others, in particular colleagues in other areas and occasional external customers.
Significant impact on the area through complex deliverables.
Provides advice and counsel related to the technology or operations of the business.
Work impacts an entire area, which eventually affects the overall performance and effectiveness of the sub-function/job family.
Responsibilities: Work with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies Build models leveraging a variety of tools (e.g.
Python, R, H2O, etc. )
Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['h2o', 'r', 'python']","['recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['h2o', 'r', 'python', 'recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Do you enjoy discovering and solving data challenges - dissecting them to uncover insights, would you like to tell a story with data analysis to influence decision making?
In this role you will work with business partners to solve business problems and identify opportunities to improve financial performance.
You will be responsible for analyzing data to identify insights and root causes, build models to simulate business and financial outcomes, propose actions to solve problems and present findings in a compelling manner to business leaders.
How You'll Contribute
Business Analysis
Develop a clear understanding of the problem to be solved, structuring the analysis approach in consultation with team leader and/or business client, identifying required data and sources, procuring and setting up data for analysis
Analysis of data and simulation, to identify potential solutions and root causes, in an iterative manner with team leader and/or business client
Build models that integrate business and financial data to project financial outcomes of business actions (e.g.
customer payment defaults, product returns)
Summarize and present the analysis in a compelling, concise manner with visuals and narratives.
Collecting feedback, disciplined follow up on requests in timely manner
Recurring & Ad-hoc
Build efficient queries for data using SQL and SQL-related tools to gather data from relational databases.
Partner with I.T.
to support Business Intelligence systems implementations throughout the System Development Lifecycle
Establish integrated and efficient reporting processes, tools and metrics
Bachelor’s Degree or MBA in Finance or equivalent business experience
3-5 years analytical experience, preferably within a Merchandising/Retail environment.
Advanced skills with BI tools
Ability to write SQL (oracle, teradata, netezza, mySql, etc.)
using associated tools (TOAD, SQL Navigator, etc.)
Excellent PC skills with a sound advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel and Access
Excellent analytical ability; very strong critical thinking and problem solving skills, ability to leverage analytical work into results-oriented storytelling and actionable insights
#LI-RB1
About QVC, Inc
Every day, in nine countries, QVC engages millions of shoppers in a journey of discovery through an ever-changing collection of familiar brands and fresh new products, from home and fashion to beauty, electronics and jewelry.
Worldwide, QVC engages shoppers on 14 broadcast networks reaching approximately 370 million homes, seven websites, and 220 social pages.
Visit corporate.qvc.com to learn more.
For more information, visit www.qurateretailgroup.com.
QVC, Q, and the Q Ribbon Logo are registered service marks of ER Marks, Inc.
EEO
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'mysql', 'bi', 'oracl']","['data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'oracl', 'data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"This includes integrating multiple systems and data sources to build large and complex data sets and making them usable for analytics studies (e.g.
transforming and cleaning data, working with incomplete data sources, etc) Analyzing internal talent trends and translating data into actionable insights that can be shared with business leaders, HR partners and COE leaders Telling a compelling story with data and presenting insights in a consumable format for varying audiences Staying abreast of current trends/research in data science research and technology The Ideal Candidate will have: BA/BS in a field that emphasizes data analysis and visualizations (e.g.
Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Science, Engineering, Economics, Physical Sciences, Social Sciences).
Masters or higher degree is strongly preferred.
Strong foundation in statistical techniques, advanced research design, and analytics/decision sciences with expertise in predictive modeling, time series forecasting, natural language processing (content and sentiment analysis), network analysis, machine learning, data mining, etc 5+ years of experience in: Excel (e.g.
formulas, charting, etc) SQL (or similar language for querying relational databases) SAS, R, Python and other similar scripting languages Tableau and other data visualization tools Experience managing and working with large databases, data management, including understanding of various data structures and common methods in data transformation, data validation and audit Experience independently initiating and driving analytics projects to completion Demonstrated strong collaboration skillsAnalytics & Insights is a team sport Strong consultative skills ability to translate business problems into research/analytics studies, as well as ability to communicate the results of analyses with business partners to impact strategy and action Ability to multitask and manage multiple research/analytics projects at the same time Demonstrated strong attention to detail, problem-solving, and critical thinking Business and HR acumen is strongly preferred About Citi: Citi, the leading global bank, has approximately 200 million customer accounts and does business in more than 160 countries and jurisdictions.
Citi provides consumers, corporations, governments and institutions with a broad range of financial products and services, including consumer banking and credit, corporate and investment banking, securities brokerage, transaction services, and wealth management.
Diversity is a key business imperative and a source of strength at Citi.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Purpose of Job
The candidate selected for this position is going to get work with the Omni-Channel Modeling Analytics Team in USAAs Enterprise Information Management Office.
Data Scientist Lead uses advanced techniques that integrate traditional and non-traditional datasets to enable analytical solutions; Applies predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications; Builds analytical solutions leveraging internal and external applications to deliver value and create competitive advantage; Leads initiatives and influences system architecture to enable automated intelligent solutions; Translates complex analytical and technical concepts to senior management to enable business decisions; Maintains relationships with academic and industry thought-leaders to ensure enterprise has access to cutting-edge thinking and technologies.
Job Requirements
Partners with business leaders across the organization to assess business needs, define business problems and develop a research agenda
Leads cross functional, matrixed teams to solve highly complex work critical to the organization.
Designs and builds large and complex information sets
Integrates and extracts relevant information from large amounts of both structured and unstructured data (internal and external) to enable analytical solutions.
Leads and conducts advanced analytics leveraging predictive modeling, machine learning, simulation, optimization and other techniques to deliver insights or develop analytical solutions to achieve business objectives.
Leads efforts to develop scalable, efficient, automated solutions for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation.
Works with IT to translate prototypes into new products, services, and features and provide guidelines for large-scale implementation.
Builds and maintains a robust library of reusable algorithms and supporting code such that research efforts are based on the highest quality data, are transparently conducted, are able to be productionized and are reproducible.
Provides guidance regarding analytical approach and iteration of algorithms to team members.
Develops and maintains academic and industry relationships for the purposes of research; Interacts with internal and external peers and management to maintain expertise and awareness of cutting edge techniques, technologies and potential business solutions.
Minimum Education:
Master's degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field (6 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree)
Minimum Experience:
8 or more Years in predictive modeling, large data analysis and computer science
Experience in stochastic modeling, machine learning, and other advanced mathematical techniques (e.g., neural nets, simulation, graph analysis)
Expert in at least one compiled language (e.g., Java, C or more or more) and one dynamic scripting language (Python, PERL, Ruby)
A strong track record of communicating results, insights, and technical solutions to Senior Executive Management (or equivalent)
Preferred Experience:
Prior experience using Speech-to-Text and/or Natural Language Processing (NLP) algorithms to develop models using unstructured text that were successfully implemented or used in a production environment; experience with the Gridspace Sift tool a plus.
Highly competent at data engineering in SQL and/or SAS as well as advanced machine learning (ML) techniques using Python; comfortable in cloud computing environments (Azure, GCP, AWS).
Expertise in using advanced statistical analysis to discover key relationships in data and applying that information to predict likely future outcomes.
Proven ability to enrich (add new information to) data, advise on appropriate course(s) of action to take based on results, summarize complex technical analysis for non-technical executive audiences, succinctly present visualizations of high dimensional data, and explain and justify results of work conducted.
Fluent in deep learning frameworks and libraries (TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, etc).
Hands-on experience delivering products or solutions that utilized deep learning neural networks in areas such as computer vision, Natural Language Processing (NLP), sensor data from the Internet of Things (IoT), and recommender systems.
Highly skilled in handling Big Data (Spark, Kafka, etc).
Experience in publishing at top ML, computer vision, NLP, or AI conferences and/or contributing to ML/AI-related open source projects and/or converting ML/AI papers into code is a plus.
PhD in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Operations Research, Statistics, or related field with coursework in advanced Machine Learning techniques (Natural Language Processing, Deep Neural Networks, etc).
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'kafka', 'java', 'spark', 'aw', 'perl', 'sql', 'net', 'tensorflow', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'rubi', 'gcp', 'sa', 'azur']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'neural network', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'kafka', 'java', 'spark', 'aw', 'perl', 'sql', 'net', 'tensorflow', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'rubi', 'gcp', 'sa', 'azur', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'nn', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Purpose of Job
Leads a team of Data Scientists responsible for advanced analytical solutions that include predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to that generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications.
Utilizes technical acumen and in-depth understanding of business processes and practices to influence the creation and execution of operational and strategic plans.
Partners with IT and other areas to build major improvements to analytical processes and systems.
Advises Senior Leadership on the development of data science solutions and long-term goals and or strategies.
Maintains relationships with academic and industry thought leaders to ensure the enterprise has access to cutting-edge thinking and technologies.
Job Requirements
Collaborates with other analytical leaders to fulfill the strategic direction of the business through data and information exploration, research of emerging technologies or analytical techniques and long-term defined/project specific strategic assignments.
Identifies additional resource needs ranging from IT investments, 3rd party support or additional analysts.
Understands the business direction, environment and strategies, to identify and recommend solutions that influence decision makers and drive change.
Directs the design and construction of large and complex data sets from large amounts of structured and unstructured data (internal and external) to enable analytical solutions.
Builds and leads a high performing team of experts in advanced analytics.
Develops team reputation as highly skilled experts in the field of data science.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field OR 6 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
8 or more years of experience in predictive modeling, large data analysis and computer science
3 or more years of direct management experience
Experience in stochastic modeling, machine learning, and other advanced mathematical techniques (e.g., neural nets, simulation, graph analysis)
Expert in at least one compiled language (e.g., Java, C) and one dynamic scripting language (e.g., Python, PERL, Ruby)
A strong track record of communicating results, insights, and technical solutions to Senior Executive Management (or equivalent)
*Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
This will take approximately 5 minutes.
Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.
Preferred Requirements:
Evidence of successful development and implementation of data science solutions
Prior experience working in an IT organization
2+ years of prior people management experience
Experience of working in a cloud environment
Understanding of model risk governance as laid out in SR 11-7
For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have managers approval prior to posting.
","['python', 'net', 'cloud', 'perl', 'rubi', 'c', 'java']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['python', 'net', 'cloud', 'perl', 'rubi', 'c', 'java', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Master's / bachelor's degree in computer science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field.
* 5-8 years of experience in predictive modeling, large data analysis and computer science* Experience in modeling, machine learning, and other advanced mathematical techniques (e.g., neural nets, simulation, graph analysis)* Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, Python, R, PL SQL) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
* Expertise in experimental design, advanced statistical analysis, and modeling to discover key relationships in data and applying that information to predict likely future outcomes; fluent in regression, classification, tree-based models, clustering methods, text mining, and neural networks.
* Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
","['excel', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'neural network', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'nn', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices.
Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics.
Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven.
Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning.
Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity.
Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program.
Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects
Original Hire Document for data scientist below:
Job Responsibilities:
· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices
· Customer outreach and engagement
· Problem solving
· Time management
· Collaborate with others
· Mission focused
· Deliver findings
· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements
· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data
· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements
· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity
· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis
Knowledge/Skills Ability:
Required:
· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.
· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.
· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.
· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.
· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)
Minimum Experience/Education:
· At least one (1) of the following:
· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations
· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)
· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years
Highly Desired:
· Education/ Certifications:
· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis
· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level
· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree
*BEAT LLC IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER - DISABILITY AND VETERANS*
","['r', 'scala', 'spark', 'python']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",1.0,"['r', 'scala', 'spark', 'python', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"This person will help execute the DHA/HCE Data Vision of providing seamless data services and decision support for clinicians, patients, beneficiaries, analysts, researchers, and DoD leadership.
This individual's primary responsibility will be to provide advanced analytics to support HCEs understanding of the issues on military service IAW SEC.
721 of the NDAA for FY 2009.
The Data scientist will perform, collect, analyze, and report data to support a variety of hearing-related initiatives.
Responsibilities Include:
Provide a variety of business intelligence and advanced analytics services, including descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Perform advanced exploratory and predictive analytics using machine learning techniques to gain insights on outcomes of interest to help improve patient care through clinical communities
Support DoD/VA internal and external research partnerships in the hearing health community as well as general analyses required within the HCE
Work with both structured and unstructured data employing unsupervised learning models including isolation forest, k-means clustering, anomaly detection, and principal component analysis
Handle Big Data problems utilizing unique technologies that store, manipulate, extract, and create features for processing and modeling
Implement machine learning algorithms with multidimensional data for classification and clustering problems and graphical networks
Provide overall data management and analytic solutions, ensuring adherence to all applicable privacy, data security, and HIPAA regulations and guidelines for Human and Non-Human Subject Researches
Serve as a Subject Matter Expert of MHS/VHA data and make recommendations on improving data collection methodologies related to any hearing requirements.
Extract data from multiple data warehousing sources to generate and design standard and ad-hoc reports.
Required Experience:
Minimum of 5 years of demonstrated experience in statistics and statistical software (R, SAS, Python, SQL)
Exposure and understanding of Data Science/Machine Learning Techniques (isolation forest, k-means clustering, anomaly detection, and principal component analysis, Baysian, etc.)
1-2 years of experience with data visualization software (Tableau, Qlik, PowerBI)
Expert knowledge in Microsoft Office products and Sharepoint
Demonstrated experience in preparing and editing technical documentation
Experience and Skills
Qualifications:
Experience working with Military Health Systems (MHS) and/or Veteran Health Administration (VHA) and Veteran Benefits Administration (VBA) data systems, such as Management Analysis and Reporting Tool (M2), MHS Data Repository (MDR) and Defense Manpower Data Center (DMDC)/Defense Eligibility and Enrollment Systems (DEERS), VA CDW and DSS.
Proficient in Python, R, SAS, Tableau, Shiny, SQL, and Hadoop ecosystem
Exposure to distributed files frameworks including Hive and Spark
Experience in leveraging machine learning algorithms to perform predictive modeling and forecasting.
Experience of performing statistical modeling with multiple regression techniques, variable selection methods, time series analyses, and neural networks in Python, R, and/or SAS
Experience of utilizing Python or R in data analytics to collect, understand, transform, cleanse, store, and share data in a privacy-preserving way
Proficient in data visualization tools to design report and graphs to identify autonomous patterns and behaviors
Experience with text analytics including Natural Language Processing
Strong background in mathematics, statistics, and probability preferred
Applicants must possess, at a minimum, a favorably adjudicated National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI) or an equivalent or higher investigation
Education:
Master's degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or an associated technical discipline with three (3) years minimum experience in data analytics, including providing analytical management by planning, coordinating and directing programs, conducting surveys and studies, and special projects OR
Bachelor's degree in one of the above disciplines with eight (8) years minimum experience in data analytics, including providing analytical management by planning, coordinating and directing programs, conducting surveys and studies, and special projects.
","['spark', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['big data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'statist', 'time series', 'probabl', 'text analytics', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'cluster', 'graph', 'research', 'data warehousing', 'natural language processing', 'exploratori', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['spark', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'big data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'statist', 'time series', 'probabl', 'text analytics', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'regress', 'cluster', 'graph', 'research', 'data warehousing', 'nlp', 'exploratori', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Required Skills:
Python/Machine Language/SAS /Python - Data Science
","['sa', 'python']",['data'],999.0,"['sa', 'python', 'data']"
DS,"Data Scientist 6 years of exp Hands on Exp with the following Python, R studios, sas statistical modeling mehnaz At sierrasoln DOT com 5202888121
","['r', 'python']","['statist', 'data']",999.0,"['r', 'python', 'statist', 'data']"
DS,"* Aggregate and analyze population health data to respond to questions from the various Congressional inquiries, DoD senior leaders, DHA, Services' Surgeon General, Service-specific Headquarters agencies, and the MTFs.
* Access, validate and analyze information about the MHS population by developing, validating and linking various medical, safety, environmental, occupational and personnel databases.
* Identify and troubleshoot data import, analysis, and display errors from multiple data sources.
* Provide technical knowledge to customers, internal and external to DHA, regarding study design and methodologies.
* Able to read, write, speak and understand English.
* Proven ability to synthesize disparate facts from multiple sources and coalesce into an accurate and useful analytic product, incorporating Service and MHS strategic goals for use by leadership in both tactical and strategic decision making.
* Demonstrated advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office products PLUS additional software/hardware skills and capabilities.
* Ability to critically examine and evaluate, problem-solve.
* Demonstrated ability to undertake and complete multiple tasks with multiple deadlines simultaneously.
* Ability to deliver products on time, on schedule, within budget.
* Flexibility and ability to adapt to rapidly changing and often time-constrained environment.
If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation.
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'analyz', 'hardwar']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'hardwar']"
DS,"**
*Job Summary:**
The Data Scientist will provide research, modeling, analysis, and guidance using Advanced Analytics and Data Science techniques to develop and support data and model-driven decision making through leading-edge business solutions.
The Data Scientist will engage directly with business and technology partners to research, identify, and seek out information, facts, and data, and will conduct and promote scientific, inquisitive, and innovative approaches to business decision problems and technical solutions.
Responsibilities:
+ Assist or lead the formulation, calibration, validation, and implementation of predictive analytics, statistical, and machine learning models
+ Communicate complex solutions and ideas to a variety of stakeholders (other team members, IT leadership, and business leaders) in easily understandable language
+ Work on a number of projects as a member of the project team and/or as an individual contributor
+ Write code that meets standards and delivers desired functionality using agreed upon technology
+ Participate in system and user acceptance testing
+ Participate in project planning sessions to gather user requirements
+ Assist in the preparation of time estimates for project schedules
+ Troubleshoot production problems within area of expertise
+ Utilize and stay current in programming languages and software technology
Qualifications:
+ Master's Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research or a related analytical field - Ph.D. desired
+ 2+ years of commercial experience in a data science, machine learning, or predictive analytics role, formulating and implementing predictive analytics models
+ A demonstrable scientific foundation and understanding of concepts of predictive analytics and data science such as theoretical statistics, estimation theory, simulation, consumer choice modeling, machine learning, etc.
+ Solid programming skills in a general-purpose language and expertise in Python or R
+ Exceptional analytical, decision-making, and problem-solving skills as well as solid communication and presentation skills with technical and non-technical audiences
+ Experience and understanding of software development practice concepts and technology obtained through formal training and/or work experience
San Antonio, TX: 20880 Stone Oak Parkway, 78258
Position Type
Regular
Click here at http://iheartmediacareers.com/Pages/EEO.aspx to learn about E-Verify.
","['r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"• Master's / bachelor’s degree in computer science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field.
• 5-8 years of experience in predictive modeling, large data analysis and computer science
• Experience in modeling, machine learning, and other advanced mathematical techniques (e.g., neural nets, simulation, graph analysis)
• Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, Python, R, PL SQL) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
• Expertise in experimental design, advanced statistical analysis, and modeling to discover key relationships in data and applying that information to predict likely future outcomes; fluent in regression, classification, tree-based models, clustering methods, text mining, and neural networks.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
Job Function
FINANCE
Role
Scientist
Job Id
158701
Desired Skills
Data scientist
Desired Candidate Profile
Qualifications :
BACHELOR OF COMPUTER SCIENCE
","['excel', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'neural network', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'graph', 'nn', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Aggregate and analyze population health data to respond to questions from the various Congressional inquiries, DoD senior leaders, DHA, Services Surgeon General, Service-specific Headquarters agencies, and the MTFs.
Access, validate and analyze information about the MHS population by developing, validating and linking various medical, safety, environmental, occupational and personnel databases.
Identify and troubleshoot data import, analysis, and display errors from multiple data sources.
Provide technical knowledge to customers, internal and external to DHA, regarding study design and methodologies.
Provide program management to refine the business and clinical measures and prototypes for optimal implementation by DHA and other agencies/MHS as appropriate.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:
Able to read, write, speak and understand English.
Proven ability to synthesize disparate facts from multiple sources and coalesce into an accurate and useful analytic product, incorporating Service and MHS strategic goals for use by leadership in both tactical and strategic decision making.
Demonstrated advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office products PLUS additional software/hardware skills and capabilities.
Ability to critically examine and evaluate, problem-solve.
Demonstrated ability to undertake and complete multiple tasks with multiple deadlines simultaneously.
Ability to deliver products on time, on schedule, within budget.
Flexibility and ability to adapt to rapidly changing and often time-constrained environment.
DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT:
CITIZENSHIP/SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Must be able to pass a NACI background check
Ke`aki Technologies LLC is a fast-growing government service provider.
Ke`aki Technologies is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.
If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation.
For additional information, please visit www.alakainafoundation.com.
#Monster
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices.
Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics.
Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven.
Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning.
Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity.
Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects
Original Hire Document for data scientist below:
Job Responsibilities:
· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices
· Customer outreach and engagement
· Problem solving
· Time management
· Collaborate with others
· Mission focused
· Deliver findings
· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements
· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data
· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements
· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity
· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis
Knowledge/Skills Ability:
Required:
· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.
· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.
· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.
Minimum Experience/Education:
· At least one (1) of the following:
· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations
· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)
· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years
Highly Desired:
· Education/ Certifications:
· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis
· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree
","['r', 'scala', 'spark', 'python']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",1.0,"['r', 'scala', 'spark', 'python', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"Air Education and Training Command is creating a new Chief Data Officer function.
The Data Scientist (Sr.) will be part of the technical support team who would define, build and manage a new learning services system to modernize the command’s learning environment.
This would include engaging with stakeholders to learn about needs and existing solutions, creating a new technical backbone for the command, and helping develop a modern data strategy.
Consistently perform analysis and translate business needs to create high-quality Business Requirements and Functional Specifications documentation within specified time frames to solve most complex problems (multiple interfaces with other systems across multiple business units) considering all impacted components from an end-to-end perspective.
Ensures end-to-end traceability of requirements is complete.
Conduct impact analysis of technology changes on business processes and existing technology.
Competent to work at the highest technical capacity on most phases of the business systems analysis.
Contribute to the review of Test Planning and Test Execution strategies.
Create the appropriate User-Interface Model(s) to support projects.
Develop business workflow diagrams.
Assist in the development of data models and interface design specifications.
Documents, tracks, and resolves issues related to data quality.
Contribute to the design and mapping of data conversion strategies.
Participate in collaborative system and data design sessions with the user community, technical architecture resources, and development resources.
Complete project activities on time and within budget, and proactively identifies and communicates issues that may jeopardize milestones or project budget to the Project Manager.
Versed in strategic policy guidance and is familiar with the higher headquarter offices who develop government policy that affects the configuration of the Learning Services Ecosystem.
Requirements
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS & EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s Degree in associated discipline area (e.g.
computer science, information technology, statistics, etc).
Five years’ industry experience.
Active Secret clearance.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS & EXPERIENCE
Experience on MAJCOM staff; familiarity with flying training, aircraft maintenance and related data systems; strong communication and teambuilding skills.
Benefits
This position will afford excellent visibility, internal mobility and leadership opportunities, within a dynamic, growth-focused organization, offering competitive compensation and robust benefits.
",['excel'],"['data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist
Duration: Full Time
Required Skills:
Python/Machine Language/SAS /Python - Data Science
Job Type: Full-time
","['sa', 'python']",['data'],999.0,"['sa', 'python', 'data']"
DS,"Data Scientist
TX - San Antonio
Job Code
6688
# of openings
1
Provide analytical tools and resources to assess the health of the Military Health System (MHS) beneficiary population.
Provide technical expertise in the areas of prevention, managed care, medical readiness issues, health promotion, clinical safety and quality, and other health Service-related issues in order to support the DHA.
Perform clinical and business analytical studies using accepted data science techniques to provide insight into areas of trending/improvement for prevention, managed care, medical readiness issues, health promotion, clinical safety and quality, and other health Service-related issues.
Aggregate and analyze population health data to respond to questions from the various Congressional inquiries, DoD senior leaders, DHA, Services’ Surgeon General, Service-specific Headquarters agencies, and the MTFs.
Access, validate and analyze information about the MHS population by developing, validating and linking various medical, safety, environmental, occupational and personnel databases.
Identify and troubleshoot data import, analysis, and display errors from multiple data sources.
Provide data analysis and decision support using research expertise as well as literature review/evidence-base to develop clinical and business measures and prototypes of health information technology (IT) tools, programs, procedures, services or databases to support DHA’s goal of building a managed healthcare system that considers and optimizes safety, quality, cost and access.
Provide technical knowledge to customers, internal and external to DHA, regarding study design and methodologies.
Provide program management to refine the business and clinical measures and prototypes for optimal implementation by DHA and other agencies/MHS as appropriate.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:
Must have experience with Data Modeling and the application of Predictive Analytics.
Mush have expert level skills in one or more of the following: Python, R, SQL, SAS, Tableau/Tableau Creator and Application/Dashboard Development.
Must have a three year experience data mining and analysis of MHS health data.
Able to read, write, speak and understand English.
Proven ability to synthesize disparate facts from multiple sources and coalesce into an accurate and useful analytic product, incorporating Service and MHS strategic goals for use by leadership in both tactical and strategic decision making.
Demonstrated ability to provide accurate and timely analytical products containing well‐reasoned and cogent discussion points providing leadership with substantiated options or courses of action.
Demonstrated ability to organize/participate/lead working groups to develop analytic products and byproducts or to develop/understand processes leading to effective optimization of analytic efforts.
Demonstrated ability to effectively and clearly communicate analytical discoveries and appropriate recommendations/mitigation strategies to all levels of customers including Senior DHA leadership.
Demonstrated advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office products PLUS additional software/hardware skills and capabilities.
Ability to critically examine and evaluate, problem-solve.
Demonstrated ability to undertake and complete multiple tasks with multiple deadlines simultaneously.
Ability to deliver products on time, on schedule, within budget.
Flexibility and ability to adapt to rapidly changing and often time-constrained environment.
Ability to acquire skills/capabilities necessary to meet growing needs/demands of systems/software/hardware.
DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT:
Master’s degree in Public Health, Health Services Research, Epidemiology, Mathematics, Biostatistics, Statistics, Informatics or related areas, or previous participation in advanced training/program with one of those related areas, and identified as a Fellow in their area of expertise is required.
Other significant related clinical/medical/health data experience such as previous participation in an analytics/quantitative field fellowship/training may be considered as an appropriate substitute for education, but minimum of Bachelor’s degree in above areas required unless otherwise specified and with few exceptions.
CITIZENSHIP/SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Must be able to pass a NACI background check
If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation.
The Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) is comprised of industry-recognized government service firms designated as Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO)-owned and 8(a) certified businesses.
Alaka`ina Foundation activities under the 501(c)3 principally benefit the youth of Hawaii through charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship.
For additional information, please visit www.alakainafoundation.com.
#Monster
","['microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'sa']","['data modeling', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'hardwar', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'sa', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'hardwar', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Provide Research Project Development and Support
Maintains a basic knowledge of human physiology, medical burn/trauma/critical care, combat casualty care concept, medical informatics and DoD clinical information systems (e.g.
Electronic Medical Record.)
Advances the science of information technology research, Advanced Technology Development by writing and submitting intramural and extramural grant proposals
Assists in the writing Cooperative Research and Development Agreements, Memorandums of Understanding and any other document required to collaborate with internal and external partners.
Independently conceptualizes, writes, develops and conducts laboratory, animal, non-human & human subject research protocols for execution consistent with the goals of the Task Area.
Works with the sponsors, collaborators, Principal/Associate investigators, Institutional Review Board and Institutional Animal Care and Use Committee, and client research support departments to coordinate activities for protocol approval and implementation and to assure that appropriate regulatory documentation is completed.
Assists in the internal and external assessment of adherence to protocols, ethical requirements, as well as relevant DoD and Institute regulations and guidance
Develops and maintains records of research activities, maintains research study regulatory readiness and assists in regulatory audits/inspections.
Manages research activities within a defined budget
Leads a team of software developers, clinicians and researchers; provides scientific research leadership and mentoring to junior researchers and fellows on team.
Participates in investigator/study and Task Area team meetings.
Data Collection and Analysis
Serves as a Primary or Associate Investigator on research protocols that involve multiple Task Areas and projects (collaborative efforts).
Collects data, documents experimental findings, summarizes data, prepares figures through use of available computer resources, and conducts preliminary analysis.
Develop schema templates and relational database repositories and utilize statistical processes and applications including JMP, SAS, Prism, and R-Studio for data input formats.
Writes code in Python, Java, SQL, Oracle Database, Java, R-language programming languages to support further development on artificial intelligence and clinical decision support tools
Possesses skills and familiarity utilizing computer dataset tools: Python, SQL, Oracle Database, Java, R-language
Performs appropriate statistical computations on raw data to determine significance, summarize results and draws appropriate conclusions.
Data Dissemination
Participates in the interpretation of results and prepares reports, abstracts, presentations and manuscripts for publication.
Prepares figures, tables, methodological text, photography, graphics, and image production, for study presentations and publications.
Participates in lectures, seminars, and conferences.
Presents research findings at military and scientific conferences.
Facilitates the gathering and sharing of relevant intellectual knowledge, expertise and data with clinical and research groups within the federal government, private sector and research facilities.
Prepares periodic and status reports, as required by investigators, administrators, funding agencies, and/or regulatory bodies.
Assists in the preparation for patent applications, intellectual property protections, invention disclosures, technology transfer etc…
Assists in the transition of TA developed technologies toward Advanced Development.
Required Experience:
A qualified data scientist will have hands-on experience - JMP, SAS, Prism, and R-Studio
Experience writing code in Python, Java, SQL, Oracle Database, Java, R-language programming languages
Experience with some number of the following statistical and predictive modeling approaches: Gaussian Process; Markov Models; Hierarchical Clustering; K-Means; Linear Regression; Logistic Regression; Monte Carlo Simulation; Neural Networks
5+ years of experience with the following:
Strong analytical skills (use of Microsoft Excel, Macros and/or Access to analyze data)
Strong presentation development and writing skills (e.g., proficient in Microsoft PowerPoint and Word)
Ability to facilitate client meetings and sessions to define client processes and needs
Ability to lead small teams to complete a project
Strong written and oral skills required
Experience in one of the following areas: Statistical Analysis, Strategic Management, or Data Analysis/Reporting
Minimum Bachelor's Degree in Business, Economics, Mathematics, Statistics, Data Science or Hard Sciences with a focus on research and analysis, Master’s Degree is preferred.
Core hours of work are between the hours of 0800 to 1500 daily.
Competitive market-based salary, commensurate with experience and education
Comprehensive benefits package available (Medical, Dental, PTO, 401k etc).
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'information technology']"
DS,"Essential Functions, Responsibilities & Duties may include, but are not limited to:
Evaluate statistical models to determine the validity of analyses, implement evaluated models into production by collaborating with software developers, periodically re-evaluate and refine machine learning models being used in production
Develop and refine date sets to achieve stakeholder goals and objectives as requested
Work with analysts to interpret analytic results and refine analysis as needed
Coordinate with Data Analysts to refine and implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers, analysts and other stakeholders
Advise on the interpretation and use of data intelligence products, quality assessments and applications
Collaborate with Intelligence Analysts to understand needs and devise possible solutions
Assess training requirements based on current system and functional baseline
Develop training artifacts in support of operations including Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), and Tactics, Techniques and Procedures (TTPs)
Required Qualifications:
Top Secret clearance with SCI eligibility
MS in Data Science, Statistics, Applied Math, or related field
Two years of experience leading data science projects is desired
Five years of intelligence analysis experience is desired
Demonstrated proficiency with R or Python, and SQL to manipulate data and draw insights from large and small data sets
Demonstrated proficiency in a variety of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Demonstrated proficiency in advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications
Demonstrated proficiency with common data science libraries
Demonstrated proficiency visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders
Demonstrated proficiency with MS Office tools including Excel, PowerPoint, and Word
Demonstrated proficiency with AWS, in particular products related to analytics, compute, database, developer tools, and machine learning
Experience with database solutions including SQL, NoSQL (e.g.
MongoDB) and graph (e.g.
Neo4j)
Experience with data visualization tools, such as D3.js, ggplot, Bokeh, etc.
Capability to recognize when Data Science can add value to an intelligence problem, and when it cannot
Ability to translate an intelligence problem into a Data Science problem, and to work with the Intelligence Analysts and ACE Chief to refine the understanding of the problem
Comfortable working in a dynamic environment with several ongoing concurrent projects; able to multitask, prioritize, and manage time effectively
Interpersonal skills and communication with all levels of leadership
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques; desire to maintain currency on latest industry trends including completing additional training; able to articulate trends and potential clearly and confidently
Creative problem solver who thrives when presented with a challenge; able to analyze problems and strategize for better solutions; strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on production for re-use
Goal-oriented, encouraging to team and staff; comfortable as a team-player, leader and mentor
Working Environment & Conditions
This position is primarily indoors, consistent with a standard office position and has a noise level of mostly low to moderate.
The incumbent is required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear.
The work load may require the incumbent to sit for extended periods of time.
The incumbent must be able to read, do simple math calculations and withstand moderate amounts of stress.
The incumbent must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 lbs.
Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
This contact information is used for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire on a status of your application.
","['nosql', 'ms office', 'bokeh', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'aw']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'graph', 'math', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",999.0,"['nosql', 'microsoft', 'bokeh', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'aw', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'graph', 'math', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"DescriptionThe Data Scientist 2 uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Data Scientist 2 work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.ResponsibilitiesHumana's Clinical Trend and Analytics Team is seeking a Data Scientist.
The Clinical Trend and Analytics team uses advanced scientific techniques, forecasting, and machine learning to predict financial and clinical outcomes in order to guide investments that improve health outcomes and reduce costs.
The Data Scientist leverages large sets of structured and unstructured data to develop tactical and strategic insights.
The work assignments are varied and frequently require interpretation and independent determination of the appropriate courses of action.
Consumers expect more personalized and holistic experiences from their health partners.?
Ideally, this position would be located in Louisville, KY.
View the EEO is the Law poster.If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.Humana Safety and SecurityHumana will never ask, nor require a candidate provide money for work equipment and network access during the application process.
",[None],"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Locations: Washington, DC
People who use data to solve hard problems.
Including ones that did not exist a few years ago.
You are:
More than a data and statistics expert.
You are the applied intelligence expert.
You are confident working on design algorithms and large-scale statistical models.
You want to help your client deliver faster and better services to U.S. citizens and improve people's quality of life where it matters most.
The work:
Work with clients to create questions and define technology opportunities
Drive the exploration of data sources and analytic techniques to create new modeling approaches
Work with large data sets to solve complex problems
Lead and oversee teams to solve clients' solutions
",[None],"['statist', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'data']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
+ Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
+ Build 'smart' systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
+ Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution
In the first year this role will focus on the following
+ Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
+ Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
+ Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
+ Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
+ Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers
Required Qualifications
+ Master's Degree + 3 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 5 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
+ Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
+ Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
+ Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ Master's Degree or PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
",[None],"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['data', 'predict', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Oversees and executes the exploration of promising new technologies, analytical methods and data sources (internal external) that have potential to add value to the enterprise.
Partners with enterprise analytical and IT teams to build core capabilities and processes.
Identifies additional resource needs ranging from IT investments, 3rd party support or additional analysts.
Directs the design and construction of large and complex data sets from large amounts of structured and unstructured data (internal and external) to enable analytical solutions.
Builds and leads a high performing team of experts in advanced analytics.
Develops team reputation as highly skilled experts in the field of data science.
",[None],['data'],999.0,['data']
DS,"Lead Data Scientist
The person in this role will be be responsible for leading a small team of Data and Software Engineers responsible for Cyber Security related data analysis and application development
Strong compensation and benefits
Flexibility to work remote part of the time
What You Will Be Doing
Lead a small team of data and software engineers in developing Cyber Security applications and analyzing data
ETL of data in a cloud environment (AWS/Azure)
Collaborate across teams on multiple projects
What You Need for this Position
Strong experience in Python
SPARK experience
Must have strong understanding of and experience in Data Science fundamentals and methodologies
Understanding of API Integration
Sumo Logic Experience
Team Lead Experience
Cyber Security / SIEM experience preferred.
What's In It for You
Strong Compensation and Comprehensive benefits
Valuable experience with connected industry leader
Growth opportunities
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['python', 'spark', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud']","['etl', 'data']",999.0,"['python', 'spark', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud', 'etl', 'data']"
DS,"The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Lead Data Scientist works on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial.
Responsibilities
The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
This role advises key executives to develop functional strategies (often segment specific) on matters of significance.
Exercises independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks, and works under minimal supervision, Uses independent judgment requiring analysis of variable factors and determining the best course of action.
+ Collaborate with key business leaders to understand business problems and formulate analytical solutions for problem solving as well as lead or collaborate with a team of data scientists, data analysts or big data engineers on analytical projects, proving benefits of solutions and helping with execution and measurement
+ Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
+ Act as an external facing business translator whose combined expertise in AI/ML and analytics will enable the incorporation of these practices to drive data driven decision in practice
+ Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
+ Deep dives across member populations to determine opportunities for improved timing or type of intervention
+ Advanced predictive analytics to help optimize the touchpoint patterns following these deepdives
+ Serve as a key participant of a cross-functional, collaborative team focused on develop consumer-centric strategies that drive value to the member and the business
Required Qualifications
+ PhD + 2 years' experience, Master's Degree + 4 years' experience OR Bachelor's Degree + 6 years' experience.
+ Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program.
+ 2+ years' experience in project, process or people leadership
+ Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
+ Successful demonstrated experience in working on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial
+ Advanced programming experience in Python, R, or SAS
+ Experience in creating analysis, projections, models, and presentations to support business
+ Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
+ Ability to exercise independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks
+ Ability to works under minimal supervision, using independent judgment
+ Ability to communicate statistical & complex concepts in a simplified manner
+ Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
+ PhD
+ Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health
+ NLP Experience
Additional Information
This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or work from home (remote)
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Equal Opportunity Employer
View the EEO is the Law poster.
If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact mailbox_tas_recruit@humana.com for assistance.
","['r', 'sa', 'python']","['segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'sa', 'python', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Ideally you have: •5 years experience in quantitative analysis and statistical modeling (regression, correlation, clustering, etc.).
•4 year of experience consulting or experience in a similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery.
•3 years experience using analytics tools and languages - R, Python, SAS, etc.
•3 years experience combining data sets, extracting key variables, and creating new variables to enhance modeling.
•3 years experience performing basic ETL functions and understanding of data quality steps/measures.
•US Citizenship required.
Understanding of Professional Services or System Integration organizations
• Ability to comprehend, synthesize, and report on data and metrics
• Experience creating and presenting executive level briefings • Experience preparing business development and account plans
• Experience managing opportunity pipelines
","['r', 'sa', 'python']","['regress', 'etl', 'correl', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['r', 'sa', 'python', 'regress', 'etl', 'correl', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'pipelin']"
DS,"To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in San Antonio and requires an active TS w/SCI Eligibility clearance*
*Also looking for candidates in these locations: Charlottesville, Fort Bragg (NC), Fort Gordon (GA), Ft. Meade, Hawaii, San Antonio, Germany, Italy, South Korea
5+ years applying statistics, machine learning and analytic approaches to answer key intelligence questions, producing results and re-usable products that provide real value to Intelligence Analysts.
Contractor shall develop and refine date sets to achieve stakeholder goals and objectives as requested.
Work with analysts to interpret analytic results and refine analysis as needed.
Evaluate statistical models to determine the validity of analyses, implement evaluated models into production by collaborating with software developers, periodically re-evaluate and refine machine learning models being used in production.
Coordinate with Data Analysts to refine and implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers, analysts and other stakeholders.
Contractor shall advise on the interpretation and use of data intelligence products, quality assessments and applications.
Collaborate with Intelligence Analysts to understand needs and devise possible solutions.
The Contractor shall:
Conduct technical reviews and develop appropriate materials to training system users and Instructors in preparation of operational deployments.
Assess training requirements based on current system and functional baseline.
Develop training artifacts in support of operations including Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), and Tactics, Techniques and Procedures (TTPs).
Languages, Tools, and Techniques
Demonstrated proficiency with R or Python, and SQL to manipulate data and draw insights from large and small data sets.
Demonstrated proficiency in a variety of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Demonstrated proficiency in advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
Demonstrated proficiency with common data science libraries.
Demonstrated proficiency visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders.
Demonstrated proficiency with MS Office tools
including Excel, PowerPoint, and Word.
Demonstrated proficiency with AWS, in particular products related to: analytics, compute, database, developer tools, and machine learning.
Skilled data wrangler.
Experience with database solutions including SQL, NoSQL (e.g.
MongoDB) and graph (e.g.
Neo4j).
Experience with data visualization tools, such as D3.js, ggplot, Bokeh, etc.
Capability to recognize when Data Science can add value to an intelligence problem, and when it cannot.
Ability to translate an intelligence problem into a Data Science problem, and to work with the Intelligence Analysts and ACE Chief to refine understanding of the problem.
Active TS/SCI clearance
MS in Data Science, Statistics, Applied Math, or related field.
2 years leading data science projects is desired and 5 years intelligence analysis experience is desired.
Experience working with platforms such as Scala, Python, Java, R
5+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web-based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
","['nosql', 'ms office', 'bokeh', 'scala', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'java']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'graph', 'math', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",999.0,"['nosql', 'microsoft', 'bokeh', 'scala', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'java', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'graph', 'math', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"These positions will support the 24/7 Defense Health Agency (DHA) contract by providing expertise in the areas of Data Science and Decision Support Analysis.
Some remote work is available, depending on shift.
JOB DUTIES: Provide analytical tools and resources to assess the health of the Military Health System (MHS) beneficiary population.
Provide technical expertise in the areas of prevention, managed care, medical readiness issues, health promotion, clinical safety and quality, and other health Service-related issues in order to support the DHA.
Perform clinical and business analytical studies using accepted data science techniques to provide insight into areas of trending/improvement for prevention, managed care, medical readiness issues, health promotion, clinical safety and quality, and other health Service-related issues.
Aggregate and analyze population health data to respond to questions from the various Congressional inquiries, DoD senior leaders, DHA, Services Surgeon General, Service-specific Headquarters agencies, and the MTFs.
Access, validate and analyze information about the MHS population by developing, validating and linking various medical, safety, environmental, occupational and personnel databases.
Identify and troubleshoot data import, analysis, and display errors from multiple data sources.
Provide data analysis and decision support using research expertise as well as literature review/evidence-base to develop clinical and business measures and prototypes of health information technology (IT) tools, programs, procedures, services or databases to support DHAs goal of building a managed healthcare system that considers and optimizes safety, quality, cost and access.
Provide technical knowledge to customers, internal and external to DHA, regarding study design and methodologies.
Provide program management to refine the business and clinical measures and prototypes for optimal implementation by DHA and other agencies/MHS as appropriate.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE: Must have experience with Data Modeling and the application of Predictive Analytics.
Mush have expert level skills in one or more of the following: Python, R, SQL, SAS, Tableau/Tableau Creator and Application/Dashboard Development.
Must have three years experience in data mining and analysis of MHS health data.
Able to read, write, speak and understand English.
Proven ability to synthesize disparate facts from multiple sources and coalesce into an accurate and useful analytic product, incorporating Service and MHS strategic goals for use by leadership in both tactical and strategic decision making.
Demonstrated ability to provide accurate and timely analytical products containing wellreasoned and cogent discussion points providing leadership with substantiated options or courses of action.
Demonstrated ability to organize/participate/lead working groups to develop analytic products and byproducts or to develop/understand processes leading to effective optimization of analytic efforts.
Demonstrated ability to effectively and clearly communicate analytical discoveries and appropriate recommendations/mitigation strategies to all levels of customers including Senior DHA leadership.
Demonstrated advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office products PLUS additional software/hardware skills and capabilities.
Ability to critically examine and evaluate, problem-solve.
Demonstrated ability to undertake and complete multiple tasks with multiple deadlines simultaneously.
Ability to deliver products on time, on schedule, within budget.
Flexibility and ability to adapt to rapidly changing and often time-constrained environment.
Ability to acquire skills/capabilities necessary to meet growing needs/demands of systems/software/hardware.
DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT: Masters degree in Public Health, Health Services Research, Epidemiology, Mathematics, Biostatistics, Statistics, Informatics or related areas, or previous participation in advanced training/program with one of those related areas, and identified as a Fellow in their area of expertise is required.
Other significant related clinical/medical/health data experience such as previous participation in an analytics/quantitative field fellowship/training may be considered as an appropriate substitute for education, but minimum of Bachelors degree in above areas required unless otherwise specified and with few exceptions.
CITIZENSHIP/SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS: Must have an active Tier 1 background check to obtain a common access card (CAC) Must be a U.S. Citizen
Depending on shift schedule, some telework will be available.
Some evening/weekend schedules and/or on-call hours to support after-hours mission requirements will be required.
","['microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['data modeling', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'hardwar', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'hardwar', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Job Title: Senior Data Scientist
Clearance Level: Secret
Minimum Education: Bachelor’s Degree in associated discipline area.
Technology:
Employer Needs:
Database
Sql
MSql Server
Python
R
Node.Js
Jupiter
Satistics
Algorithims
Big Data
Hadoop
Mathamatic
Programming
Data Architecture
Career Role Details:
Perform analysis and translate business needs to create high-quality Business Requirements and Functional Specifications documentation within specified time frames to solve most complex problems (multiple interfaces with other systems across multiple business units) considering all impacted components from an end-to-end perspective.
Ensures end-to-end traceability of requirements is complete.
Conduct impact analysis of technology changes on business processes and existing technology.
Competent to work at the highest technical capacity on most phases of the business systems analysis.
Contribute to the review of Test Planning and Test Execution strategies.
Create the appropriate User-Interface Model(s) to support projects.
Develop business workflow diagrams.
Assist in the development of data models and interface design specifications.
Documents, tracks, and resolves issues related to data quality.
Contribute to the design and mapping of data conversion strategies.
Participate in collaborative system and data design sessions with the user community, technical architecture resources, and development resources.
Complete project activities on time and within budget, and proactively identifies and communicates issues that may jeopardize milestones or project budget to the Project Manager.
Versed in strategic policy guidance and is familiar with the higher headquarter offices who develop government policy that effects the configuration of the Learning Services Ecosystem.
Minimum/General Experience: 5+ years of industry experience.
“Your reputation is more important than your paycheck, and your integrity is worth more than your career.” - Ryan Freitas
","['hadoop', 'r', 'sql', 'python']","['big data', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'r', 'sql', 'python', 'big data', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Responsible for leading and managing the day-to-day operations of the storage area network (SAN) team.
Oversees all aspects of the SAN architecture, providing insight on the design, backup strategies, and networking.
Manages project and workloads of SAN team, overseeing system analysis activities, troubleshooting, and incident management.
Plans workspaces, workloads, storage projects, and other administrative tasks associated with the management of the SAN.
??
?Provide technical consulting, assistance, and enablement of storage concepts to customers using a mixture of Linux and windows technologies
??
?Ensure customer engagements always result in high levels of customer satisfaction
??
??
??
?Answer questions using your knowledge of Storage system and sophisticated processes
??
??
??
?Help escalate and resolve customer technical support issues.
??
?Work on projects and lead in the migration of the current infrastructure from Hosted to a Cloud environment.
??
?Create engineering documentation based from architectural designs.
??
?Create, update and utilize standard operating procedures.
??
?Work with other Team Leads and Manager to maintain organizational goals.
??
?Provide Level 3 escalation for Storage Operations team
Requirement:
Bachelor's degree in engineering or a related technical field and is required plus a minimum of 10 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree in engineering or a related technical field plus a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience.
Relevant Experience:
Bachelors of Science degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 15 years of relevant experience leading and managing the operations of a storage area networks, specializing in SAN architecting; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 10 years of relevant experience leading and managing the operations of a storage area networks, specializing in SAN architecting.
Security Requirements:
TS/SCI with Polygraph, obtainable within reasonable time based on requirements
Skills:
??
?Capable of working on complex problems of diverse scope or situations or data that requires in-depth evaluation of variable factors
??
?Exercises judgment in selecting methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results
??
?Detailed and very strong knowledge of technology trends and champions new ideas and product and process improvements
??
?Strong ability to excel at the development of new theories and methods
??
?Strong awareness of business objectives and Engineering's role in achieving
??
?Strong ability to be creative, innovative and responsible, and able to master advanced decision-making skills
??
??
?Shows initiative on assignments, and professionally executes projects as a technical SME and leader with little or no direction
??
?Strong ability to be a team player who thrives in collaborative environments and revels in team success, meeting and exceeding personal and team commitments
??
?Strong written and verbal communications skills
??
?Strong ability to recognize and clearly report relevant information
??
?Strong troubleshooting skills
??
?Solid grasp and deep curiosity of industry trends in the storage and adjacent technical areas.
??
?Knowledge of Eucalyptus, Apache CloudStack or Vmware vSphere
??
?Must have experience managing EMC VNX and NetApp or an equivalent Storage environments
??
?Must have experience in various deployment models of technology within a customer-facing hosted cloud; SaaS, PaaS, IaaS environment.
??
?Must have experience designing in a cloud-based service provider environment.
??
?Must have experience with software-defined storage technologies; Red Hat Ceph Storage or Red Hat Cluster Storage, and Distributed File System using Ceph technologies.
","['linux', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'cluster', 'busi']",1.0,"['linux', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'cluster', 'busi']"
DS,"Applies advanced subject matter knowledge to solve complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert.
Frequently contributes to the development of new ideas and methods.
Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of multiple factors.
Leads and/or provides expertise to functional project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives.
Acts as an expert providing direction and guidance to process improvements and establishing policies.
Frequently represents the organization to external customers/clients.
Exercises significant independent judgment within broadly defined policies and practices to determine best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives.
Responsibilities:
Leads complex data and business analyses to develop business plans, and identifies recommendations and insights.
Works independently to construct highly complex statistical and financial models to forecast business performance; coaches others on model development.
Establishes the metrics required to measure business performance, and develops the process for identifying and addressing performance gaps.
Manages complex, time- sensitive market research projects and prepares synthesized intelligence reports with clear implications.
Leads cross-functional teams across the entire span of business planning activities.
Contributes to priority projects by adding creative insights and developing recommendations.
Partners with business leaders to develop business plans and proactively identify new opportunities.
Develops go-forward business plan recommendations based on potential risks and returns.
Identifies cutting-edge analytical tools, models, and methods for making key business decisions.
Education and Experience Required:
Typically 6-10 years work experience in strategy, planning, operations, finance, or related functional area.
Advanced university degree (e.g., MBA) or demonstrable equivalent.
Knowledge and Skills:
Extensive knowledge of research methodology for key business issues.
Excellent analytical thinking, technical analysis, and data manipulation skills.
Ability to leverage new analytical techniques to develop creative approaches to business analysis.
Extensive knowledge and understanding of how to analyse business problems using Excel, Access, statistical analysis, and financial modelling.
Strong business acumen and technical knowledge within area of responsibility.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Very strong project management skills, including leading large, cross-functional initiatives.
Strong relationship management skills, including partnering and consulting.
Developed leadership skills, including team-building, conflict resolution, and management.
Ability to identify emerging trends from market and industry data.
Experience developing and implementing machine learning techniques in real time (e.g.
API, PMML, Java, C, RPMML).
Advanced hands on experience in Statistical Software (e.g.
SAS, R, Python) and big data environments (e.g.
cloud (e.g.
AWS, Azure), and on-prem (e.g.
Hadoop).
Work effectively in cross-functional teams, having demonstrated strong partnerships with both internal and external business partners and alliances.
Solid data modelling experience is required with proven application in applying Decision Trees, Regression analysis, Neural Network and other data mining techniques, experience with time series and experimental design.
","['aw', 'excel', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'c', 'sa', 'java']","['risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'experimental design', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.5,"['aw', 'excel', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'c', 'sa', 'java', 'risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'experimental design', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Bring your experience and take advantage of this opportunity to discover how you can start to push past possible and achieve your goals today.
Enjoy a diverse, collaborative environment with professionals across the nation ready to help launch your career.
Creates data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.
Analysis may have many applications such as to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization.
Requires strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Qualifications:
Basic Qualifications:
BS in Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Computer Science, or Engineering related discipline
9+ years of relevant experience in analytics with BS, 7 Years with Masters
Strong data mining, algorithm development, and analytic skills
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, Java, or C++
Excellent communication and team player skills
Ability to obtain a secret security clearance
Preferred Qualifications
Masters degree is preferred
Experience with Hadoop, SQL and building multi-dimensional models
Proficiency in analytical modeling and statistical tools such as Matlab, SAS, or SPSS
Ability to provide solutions to a variety of technical problems of increasing scope and complexity
U.S.
Citizenship is required for most positions.
","['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'sa', 'java']","['data mining', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'sa', 'java', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.
Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.
Primary Responsibilities:
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelors degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
2+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques (this experience can be academic based)
Proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to complex datasets
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Strong ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum.
Here's the idea.
For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter.
Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.
Job Keywords: Data Scientist, Telecommuter, Telecommute, Remote
","['h2o', 'd3', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['h2o', 'd3', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Position Summary
The Data Scientist will actively research and implement approaches to model complex physiological, tabular, and/or imaging data and discover insights using statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques.
You will collaborate with other Data Scientists, Analysts and Engineers to improve existing models, workflows, and databases using quantitative methods.
Responsibilities
Clearly communicate the design and operation of implemented algorithms (short reports, diagrams).
Work expertly with intermediate data structures (e.g., SQL databases, flat files).
Use relevant packages (e.g., PyTorch, TensorFlow, Theano, Lasagne) for running neural networks
Rapid prototyping of code in Python and/or R (numpy, pandas, matplotlib, wfdb / glmnet, data.
table, ggplot2, survival, etc).
Maintain breadth of knowledge in latest developments in AI/machine learning and industry best practices.
Optimize algorithm parameters, and work with data engineers to ensure the usage of high-quality data and correct application of statistical methods and assumptions.
Use internal ticketing system tools (Softzilla and Service Direct) to report and document work according to CCI standards and protocols.
Perform, visualize, and validate statistical analyses.
Requirements
Required
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or related technical field.
At least 1+ years database experience with solid understanding of SQL query development (in MySQL, SQLite, and/or Postgres).
At least 1+ years Python experience
Possesses a strong quantitative approach to analyzing data and fundamental knowledge in statistics and statistical software with large datasets.
Preferred
Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or related technical field.
2-5 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research and analytics experience.
Deep understanding of statistical and predictive/dynamical modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, and clustering and classification techniques.
Proficiency with large datasets.
Comfortable installing and configuring software, as well as conducting analysis in Unix/Linux environments (RHEL7).
Working knowledge of high performance distributed computing or code-optimization through parallelization (GPU, clusters); git, or other method of version control
Successful completion of the security clearance process may not be required for every position but all candidates must be willing to submit to the process if requested by their manager according to the requirements of the position and business needs.
Benefits
100% covered Medical and Dental coverage for you & your family
Generous 401(k) plan and contribution
Events and weekly lunches
Engaging wellness activities
Corporate Social Responsibility Program
So many more to list…
EEO/AA/M/F/Veteran/Disabled
","['unix', 'pytorch', 'glmnet', 'linux', 'theano', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'numpi', 'postgr']","['classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['unix', 'pytorch', 'glmnet', 'linux', 'theano', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"is Healthier Pets.
Happier People.
Better World.
The journey starts with knowledgeable, passionately engaged associates who are
are committed to delivering a superior customer experience.
with others who share your values and commitment.
passionate about animal welfare, have great people skills and are driven to
exceptional opportunities for professional development and personal enrichment
Position Purpose
This Data Scientist position
is responsible for leveraging strategic insights, advanced analytics, data
science, and market research to understand customer behavior trends, product
relationships, competitive price position, and marketing opportunities in order
to maximize financial performance and deliver an exceptional customer
experience.
Within
the team, you combine advanced analytical skills and big data techniques with
strong business acumen to build predictive models aimed at providing actionable
face.
You will actively engage and influence the business with your models and
algorithms as well as consult on implementation of new strategies.
Essential
Job Functions The incumbent must be able
to perform all of the following duties and responsibilities with or without a reasonable accommodation.
Develop and implement behavioral
and predictive models that drive customer value and achieve strategic
business objectives (machine learning, linear & logistic regression,
clustering, statistical sampling, A/B testing, and text mining/sentiment
analysis).
Go beyond delivering insights and
instead translate business questions into concrete solutions that can be
effectively executed and operationalized to improve value.
Utilize deep experience
manipulating large volumes of information from a variety of disparate
sources into clean data sets; proficient use of SQL/Hive and other data
mining tools is required.
Partner with the IT team to stay
current on the latest trends in big data technologies.
Contribute to new
data tools and system integrations, and lead projects to continuously
improve data quality, computing power, and query optimization.
Create compelling data
visualizations and develop new performance metrics to quantify the value
of corporate initiatives and highlight trends in consumer behavior.
Present findings to executive
leadership by effectively translating complex data and methodologies into
clear insights, opportunities, and tangible business actions.
Display deep intellectual
curiosity, creativity, and commitment to learning in order to solve
Supervisory Responsibility: No direct reports.
Incumbent will collaborate and lead cross-functional business projects.
Work Environment: The majority of job duties are conducted while
seated indoors at a computer terminal with little or no exposure to
hazards.
Occasional travel may be required for presentations, training,
and convention.
Education/Experience:
M.S.
in Computer Science, Math, Statistics preferred with 3 years experience applying data mining techniques to real business problems
Expertise in one or more of R, Python, SAS; deep understanding of Machine Learning and Data Mining techniques.
Experience building large data sets across disparate sources (SQL, Hive, Pig).
Familiarity with basic principles of distributed computing/databases (Hadoop, NoSQL).
Experience with retail industry, customer-level demographic and transactional data a must.
Experience with web API’s, clickstream and mobile app engagement/telemetry data a plus.
Proven ability to deploy new analytic and data manipulation techniques.
Ability to think conceptually and creatively about problems and solutions.
Strong interpersonal communication, verbal and written, due to the nature and level of interaction with senior management.
Demonstrated ability to prioritize workload and ability to manage multiple projects while meeting deadlines.
#LI-DNI
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other protected classification.
","['nosql', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['nosql', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Global Big Data Scientist
DO WORK THAT MATTERS
create the life-changing solutions that help people live healthier
lives.
In 150 countries and with businesses spanning nutrition,
diagnostics, medical devices, and branded generic pharmaceuticals,
Abbott offers you enormous opportunities to explore your interests and
help you achieve your career and personal goals.
Diagnostics family of businesses, bringing together exceptional teams
of experts and industry leading technologies.
The position of Global
San Diego, CA or may be remote.
In this role, you will work as part of
the Global Pricing and Analytics organization to define, structure and
support the development and management of pricing, commercial and
business partners.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Work in conjunction with functional management to develop, maintain
development roadmap, prioritization of development activities and
workstreams to support Global Pricing, Commercial, Marketing and
Finance functional areas;
Internal & external exploration of disparate data sources/systems to
reveal untapped business insight opportunities;
Develop operational analytics using descriptive, predictive, and
prescriptive models accordingly to improve business outcomes using
data warehousing & analytic solutions;
Architect & develop advanced data science solutions using tools &
techniques such as machine learning, natural language processing, deep
neural network, etc.
;
Develop and maintain data pipelines using standard best practices in
ETL (Extract Transform Load) / ELT (Extract Load Transform) using
tools & languages such as DAX, Power Query, Azure Data Factory,
SnapLogic, etc.
;
Develop data modeling & visualization using Power BI Desktop, Power
BI Service, and Power BI Dataflows;
Provide ongoing recommendations with pragmatic approach for industry
best practices on tools & processes by staying up-to-date with
technologies & methodologies;
Collaborate closely with IT counterparts to ensure Global Pricing
Analytics are adequately supported and roadmap is aligned with the IT
Business Intelligence Team
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
Quantitative Bachelor s degree with strong statistical component:
for example Computer Science, Engineering, Bioinformatics, etc.
10+ years of experience required on data warehousing architecture,
modeling, development, and leading technical projects in an enterprise
business environment;
10+ years of experience required on database programming languages
using T-SQL, PL/SQL, or equivalent;
Strong experience in data modeling & visualization using Power BI;
Strong experience with Python, Jupyter Notebook, Databricks,
PySpark, R, or other statistical modeling languages & tools;
Strong experience with data visualization & modeling languages such
as DAX and Power Query;
Strong experience with cloud-based data analytic services such as
Azure - SQL Database, SQL Data Warehouse, Analysis Services,
Databricks, Data Lake Analytics, Synapse Analytics, etc.
;
Strong experience with a broad range of data science methods such as
machine learning, deep learning, classical regression, decision
trees/forests, clustering, optimization, and all associated tools and
techniques;
Strong experience with software development process & tools such as
Jira, Kanban, Agile Sprint, etc.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Microsoft Azure Big Data, Data Engineering, or Data Science
certifications;
Expertise in Microsoft Azure Data Science & Analytics related
services;
Expertise in software development using C++/C# .NET or similar;
COMPETENCIES
Technical learning
Customer focus
Achieving results ethically
Problem solving
Business acumen
Strategic agility
Process management
Dealing with ambiguity
Teamwork
About Abbott.
life through the power of health.
brought new products and technologies to the world -- in nutrition,
diagnostics, medical devices and branded generic pharmaceuticals that create more possibilities for more people at all stages of life.
An equal opportunity employer, Abbott welcomes and encourages
To request accommodation,
please send an email to .
Strategy & Planning
Full-time
","['jira', 'power bi', 'pyspark', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'c', 'cloud']","['big data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data', 'visual', 'regress', 'optim', 'bioinformat', 'data warehousing', 'pipelin', 'financ', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['jira', 'powerbi', 'pyspark', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'r', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'c', 'cloud', 'big data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'data', 'visual', 'regress', 'optim', 'bioinformat', 'data warehousing', 'pipelin', 'financ', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"supported by the cash flow, over 6,000 real estate properties owned under long-term lease agreements with regional and national commercial tenants.
If you appreciate working on a truly collaborative team in
leaders.
In this role, you will design, develop
and execute predictive analytics work streams that serve as the catalyst to increase ROI for the business.
Your Contribution to the Team Includes:
Predictive Analytics
Build predictive analytics for use cases such as: Portfolio Management; Development; Acquisitions
Work with business teams to identify, develop and deliver new use cases over time
Prioritize predictive analytics initiatives based on multiple factors, e.g., ROI/productivity, business continuity, ease of delivery
Deliver insights with user friendly end-products such as web-based tools, reports (e.g., Power BI) or visualizations that are accessible and understandable for business users
Infrastructure for Predictive Analytics
Oversee the process for data management leveraging IT and business teams using clearly articulated responsibility matrices and timelines, including meeting internal audit requirements for data/process integrity
Coordinate with the IT team to buy or license required tools, data and feeds
Work with the IT team as they set up the necessary infrastructure and processes to support predictive analytics, e.g., ETL from the ERP system to data warehouse/lake
Organizational Relationships
Work closely with business teams, IT, internal audit and enterprise risk to define end products and processes
Create cross-functional working groups or teams as needed to initiate, approve or complete work
Update the Investment Committee monthly or quarterly on key matters such as portfolio risk
Support business teams in the achievement of their objectives using predictive analytics tools
Requirements
What You’ll Need to be Successful
PHD Preferred in a relevant discipline, e.g., machine learning, statistics, applied mathematics, econometrics, or operations research
3-5+ years of experience providing advanced analytics within a business setting
Prior work experience within real estate or financial services is preferred, but not required
Programming experience in Python, Spark and SQL.
Java/Scala is a plus
Experience with RDBMS systems like PostgreSQL and NoSQL systems like MongoDB
Hands-on experience in Microsoft Azure and Amazon EC2 cloud platform
Demonstrated ability to design and implement ETL workflows across both Windows and Linux environments
Ability to clearly communicate ideas, orally or via written communications
in a virtual capacity.
responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.
","['postgresql', 'nosql', 'linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'ec2', 'power bi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'erp system', 'mongodb', 'python', 'cloud', 'azur', 'erp', 'java']","['risk', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",3.0,"['postgresql', 'nosql', 'linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'ec2', 'powerbi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'erp system', 'mongodb', 'python', 'cloud', 'azur', 'erp', 'java', 'risk', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Summary:
You will be part of the team that supports enhanced Continuous Glucose Monitoring (CGM) design using analytics on large cloud datasets.
Your contributions will drive continuous improvement in current CGM systems and drive design of next-generation CGM systems.
You will leverage large datasets to model the complex relationships between manufacturing and performance of the system in-vivo.
Additionally, you will create periodic reports, create dashboards, and make presentations to a large cross-functional audience.
Work as a member of a R&D technology development team and collaborate and communicate with other departments including firmware/hardware, sensor/membrane, and mechanical engineering to help facilitate improved designs.
Designs, develops and programs methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze unstructured, diverse “big data” sources to generate actionable insights and solutions for client services and product enhancement.
Interacts with product and service teams to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experiments.
Develops and codes software programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources.
Identifies meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources; interprets and communicates insights and findings from analysis and experiments to product, service, and business managers.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Contribute to research in CGM system to respond to customers and market needs
Use techniques from signal processing, time series, statistical analysis and machine learning to develop models that relate sensor manufacturing to in-vivo performance
Support ad-hoc requests by running analyses and present results to stakeholders
Collaborate cross-functionality to capture design details relevant to data interpretation and analysis
Create and maintain documentation of work processes
Recognize and adopt best practices in reporting and analysis: data integrity, test design, analysis, validation, and documentation
Perform other related duties and assignments as required
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in technical discipline with a minimum of 8-12 years of related experience or a Master’s degree and 5-7 years of related experience or a PhD and 2-4 years or related experience.
Sound knowledge of statistical analysis, time series, signal processing, and data mining techniques
Strong knowledge of statistical programming languages in MATLAB or Python
Strong knowledge of SQL
Knowledge and direct experience handling large datasets
Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills with an ability to effectively communicate with both business and technical teams
Perform other related duties and assignments as required
Preferred Qualifications:
Direct experience with BigQuery platform
Knowledge and direct experience using business intelligence reporting tools such as Tableau
Functional/Business Knowledge:
Possesses advanced knowledge of technical principles and theories.
Scope:
Demonstrates significant technical expertise, collaboration with others and independent thought.
Anticipates potential complex problems requiring an in-depth evaluation.
Demonstrates strategic thinking and commercial/industry understanding in functional projects.
Judgement:
Exercises judgment in selecting methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results.
Determines methods and procedures on new assignments and may coordinate activities of other colleagues.
Travel Required:
0 – 24%
An Equal Opportunity Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
If you are an individual with a disability and would like to request a reasonable accommodation as part of the employment selection process, please contact Talent Acquisition at talentacquisition@dexcom.com.
Only authorized staffing and recruiting agencies may use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes on specific requisitions.
","['bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Who You Are:
An experienced Data Scientist with a passion for digging deep and finding trends that others may miss
You can release high-quality, production-ready products.
This requires rapid iterations, robust debate, and technical skills.
Seen as an active contributor in the team problem-solving-process – you aren’t afraid to share your opinions in a low-ego manner
You enjoy solving challenging problems, all while having a blast with equally passionate and talented team members
You are comfortable and enjoy working with data.
This requires a high level of mathematical and statistical literacy and an intense interest in applying quantitative analysis to real-world problems
You can extract meaning from data.
You are intellectually honest, not fooled by randomness, and obsessive about details
You are well versed in techniques such as statistical analysis, exploratory analysis, and predictive analysis
What you will be doing:
Provide data insights back to the organization in an accessible and end-user friendly manner
Work closely with stakeholders and contribute your suggestions to build optimal solutions
Implement algorithms with modern software development and delivery techniques
Be flexible to handle other duties as assigned
What you bring to the team:
Bachelor's degree in Computer or Data Science, Applied Mathematics, similar technical field of study, or equivalent practical experience
Minimum of 5 years of experience as a Data Scientist, Data Engineer, or Machine Learning Engineer
3-5 years of experience with Python and SQL as it pertains to Data Analytics / Data Mining
Deep familiarity with BI/Data tools such as Tableau, Spark, Snowflake, etc.
Familiarity with Kubernetes, C#, Docker, Apache Kafka a plus!
Strong background in Machine Learning a must.
Focus on recommendation systems, natural language processing (NLP), Bayesian estimation, or reinforcement learning would be nice.
Generous PTO, paid holidays, and paid sick leave
Competitive Medical, Dental and Vision Plans
Catered meals, healthy snacks and coffee bars
#OneSeismic culture that celebrates wins, encourages autonomy, ownership, and transparency
More than 600 customers rely on the world’s most powerful storytelling platform to connect the right buyer, with the right content, at the right time, every time.
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
","['kubernet', 'kafka', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'c', 'python', 'docker']","['data mining', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'reinforc', 'exploratori', 'nlp', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['kubernet', 'kafka', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'c', 'python', 'docker', 'data mining', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'reinforc', 'exploratori', 'nlp', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
In this role, you will work as a Data Scientist and problem solver.
You will be a part of a small team where you will switch assignments and projects in a disciplined and fast-paced environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Be innovative and entrepreneurial to work within a ""start-up like"" environment.
Be an advisor to the data science team and provide expertise and direction on complex analytical modeling problems
Work with cross-functional teams to help them implement solutions
Research methods to improve statistical inferences of variables across models
Solve quantitative problems
Consult on industry standard solutions as well as new innovative techniques
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"They must have strong experience developing/designing databases, using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations.
They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights.
They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams.
The research will focus on the energy space, primarily electric vehicles, electric vehicle infrastructure, and distributed energy resources,
The position will work under the Director of Strategic Research and Analytics.
The team often needs to work quickly and under significant time constraints, the ideal candidate should be comfortable with this environment.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
SKILLS
· Develop, design, and manage databases to support the evaluation work of the Strategic Research and Analytics team.
The successful candidate will work with a variety of stakeholders, both internal and external, to identify existing and new data sources, while assessing the effectiveness and accuracy of the data, as well as opportunities to leverage that data to drive business solutions and success.
· Mine and analyze data to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing, and business strategies, as well as portfolio and program level evaluation.
· Execute various mixed methods models, to identify new, interesting, and executable insights.
Candidate should be an expert in machine learning tools and techniques such as as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, etc
· Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
· Effectively communicate findings to relevant stakeholders through professional, clear, and concise presentations, reports, and visualization of the data and results of any analyses.
The ideal candidate can produce advanced visualizations that are accurate and audience specific.
· Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
QUALIFICATIONS
Essential Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Required
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SLQ, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
and familiar with the following software/tools:
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Preferred
· Knowledge of the electric vehicle and/or DER market and related policies and technologies
· Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase
Education:
· Ph.D. in a relevant field (e.g.
data science, statistics, economics, scenario analysis, forecasting, etc.).
Experience:
§ 7+ years of relevant experience
Licenses, Certificates or Registrations:
· None required
Computer and/or Technical Skills:
· Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python, Weka, NumPy, MatLab, etc.
Excellence in at least one of these is required
· Demonstrated high-level abilities with programs such as (or comparable to) Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook are required.
· Familiarity with statistical and/or data visualization tools is required.
","['hive', 'nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'hbase', 'matlab', 'mysql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'c', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'java']","['regress', 'data mining', 'bay', 'glm', 'data', 'decision tree', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",3.0,"['hive', 'nosql', 'spark', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'hbase', 'matlab', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'c', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'java', 'regress', 'data mining', 'bay', 'glm', 'data', 'decision tree', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'optim', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Perform advanced analytics tasks, including but not limited to predictive statistical models, customer profiling, segmentation analysis, data analysis and mining, and external data enhancement using SQL, SAS, R, Python or PySpark.
Identify and test hypotheses, ensuring statistical significance, and builds predictive models and data visualization to support production business.
Extract and process large quantities of data from data warehouses and other data marts in support of assignments.
Analyze marketing metrics to identify cause-effect relationships between marketing levers and outcomes.
Consolidate and package up insights, analytic outputs, and action items into a well-organized, consumable package with actionable recommendations and strategies for marketers (MS Excel, PowerPoint, Word, etc.
)Present statistical and nonstatistical results, using charts, bullets, and graphs, in meetings or conferences to audiences such as clients and peers.
Turn complex data into practical and actionable marketing insights.
Support development of efficient and accurate project management plans for project delivery.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree (or equivalent) required in any discipline with strong record of academic success in quantitative and analytic coursework such as Business Analytics, Data Science along with Computer Science.
Expert in large distributed datasets using Hive SQL, Spark, Python.
Solid knowledge of SQL in its various forms for traditional databases and distributed computing environments.
Experience with Spark or Map Reduce, SQL and noSQL databases.
Solid understanding of data mining and statistics concepts and familiarity with real-world applications of these techniques.
Expert in commercial and/or open source statistics and data mining packages.
Strong written and verbal communication, presentation, client service and technical writing skills for both technical and business audiences.
Strong analytical, problem solving and critical thinking skills.
Strong attention to detail, with a quality-focused mindset
","['nosql', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'sa']","['data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'graph', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['nosql', 'spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'sa', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'graph', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Job Number: R0085562
Data Scientist, Mid
The Challenge:
Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set?
Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by machine learning, artificial intelligence advances, and IoT?
In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities.
As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges.
Across private and public sectors-from fraud detection, to cancer research, to national intelligence-you know the answers are in the data.
You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle.
You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it.
You Have:
-3+ years of experience in data science and analytics
-Experience with extract, transform, load (ETL) operations, including on-premises or cloud infrastructure
-Experience with source control and collaboration software, including Git and Atlassian tools
-Knowledge of machine learning approaches, techniques, and their advantages and disadvantages
-Knowledge of cloud infrastructure as a service (IaaS) offerings, including AWS EC2, RDS, ECS, and Lambda or Azure VM, SQL Database, Container Instances, and Functions
-Knowledge of relational and non-relational database technologies, including SQL or GraphQL
-Ability to automate or script tasks on Linux or Windows operating systems, including Bash or PowerShell
-Ability to obtain a security clearance
-BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
-Experience with deploying analytics workloads on platform as a service (PaaS) and software as a service (SaaS), including AWS EMR, Redshift, and SageMaker or Azure Databricks, SQL Data Warehouse, and Machine Learning Service
-Experience with distributed or parallel programming frameworks, including Apache Spark or NVIDIA CUDA
-Experience with infrastructure as code (IaC) frameworks and services, including Terraform or CloudFormation
-Experience with developing and presenting complex technical information for both technical and non-technical audiences and senior leaders
-Experience with developing and deploying large-scale batch and stream analytics pipelines
-Experience with integrated groups comprised of product managers, infrastructure engineers, data scientists, and software engineers
-Experience with DoD information systems
-Knowledge of cloud technology and its advantages and disadvantages in secure environments
-Knowledge of secure information systems architecture design and implementation principles
-Knowledge of DevOps principles and tools, including continuous integration and continuous deployment (CI/CD) with Jenkins or AWS CodeDeploy
-Cloud development certification, including AWS Solutions Architect or Azure
-Information Security certification, including Security+ or CISSP Certification
-MA degree in Mathematics, CS, or a related quantitative field
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
","['lambda', 'linux', 'spark', 'ec2', 'redshift', 'git', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud']","['data', 'research', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['lambda', 'linux', 'spark', 'ec2', 'redshift', 'git', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud', 'data', 'research', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Position Role/Tile: Data Scientist
Have strong scientific coding aptitude efficient code that is numerically stable and of production quality.
Are strong analytical thinkers, including reasoning through probabilities and statistics, as well as delving into detailed deterministic thinking and using individual examples
Have interest in working from start to finish: gather data, clean and prepare, model, code, package, guide into production, and help clients use the results.
Enjoy working with data.
Can communicate complex and sophisticated ideas to people without scientific backgrounds
Enjoy working in a team environment
You will be responsible for:
Working on problems in the fintech area, including online payments, banking, and other areas
Working on a team under the leadership of other Data Scientists
Analyzing and understanding data from different domains, including data cleansing and detailed analysis of relationships between fields
Developing supervised, unsupervised, and reinforcement models in the laboratory
Coding models for production, with particular attention to efficient use of computational resources and robustness of the code
Working with Software Engineers and SaaS Operations to package and deploy the models
Monitoring the models to ensure that they are working properly, and generalizing to new data
Working with clients to ensure that they are using the results of the models effectively.
Skills needed include: excellent written and verbal communications, and presentation skills.
Languages needed include a subset of: Python, C++, Unix scripting, SAS, PySpark, Scala, Perl, C
Strong command of Unix is preferred.
Experience: PhD plus 3 years of industry experience in a relevant area, including taking machine learning into a production environment.
Alternatively, Master's degree plus 6 years of industry experience in a relevant area, including taking machine learning into a production environment.
Suite #214
Newark, CA 94560
","['unix', 'python', 'scala', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'perl', 'c', 'sa']","['probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'clean', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",2.0,"['unix', 'python', 'scala', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'perl', 'c', 'sa', 'probabl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'clean', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"The Clinical Data Scientist designs, develops, and maintains key data management deliverables used to collect, review, monitor, and ensure the integrity of clinical data, oversees application of standards, data review and query management, and is accountable for quality study data set release and consistency in asset/submission data.
ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES
Clinical Data Scientist
Serve as Clinical Data Scientist for one or more clinical trials assuming responsibility for all DM&M activities including selection and application of data acquisition standards, Data Management Plan, selection of quality risk indicators, third party study data due diligence
Participates and ensures quality database design including documentation, testing and implementation of clinical data collection tools, both CRF and non-CRF, using an electronic data capture (EDC) system and/or other data collection systems.
Serve as a technical resource to the study teams for DM and RBM standards, tools, data provisioning, and reporting
Partners with Research/Business Units and any external DM service provider to deliver high quality data management for all studies as assigned.
Proactively drives quality and efficiency to meet timeline and milestones for data management, ensuring scientific and operational excellence in support of strategic imperatives and in collaboration with the cross functional study team (s).
Ensure work carried out by DM providers is in accordance with applicable SOPs and working practices.
Ensure the required study-specific DM&M documents in the Trial Master File (TMF) are of high quality and are filed contemporaneously.
Ensure operational excellence in collaboration with partners for application of standards, data acquisition, proactive data review and data integrity monitoring, data cleaning, e-data processing, data access and visualization, and database release.
QUALIFICATIONS
Proficient experience using Oracle Inform EDC software
Experience with Oracle DMW preferred
Working experience applying CDISC CDASH standards
Demonstrated successful experience in all relevant clinical data management activities in a BioPharmaceutical or CRO setting
Working knowledge of all phases of clinical trials and ability to assess and determine study requirement from protocol review
Strong Project and Risk Management
CRO and vendor oversight experience preferred
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Consistent, detail oriented, communicative, dedicated to do a job well done
Minimum 5 years Data Management experience required
Working knowledge of clinical research, FDA & ICH, GCP, GCDMP, and related regulatory requirements
Experience using data visualization tools (e.g.
Spotfire, jReview)
Familiarity with MedDRA/WHO-Drug
Proficiency in the use of Microsoft Office Suite of tools (Outlook, Word, Excel, etc.)
Bachelor's degree required.
#LI-PFE
Sunshine Act
If you have questions regarding this matter, please do not hesitate to contact your Talent Acquisition representative.
EEO & Employment Eligibility
Medical
","['microsoft', 'excel', 'gcp', 'oracl']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'gcp', 'oracl', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
DS,"Digital Health Technology team powers digital experiences and engagement to enhance the lives of millions of people every day through connected care.
You’ll be immersed in a dynamic high-growth environment and empowered to excel, take informed risks, and drive ingenuity across the enterprise.
Let's talk about the team and you:
The Senior Data Scientist will undertake applied research and development in the areas of data science and biomedical informatics, and outcomes research, using the latest technologies in machine learning and distributed computing.
The platform and algorithms developed may be used in a range of diagnostic and therapeutic applications, such as sleep disorder breathing, chronic obstructive pulmonary disorder, and other respiratory disorders, as well as co-morbidities such as congestive heart failure and diabetes and chronic disease management.
Let's talk responsibilities:
The Advanced Analytics team is focused on developing analytics solutions that will enable a data-driven approach to addressing business questions.
This role will collaborate with the global Analytics team in support of achieving global and regional business goals.
Research, customization, and development of statistical and machine learning algorithms to meet complex project requirements; tasks include defining hypotheses, executing necessary tests and experiments, evaluating, tuning and optimizing algorithms and methods to specific situations.
Analysis of big data for data-driven solution validation, evaluation and technology innovation.
Optimize data analysis processes and systems for better efficiency and maintainability.
Leading sub-functional and small project teams.
Mentoring and training more junior team members and serving as a best-practice resource for statistics and machine learning.
Writing of documents that clearly explain how algorithms should be implemented, verified and validated.
Writing documents for use in the preparation of intellectual property and technical publications.
Monitoring the literature of interest and industrial development trends, broadly in the areas of data analysis and machine learning.
Understanding regulatory requirements, such as those mandated by the FDA.
Promoting safe working environment within OH&S guidelines
Let's talk qualifications and experience:
Expert in statistical analysis methods, including analysis of variance, regression, time series analysis, survival analysis, etc.
Extensive knowledge in machine learning fundamental theories and data mining technologies.
Leadership and hands on experience with development of data analytics systems, including data exploration/crawling, feature engineering, model building, performance evaluation, and online deployment of models.
Proficient with server-side programming in Python/Java.
Hands-on experience in handling large and distributed datasets on Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Pig or Storm, etc.
Strong database skills and experience, including experience with SQL programming.
Knowledge in big data technologies including cloud computing/distributed computing, data fusion, and data visualization.
Experience in R programming.
A background in or exposure to biomedical engineering, outcomes research, medical science or physiology.
Good technical writing and presentation skills.
Optimisation of algorithm complexity vs. accuracy vs. implementation cost.
Implementing robust software for use in research programs with a minimum of review and other formal process
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathmatics, or related fields.
Minimal 6 years’ industry or academic experience in data science.
Preferred
Post-graduate research experience (Masters or PhD) in a field encompassing Data Science, Applied Statistics, Biomedical Informatics, or Outcomes Research.
Relevant industry experience would be favourably considered.
#LI-NF1
It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring.
Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones.
","['spark', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['spark', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"PURPOSE OF THE JOB
The purpose of this job is to provide analyses of internal and external data sources in support of key business functions.
The Data Scientist performs data analysis to support portfolio management and operations goals.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Provides quantitative analysis for portfolio management decisions.
Collects, aggregates, and analyzes data from multiple internal and external sources for use in advanced analytics.
Writes and maintains code to build and maintain data pipelines for production models.
Develops high quality, replicable predictive and descriptive analytics for business use.
Analyzes, refines, and documents functional requirements for modeling projects.
Drives insights into business performance optimization.
Evaluates complex business and system requirements to create detailed business user requirements, system documentation, workflow procedures, and data modeling.
Develops an understands the business issues and data challenges of the organization in order to provide meaningful insights.
Communicates findings and insight to stakeholders and provide business strategy recommendations for optimizing business performance.
Evaluates the business and end user data requirements and develops analytical and reporting solutions to address those needs.
Understands and translates business requirements into functional requirements.
Improves workflows and business processes in assigned business units.
Aids in the analysis of current business processes; makes recommendations to management for new, more efficient, workflows, and processes.
Develops or assists with developing functional specifications and system design specifications for assigned projects.
Uses analytics and metrics to improve processes and provide data-driven forecasts of potential costs, risks, and profits of new business initiatives.
Provides reporting solutions and responds to ad-hoc report requests across multiple business areas.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
This role does not have supervisory responsibilities.
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university preferred with a major or emphasis in Mathematics, Data, Computer Science or related field.
Minimum 3 years of related technical experience and/or training required or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Or Master’s degree plus one-year experience in related discipline.
Insurance industry experience preferred.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS
None required.
KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS
Demonstrated experience with statistical modeling techniques, especially generalized linear models, cluster analysis, latent class analysis, and factor analysis.
Demonstrated experience and knowledge of machine learning techniques, including random forests, gradient boosted machines, extreme gradient boosting, and support vector machines.
Knowledge of and experience with contemporary model validation methods, including cross validation and nested cross validation.
Knowledge of databases and database methodology; experience with SQL Server is a plus.
NoSQL database experience is beneficial.
Knowledge of data warehouse principles, data modeling, and other business intelligence architecture methods is desirable.
Experience with contemporary reporting tools is desired.
Demonstrated knowledge and experience with open source analytics platforms, such as Python and/or R. Working knowledge in analytic platforms such as Sagemaker, TensofFlow and Keras a plus.
Process and model documentation using Markdown or other electronic means and experience using Git and GitLab are desired.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS
COMPETENCIES
This position maps to the Individual Contributor level.
Additional competencies required: None.
WORK ENVIRONMENT
This position operates in an office environment and requires the frequent use of a computer, telephone, copier, and other standard office equipment.
","['nosql', 'kera', 'git', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'python']","['risk', 'data modeling', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['nosql', 'kera', 'git', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'python', 'risk', 'data modeling', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Summary
As a data scientist, you will work closely with a team of research and production professionals.
This role requires a broad knowledge of cancer biology, oncology, bioinformatics, statistics, and programming, paired with effective communication skills, a strong sense of diligence, and timeliness.
Duties and Tasks
Contribute the design of experiments focused on assay improvement.
Conduct data analysis in support of biopharma clinical trials and collaborations
Support development of novel genomic signatures
Design and implement data reports and dashboards
Contribute to manuscript drafting for peer-reviewed journals and patent filings
Support and assist colleagues and external collaborators in data preparation and analysis
Understanding, maintaining, and improving various databases and schema
Contribute to the maintenance and improvement of the data processing pipelines, automating common data analysis routines into software packages or applications.
Qualifications:
Graduate degree from a quantitative field with strong programming experience (data science, statistics, bioinformatics, or equivalent).
Proven experience in analysis and interpretation of large-scale gene expression data (microarray, sequencing).
1 year + experience in data science and quantitative data analysis.
1 year + experience in working with cloud platform like GCP.
Familiar with a Linux environment and shell scripting.
Experience working with source control tools (Git) in a collaborative programming environment.
Knowledge in cancer biology and genomics.
Work/research experience with public genomic data platforms (GEO, CBioPortal, MSigDB, etc or equivalent) is a plus.
Extensive experience of working with R or Python.
Experience of building and testing customized R packages.
Software engineering experience in a programming language (GO and Javascript is preferred) is a plus.
Experience in performing complex data analysis on large volumes of data and present findings to collaborators.
Experience in drafting and publishing scientific research papers and addressing comments and feedbacks from collaborators and reviewers.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills (both written and verbal); ability to communicate with people in a wide variety of areas and at various levels from technical specialists to executives
Ability to quickly and efficiently adapt to new concepts and collaborate with cross-function teams and business units.
Critical thinking
Curiosity and eager to learn.
Powered by JazzHR
Zp1iPX2t0j
","['linux', 'git', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'gcp', 'cloud']","['dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['linux', 'git', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'gcp', 'cloud', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist
FULLTIME ROLE
Overview:
applying machine learning methods towards solving real-world problems through
(Un)supervised Learning, Operations Research and Optimization Problems to name a few.
You
will be joining an excellent, multidisciplinary team and will be participating in cutting-edge
work in data science.
You will be providing quality answers to large-scale problems with broad
impact.
Responsibilities:
1.
Conceptualize, design and develop prototypes which demonstrate the required
functionality rapidly
2.
create prototypes for demonstration.
3.
Work with development teams to mature these algorithms into production quality
programs
4.
Do applied research on a wide array of Operations research and machine learning
projects.
Desired candidate profile:
1.
Degree in relevant field or considerable hands-on experience in data science algorithms
2.
Basic understanding of Supervised learning, Unsupervised learning.
Graph theory
knowledge is a plus
3.
Basic knowledge in working with Deep Learning libraries such as Tensorflow or Pytorch
or Keras or Theano is a plus.
Basic Qualifications:
1.
A good foundation in AI Methodologies like ML and Deep Learning.
NLP, Computer
vision is a plus.
2.
Very good python programming skills.
Java programming skills a bonus
3.
Detailed oriented and penchant for data quality control
4.
Ability to Dig deeper into data, understand characteristics of data, evaluate alternate
models and validate hypothesis through theoretical and empirical approaches
5.
Is a Self-Driven individual contributor who prefers working in an agile manner.
6.
Ability to work independently and have ownership mentality
7.
Innovation minded, highly capable to think systematically, capable of redefining the
solutions to overcome the competitors and solving problems.
8.
Curious and willing to challenge existing solutions with innovative technology concepts.
Thanks,
Amit Sehdev
Direct: 510-402-1061 | Fax: 510-623-5055 | Amit@apninc.com
“Ranked Top Work Places 2016”
“Certified Small and Minority Business”
“Ranked Top 50 Organizations for Diversity”
“Ranked Top Diversity Business”
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'java']","['deep learning', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'graph', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'java', 'deep learning', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'graph', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Return To Job Search
Job Title:
Senior Data Scientist
State/Area: California
Regional Area
San Diego Metro Area
Primary Background
Applications - Developer – Technology
Secondary Background
Job Number: JN -052020-4267
JOB TITLE: Sr. Data Scientist
DURATION: 9-12 months, possible contract to hire
Position Summary
Candidates should have advanced skills in Python.
You should be able to work alone comfortably without close oversight, collaborate with distributed team members, and to document and report on your achievements/progress in meetings.
You should enjoy researching information and digging deep to solve problems.
Minimum Qualifications
• BS or MS in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science w/Machine Learning, or a related quantitative field
• You have 3+ years of related experience as a Data Scientist, with a proven record of analysis and research that positively impacts your team
• Solid background in at least one area of machine learning and/or AI research
• Experienced in developing tools to ingest, merge, and clean data sets
• Experienced using scripting languages on a daily basis (SQL, Python, etc.)
• Proficient with common data science toolkits, such as Pandas, TensorFlow, NumPy.
• Proficient with visualization software/tools such as Python, R, D3.js, Spotfire, Tableau, etc.
and creating strategy recommendations
• Experienced building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, Segmentations, etc.)
• Experienced dealing with large data sets (especially visual data)
• Knowledge of traditional NLP applications such as: entity extraction, document classification, TFIDF, tokenization, and topic modeling.
• Knowledge of modern NLP techniques such as Word2Vec, RNNs, CNNs, LSTMs, and Transformers.
• Knowledge and experience with ontologies, taxonomies, semantic meaning representation frameworks and other relations between concepts.
• Experience with machine learning algorithms, including: random forest, SVM, boosting, neural networks, etc.
and/or Natural Language.
• Experience with source code control (Git)
","['git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'cnn', 'clean', 'neural network', 'research', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'cnn', 'clean', 'nn', 'research', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Additional Notes from Hiring Manager:
The hiring manager for has noted that this position is fully open to new candidates, and that this role will move quickly through the screening & interview process.
Please see the additional notes below.
Things the manager would like to see:
Improve existing pipeline, data ingestion, cleaning, & storage
Dataset statistics/visualization
Good foundation in statistics and some visualization toolset
ML Model selection & prototyping
Machine Learning experience – preferably in either speech and/or image understanding
Building inference pipeline
Programming skills in Python, C/C++ at least
They don’t need the person to be IN San Diego, but the position requires them to be able to come to the office at least 1 day/week.
So realistically they need to move or be close.
Position Summary:
Candidates should have advanced skills in Python.
You should be able to work alone comfortably without close oversight, collaborate with distributed team members, and to document and report on your achievements/progress in meetings.
You should enjoy researching information and digging deep to solve problems.
Minimum Qualifications
You have 3+ years of related experience as a Data Scientist, with a proven record of analysis and research that positively impacts your team
Solid background in at least one area of machine learning and/or AI research
Experienced in developing tools to ingest, merge, and clean data sets
Experienced using scripting languages on a daily basis (SQL, Python, etc.)
Proficient with common data science toolkits, such as Pandas, TensorFlow, NumPy.
Proficient with visualization software/tools such as Python, R, D3.js, Spotfire, Tableau, etc.
and creating strategy recommendations
Experienced building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, Segmentations, etc.)
Experienced dealing with large data sets (especially visual data)
Knowledge of traditional NLP applications such as: entity extraction, document classification, TFIDF, tokenization, and topic modeling.
Knowledge of modern NLP techniques such as Word2Vec, RNNs, CNNs, LSTMs, and Transformers.
Knowledge and experience with ontologies, taxonomies, semantic meaning representation frameworks and other relations between concepts.
Experience with machine learning algorithms, including: random forest, SVM, boosting, neural networks, etc.
and/or Natural Language.
Experience with source code control (Git)
You possess excellent communication skills and the ability to clearly communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience.
All candidates must be authorized to work in USA.
Must live near San Diego but primarily work remotely in 2020.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Experience:
Programing in Python, C or C++: 3 years (Required)
Data Scientist: 3 years (Required)
San Diego, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'c', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi']","['svm', 'statist', 'classif', 'data', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'cnn', 'clean', 'research', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'decision tree', 'neural network', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'c', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'svm', 'statist', 'classif', 'data', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'cnn', 'clean', 'research', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'decision tree', 'nn', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Digital Health Technology team powers digital experiences and engagement to enhance the lives of millions of people every day through connected care.
You'll be immersed in a dynamic high-growth environment and empowered to excel, take informed risks, and drive ingenuity across the enterprise.
The Advanced Analytics team is headquartered in the United States and is focused on developing analytics solutions that will enable a data-driven approach to addressing business questions.
This role will be a part of the Advanced Analytics team in San Diego.
It will collaborate with the global Advanced Analytics team in support of achieving global and regional business goals.
The Lead Data Scientist will undertake applied research and development in the areas of data science, biomedical informatics, and outcomes research, using the latest technologies in machine learning and distributed computing.
The platform and algorithms developed may be used in a range of diagnostic and therapeutic applications, such as sleep disorder breathing, chronic obstructive pulmonary disorder, and other respiratory disorders, as well as co-morbidities such as congestive heart failure and diabetes and chronic disease management.
Let's talk about Responsibilities:
Research, customization, and development of statistical and machine learning algorithms to meet unique and complex project requirements that have broad business impacts; tasks include defining hypotheses, executing necessary tests and experiments, evaluating, tuning and optimizing algorithms and methods to specific situations.
Analysis of big data for data-driven solution validation, evaluation and technology innovation.
Optimize data analysis processes and systems for better efficiency and maintainability.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Leading project teams to achieve milestones and objectives.
Anticipating challenges and issues and recommending process, product, and service improvements.
Collaborate with management, stakeholders, and teams to define technology roadmaps.
Mentoring and training more junior team members and serving as a best-practice resource for statistics, artificial intelligence, and machine learning.
Writing documents that clearly explain how algorithms should be implemented, verified, and validated.
Writing documents for use in the preparation of intellectual property and technical publications.
Monitoring the literature of interest and industrial development trends broadly in the areas of data analysis and machine learning.
Understanding regulatory requirements, such as those mandated by the FDA.
Promoting safe working environment within OH&S guidelines
Let's talk about Qualifications and Experience:
Expert in statistical analysis methods, including analysis of variance, regression, time series analysis, survival analysis, etc.
Expert knowledge in artificial intelligence and machine learning fundamental theories and data mining technologies.
Thorough knowledge of data engineering or informatics systems.
Leadership and hands-on experience with the development of data analytics systems, including data exploration/crawling, feature engineering, model building, performance evaluation, and online deployment of models.
Proficient with R programming and server-side programming in Python or Java.
Hands on experience in handling large and distributed datasets on Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Pig or Storm, etc.
Strong database skills and experience, including experience with SQL programming.
Knowledge in big data technologies, including cloud computing/distributed computing, data fusion, and data visualization.
A background in or exposure to biomedical engineering, outcomes research, medical science, or physiology.
Good technical writing and presentation skills.
Optimization of algorithm complexity vs. accuracy vs. implementation cost.
Implementing robust software for use in research programs with a minimum of review and other formal processes.
A degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or related fields.
Minimal 8 years' industry or academic experience in data science.
Post-graduate research experience (Masters or PhD) in a field encompassing Data Science, Applied Statistics, Biomedical Informatics, or Outcomes research.
Relevant industry experience would be favourably considered.
#LI-TB1
It's discovering a career that's challenging, supportive and inspiring.
Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones.
","['spark', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['spark', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'risk', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Position is contingent upon contract award.
Essential Job Functions & Responsibilities:
Tableau - Statistics (IT Portfolio), Predictive Analysis & Visualization.
Conduct planning, analysis, integration, extraction, migration, and reporting of data in Navy Enterprise Resource Planning (N-ERP) and its associated software products.
Create, maintain, and manage the tables, cubes, extracts, and reports used to provide the required information.
Sustain the data structures, processes, principles, business rules, and operational practices of N-ERP in the current operating environment.
Utilize Government provided software environments, applications, and tools to support N-ERP, data analytics, and other IT operations.
Configuration files, source code, scripts, reports, visualizations, analytics, and algorithms shall be developed and retained in tools within the Government provided environment.
Required Qualifications:
One (1) year of experience translating business requirements into reporting designs, predictive and statistical analysis, data cleansing, and visualizing business data.
One (1) year of experience using analytics environments necessary for specific job duties (Tableau, R, Python, etc.)
Eligible to obtain a SECRET level security clearance (final SECRET clearance required if tasking includes access to classified systems).
Education Requirements:
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in one of the following fields: Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research.
An additional 4 years of relevant specialized experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree.
In addition, U.S Citizenship is required.
Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information and be able to obtain a DoD government-granted security clearance.
Individuals may also be subject to a background investigation to include but not limited to criminal history, employment and education verification, drug testing, and creditworthiness.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, or genetic information.
","['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python']","['data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']",1.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"Candidates should have advanced skills in Python.
You should be able to work alone comfortably without close oversight, collaborate with distributed team members, and to document and report on your achievementsprogress in meetings.
You should enjoy researching information and digging deep to solve problems.
Minimum Qualifications bull BS or MS in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science wMachine Learning, or a related quantitative field bull You have 3+ years of related experience as a Data Scientist, with a proven record of analysis and research that positively impacts your team bull Solid background in at least one area of machine learning andor AI research bull Experienced in developing tools to ingest, merge, and clean data sets bull Experienced using scripting languages on a daily basis (SQL, Python, etc.)
bull Proficient with common data science toolkits, such as Pandas, TensorFlow, NumPy.
bull Proficient with visualization softwaretools such as Python, R, D3.js, Spotfire, Tableau, etc.
and creating strategy recommendations bull Experienced building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, Segmentations, etc.)
bull Experienced dealing with large data sets (especially visual data) bull Knowledge of traditional NLP applications such as entity extraction, document classification, TFIDF, tokenization, and topic modeling.
bull Knowledge of modern NLP techniques such as Word2Vec, RNNs, CNNs, LSTMs, and Transformers.
bull Knowledge and experience with ontologies, taxonomies, semantic meaning representation frameworks and other relations between concepts.
bull Experience with machine learning algorithms, including random forest, SVM, boosting, neural networks, etc.
andor Natural Language.
bull Experience with source code control (Git) bull You possess excellent communication skills and the ability to clearly communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience.
bull All candidates must be authorized to work in USA.
Must live near San Diego but primarily work remotely in 2020.
Thanks Udai Bhan (W) 408-550-1213(C) 408-585-5607
","['excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'c', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'cnn', 'clean', 'neural network', 'research', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['excel', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'c', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'cnn', 'clean', 'nn', 'research', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Job Number: R0087155
Data Scientist, Senior
The Challenge:
Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set?
Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by machine learning, artificial intelligence advances, and IoT?
In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities.
As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges.
Across private and public sectors-from fraud detection, to cancer research, to national intelligence, you know the answers are in the data.
You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle.
You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it.
You Have:
-3+ years executing data science, machine learning or artificial intelligence principles
-Experience with one or more statistical analytical programming languages, including Python or R
-Experience with source control and dependency management software, including Git or Maven and using relational databases, including MySQL
-Experience with identifying analytic insight in data, developing visualizations, presenting findings to stakeholders, and statistical analysis techniques
-Experience with designing and implementing custom machine learning algorithms, graph algorithms, and semantic Web
-Experience with Big Data computing environments, including Hadoop
-Knowledge of object-oriented programming, including Java and C++
-Ability to build complex extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) pipelines to clean and fuse data together
-Ability to obtain a security clearance
-BA or BS degree
Nice If You Have:
-Experience with designing and implementing custom machine learning algorithms
-Experience with graph algorithms and semantic Web
-Experience with designing and setting up relational databases
-Experience with Big Data computing environments, including Hadoop
-Experience with Navy mission systems
-Experience with managing a small team of 3-5 people and the technical delivery of a data science, machine learning, or artificial intelligence project
-Ability to grow into a technical lead of one or more data science projects
-MA or MS degree in Mathematics, CS, or related quantitative field
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
Build Your Career:
access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role?
","['splunk', 'git', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'docker', 'java']","['etl', 'big data', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['splunk', 'git', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'docker', 'java', 'etl', 'big data', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"This will join their RD Team working on projects ranging from AWS cloud to Artificial Intelligence to Machine Learning to Web to Mobile.
They are looking for a Sr. Data Scientist who really understands data pipelines, data statisticsvisualization, and machine learning.
All candidates must be authorized to work in USA.
Primarily remote, but would like someone to come into the San Diego office at least 1 day per week.
So must be close enough to travel one day per week.
12 month+ contract with high potential to convert to full time.
Candidates should have advanced skills in Python.
Minimum Qualifications BS or MS in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science wMachine Learning, or a related quantitative field You have 3+ years of related experience as a Data Scientist, with a proven record of analysis and research that positively impacts your team Solid background in at least one area of machine learning andor AI research Experienced in developing tools to ingest, merge, and clean data sets Experienced using scripting languages on a daily basis (SQL, Python, etc.)
Proficient with common data science toolkits, such as Pandas, TensorFlow, NumPy.
Proficient with visualization softwaretools such as Python, R, D3.js, Spotfire, Tableau, etc.
and creating strategy recommendations Experienced building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, Segmentations, etc.)
Experienced dealing with large data sets (especially visual data) Knowledge of traditional NLP applications such as entity extraction, document classification, TFIDF, tokenization, and topic modeling.
Knowledge of modern NLP techniques such as Word2Vec, RNNs, CNNs, LSTMs, and Transformers.
Knowledge and experience with ontologies, taxonomies, semantic meaning representation frameworks and other relations between concepts.
Experience with machine learning algorithms, including random forest, SVM, boosting, neural networks, etc.
andor Natural Language.
","['aw', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'cloud']","['regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'cnn', 'clean', 'pipelin', 'neural network', 'research', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['aw', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'numpi', 'cloud', 'regress', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'lstm', 'random forest', 'cnn', 'clean', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'research', 'svm', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Position is contingent upon contract award.
Essential Job Functions & Responsibilities:
Tableau – Statistics (IT Portfolio), Predictive Analysis & Visualization.
Conduct planning, analysis, integration, extraction, migration, and reporting of data in Navy Enterprise Resource Planning (N-ERP) and its associated software products.
Create, maintain, and manage the tables, cubes, extracts, and reports used to provide the required information.
Sustain the data structures, processes, principles, business rules, and operational practices of N-ERP in the current operating environment.
Utilize Government provided software environments, applications, and tools to support N-ERP, data analytics, and other IT operations.
Configuration files, source code, scripts, reports, visualizations, analytics, and algorithms shall be developed and retained in tools within the Government provided environment.
Required Qualifications:
• One (1) year of experience translating business requirements into reporting designs, predictive and statistical analysis, data cleansing, and visualizing business data.
• One (1) year of experience using analytics environments necessary for specific job duties (Tableau, R, Python, etc.)
• Eligible to obtain a SECRET level security clearance (final SECRET clearance required if tasking includes access to classified systems).
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university in one of the following fields: Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research.
An additional 4 years of relevant specialized experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s degree.
In addition, U.S Citizenship is required.
Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information and be able to obtain a DoD government-granted security clearance.
Individuals may also be subject to a background investigation to include but not limited to criminal history, employment and education verification, drug testing, and creditworthiness.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, or genetic information.
","['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python']","['data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']",1.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"Position is contingent upon contract award.
Essential Job Functions & Responsibilities:
Tableau - Statistics (Fleet Readiness), Tableau - Statistics (IT Portfolio), Predictive Analysis & Visualization.
Conduct planning, analysis, integration, extraction, migration, and reporting of data in Navy Enterprise Resource Planning (N-ERP) and its associated software products.
Create, maintain, and manage the tables, cubes, extracts, and reports used to provide the required information.
Sustain the data structures, processes, principles, business rules, and operational practices of N-ERP in the current operating environment.
Utilize Government provided software environments, applications, and tools to support N-ERP, data analytics, and other IT operations.
Configuration files, source code, scripts, reports, visualizations, analytics, and algorithms shall be developed and retained in tools within the Government provided environment.
In support of data analytics, work with other functional SME to produce and improve relevant analytics and reports in areas such as financial management, accounting, cost analysis, material management, human resources (workforce), total force management (manpower), logistics, Fleet readiness, installations, facilities, program management, IT management, cybersecurity, and other areas within the customer's mission.
Support business process engineering to align data analytics requirements to the customer's business processes.
Interact with SME to develop understanding of data sets, analytics requirements, business problems, leadership objectives, external stakeholder objectives, and metrics and produce requirements specifications.
Digitize processes and implement tools integrated with data sources.
Provide data integration to enable the discovery and monitoring of correlations among disparate data sources and metrics, as well as the identification of causal factors associated with anomalous data observations.
Develop and implement predictive algorithms to identify leading indicators.
Implement artificial intelligence driven knowledge bases.
Provide user training on analytics and reporting.
Required Qualifications:
Three (3) years of experience translating business requirements into reporting designs, predictive and statistical analysis, data cleansing, and visualizing business data.
Two (2) years of experience using analytics environments necessary for specific job duties (Tableau, R, Python, etc.)
Development of Systems Specification, Systems Analysis, Systems Architecture, Systems/Equipment Integration, Test & Evaluation Criteria for business systems.
Eligible to obtain a SECRET level security clearance (final SECRET clearance required if tasking includes access to classified systems).
Education Requirements:
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in one of the following fields: Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research.
An additional 4 years of relevant specialized experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree.
Master's degree preferred.
In addition, U.S Citizenship is required.
Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information and be able to obtain a DoD government-granted security clearance.
Individuals may also be subject to a background investigation to include but not limited to criminal history, employment and education verification, drug testing, and creditworthiness.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, or genetic information.
","['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python']","['correl', 'data', 'logist', 'causal', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']",1.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python', 'correl', 'data', 'logist', 'causal', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Summary:
The Lead Healthcare/Claims Data Scientist will undertake applied research and development in the areas of data science, biomedical informatics, and outcomes research, using the latest technologies in machine learning and distributed computing.
You will utilize your previous experience with claims data and EHR data to develop platforms and algorithms developed may be used in a range of diagnostic and therapeutic applications, such as sleep disorder breathing, chronic obstructive pulmonary disorder, and other respiratory disorders, as well as co-morbidities such as congestive heart failure and diabetes and chronic disease management.
Responsibilities:
Research, customization, and development of statistical and machine learning algorithms to meet unique and complex project requirements that have broad business impacts; tasks include defining hypotheses, executing necessary tests and experiments, evaluating, tuning and optimizing algorithms and methods to specific situations
Analysis of big data for data-driven solution validation, evaluation and technology innovation
Optimize data analysis processes and systems for better efficiency and maintainability
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Leading project teams to achieve milestones and objectives
Anticipating challenges and issues and recommending process, product, and service improvements
REQUIREMENTS:
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or related fields.
Minimal 8 years' industry or academic experience in data science
Post-graduate research experience (Masters or PhD) in a field encompassing Data Science, Applied Statistics, Biomedical Informatics, or Outcomes research
Experience in analyzing very large medical insurance claims with SAS and/or SQL
Strong Experience in healthcare outcomes, healthcare insurance claims research
Experience in building predictive models using medical history, EHR data, and claims data
Senior level experience in leading a team or mentoring analysts and scientists
Expert in statistical analysis methods, including analysis of variance, regression, time series analysis, survival analysis, etc.
Expert knowledge in artificial intelligence and machine learning fundamental theories and data mining technologies
Previous Healthcare, pharmaceutical, or similar domain experience and utilization of claims data
Thorough knowledge of data engineering or informatics systems
Leadership and hands on experience with development of data analytics systems, including data exploration/crawling, feature engineering, model building, performance evaluation, and online deployment of models
Proficient with R programming and server side programming in Python or Java
Hands on experience in handling large and distributed datasets on Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Pig or Storm, etc.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['spark', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['spark', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Position is contingent upon contract award.
Essential Job Functions & Responsibilities:
Tableau – Statistics (Fleet Readiness), Tableau – Statistics (IT Portfolio), Predictive Analysis & Visualization.
Conduct planning, analysis, integration, extraction, migration, and reporting of data in Navy Enterprise Resource Planning (N-ERP) and its associated software products.
Create, maintain, and manage the tables, cubes, extracts, and reports used to provide the required information.
Sustain the data structures, processes, principles, business rules, and operational practices of N-ERP in the current operating environment.
Utilize Government provided software environments, applications, and tools to support N-ERP, data analytics, and other IT operations.
Configuration files, source code, scripts, reports, visualizations, analytics, and algorithms shall be developed and retained in tools within the Government provided environment.
In support of data analytics, work with other functional SME to produce and improve relevant analytics and reports in areas such as financial management, accounting, cost analysis, material management, human resources (workforce), total force management (manpower), logistics, Fleet readiness, installations, facilities, program management, IT management, cybersecurity, and other areas within the customer’s mission.
Support business process engineering to align data analytics requirements to the customer’s business processes.
Interact with SME to develop understanding of data sets, analytics requirements, business problems, leadership objectives, external stakeholder objectives, and metrics and produce requirements specifications.
Digitize processes and implement tools integrated with data sources.
Provide data integration to enable the discovery and monitoring of correlations among disparate data sources and metrics, as well as the identification of causal factors associated with anomalous data observations.
Develop and implement predictive algorithms to identify leading indicators.
Implement artificial intelligence driven knowledge bases.
Provide user training on analytics and reporting.
Required Qualifications:
• Three (3) years of experience translating business requirements into reporting designs, predictive and statistical analysis, data cleansing, and visualizing business data.
• Two (2) years of experience using analytics environments necessary for specific job duties (Tableau, R, Python, etc.)
• Development of Systems Specification, Systems Analysis, Systems Architecture, Systems/Equipment Integration, Test & Evaluation Criteria for business systems.
• Eligible to obtain a SECRET level security clearance (final SECRET clearance required if tasking includes access to classified systems).
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university in one of the following fields: Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research.
An additional 4 years of relevant specialized experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s degree.
Master’s degree preferred.
In addition, U.S Citizenship is required.
Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information and be able to obtain a DoD government-granted security clearance.
Individuals may also be subject to a background investigation to include but not limited to criminal history, employment and education verification, drug testing, and creditworthiness.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, or genetic information.
","['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python']","['correl', 'data', 'logist', 'causal', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']",1.0,"['tableau', 'r', 'erp', 'python', 'correl', 'data', 'logist', 'causal', 'cleans', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"• Medical, dental, and vision insurance is available
• 401K
• Disability insurance
• Paid vacations and holidays
• Flexible PTO policy
• Casual, laid-back work environment
• Free snacks
Here's a closer look at this key role:
The Data Scientist will use data-based insights to conceptualize, plan, and develop solutions to solve complex problems.
Your primary focus will be in applying data mining techniques, data visualization, doing statistical analysis, and building high-quality prediction systems.
Requirements:
2+ years of recent experience working as a data scientist.
Expertise in SQL (including but not limited to transforming data) and proficiency in another data programming language (Python, R, etc.)
Experience in creating experiments and analyzing results that drive key decisions
Proficiency in one or more analytics & visualization tools (e.g., Looker, Tableau, etc.)
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to tailor communication such as analyses and interpretations to match the audience
Responsibilities:
Maintain solid working relationships with all stakeholders, primarily the Executive Team.
Work with business experts to better understand goals and identify alternative approaches to extract insights from data.
Drive adoption of BI platform across organization
Present ideas/analyses/interpretations in a clear, concise manner tailored to audience
Maintain integrity, organization and consistency of data by coordinating with system administration to ensure accurate data input or collection and by managing ETL processes
","['looker', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['looker', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"A data scientistforecaster with experience in multi variate forecasting for demand and supply type of problem with an ability to do production deployment Domain Integrated Business Planning, Consensus Based Forecasting, Supply Chain Management Tools HiveImpala, Spark, Python - STATSMODELS, SKLEARN, TENSORFLOW, KERAS, PROPHET, Implementation from Research Paper Forecasting Methods Univariate and Multi-variate time series like ARIMA, LSTM, Bagging, Boosting, Mathematical Programming (LP, MIP), etc.
","['kera', 'spark', 'prophet', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'sklearn']","['data', 'lstm', 'boost', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'time series']",999.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'prophet', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'sklearn', 'data', 'lstm', 'boost', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'time series']"
DS,"This is a great opportunity to join a small team to help share your expertise but also provides you the opportunity to grow in your career.
You will be responsible for obtaining, developing and analyzing data, prove/disprove hypotheses, exploring new data sources and structures, and develop insights.
You will have the opportunity to consult with internal customers to develop business requirements and provide possible solutions and approaches to their analytic needs.
Your customers will include marketing, branding, underwriting, field leadership, senior business leaders and the data office.
* Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
* Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, marketing targeting and other business outcomes.
* Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
* Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.Job Qualifications* Strong problem-solving skills in Financial Services, with extensive familiarization in related life, health, and investment product sets.
* Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SAS, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
* Experience working with and creating data architectures, both structured and non-structured.
* Knowledge of a variety of predictive analytics and machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
* Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
* 3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
At least 7 years of experience for the Senior Data Scientist opening.
* Master's or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or equivalent experience.
* Familiar with the following software/tools:* Coding knowledge and experience with R, Python and/or SAS.
* Statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, social network analysis, etc.
* Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
* Analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Demographic providers (Wunderman, Acxiom, Claritas), Google Analytics, and other web/social data providers.
* Distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc.
* Data mapping using R, SAS, or Tableau.Thrivent provides Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) without regard to race, religion, color, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, pregnancy, national origin, age, disability, marital status, citizenship status, military or veteran status, genetic information, or any other status protected by applicable local, state, or federal law.
","['spark', 'mysql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'busi', 'svm', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"This includes staying on the cutting edge by investing in technologies like machine learning & AI.
This role also has the opportunity to develop into a team leadership position.
The ideal candidate is located in Dallas, TX, but telecommuting is an option for exceptional candidates with proven remote experience.
ABOUT THE ROLE
You’ll have the chance to work with the latest technologies - GoLang based microservices in a true, cloud-based, big-data application environment.
You’ll work in partnership with a group of amazing engineers with expertise in designing and building beautiful customer experiences and structuring the data to support them.
There will be many opportunities to forge your own path and demonstrate individual excellence, all while pulling together with a team who is ready to support you and eager for your help.
Responsibilities
Develop and execute on testing and evaluation methodologies to optimize product prices
Perform market research and develop automated methods to keep research up to date
Behavioral Segmentation
Build production-grade segmentation models using customer behavior data
Predictive Model Building & Analysis
Build and maintain production-grade clustering, classification, and predictive models
Experience
Master’s degree in statistics, mathematics or related analytical discipline preferred (PhD a plus)
Proficiency in statistical models and thinking (probability, regression, segmentation)
Proficiency in Python, Spark and SQL
2+ years experience in a fast-paced startup environment a plus
Prior experience in price optimization and consumer segmentation is a huge plus!
Experience writing production-grade code and running predictive models in production
Embrace commitment and support a ‘team-first’ mentality
Proven success leveraging data to empower sound decision making
Ability to get stuff done, delivering high-quality work on time
Desire to solve big problems, embracing challenges with excitement
Strong belief in transparency and capable of raising issues or concerns early and often
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
ABOUT YOU
You thrive in challenging environments that require collaborative problem solving
You prefer to spend your time coding and collaborating, not in meetings
You take pride and responsibility seeing the product you worked on meet the real world for the first time
You are capable of independently prioritizing your duties and still work well with a team
You can both accept and provide thoughtful, respectful constructive criticism.
BENEFITS
Integrity.
Drive to Innovate.
Joyful Work Environment.
Loving where you work isn’t about ping pong tables and free snacks.
It’s the feeling that you wouldn’t want to be on a project with any other team.
It’s the feeling that you can get creative energy just by showing up to work.
It’s the feeling that your entire team respects your life away from the job and understands how work impacts it.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'cloud']","['probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'cloud', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'segment']"
DS,"Healthcare Data Scientist
Type: Full Time Min.
Experience: 7 â 10 years
A Data Science Analyst works with the entire life cycle of analytics initiatives (research, design, implementation and validation) of machine learning and predictive algorithms to analyze program performance and improve operational processes.
This role will also participate in other continual process improvement activities, help with project management, and execute ad-hoc requests, as needed.
The role is fully remote, with limited travel requirements, but travel may be up to 25% time when necessary.
Overall, most of the team experiences 10-15% travel time on an annual basis.
Minimum Qualifications
Seven (7) yearsâ experience in healthcare data science
Strong healthcare industry experience with claim and clinical data
Desired Skills
Management and teaming experience leading short and long term product roadmaps
Expand datasets, enhance data quality, create automated anomaly detection systems, and see issues to resolution
Balance accuracy of analysis with needs for rapid response â using many types of data, healthcare business acumen, and strategic assumptions when data doesnât exist
Manage third party relationships to extend data and capabilities, when needed
Clear understanding of the uses and limitations of statistical applications, and ability to communicate relevant information with a wide variety of audience
Education and Experience Requirements
7+ years of experience in data analysis with heavy emphasis on data-driven decision making and applied statistics
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, NaÃ¯ve Bayes, SVM, decision forecasts, etc.
1+ yearsâ experience working with common data science toolkits such as R, Weka, Python/NumPy, MatLab, etc.
Completed education in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Machine Learning, or a related field
Experience in one or more of the following areas: speech/text analytics, data visualization tools, large datasets, distributed computing tools, query languages, or relational databases
Unibloc comes readily bundled with modules and algorithms for membership, consensus, API management, and Peer2Peer communication that correspond with block chain frameworks.
Components of this modular software can be re-purposed or built upon to deliver cloud based technical web services solutions.
Discover your Data (DyD) is a product that uses augmented analytics that leverage enabling technologies such as machine learning and artificial intelligence to assist with data preparation, insight generation and insight explanation in order to augment how healthcare organizations explore and analyze their data.
This new platform helps HTGâs clients, including state Medicaid agencies, obtain crucial insights into providersâ quality of performance, compliance and behavior, and enables them to boost the efficiency and effectiveness of medical service delivery to members and patients.
Further, the âœDyDâ analytics platform will assist healthcare organizations in managing the transition from fee-for-service payments to value-based contracting, while also detecting and minimizing fraud, waste and abuse.
â¢ Fully paid dental, vision, life insurance, and disability insurance.
â¢ Generous 401k matching program fully vested from beginning.
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'numpi', 'cloud']","['text analytics', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'anomali', 'svm', 'forecast', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'numpi', 'cloud', 'text analytics', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'anomali', 'svm', 'forecast', 'visual', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Organizes, analyzes and extracts meaningful information from large amounts of data to build a learning machine which helps in streamlining business processes.
Assists on machine learning projects that use and promote data-exploration techniques to discover new or previously unasked questions.
Interprets business data and translates business knowledge into relevant machine learning solutions.
Develops expertise in various businesses and help translate that into increasingly high value-added advisory solutions to stakeholders.
Builds custom data-fueled models and algorithms, uses machine learning tools and statistical techniques to improve decision making capabilities, produce solutions to problems and improve ROI.
Builds custom data models and algorithms to complex data sets Works on a broad-range of Data Science problems across varied business groups.
Good Knowledge of statistical computer languages,(R, Python, SQL, PySpark, etc.)
to manipulate data and interpret insights from large data sets.
Understanding of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision trees, Random Forest, Logistic, regression, Linear regression, Gradient boosted trees, naïve bayes, classifier).
Understanding of big data architecture and how distributed computing works.
Understanding of basic database concepts, ability to handle large complex data sets.
Ability to communicate results and gain consensus with non-technical audience.
Experience with SparkMlib, combined with strong programming background.
Basic knowledge about analyzing unstructured information.
Strong knowledge about Visual analytics, preferable experience with Qlik, Tableau or PowerBI.
Requires a bachelor's degree in a related field (Business, Computer Science, Information Science, Analytics) or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Requires at least 1 year related experience.
","['pyspark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python']","['regress', 'big data', 'bay', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'boost', 'random forest', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['pyspark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'regress', 'big data', 'bay', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'boost', 'random forest', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
is a plus.
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'excel', 'github', 'python', 'javascript', 'java']","['probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'excel', 'github', 'python', 'javascript', 'java', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"Overview
You will work to build data science pipelines that include building models, A/B testing, natural language processing, computer vision and AR/VR visualizations.
What You'll Be Doing
Confidence with manipulating complex, large and dense datasets with big data tools; must be comfortable with SQL and large database systems
Ability to Build complex data transformation code
Build complex SQL queries using MongoDB, Oracle, SQL Server, MariaDB, MySQL
Excellent ability to work with structured and unstructured data sets
Deep experience with R or Python, SQL and running ETL jobs
Strong understanding of continuous learning and model training
Knowledge of data labeling, categorization, and structuring techniques
Expert ability to break down and clearly define problems
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Qualifications & Experience
3-5 years of hands-on experience in data mining and predictive analytics with statistical modeling techniques
3-5+ years of experience in networking, infrastructure, or database architectures
Experience working with data in the AWS ecosystem
Experience with advanced data science tools
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
MS or PhD in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
Experience in the cyber security domain
AWS certifications
SQL
Artificial Intelligence
Predictive Analytics
Tableau or other visualization tools
Kafka / Confluent
CI / CD and Cloud Native Computing (Docker, Kubernetes, Consul, Vault)
It's time to rethink the possible.
Are you ready?
","['kubernet', 'kafka', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'docker', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['kubernet', 'kafka', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'docker', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']"
DS,"They are seeking data experts who are passionate about using leading edge technology to solve unique problems in the hospitality industry.
The ideal candidate is intellectually curious about how data can be used to tell a story and help drive profitable revenue enhancing decisions for the hospitality industry.
In addition, candidate must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms, creating/running simulations and must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams.
Ideal Candidate will have:
Master’s in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models in a professional environment
Deep knowledge of modern data warehouses, distributed data sets and analysis tools (SnowFlake, HDFS, S3, Tableau, DataRama, Jupyter Notebooks, etc)
Deep knowledge of numerical and statistical packages (Python, Pandas, Numby, Sklearn, R or related).
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications
Strong problem-solving skills with an emphasis on developing new analytic products and services
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across team
Helping Your Business Thrive With Human Capital Solutions
www.ateroz.com
","['snowflak', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'jupyt', 's3', 'python', 'sklearn']","['regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['snowflak', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'jupyt', 's3', 'python', 'sklearn', 'regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Serve as an expert in translating complex data into key strategy insights and valuable actions.
• Discover business narratives told by the data and present them to other scientists, business stakeholders, and managers at various levels.
• Develop and test heuristics.
• Create and run statistic/ML models.
• Perform data exploration and data mining.
• Create business intelligence, dashboards, visualizations, and/or other advanced analytics reports to adequately tell the business narrative and offer recommendations that are practiced, actionable, and have material impact, in addition to being well-supported by analytical models and data.
Skills:
Work experience in addition to degree: 3 - 5 years of data engineering/science related activities with overall 10+ years experience.
• Graduation from a four-year college or university with a degree in statistics, physics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, or management of information systems.
• Expert knowledge of SAS, Python Machine Learning or R
• Working knowledge of statistics, programming and predictive modeling.
• Working knowledge of code writing
• Big Data/Hadoop/NoSQL and experience with large datasets
Desired:
Doctorate in Computer science, Engineering, Physics or Statistics
It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.
Your future duties and responsibilities
#LI-JS2
Required qualifications to be successful in this role
","['nosql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa']","['big data', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nosql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa', 'big data', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
In this role, you will work as a Data Scientist and problem solver.
You will be a part of a small team where you will switch assignments and projects in a disciplined and fast-paced environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Be innovative and entrepreneurial to work within a ""start-up like"" environment.
Be an advisor to the data science team and provide expertise and direction on complex analytical modeling problems
Work with cross-functional teams to help them implement solutions
Research methods to improve statistical inferences of variables across models
Solve quantitative problems
Consult on industry standard solutions as well as new innovative techniques
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"Experience 2-8 years.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
DS,"Immediate Interviews ..
Duration: 12 + months
Skills :
Data Scientist
",[None],['data'],999.0,['data']
DS,"Q2 - AINA - Data Scientist -JL5 - Richardson, TX
07/13/2020
Work on productionizing machine learning models and guide development team for implementing end to end machine learning use case.
They will define end to end architecture of Data Science and machine learning project along with being the technology architect.
The candidate will provide technology consulting for defining right Data Science and ML use cases and provide high level architecture.
Required Qualifications:
Candidate must be located within commuting distance of Richardson, TX or be willing to relocate to one of these areas.
This position may require travel.
Bachelor’s Degree or foreign equivalent, will consider work experience in lieu of a degree
5 years of experience with Information Technology
3-5+ years NLP analysis skills, software engineering or systems analysis experience preferred
Programming – Python, R
Machine Learning – strong fundamentals in machine learning
Deep Learning – experience with CNNs, RNN, LSTMs and the latest research trends
Experience with Lean / Agile development methodologies
U.S.
Preferred Qualifications:
4+ years of hands on experience with more than one programming language; Python, R, Scala, Java, SQL
Strong programming skills, strong IT background
Shipped one or more machine learning based products.
Experience with data gathering, data quality, system architecture, coding best practices
Big Data Experience strongly preferred – HDFS, Hive, Spark, Scala
Experience with perception (e.g.
computer vision), time series data (e.g.
text analysis)
Data visualization tools such as Tableau, Query languages such as SQL, Hive
Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment
The job entails an extensive amount of travel.
The job also entails sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time.
Should be able to communicate by telephone, email or face to face.
EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin
Auto req ID
57909BR
State / Region / Province
Texas
Country
USA
Interest Group
Role
Associate Data Scientist
ITL USA
Richardson, TX
External Job Title
Senior Consultant Data Science
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'data', 'lstm', 'cnn', 'research', 'nlp', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'information technology']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'data', 'lstm', 'cnn', 'research', 'nlp', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'information technology']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"They have strong experience in data preparation and analysis using a variety of tools and programming techniques, building and implementing models, and creating and running simulations.
The candidate has a track record of working with data engineers and data architects to implement models into production environments.
The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets to improve business outcomes.
They are passionate about problem solving with the use of data and feel comfortable applying their expertise across many use cases in various industries.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Candidate with 2+ years of hands-on statistical modeling and/or analytical experience
Master's degree in statistics, mathematics, computer science or related field (a PhD is preferred)
Experience with a variety of ML and AI techniques (e.g.
multivariate/logistic regression models, cluster analysis, predictive modeling, neural networks, deep learning, pricing models, decision trees, ensemble methods, etc.)
Advanced skillset building models and performing analysis using scripting languages (Python, R, Scala, Octave)
Advanced knowledge of relational and non-relational databases (SQL, NoSQL)
Proficient in large-scale distributed systems (Hadoop, Spark, etc.)
Experience with designing and presenting compelling insights using visualization tools (RShiny, R, Python, Tableau, Power BI, D3.js, etc.)
Experience with wrangling, exploring, transforming, and analyzing datasets of varying size and complexity
Knowledgeable of tools and processes to monitor model performance and data quality, including model tuning experience
Comfortable presenting findings and recommendations to key client stakeholders
Experience with implementing machine learning models in production environments through one or more cloud platforms:
Google Cloud Platform
Azure cloud services
AWS cloud services
7-time awardee on Inc. Magazine's annual Inc. 5000 list
6-time winner of 100 Best Companies to Work for in Texas by Texas Monthly Magazine
Best Workplaces in Consulting & Professional Services by Great Place to Work and Fortune
Fortune100 Best Workplaces for Millennials
Most teams are a mix of strategy, design and technology consultants working closely with clients to solve business critical challenges.
Travel: Up to 25%
LEARN MORE:
More information is available at www.credera.com.
This position is an exempt position.
U.S.
Equal Opportunity Employment Information (Completion is voluntary)
Any information that you do provide will be recorded and maintained in a confidential file.
","['nosql', 'scala', 'spark', 'power bi', 'aw', 'google cloud', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'neural network', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nosql', 'scala', 'spark', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'google cloud', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Decision Science Analyst) positions charter is to increase the companys profits through data science, machine learning, and advanced statistical analytics techniques in the areas of payments, collections, operations, and companywide cross-functional projects.
This is a great opportunity for a talented person to broaden his/her business skill set through exposure to a wide variety of business problems and challenge him/herself with projects that can span from tactical to strategic
",[None],"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"This role is integral to development and creation of both ad hoc analytic projects and the long term development of machine learning models and system wide applications supporting both improved business and clinical outcomes.
Candidates will be considered based on their ability to design modeling solutions that predict healthcare consumer behaviors and derive insights from big data.
This role will support the design, testing, and implementation of customer segmentation, clinical propensity modeling and numerous other projects.
Candidates must be able to clearly communicate the results to non-technical users and be detail-oriented.
Candidates must poses strong understanding of data modeling (supervised and unsupervised), behavioral change theory, psychometrics, clinical/claims data analysis, actuarial, healthcare quality reporting and/or actuarial data analysis.
Essential Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders to identify business requirements and the expected outcome
Collaborate with subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Determine project plans, timelines, and/or technical objectives for statistical aspects of healthcare data analytic processes, applying valid statistical techniques and using information obtained from baselines or historical data to structure uncompromised and efficient analyses.
Design experiments, test hypotheses, and build models
Develop analytic studies with an aim of delivering immediate and actionable insights to business users
Work in iterative processes and validates findings
Non-Essential Responsibilities:
Performs other functions as assigned
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Ability to translate business customer problems and questions into clear requirements for analysis
Ability to collaborate with others in diplomatic, tactful manner, while exercising sensitivity and discretion as needed
Strong understanding of statistics and probability
Ability to wrangle and analyze data using SAS, Python, R or other statistical packages
Strong understanding of data modeling (supervised and unsupervised), behavioral change theory, psychometrics, clinical/claims data analysis, healthcare quality reporting and/or actuarial data analysis.
Possess strong knowledge of and experience with analytical, quantitative, statistical, and/or consumer segmentation methodologies and theories (e.g.
opportunity analyses, risk adjustment and predictive modeling, program evaluation studies, probability and inference, longitudinal analysis, mixed effect modeling, logistic regression analyses, and model building techniques)
Ability to work under pressure while managing competing demands and deadlines
Well organized with meticulous attention to detail
Strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
Mentor junior scientists
Work Conditions and Physical Demands:
Primarily sedentary work in a general office environment
Ability to communicate and exchange information
Ability to comprehend and interpret documents and data
Requires occasional standing, walking, lifting, and moving objects (up to 10 Ibs.)
Requires manual dexterity to use computer, telephone and peripherals
May be required to work extended hours for special business needs
May be required to travel at least 10% of time based on business needs
Minimum Education:
The knowledge typically acquired during the course of attaining a Master's Degree in Data Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Epidemiology or relevant major is required.
A combination of education and experience may be used in lieu of a degree.
Minimum Related Work Experience:
5-10 years of work experience in a data science role required
Experience with SAS, SPSS, R or Python preferred
Experience in diverse statistical and data mining techniques with a mix of at least some of the following methods regression, random forest, clustering, consumer segmentation, social media analysis etc.
Experience working with healthcare data preferred (clinical, claims, eligibility, etc.)
EOE including disability/veteran
","['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python']","['risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python', 'risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Data Scientist
If you are a Data Scientist with experience, please read on!
What You Will Be Doing
- Mine and analyze data from database to fuel optimization and improvement of product development, business strategies, and marketing techniques
- Develop A/B testing framework and test model quality
- Analyze model performance and data accuracy by developing monitoring processes and tools
What You Need for this Position
Must have Majority of the following:
- R
- Python
- SQL
- Experience with clustering, Decision Tree Learning, GLM/Regression, Random Forest, social network analysis
- Artificial Neural Networks, Map/Reduce
- Hadoop, Spark, Gurobi, Hive
- MongoDB
- Masters of Science in related field
Nice to Have:
- Node.js (Very nice to have)
- PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science
What's In It for You
- Competitive Base Salary (DOE) + EQUITY!
- Full benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision)
- Performance based bonuses!
- Generous PTO/Sick time
- Collaborative/Friendly culture
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'optim', 'neural network', 'busi', 'statist']",2.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'mongodb', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'random forest', 'optim', 'nn', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Bachelor's or Master's degree in computer science, software engineering, or other related field.
Ability to manage multiple assignments.
6-12+ years of experience.
",[None],[None],1.0,[]
DS,"European number one in Cloud, Cybersecurity and High-Performance Computing, the Group provides end-to-end Orchestrated Hybrid Cloud, Big Data, Business Applications and Digital Workplace solutions.
Its expertise and services support the development of knowledge, education as well as multicultural and pluralistic approaches to research that contribute to scientific and technological excellence.
Then this will be a fantastic opportunity for you.
Waste no time and accelerate your career to become a cloud professional.
Are you ready to become the next AWS, Google, and Microsoft Cloud App Development expert?Job Roles after completion -Application DeveloperBrings new ideas to life building impactful solutions and experiences integrating state of the art technologies such as AR, VR and CV.
Works closely with business analysts to translate business requirements into technical specifications.
Demonstrates solid grasp of software development lifecycle including DevOps and Site reliability engineering.
Experience with cloud native methodologies and integrating third-party applications within a complex enterprise application portfolio.
Proficiency in traditional application and mobile application development frameworks including exposure to UX/UI design.Data ScientistHelp customers improve their business and operational strategies by processing, analyzing and interpreting advanced data sets.
This meaningful role requires expertise in designing and building statistical forecasting models and a passion for problem-framing and problem-solving.
Engaging broadly across different customer teams to structure complex business challenges.
Selecting the most suitable mathematical models and statistical techniques to address the posed business challenges.
Demonstrates expert level knowledge of public cloud, open source, big data and machine learning tools.Business Analyst/ Product OwnerAn exhilarating evolution of the traditional consulting role.
Interacts with the customer to understand the digital business challenges.
Analyzes business processes, visualize data, articulate business requirements and translate these into engineering requirements.
Prioritizes and communicates user needs, making recommendations for process or product feature changes.
Successful candidates will be invited for an introductory phone or video interview.
","['aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"He/or she should be able to work across teams to design, develop, and evaluate and execute against those data science and analytical solutions with a keen functional understanding of the business problem.
He/she will be responsible for data wrangling, data analysis, modeling, including model selection and producing quick applicable modeling solutions.
The position will serve as a thought leader including advising on optimal solutions and opining on challenger models.
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
Advanced degree in analytical field (e.g., Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Data Analysis, Operations Research)
Extensive practical expertise and work experience with Machine Learning, both supervised and unsupervised.
Deep Learning (neural network) experience is preferred.
Experience across broad range of modern analytic and data tools, particularly Python/Anaconda and/or R, XGBoost, Tensorflow and/or Keras, Spark, Hive, SQL.
Excellent problem solving, communications, and teamwork skills.
Financial service background preferred, but not required.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['xgboost', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'neural network', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",2.0,"['xgboost', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'nn', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"middot Proficient in extracting and transforming data resident in public clouds (AWS) middot Working knowledge of different types of models and their suitability middot Familiarity with Data Science lifecycle processes middot Proficient with SQL, and data structures (Data frames) middot Proficient with Jupyter and other Notebooks for analytics middot Knowledge of Text Analytics middot Experience in using data visualization tools (eg.
Tableau, Qlikview, or equivalent)
","['sql', 'tableau', 'jupyt', 'aw', 'cloud']","['text analytics', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'jupyt', 'aw', 'cloud', 'text analytics', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"This role is integral to development and creation of both ad hoc analytic projects and the long term development of machine learning models and system wide applications supporting both improved business and clinical outcomes.
Candidates will be considered based on their ability to design modeling solutions that predict healthcare consumer behaviors and derive insights from big data.
This role will support the design, testing, and implementation of customer segmentation, clinical propensity modeling and numerous other projects.
Candidates must be able to clearly communicate the results to non-technical users and be detail-oriented.
Candidates must poses strong understanding of data modeling (supervised and unsupervised), behavioral change theory, psychometrics, clinical/claims data analysis, actuarial, healthcare quality reporting and/or actuarial data analysis.
Essential Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders to identify business requirements and the expected outcome
Collaborate with subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Determine project plans, timelines, and/or technical objectives for statistical aspects of healthcare data analytic processes, applying valid statistical techniques and using information obtained from baselines or historical data to structure uncompromised and efficient analyses.
Design experiments, test hypotheses, and build models
Develop analytic studies with an aim of delivering immediate and actionable insights to business users
Work in iterative processes and validates findings
Non-Essential Responsibilities:
Performs other functions as assigned
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Ability to translate business customer problems and questions into clear requirements for analysis
Ability to collaborate with others in diplomatic, tactful manner, while exercising sensitivity and discretion as needed
Strong understanding of statistics and probability
Ability to wrangle and analyze data using SAS, Python, R or other statistical packages
Strong understanding of data modeling (supervised and unsupervised), behavioral change theory, psychometrics, clinical/claims data analysis, healthcare quality reporting and/or actuarial data analysis.
Possess strong knowledge of and experience with analytical, quantitative, statistical, and/or consumer segmentation methodologies and theories (e.g.
opportunity analyses, risk adjustment and predictive modeling, program evaluation studies, probability and inference, longitudinal analysis, mixed effect modeling, logistic regression analyses, and model building techniques)
Ability to work under pressure while managing competing demands and deadlines
Well organized with meticulous attention to detail
Strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
Mentor junior scientists
Work Conditions and Physical Demands:
Primarily sedentary work in a general office environment
Ability to communicate and exchange information
Ability to comprehend and interpret documents and data
Requires occasional standing, walking, lifting, and moving objects (up to 10 Ibs.)
Requires manual dexterity to use computer, telephone and peripherals
May be required to work extended hours for special business needs
May be required to travel at least 10> of time based on business needs
Minimum Education:
The knowledge typically acquired during the course of attaining a Master’s Degree in Data Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Epidemiology or relevant major is required.
A combination of education and experience may be used in lieu of a degree.
Minimum Related Work Experience:
5-10 years of work experience in a data science role required
Experience with SAS, SPSS, R or Python preferred
Experience in diverse statistical and data mining techniques with a mix of at least some of the following methods regression, random forest, clustering, consumer segmentation, social media analysis etc.
Experience working with healthcare data preferred (clinical, claims, eligibility, etc.)
EOE including disability/veteran
","['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python']","['risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python', 'risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This is a great opportunity for a talented person to broaden his/her business skill set through exposure to a wide variety of business problems and challenge him/herself with projects that can span from tactical to strategic in nature.
Chemical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering)* 2+ years of hands-on work experience developing data science solutions* 2+ years of coding experience in open source programming languages such as Python or R* Advanced user of database query languages such as SAS and SQL* Results-oriented self-starter who is confident in defending his/her critical thinking abilities* Proven track record of developing successful predictive analytics (i.e.
","['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['predict', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'predict', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"IGNITE Graduate Development Program - Application Developer / Data Scientist / Business Analyst
Publish Date: Jun 14, 2020
European number one in Cloud, Cybersecurity and High-Performance Computing, the Group provides end-to-end Orchestrated Hybrid Cloud, Big Data, Business Applications and Digital Workplace solutions.
Its expertise and services support the development of knowledge, education as well as multicultural and pluralistic approaches to research that contribute to scientific and technological excellence.
App Dev is only position available within this track.
Data Scientist and Business Analyst roles are filled.
Position -
Software Development - IGNITE Graduate Development Program
Application Developer / Data Scientist / Business Analyst - Entry Level
Irving, TX
The Opportunity -
Are you looking to ignite your career in technology?
Then this will be a fantastic opportunity for you.
Waste no time and accelerate your career to become a cloud professional.
The Software Development Graduate Development Program is designed in phases and is a mixture of formats.
In Phase Three, you will select one or more specializations, such as AI, Machine Learning, Kubernetes or Mobile App Development.
Are you ready to become the next AWS, Google, and Microsoft Cloud App Development expert?
Job Roles after completion -
Application Developer
Brings new ideas to life building impactful solutions and experiences integrating state of the art technologies such as AR, VR and CV.
Works closely with business analysts to translate business requirements into technical specifications.
Demonstrates solid grasp of software development lifecycle including DevOps and Site reliability engineering.
Experience with cloud native methodologies and integrating third-party applications within a complex enterprise application portfolio.
Proficiency in traditional application and mobile application development frameworks including exposure to UX/UI design.
Data Scientist
Help customers improve their business and operational strategies by processing, analyzing and interpreting advanced data sets.
This meaningful role requires expertise in designing and building statistical forecasting models and a passion for problem-framing and problem-solving.
Engaging broadly across different customer teams to structure complex business challenges.
Selecting the most suitable mathematical models and statistical techniques to address the posed business challenges.
Demonstrates expert level knowledge of public cloud, open source, big data and machine learning tools.
Business Analyst/ Product Owner
An exhilarating evolution of the traditional consulting role.
Interacts with the customer to understand the digital business challenges.
Analyzes business processes, visualize data, articulate business requirements and translate these into engineering requirements.
Prioritizes and communicates user needs, making recommendations for process or product feature changes.
Your Qualifications
University degree majoring in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, Math)
Within 24 months after graduation
Minimum GPA: 3.0
Professional curiosity and the ability to enable yourself in new technologies
Enthusiasm, resilience, and a positive attitude
Willing to travel
Dedication to a 12-month development program focusing on both professional and personal development.
Your Application -
Successful candidates will be invited for an introductory phone or video interview.
For questions, you may contact
Nearest Major Market: Irving
Nearest Secondary Market: Dallas
","['kubernet', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'aw', 'cloud']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['kubernet', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'aw', 'cloud', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.
Responsibilities
The Senior Data Scientist develops, maintains, and collects structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting.
Creates reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics.
Begins to influence department’s strategy.
Makes decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components, and work is performed without direction.
Exercises considerable latitude in determining objectives and approaches to assignments.
Required Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree and 5+ years of applicable experience OR Master's Degree and 3 or more years of experience
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors
Experience in developing, maintaining, and collecting structured and unstructured data sets for analysis and reporting
Experience in creating reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences
Preferred Qualifications
Master's Degree
PhD
Additional Information
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"HMS makes the healthcare system work better for everyone.
At HMS, you will develop new skills and build your career in a dynamic industry while making a difference in the lives of others.
This role is integral to development and creation of both ad hoc analytic projects and the long term development of machine learning models and system wide applications supporting both improved business and clinical outcomes.
Candidates will be considered based on their ability to design modeling solutions that predict healthcare consumer behaviors and derive insights from big data.
This role will support the design, testing, and implementation of customer segmentation, clinical propensity modeling and numerous other projects.
Candidates must be able to clearly communicate the results to non-technical users and be detail-oriented.
Candidates must poses strong understanding of data modeling (supervised and unsupervised), behavioral change theory, psychometrics, clinical/claims data analysis, actuarial, healthcare quality reporting and/or actuarial data analysis.
*Essential Responsibilities:**
+ Work with stakeholders to identify business requirements and the expected outcome
+ Collaborate with subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
+ Determine project plans, timelines, and/or technical objectives for statistical aspects of healthcare data analytic processes, applying valid statistical techniques and using information obtained from baselines or historical data to structure uncompromised and efficient analyses.
+ Design experiments, test hypotheses, and build models
+ Develop analytic studies with an aim of delivering immediate and actionable insights to business users
+ Work in iterative processes and validates findings
*Non-Essential Responsibilities:**
+ Performs other functions as assigned
*Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:**
+ Ability to translate business customer problems and questions into clear requirements for analysis
+ Ability to collaborate with others in diplomatic, tactful manner, while exercising sensitivity and discretion as needed
+ Strong understanding of statistics and probability
+ Ability to wrangle and analyze data using SAS, Python, R or other statistical packages
+ Strong understanding of data modeling (supervised and unsupervised), behavioral change theory, psychometrics, clinical/claims data analysis, healthcare quality reporting and/or actuarial data analysis.
+ Possess strong knowledge of and experience with analytical, quantitative, statistical, and/or consumer segmentation methodologies and theories (e.g.
opportunity analyses, risk adjustment and predictive modeling, program evaluation studies, probability and inference, longitudinal analysis, mixed effect modeling, logistic regression analyses, and model building techniques)
+ Ability to work under pressure while managing competing demands and deadlines
+ Well organized with meticulous attention to detail
+ Strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
+ Mentor junior scientists
*Work Conditions and Physical Demands:**
+ Primarily sedentary work in a general office environment
+ Ability to communicate and exchange information
+ Ability to comprehend and interpret documents and data
+ Requires occasional standing, walking, lifting, and moving objects (up to 10 Ibs.)
+ Requires manual dexterity to use computer, telephone and peripherals
+ May be required to work extended hours for special business needs
+ May be required to travel at least 10% of time based on business needs
*Minimum Education:**
+ The knowledge typically acquired during the course of attaining a Master's Degree in Data Analytics, Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Epidemiology or relevant major is required.
A combination of education and experience may be used in lieu of a degree.
*Minimum Related Work Experience:**
+ 5-10 years of work experience in a data science role required
+ Experience with SAS, SPSS, R or Python preferred
+ Experience in diverse statistical and data mining techniques with a mix of at least some of the following methods regression, random forest, clustering, consumer segmentation, social media analysis etc.
+ Experience working with healthcare data preferred (clinical, claims, eligibility, etc.)
_EOE including disability/veteran_
*Title:** _Data Scientist_
*Requisition ID:** _200010ED_
EEO/Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled.
","['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python']","['risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python', 'risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'segment', 'big data', 'data', 'logist', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Prefer Masterrsquos degree (MBA).
",[None],[None],2.5,[]
DS,"This is an exciting full-time opportunity to work in a fast-paced environment with a team of passionate technologists.
As a solution builder, you will be working to support the clients mission and goals of building an enterprise analytics platform.
It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.
Your future duties and responsibilities
• Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities with the ability to support multiple work streams and drive assimilation of new techniques and solutions.
• Evaluate data quality using SQL and data analysis techniques that improve client-reporting capabilities.
• Participate in team problem solving efforts and offer ideas to solve client issues.
• Understand data needs and construct data pipelines for automating and accelerating data preparation.
Required qualifications to be successful in this role
Basic Qualifications:
• Bachelors degree or masters degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Technology or STEM related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, training, or work experience.
• 1+ Years of Experience working on Analytics and Business Intelligence focused initiatives, preferably in a consulting capacity.
• 1+ Years of Experience using Python, R, or other languages to build statistical models or analyze data.
• 1+ Years of Experience in creating complex SQL queries and functions, data structures and strong analytical problem solving skills.
• Experience working with various self-service business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI, Business Objects, etc.
• Experience working in an Agile based environment.
• Strong technical and troubleshooting techniques.
#LI-HS1
#CGIFederalERPJob
#BePartofCGIMomentum
","['power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'information technology', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'information technology', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Design and develop statistical models with Big Data, IoT, ERP, Supply Chain, etc.
to drive major operational business decisions
Understand customer and business requirements and implement reliable technical solutions for non-technical end users.
Identify opportunities to improve data collection, reporting, and analysis based on business needs.
Regularly interface with client sponsors and team members to meet project deadlines and provide clear communication with the team.
Provide documentation and explanation of technical solutions in a professional manner
Ability to create and deliver presentations in the Data Science and Advanced Analytics space
Ability to take complex problems/concepts and simplify down for a variety of audiences
Requirements
Strong and proven background of analytical, mathematical and critical thinking
Passion for data analytics, modeling, programming, and machine learning.
Strong Python and/or R programming experience.
Exposure to data ETL, storage, and manipulation tools including SQL, XML/JSON, and APIs
4+ years of experience in Data Science or related field.
BS or MS in Computer Science, Computational Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, Data Science, Statistics or equivalent
Travels to client sites.
Delighters
Having examples of scaling production-facing applications or open-source contributions.
2+ years of consulting experience
Experience using Big Data and Cloud technologies
Familiarity with Spark and Data Lakes
Prior experience in the Oil and Gas industry
Benefits
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'erp', 'cloud']","['etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'erp', 'cloud', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist
Yrs of Exp: 6 to 9 Yrs
Responsible for developing strategies for effective data analysis and reporting.
Selects, configures, and implements analytical solutions.
Develops and implements data analytics, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Identifies, analyzes, and interprets trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Manages computer systems in a business environment and responsible for resolving technical issues.
Knowledgeable in programming, data structures, computer systems, and software engineering.
Bachelor's or Master's degree in computer science, software engineering, or other related field.
Ability to manage multiple assignments.
Superior written and oral communication skills.
6-10+ years of experience.
Requirement:
Strong in Data Science and as a Data scientist experience with building statistical models and intelligence around it - AIML ·
Programming experience with at least 6 years of Oracle pl/sql, 3 years of Hadoop and 1 year of Java experience.
Proven understanding and related experience with Hadoop, HBase, Hive, Pig, Sqoop, Flume, Hbase, Map/Reduce, Apache Spark as well as Unix OS Core Java programming, Scala, shell scripting experience.
Hands on Experience in Oozie Job Scheduling, Zookeeper, Solr, ElasticSearch, Storm, LogStash or other similar technologies
Must have experience with MQ technologies (Kafka, RabbitMQ).
Solid experience in writing SQL, stored procedures, query performance tuning preferably on Oracle 12c.
Experience working with CI/CD and DevOps
Responsibilities:
Identify new opportunities, use cases and build data models in RA and Enforce .
Train Data models to proactively identify revenue leakages and Fradulant behaviours Participate in Agile development on a large Hadoop-based data platform as a member of a distributed team .
Come out with different statistical models and build data insights on revenue leakages possiblities
Code programs to load data from diverse data sources into Hive structures using SQOOP and other tools.
Translate complex functional and technical requirements into detailed design.
Analyze vast data stores.
Code business logic using Scala on Apache Spark.
Create workflows using Oozie.
Code and test prototypes.
Code to existing frameworks where applicable
Education/Certifications: Bachelor's/Masters in Computer Engineering or Information Technology Hadoop and AIML Certification is added advantage
","['unix', 'kafka', 'scala', 'spark', 'pig', 'hbase', 'sql', 'solr', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'elasticsearch', 'oracl', 'java']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['unix', 'kafka', 'scala', 'spark', 'pig', 'hbase', 'sql', 'solr', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'elasticsearch', 'oracl', 'java', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
DS,"Data Scientist,
Coppell, TX
Phone + Skype
No H1B
6 Months Duration
JD:
Data Science projects: (ML Machine Learning)
Sales forecasting and revenue forecast using multiple regression
ML projects for Customer Success: Predict customer attrition; use several data points to predict attrition/ or will they renew
Models: *Working on LARGE DATA SETS
Classification, Regression models primarily
Key skills needed :
Data cleaning, Data wrangling, Data Visualization, Intellectual Curiosity, Business acumen, Communication Skills, Probability and Statistics, Machine Learning
Tools/Environment must haves:
Azure Databricks environment/environment experience, OR working on AWS Public Cloud environments
Python Programming skills 3 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
SQL 2- 3 years
Spark ML domain knowledge
Visualization tools: Power BI or Tableau
Presenting to senior leadership, up to C-level execs, via PowerPoint presentations, etc.
Scope:
Data Scientist to help build classification, regression ML models for predictive analytics and anomaly detection
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for the Customer Success team
Must have DS skills:
Data cleaning, Data wrangling, Data Visualization, Intellectual Curiosity, Business acumen, Communication Skills, Probability and Statistics, Machine Learning
Experience building (from scratch) Machine Learning (ML) models that can be put to production (with the support of data engineering and S.W engineering teams)
Professional experience building machine learning models (candidates will need to articulate detail project experience from research, model selection, action and results)
Statistics knowledge
Tools/Environment must haves:
Azure Databricks environment/environment experience,
Python Programming skills 3 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
SQL 2- 3 years
Spark ML domain knowledge
Visualization tools: Power BI or similar
Responsibilities:
Build machine-learning models
Create regression, classification models; Work with engineering teams to deploy robust, highly available decisioning pipelines based on your models.
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Combine models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Qualifications:
Business acumen and communication skills to gather the data requirement from the business
3+ years of related professional work experience
Theoretical and execution background of Data Science with specific focus on Machine Learning
Experience testing and validating models and assessing the trade-offs between different modeling techniques and specifications
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Strong analytics and problem-solving skills needed.
Can take the data and come up with a solution specific to the use case
Experience in applying statistical learning methods to solve business problems
Experience working with complex and/or large data sets
Programming skills 2 years (In-depth knowledge of Python, Pandas and its open-source ecosystem or similar)
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig, Sqoop.
Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, Hbase and SQL databases and unstructured data stores
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Na ve Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, etc.
NLP / NLU experience preferred.
","['excel', 'python', 'spark', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'mongodb', 'azur', 'hive', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'power bi', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'bi', 'powerpoint', 'panda', 'aw']","['predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'probabl', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'clean', 'research', 'forecast', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali']",999.0,"['excel', 'python', 'spark', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'mongodb', 'azur', 'hive', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'pig', 'powerbi', 'c', 'cloud', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'panda', 'aw', 'predict', 'svm', 'statist', 'probabl', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cleans', 'random forest', 'visual', 'commun', 'regress', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'clean', 'research', 'forecast', 'nlp', 'pipelin', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali']"
DS,"Skills: Work experience in addition to degree: 3 - 5 years of data engineering/science related activities with overall 10+ years' experience.
• Graduation from a four-year college or university with a degree in statistics, physics, mathematics, engineering, computer science, or management of information systems.
** It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned** .
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"He/or she should be able to work across teams to design, develop, and evaluate and execute against those data science and analytical solutions with a keen functional understanding of the business problem.
He/she will be responsible for data wrangling, data analysis, modeling, including model selection and producing quick applicable modeling solutions.The position will serve as a thought leader including advising on optimal solutions and opining on challenger models.
Deep Learning (neural network) experience is preferred.
* Experience across broad range of modern analytic and data tools, particularly Python/Anaconda and/or R, XGBoost, Tensorflow and/or Keras, Spark, Hive, SQL.
* Excellent problem solving, communications, and teamwork skills.
* Financial service background preferred, but not required
","['xgboost', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'neural network', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['xgboost', 'kera', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"Hope you are doing great!!
Â
Role: Data Scientist
Duration: 12+months
Visa: H1B, GC, USC
Need 5+ years of experience as Data Scientist.
The desired candidate would have an excellent understanding of Python Java R Robotic Process Automation (RPA)
Hands on working experience with below skill sets:
Artificial Intelligence
Machine Learning algorithms -
Google Tensol Flow
Amazon Sage Maker etc.
Supervised LearningÂ
Unsupervised LearningÂ
Reinforcement Learning
Data Science - Data Preparation and Feature Engineering
Software languages for Machine learning Python Java R Robotic Process Automation (RPA)
Able to integrate multiple data sources and databases into one system
Design and implement a microservice based application using python, Django and related frameworks.
Understanding of the threading limitations of Python, and multi-process architecture
Good understanding of server-side templating languages
Basic understanding of front-end technologies, such as JavaScript, HTML5, and CSS3
Understanding of accessibility and security compliance
Knowledge of user authentication and authorization between multiple systems, servers, and environments
Understanding of fundamental design principles behind a scalable application
Familiarity with event-driven programming in Python
Understanding of the differences between multiple delivery platforms, such as mobile vs desktop, and optimizing output to match the specific platform
Able to create database schemas that represent and support business processes
Strong unit test and debugging skills
Proficient understanding of code versioning tools (GIT) and Continuous integration continuous deployment Requirements
Bachelor s degree in a technical discipline such as Computer Science, Software Engineering; or equivalent work experience required
Â
Thanks & Regards,
SANTOSH KUMAR | Sr.IT Recruiter
Contact by : cskumar@xcelogroup.com
M: 972-968-8512
","['excel', 'git', 'django', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'java']","['data', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'busi', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['excel', 'git', 'django', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'java', 'data', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'busi', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Purpose of Job
Leads a team of Data Scientists responsible for advanced analytical solutions that include predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to that generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications.
Utilizes technical acumen and in-depth understanding of business processes and practices to influence the creation and execution of operational and strategic plans.
Partners with IT and other areas to build major improvements to analytical processes and systems.
Advises Senior Leadership on the development of data science solutions and long-term goals and or strategies.
Maintains relationships with academic and industry thought leaders to ensure the enterprise has access to cutting-edge thinking and technologies.
Job Requirements
Collaborates with other analytical leaders to fulfill the strategic direction of the business through data and information exploration, research of emerging technologies or analytical techniques and long-term defined/project specific strategic assignments.
Identifies additional resource needs ranging from IT investments, 3rd party support or additional analysts.
Understands the business direction, environment and strategies, to identify and recommend solutions that influence decision makers and drive change.
Directs the design and construction of large and complex data sets from large amounts of structured and unstructured data (internal and external) to enable analytical solutions.
Builds and leads a high performing team of experts in advanced analytics.
Develops team reputation as highly skilled experts in the field of data science.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field OR 6 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
8 or more years of experience in predictive modeling, large data analysis and computer science
3 or more years of direct management experience
Experience in stochastic modeling, machine learning, and other advanced mathematical techniques (e.g., neural nets, simulation, graph analysis)
Expert in at least one compiled language (e.g., Java, C) and one dynamic scripting language (e.g., Python, PERL, Ruby)
A strong track record of communicating results, insights, and technical solutions to Senior Executive Management (or equivalent)
*Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
This will take approximately 5 minutes.
Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.
Preferred Requirements:
Evidence of successful development and implementation of data science solutions
Prior experience working in an IT organization
2+ years of prior people management experience
Experience of working in a cloud environment
Understanding of model risk governance as laid out in SR 11-7
For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement), or must have managers approval prior to posting.
","['python', 'net', 'cloud', 'perl', 'rubi', 'c', 'java']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['python', 'net', 'cloud', 'perl', 'rubi', 'c', 'java', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist
Type: Fulltime Permanent
All with the ultimate goal of optimizing the aviation industry.
You will join a multi-disciplinary team of talented individuals and you will use your skills and experience to drive the present and create the future.
Design, code, test and debug complex optimization & data science solutions using operations research & machine learning techniques.
Pattern recognition, Statistical Inference, and model estimation using multiple big data sources
Develop data manipulation and machine learning algorithms in R, Python, SQL, Bash, C# etc.,
Qualifications:
MS. or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research, Mathematics, Machine Learning
Excellent programming skills using R, Python, SQL, C#
Experience in Big Data technologies such as Spark and Hadoop Platform (Hive, HDFS)
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills
Deriving meaningful patterns and quantitative analysis using complex large datasets
Thank you,
Sachin Patil,
510-402-1063
sachin@apninc.com
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'c']","['big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']",3.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'c', 'big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Duration & Type: 12 months Contract
No.
of Positions: Multiple
Please Note: This is a W-2 only position.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with the IT, Sales and Marketing organizations functional leads to formulate and deliver insights to production
Perform data studies and data discovery around new data sources or new uses for existing data sources
Design and build large and complex data sets from spurious sources
Design and implement statistical data quality procedures around data sources
Use statistical packages to perform statistical analyses with data sets
Implement software solution required for accessing, handling and updating data appropriately
Visualize and report data findings to provide insights for the organization
Serve as a functional lead and mentor to other team members within the organization
Provide domain expertise to external vendors, partners, and members of other organizations
Required:
Experience creating models utilizing Machine Learning and/or Statistics
Exposure to the Hadoop Ecosystem tools (e.g Spark, MapReduce/Tez) or other big data technologies
Experience manipulating big and noisy datasets (e.q.
SQL, Pig, Hive)
Bachelors or Masters (preferred) degree in Computer Science, Math or Scientific Computing; Data Analytics, Machine Learning or equivalent experience.
Minumum 2 to 8 years of experience
Nice to have – Knowledge of scalable data visualization techniques
Ability to create prototypes quickly
For consideration, please send resume to career@infoquestgroup.com
","['mapreduc', 'spark', 'pig', 'sql', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['big data', 'data', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'spark', 'pig', 'sql', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'big data', 'data', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"R&D ranges from concept development, trade studies, and rapid prototyping for customized engineering products and services.
Modern DS/DE/AI approaches are inherently interdisciplinary, integrating concepts from Computer Science, statistics, and math among other fields.
Therefore, the candidate must have both technical depth in data engineering combined with interdisciplinary breadth to integrate concepts from other fields.
The ideal candidate will be able to work with product teams to identify rich data science opportunities, develop data-centric solutions, and deploy those solutions to a secure production environment.
Typical tasks may include:
Work with product teams, users, and other stakeholders to identify opportunities for data-driven solutions.
Help build sophisticated optimization models, and create algorithms for quickly producing near optimal solutions according to those models.
Use supervised and unsupervised machine learning approaches to develop insights and provide recommendations or predictions for future events.
Generate hypotheses, design experiments, gather, review and transform data, and test the hypotheses using modern and statistically rigorous methodologies.
Develop new techniques and applications in optimization, statistics, and machine learning fields and present those findings to the academic community.
Requirements:
Ability to obtain and maintain a U.S. Security Clearance as required for the position.
A minimum of 6 years of related professional experience.
Theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Must thrive on data driven problem solving.
Experience in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Professional verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Ability to start with a messy unstructured problem, identify specific research questions from it, and propose data and model-driven solutions that would create value for end-users and other stakeholders.
Experience working on front-end, back-end, or full-stack web development projects.
Knowledge of current developments and trends in statistics, machine learning, and big data.
Desired Skills:
Direct experience working DoD and/or IC problem sets
Required Education:
B.S.
in STEM related degree such as Data Science, Computer Science, AI, Math or similar quantitative focused degree.
Advanced degree strongly preferred.
This position requires a U.S.
Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
163143
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.
","['r', 'julia', 'sa', 'python']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['r', 'julia', 'sa', 'python', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience.
Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.
Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,406.00 - $158,767.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Experience:
Data Science: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
DS,"POSITION SUMMARY:
PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Experience using NLP toolkits like SpaCy, Gensim, NLTK, CoreNLP, OpenNLP, LingPipe Mallet, etc.
Design and development of robust algorithms and
techniques using machine learning techniques like clustering, decision
trees, Random Forest, Logistic, regression, Linear regression, Gradient
boosted trees, naïve bayes, classifier along with some text analytics,
Natural Language Processing (NLP).
Assist in the development of
sales and clinical analytic platforms through quantitative data analysis,
documentation, and communication for new and existing internal and
external business opportunities.
Communicate and engage internal
clients to develop a strong understanding
of their data, analytical and reporting needs.
Conceptualize, design and develop
analytics models in addressing complex business problems, discovering
insights and identifying opportunities that are of value to internal and
external business stakeholders, typically using a hypothesis-driven
approach.
Improve organizational
performance through the application of original thinking to existing and
emerging analytic methods, processes, products and services, and employ
sound judgment in determining how innovations will be deployed to produce
a return on investment
Use traditional and sophisticated analytical
and statistical methods, metrics, tools and reporting to help organize
data and information to achieve business and corporate objectives in areas
such as contract management, customer relationship management, sales
management, product utilization, customer segmentation, and targeting,
etc.
Data Scientist with a strong background in statistical computer languages (R or
Python or SAS or SQL or Spark etc.)
to manipulate data and interpret insights
from big data sets, great understanding of machine learning techniques and Deep
Under the general direction of the Director,
Business Informatics, this position will be responsible for providing
innovative solutions and developing/driving strategic modeling initiatives
while maintaining a close partnership with Data engineers, subject matter
deployed quickly and monitored in the deployment framework.
EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires training in fields such as engineering, statistics,
mathematics, biomedical science, economics or similar
vocations generally obtained through completion of a four-year bachelor’s
degree.
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills with experience in
statistical modeling is preferred.
Proficient with Excel, Python/R and SAS preferred.
Requires a minimum
of one (1) to two (2) years’ experience as a Data Scientist with job
duties like above, ideally for projects associated with custom analytics and/or
custom reporting/metrics development.
MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS:
Strong analytical, problem
applications knowledge to identify appropriate solutions
Proficient
in SAS or Python or R data analytics tools as well as Microsoft SQL query
tools.
Familiarity BI tools like PowerBI is plus.
Designs
experiments, test hypotheses and builds analytic models.
At
least 1-year experience implementing deep learning models using
Databricks, H20.ai or other similar packages is strongly preferred.
1 years’
experience working on EMR (Electronic Medical Records) preferred.
Deep
knowledge of healthcare informatics and/or information management
Conducts
data analysis and designs and develops moderately complex analytic algorithms.
Validates
analysis by comparing appropriate samples.
Employs
the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns.
Experience with state-of-the-art techniques in machine learning
algorithms, including deep neural networks, NLP, dimensionality reduction,
ensemble methods, graph algorithms
The work environment
characteristics described here are representative of those associate encounters while performing the
essential functions of this job.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to
The noise level in the work environment is generally quiet.
PHYSICAL
AND MENTAL REQUIREMENTS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those
that must be met by an associate to successfully perform the essential
functions of this job.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable
Sedentary
physical activity requiring reaching, sifting, lifting, finger dexterity,
grasping, feeling, repetitive motions, talking and hearing.
The visual requirement is for close vision,
distance vision, peripheral vision and ability to adjust focus.
75> or more
time is spent looking directly at a computer.
The Associate is frequently required to stand,
walk (or otherwise be mobile).
Ability
to deal with stressful situations as they arise.
","['nltk', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'spaci', 'sa']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'boost', 'statist', 'healthcar', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'bay', 'nlp', 'econom', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['nltk', 'spark', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'spaci', 'sa', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'boost', 'statist', 'healthcar', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'data', 'logist', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'bay', 'nlp', 'econom', 'nn', 'busi', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Principal Data Scientist-- Ensemble Algorithms and Architecture
Job Summary
The Data Scientist performs statistical and econometric analysis, AI/ML modeling, and optimization.
The Data Scientist solves use cases related to personalization, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, pricing, and cost.
The major job responsibility for this position is to develop ensemble algorithms in cascaded orchestration platform for multi-service use cases for NMG.
The Principal Data Scientist will develop expandable and rapidly deployable algorithm and models for use cases such as Next Best Action (NBA).
The position requires expert level skills in neural network and graph theory in building time-sensitive and association-based next best action and next best complete the look product recommendation system.
Modular algorithm and models developed by the Principal Data Scientist can be cascaded to be used for many use cases for various use cases in personalization, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, and pricing optimization.
Job Duties
The position will report to the Director of Data Science and will have a dotted-line leadership responsibility to mentor and train at least three junior- or senior-level data scientists.
Collaborate with cross-organization to ideate and prioritize use cases, business problems, and user stories that can enhance customers experience and increase NMG ROI.
Lead data science projects independently while collaborating with team members and multi-organizational stakeholders.
Perform hands-on advanced analysis in personalization, marketing science, retail analytics, business analytics, and supply-chain analytics using big data in cloud environment to improve customer satisfaction and promote growth.
Leverage state-of-the-art data science tools, methodologies, and algorithms to drive improved decisions
Collaborate in the development and implementation of predictive models, segmentation strategies, optimization algorithms, and data mining analyses with a targeted result of increasing revenue.
Research, innovate, and design algorithms and techniques to contribute in optimization and automation.
Job Requirements
At least a quant-based graduate degree such as Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Math, Statistics, Physics, Economics, or other related fields from a reputed university with course work that includes analytics, coding, statistics, math, and algorithm development.
Ph.D. is Preferred
Strong in Math, Statistic, Finance, and Econometric
Expert Level skills in one or many of the followings:
Graph/Network Theory
Personalized Recommendation Engine for Next Best Action and Next Best Choice
5 years of hands on experience in Data Science.
Experience in processing and performing multi-faceted analysis with on-line browsing, sales transaction, product, and inventory data.
Experience in working in retail space will be a plus.
Experience in developing or enhancing models applying machine learning and neural network algorithms, graph/network theory, statistical analysis, and optimization theories.
Experience in using Keras, Tensorflow, and scikit-learn
Strong coding skills in SQL, Python.
Experience in working with distributed computing i.e.
Hive, Apache Spark
Experience in working on AWS SageMaker, S3, and SnowFlake will be a plus
Knowledge of descriptive analytics and data visualization
Experience with full lifecycle agile and experimental design methods.
Exceptional standards for quality and strong attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple projects and on-demand business requests simultaneously
Able to work in a fast-paced core team environment with team members from diverse areas such as marketing, creative, strategy, and product.
","['kera', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'visual', 'segment', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'financ', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['kera', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'visual', 'segment', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'financ', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"MUST HAVE; Looking for relevant experience in troubleshooting performance issues and experienced in analyzing large data sets using statistical methods
As a Performance Assurance Engineer, you will be responsible to be part of a team of 4G/5G RAN Performance Assurance technical staff, business intelligence analysts, and visualization architects.
You will be responsible to provide support and expertise for proactive identification of issues, analysis and diagnostics across a diverse 4G/5G network infrastructure using expansive data and measurement capabilities.
Specific Responsibilities include:
• 10+ years of professional experience in Engineering: 5+ years’ experience in Data Science with knowledge of data engineering
• Work closely with the internal and external stakeholders to define 4G/5G KPI measurement methodologies and targets (KPI, KQI) for 4G/5G RAN product acceptance.
• Work closely with stakeholders to help build products that help utilize large amount of structured & unstructured data in analyzing network performance
• Proactively define and interpret data/metrics/KPIs, analyze results, and provide insights to determine operational impact, trends and opportunities for all the 4G/5G RAN products
• Communicate key findings to stakeholders using visualizations and/or other suitable methods
• Aid in product & feature performance analysis, evaluation of new product & SW releases and 3rd party product evaluation using analytics/data science to drive intelligent business decisions and to build product synergies across all product elements
• Develop the A/B testing framework to aid in product & feature performance analysis, evaluation of new product & SW releases and 3rd party product evaluation
• Identify key datasets, and help define data pipeline from collection, processes, storage, lineage and data dictionary to ensure accuracy, completeness & availability
• Demonstrate ability to analyze and interpret a mix of qualitative and quantitative data using various data sources, construct compelling narratives, and provide actionable insights and recommendations on complex topics.
• Conceptualize and implement data extracts, data replication, reports, information dashboards, and other end-user information portals or resources to support the 4G/5G project deliverables.
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills to communicate key technical concepts, ability to package complex ideas into logical, easy-to-follow progressions
• Adapt to changes in a dynamic business environment, support management initiatives, and guide other engineers
• Present ideas, technical and non-technical, in a logical, compelling manner in a written format and verbally in both small and large group settings
• Communicate PA team budget, milestones and deliverables to project management and implement plans to accomplish the milestones within budget, as required
Background & Competencies Required:
• Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering; Advanced degree in Data Science or a related Data Engineering, or equivalent experience is beneficial
• Strong technical knowledge of any wireless technology & procedures including CDMA/EVDO/LTE/Volte and/or 5G
• Must possess expert-level understanding of operational measurements/counters to monitor and define Key Performance Indicators (KPIs)
• Experience with evaluating service performance trends and proactively defining RAN system performance related issues
• Experience with data visualization and ability to quickly grasp statistical methods, and methodologies.
Maintain a strong command of current data analytics technology trends, including emerging paradigms and practices
• Successful track record defining direction and providing specific instruction for engineering projects/programs leveraging personal knowledge and organizational skills to increase team efficiency, facilitate personal development and mentor colleagues.
• Working knowledge of statistical concepts (distributions, hypothesis testing, confidence intervals) and experience applying to real-world applications
• Demonstrated research and problem solving skills via prior work experience.
Experience with wireless infrastructure provider and/or operator is desired
• Must have a strong work ethic, integrity and work extremely well in a team environment
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job Summary
The Data Scientist performs statistical and econometric analysis, AI/ML modeling, and optimization.
The Data Scientist solves use cases related to personalization, customer journey, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, pricing, and cost.
The major job responsibility for this position is to develop ensemble algorithms in cascaded orchestration platform for multi-service use cases for NMG.
The Data Scientist will develop expandable and rapidly deployable algorithm and models for use cases such as Next Best Action (NBA).
The position requires skills in machine, neural network and graph theory in building time-sensitive and association-based next best action and next best complete the look product recommendation system.
Modular algorithm and models developed by the Data Scientist can be cascaded to be integrated in various use cases in personalization, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, and pricing optimization.
Job Duties
The data scientist will report to the Director of Data Science
Collaborate with cross-organization to ideate and prioritize use cases, business problems, and user stories that can enhance customers experience and increase NMG ROI.
Lead data science projects independently while collaborating with team members and multi-organizational stakeholders.
Perform hands-on advanced analysis in personalization, marketing science, retail analytics, business analytics, and supply-chain analytics using big data in cloud environment to improve customer satisfaction and promote growth.
Leverage state-of-the-art data science tools, methodologies, and algorithms to drive improved decisions
Collaborate in the development and implementation of predictive models, segmentation strategies, optimization algorithms, and data mining analyses with a targeted result of increasing revenue.
Research, innovate, and design algorithms and techniques to contribute in optimization and automation.
Job Requirements
Experience in processing and performing multi-faceted analysis with on-line browsing sales transaction, product, and inventory data.
Experience in working in retail space will be a plus.
Strong in Math, Statistic, Finance, and Microeconomics
Experience in developing or enhancing models applying artificial intelligence/machine learning (AI/ML) algorithms, statistical analysis, and optimization theories.
A least three years of work experience in developing AI/ML models
Strong coding skills in SQL, Python.
A least four years of work experience in using SQL and Python).
Experience in working with distributed computing i.e.
Hive, Apache Spark.
At least two years of experience in Spark
Good to have --Experience in working on AWS SageMaker, S3, and SnowFlake
Knowledge of descriptive analytics and data visualization
Exceptional standards for quality and strong attention to detail
Experience with full lifecycle agile application development in supporting analytic requirement
Ability to manage multiple projects and on-demand business requests simultaneously
","['snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sagemak', 'sql', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econometr', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']",999.0,"['snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sagemak', 'sql', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econometr', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Date Posted
2018-10-22
Various Locations
Job Title
Data Scientist
Job ID
IMGDS18
Data Scientist (IMGDS18): Data Visualization, Natural Language Processing (NLP), Machine Learning (ML), Python, Numpy.
Mail resume with job ID to: HR, 400 Chisholm Place, Suite 414, Plano, TX 75075.
Travel to unanticipated work sites throughout the U.S. Foreign equiv.
accepted.
","['numpi', 'python']","['visual', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'nlp', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['numpi', 'python', 'visual', 'data', 'nlp', 'nlp', 'machine learning']"
DS,"* Work closely with service engineers, warranty analysts and quality assurance engineers to identify required data sources and to implement methodologies to retrieve and use this data.
* Communicate data insights that are easily understandable and concise.
* Remain up-to-date with the latest analytical techniques.
* Align with the IT to ensure data is stored efficiently to facilitate the required analytics.
* Use analytical techniques to find patterns in data, which could be valuable for the business.
* Have strong customer focus in the application of Analytics techniques and digital technologies.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSEDUCATION, CERTIFICATIONS, AND TRAINING:* Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Business Analytics or related experience.
* Prefer Advanced Degree in a relevant study area (e.g.
mathematics, statistics, advanced analytics).SKILLS AND BACKGROUND:* 3 or more years of experience applying statistical analyses and analytical methodologies.
* Experience communicating complex analytical insights in a manner, which is clearly understandable.
* Experience in using programming languages - SQL, SAS, R, Python, MatLab* Balance theoretical knowledge and practical experience in statistical and analytical techniques.
This job is intended to include the current essential functions of the job.
Management reserves the right to add or modify the duties and responsibilities and to designate other functions as essential at any time.Kubota is an equal opportunity at will employer and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of age, race, religion, color, disability, sex, sexual orientation or national origin.Other details* Pay Type Salary* Travel Required Yes* Required Education Bachelor's Degree* Grapevine, TX, USA
","['matlab', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['statist', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['matlab', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'statist', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Position Role/Tile: Data Scientist
6+ months
Educational background in Math, Statistics or Economics.
Must have a strong background in AB testing.
Strong theoretical and applied background in mathematical optimization with a proven track record in computation and algorithm development in linear and nonlinear programming, combinatorial optimization, integer programming, dynamic programming, network flows and algorithms to design optimal or near optimal solution methodologies using statistical and optimization tools such as R to find both exact and heuristic solution strategies for optimization problems
Probability and statistics: Candidate should know basic probability, expectation and conditional expectation, common statistics, exploratory data analysis, linear regression, hypothesis testing.
Additional knowledge of probability is a plus.
Scientific Computing: R, Python
Deep Learning frameworks: Keras, Tensorflow
Data Management Systems
Experience in the financial industry with capital markets or wealth management portfolios is a plus.
Suite #214
Newark, CA 94560
","['tensorflow', 'r', 'kera', 'python']","['probabl', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'ab testing', 'statist', 'econom']",999.0,"['tensorflow', 'r', 'kera', 'python', 'probabl', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'math', 'ab testing', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Position Title: Staff member computation biologist I, II and III orPostdoctoral Fellow (Bioinformatics/Biostatistics/Computer Science)
Duties & Responsibilities: For bioinformatics scientists, the projects include developing novel method for analysis and integration of cancer genomics and other forms of high-dimensional -omics data, and developing prediction models for patients’ clinical outcomes.
For biostatistics scientists, the projects include assembling and statistical analyses of big clinical data.
For computer scientists, the projects including creating databases and websites for management of big biological data.
At UTSW, there are great opportunities for scientists to collaborate with outstanding biomedical investigators and work on exciting research projects.
Position Qualifications: Candidates should have a doctoral or master degree in either one of the following fields, including genetics/genomics, bioinformatics, computer science, biostatistics, computational biology or a related field.
Programming skills in Python, Perl or R is preferred.
Related websites:
QBRC: https://qbrc.swmed.edu/
Application Deadline: until filled
","['r', 'perl', 'python']","['data', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'research', 'statist', 'bioinformat']",2.0,"['r', 'perl', 'python', 'data', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'research', 'statist', 'bioinformat']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 6+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist
Responsibilities include:
Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for a broad range of analytics driven insights including developing and enhancing customer segmentation for sales and marketing, churn forecasting and propensity modeling, marketing mix analysis, customer profitability and lifetime value analysis, propensity to bundle, and response modeling across B2B and B2C domains.
Work with and analyze complex data from various sources.
Manipulate large data sets and navigate a variety of servers, data types, and data structures to complete statistical and other analyses
Develop and scale predictive and descriptive models using advanced statistical, optimization and big data techniques including: multivariate, regression, decision trees/classification and time series forecasting.
Work with stakeholders to understand critical business issues and propose analytics-driven solutions to inform smarter decisions.
Work with IT teams to increase the velocity of insights across the organization; e.g.
by automating algorithmic scoring of accounts.
Drive end to end analytical process: from formulation of requirements, data acquisition, identification of analytical methods, creation/validation of models to business-friendly summarization of results.
Work in complex data environment comprising enterprise data warehouse, several additional databases and 3rd party data sources.
Manipulate large data sets and navigate a variety of servers, data types, and data structures to complete statistical and other analyses.
Use a suite of analytical tools including Python, SAS, & R to build, implement, and regularly monitor the effectiveness of predictive models.
Required Skills/Requirements
Requires at least a Master’s degree in Statistics, Math, Econometrics or related field and five years of experience as Data Scientist, Statistician, Analyst or related position.
Experience must include the following experience and skills:
5 years of experience with the following: working with a broad range of analytical methods including multivariate, time series, classification and machine learning; developing predictive and descriptive models using variety of statistical methods: multivariate analysis, generalized linear models, linear/logistic regression, Bayesian analysis, clustering or survival analysis; marketing/sales analytics or forecasting; statistical analysis tool like R, SAS or SPSS; performing data management, mining, and manipulation along with analytics
3 years of experience with the following: data mining and machine learning methods such as classification and clustering (e.g., bootstrap aggregation, boosting, decision trees, Monte Carlo simulations); creating and deploying statistical/analytical models to drive strategy, segmentation and targeting; translating quantitative results into clear and concise presentations/reports using compelling data visualization techniques;
2 years of experience with the following: time series forecasting of market or consumer trends using hierarchical ARIMA, exponential smoothing, moving average or ensemble models; marketing analytics: Marketing Mix Modeling, attrition/retention modeling, experimental design (A/B testing), sample size calculations tracking and analysis of marketing campaign; working with SQL and relational data models; working with and analyzing complex data from various sources, manipulate large data sets and navigate a variety of servers, data types, and data structures to complete analysis;
1 year of experience with the following: price elasticity models, pricing strategies and price optimization efforts for promotions, product offers, and various marketing programs
Desirable
Familiarity with relational databases, such as Oracle, MS SQL and Server
Knowledge of 3rd party demographic (Claritas) or firmographic (D&B) information sources
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'oracl', 'sa']","['big data', 'predict', 'account', 'time series', 'statist', 'classif', 'data', 'logist', 'visual', 'segment', 'regress', 'cluster', 'optim', 'forecast', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'experimental design', 'math', 'busi', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'econometr']",2.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'oracl', 'sa', 'big data', 'predict', 'account', 'time series', 'statist', 'classif', 'data', 'logist', 'visual', 'segment', 'regress', 'cluster', 'optim', 'forecast', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'experimental design', 'math', 'busi', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'econometr']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"The data scientist will also make technology and business recommendations, as well as develop key insights based on data analysis in both macro- and micro-environments.
data science teams to enhance, scale and operationalize existing models.
Communicate effectively with both technical and nontechnical stakeholders.
use cases.
Conduct and support white-boarding sessions, workshops, design sessions and project meetings as needed, playing a key role in cross-functional business relations.
Develop data science solutions as currently defined by the existing product roadmap.
Prototype algorithms using Python andor other languages with appropriate libraries and frameworks.
Skills and Qualifications 5+ years of experience in data science.
Advanced analytical and quantitative skills to use data and metrics to back up assumptions, evaluate the hypothesis and complete root cause analysis of the business problem.
Deep understanding of supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques.
Hands-on experience working with regression, clustering, support vector machines, neural networks (including CNN and RNN), decision trees and related models.
Experience building recommendation engine models for ecommerce business Knowledge of the full data mining steps from data preparation, modeling, visualization and interpretation.
In-depth knowledge of Python, R, SAS, SPSS, SQL and any analytics platforms (such as Alteryx, KNIME, RapidMiner and Data Robot, etc.)
is strongly desired.
Experience in integrating business analysis with technical solutions that involve advanced analytics solutions, demand forecasting, segmentation, churn prediction, predictive maintenance and route optimization, etc.
Master's degreePh.D.
in a quantitative field (statistics, business analytics, computer science or business administration) with a specific emphasis on statistics, (big) data mining and data science, etc.
has been named to the Dow Jones Sustainability North America Index and ranked among the top 100 Best Corporate Citizens by Corporate Responsibility Magazine in addition to being named to the Bloomberg Gender-Equality Index.
's world-famous recognition culture.Description3
","['rapidmin', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa']","['hypothesi', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'cnn', 'optim', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['rapidmin', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'hypothesi', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'supervis', 'visual', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'segment', 'regress', 'cnn', 'optim', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'nn', 'busi', 'svm', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"One of the world’s leading financial consultative service providers are looking for Data Sceintists to join their team.
Roles & Responsibilities
Identify and process various sources of client/third-party financial data
Analyse sets of data to identify structures, patterns and trends
Use patterns in data to propose solutions and strategies for client problems
Create and present findings to senior management team and other stakeholders, as and when required
Essential Requirements
5+ years of relevant experience (e.g.
Data Scientist, Data Analyst, Statistician, Economist, etc.)
Working knowledge of machine learning algorithms and technologies
A great knowledge and/or experience of business intelligence tools (e.g.
VBA, SQL, Tableau, etc.)
MSc or higher in Data Science, Statistics, Economics or a related field
Experience delivering agile solutions to various small and large clients
Strong problem-solving skills
Excellent attention to detail
Impeccable listening skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Able to create and maintain strong working relationships with both internal and external colleagues and clients
Great planning and organisational skills
A desire for continuous learning and professional improvement
Desirable Skills
Experience working within the financial services (or similar) sector
Knowledge of cloud computing technologies (MS Azure, Amazon AWS, etc.)
A working knowledge of Python programming
Experience providing advisory or consultation services to client
Benefits:
Work from home opportunities
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $50,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['aw', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Integrity in Action: Be True, Be Responsive, Be Accountable
Sense of Urgency: Every Moment Matters
Relentless Discipline: Rigor, Precision and Excellence in Every Single Action
Summary:
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develop, implement and evaluate machine learning and optimization models across multiple platforms to create actionable insights from complex data sets.
Work closely with data engineers to deploy models and systematically track model and data performance.
Understand and clearly communicate model performance to leadership team by translating the complex into the concise and clear
Collaborate with Operations, Marketing, Sales, and IT to utilize model findings to build and test programs that improve customer acquisition and retention efforts
Requirements:
Advanced degree in a quantitative discipline such as Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Econometrics or Undergraduate degree with significant, demonstrative experience in data science
3+ years of demonstrated/hands-on experience required for the following:
Machine Learning and statistical analysis (text mining, sentiment analysis, gradient boosting, random forest, regression, etc.)
Designing and running experiments and extracting insights
Visualization/Dashboarding tools (Experience with Tableau preferred)
Proficiency in Python and relevant libraries
Thorough understanding of SQL
2+ years’ experience working with cloud infrastructure (Azure, AWS, Google Cloud etc.)
Excellent communication skills and the ability to collaborate with business stakeholders on use cases and requirements
","['google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'random forest', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",1.0,"['google cloud', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'cloud', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'random forest', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Work hours can be flexible.
Responsibility
Strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations
Research and devise innovative statistical models for data analysis
Mine and analyze data from databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development
Devise and utilize algorithms and models to mine big data stores, perform data and error analysis to improve models, and clean and validate data for uniformity and accuracy
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with IV.AI, Big Data, and SR teams
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Create ad-hoc data sources on demand to find insights as needed.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Minimum Qualifications
4 year degree in mathematics, data analytics, information systems, computer science or related field
5 years of experience in structuring, validating, analyzing and modeling data sets
2 years of experience with one of the following programming languages: R or Python
Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience
Excellent communication/interpersonal skills
","['r', 'excel', 'python']","['big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['r', 'excel', 'python', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'cleans', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Principal Data Scientist-- Ensemble Algorithms and Architecture
Job Summary
The Data Scientist performs statistical and econometric analysis, AI/Client modeling, and optimization.
The Data Scientist solves use cases related to personalization, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, pricing, and cost.
The Principal Data Scientist will develop expandable and rapidly deployable algorithm and models for use cases such as Next Best Action (NBA).
The position requires expert level skills in neural network and graph theory in building time-sensitive and association-based next best action and next best complete the look product recommendation system.
Modular algorithm and models developed by the Principal Data Scientist can be cascaded to be used for many use cases for various use cases in personalization, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, and pricing optimization.
Job Duties
The position will report to the Director of Data Science and will have a dotted-line leadership responsibility to mentor and train at least three junior- or senior-level data scientists.
Lead data science projects independently while collaborating with team members and multi-organizational stakeholders.
Perform hands-on advanced analysis in personalization, marketing science, retail analytics, business analytics, and supply-chain analytics using big data in cloud environment to improve customer satisfaction and promote growth.
Leverage state-of-the-art data science tools, methodologies, and algorithms to drive improved decisions
Collaborate in the development and implementation of predictive models, segmentation strategies, optimization algorithms, and data mining analyses with a targeted result of increasing revenue.
Research, innovate, and design algorithms and techniques to contribute in optimization and automation.
Job Requirements
At least a quant-based graduate degree such as Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Math, Statistics, Physics, Economics, or other related fields from a reputed university with course work that includes analytics, coding, statistics, math, and algorithm development.
Ph.D. is Preferred
Strong in Math, Statistic, Finance, and Econometric
Expert Level skills in one or many of the followings:
Graph/Network Theory
Personalized Recommendation Engine for Next Best Action and Next Best Choice
5+ years of hands on experience in Data Science.
Experience in processing and performing multi-faceted analysis with on-line browsing, sales transaction, product, and inventory data.
Experience in working in retail space will be a plus.
Experience in developing or enhancing models applying machine learning and neural network algorithms, graph/network theory, statistical analysis, and optimization theories.
Experience in using Keras, Tensorflow, and scikit-learn
Strong coding skills in SQL, Python.
Experience in working with distributed computing i.e.
Hive, Apache Spark
Experience in working on AWS SageMaker, S3, and SnowFlake will be a plus
Knowledge of descriptive analytics and data visualization
Experience with full lifecycle agile and experimental design methods.
Exceptional standards for quality and strong attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple projects and on-demand business requests simultaneously
Able to work in a fast-paced core team environment with team members from diverse areas such as marketing, creative, strategy, and product.
","['kera', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'visual', 'segment', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'financ', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['kera', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'visual', 'segment', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'financ', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The Lead Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions.
The Lead Data Scientist works on problems of diverse scope and complexity ranging from moderate to substantial.
Responsibilities
The Data Science Product Manager/Lead Data Scientist has a strong intuitive grasp of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (AI /ML) as well as core product skills (strategy, roadmaps, prioritization, etc.).
AIIMs help identify and prioritize the highest value applications for machine learning and do what it takes to make them successful.
The AIIM, plans and executes the necessary AI/ML-driven process changes and initiatives necessary to deliver a complete solution to a stated business problem.
Owns key initiatives & deliverables especially in Data Science application development & deployment in cloud-based environments.
Job Duties
Act as an “external facing” business translator whose combined expertise in technology and AI enable the development of custom solutions
Partner with project and product managers to assemble a cross-functional team of data experts, data scientists, and technology experts to design and deliver a solution to meet a business need
Partner with project and product managers to monitor the business impacts of AIM deliverables, implementing changes as/when appropriate, to continuously improve reliability and efficiency
Performs as Analytics community’s ambassador to business stakeholders
Help internal customers think through and clearly articulate business problems/needs and architects data science solutions
Required Qualifications
AI/ML Expertise
Know when it is feasible to build an AI/ML product, AIIM has strong ability to assess the tradeoff between level of effort vs. business value of building a particular AI solution and advises stakeholders accordingly
3+ years expert knowledge of Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning strategy development, business plan implementation and ongoing scale/evolution management
Master degree in a quantitative field (Statistics, Business Analytics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Engineering, Data Science) or equivalent experience
Ability to leverage technology (e.g.
SQL) to extract and manipulate data
Working knowledge and experience in statistical analysis packages Python, R
Ability to build collaborative relationships with stakeholders and diverse, cross-functional teams/organizations to develop appropriate requirements, scope and delivery time frames, driving on-time execution
Strong analytical thinker with the ability to deliver high-quality work in a structured, disciplined and time-conscious manner
Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills
Ability to operate in both strategic and tactical environments, accommodating for global-level needs
Preferred Qualifications
Experience analyzing, designing and implementing large scale business and performance management solutions
Experience with Consumer Analytics
Additional Information
This role is based in Irving Texas
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
","['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist is a player/coach role, in which the successful candidate is not only an individual contributor who applies quantitative, data science and analytical skills to solve complex problems, but also, as appropriate, a team leader who leads ad hoc project teams in the definition, solution, and implementation of data science and machine learning projects.
He/she should be able to work effectively across organizational groups and hierarchies to design, develop, evaluate and execute solutions, with a keen functional understanding of the business problem at hand.
On the technical side, the role is responsible for the full model development life cycle, including data wrangling, data analysis, modeling, including model selection and producing quick applicable modeling solutions, and ongoing performance analysis.More broadly, the successful candidate will serve as a thought leader, including advising on optimal solutions and proposing challenger models.
Deep Learning (neural network) experience is preferred.
* Experience across broad range of modern analytic and data tools, particularly Python/Anaconda and/or R, XGBoost, Tensorflow and/or Keras, Spark, Hive, SQL.
* Excellent problem solving, communications, and teamwork skills.
* Financial service background preferred, but not required
","['kera', 'xgboost', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'neural network', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['kera', 'xgboost', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"You will have the opportunity to work with a small high impact team and bring AI into an industry that has not fully captured the potential of AI.
As dedicated data scientists, you will be working with large datasets that generate within the organization.
These datasets consist of but are not limited to, IoT data, customer interaction data, and ISP network data.
You will be working closely with senior management to understand business requirements and use cases that can be solved using machine learning approaches.
You must work closely with data engineers to collect, process, and transform datasets to be used in statistical and predictive modeling experiments
Propose solutions to identified use cases using predictive modeling.
Design and train machine learning models and generate high accuracy predictions.
Designing and execute experiments iteratively to improve the accuracy of model predictions.
Debug and analyze model performance and provide solutions to improve them.
You will be responsible for analyzing model performance and failure points and proposing/ implementing solutions for each of those points.
Working closely with engineering and product teams to scale prediction models into production and integrate within the existing workflows.
Qualifications
Minimum:
Master’s Degree in a quantitative field (Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Machine Learning etc.)
or relevant experience.
3+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling and data analysis
Experience in analyzing and visualizing big data sets
Experience in building deep learning models
Strong background in python language (and R, C/C++)
Deep understanding of a modern machine learning framework (TensorFlow, PyTorch, scikit learn)
Working knowledge in Linux environments
Preferred:
PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, or Computer Science (Data Science, Machine Learning, AI)
Exposure to industry or academic research (peer review publications)
Experience in cloud computing technologies (GCP, AWS)
Experience in CNNs and RNNs
Experience in deploying ML models to production environments
Working knowledge of computer networking
Experience in analyzing ISP IoT data
","['pytorch', 'linux', 'aw', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'c', 'python', 'gcp', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'cnn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['pytorch', 'linux', 'aw', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'c', 'python', 'gcp', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'cnn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Locations: Washington, DC
People who use data to solve hard problems.
Including ones that did not exist a few years ago.
You are:
More than a data and statistics expert.
You are the applied intelligence expert.
You are confident working on design algorithms and large-scale statistical models.
You want to help your client deliver faster and better services to U.S. citizens and improve people's quality of life where it matters most.
The work:
Work with clients to create questions and define technology opportunities
Drive the exploration of data sources and analytic techniques to create new modeling approaches
Work with large data sets to solve complex problems
Lead and oversee teams to solve clients' solutions
",[None],"['statist', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'data']"
DS,"Responsibility also includes coding, testing, and documentation of new or modified scalable analytic data systems including automation for deployment and monitoring.
This role participates along with team counterparts to architect an end-to-end framework developed on a group of core data technologies.
",[None],['data'],999.0,['data']
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
- Top 10 Companies for Global DiversityNational Association of Female Executives - Top 50 Companies for Female ExecutivesWorking Mother - 100 Best Companies2016 Climate Leadership AwardRequired Technical and Professional Expertise* PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.About IBMIBM's greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Data Science Consultant with healthcare domain expertise, analyze Healthcare claims data leveraging Data Science models to develop new audit Proof of Concept tools visualizing them through Tableau.
Productize these working w/ Tech and non-tech teams.
Expertise in Python, SQL & Tableau and Machine Learning Models.
Updated notes based on HM feedback:
Title : Data Scientist / Product Analyst - Healthcare
5yrs exp
Role: Data Scientist / Product Analyst - Healthcare
Key Duties: With healthcare domain expertise, analyze end-customer Healthcare claims data using Data Science models to identify new audit algorithms and productize it working w/ Tech and non-tech teams communicating the output using Tableau.
Critical skills
Ideal: Data Science + Healthcare claims background
Ok with: Heavy Data Science w/ some Healthcare OR Heavy healthcare w/ BI (strong Tableau) but able to pick up Data Science
Python, SQL, Tableau critical
Desired skills
Tableau certification desired
Tech stack:
ML models being used: Unsupervised (& Supervised) Learning.
CNN (Neural Networks) nice to have
Data Science stack being used: SciKit, keras;
Data Robots - > desired.
Desired: Big Data tech (Hadoop, Teradata, Spark)
Salary: $75-$106k
100% remote role
No H1
—
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $105,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Robots: 1 year (Preferred)
claims: 1 year (Preferred)
Python: 1 year (Preferred)
Claims Processing: 1 year (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Scientist: 5 years (Preferred)
Healthcare: 4 years (Preferred)
Scikit: 1 year (Preferred)
Tableau: 1 year (Preferred)
KERAS: 1 year (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Fully Remote
","['kera', 'spark', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit']","['big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'cnn', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'cnn', 'supervis', 'nn', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Hello,
Hope you are doing great!
If you are comfortable with the requirement, kindly respond with below information and your updated resume( word format ) ASAP
Full Name:
Contact No Primary( Not Google Number ):
Email:
Skype ID:
Work Authorization:
Availability( Any notice period required to join in project ):
Currently working(Yes/No):
LinkedIn( if you have):
Hourly Pay Rate: $53/hr on W2( without benefits ) or $60/hr on 1099
Please check the below requirement
Position: Data Engineer – 100% Remote
Duration: 12+ Months Contract( Long term )
Total Positions: 2
Need Healthcare claims exp
185747--Data Engineer- 100% remote
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Build and maintain large-scale batch and real-time ETL pipelines in a Google Cloud Platform architecture (BigQuery, Dataproc, Firestore, etc.).
Design and support Data Lakes and Marts in Google CloudStorage, BigQuery, and NoSQL (Google Firestore & MongoDB).
Implement high-quality test-driven code, ?participate in code reviews, and own the development of medium-size features.
Collaborate with data scientists and business analysts to enable self-service analytics and reporting.
Support Production systems off hours.
POSITION REQUIREMENTS
Experience:
2+ years of industry experience in software development or data engineering.
2+ years extracting insights from data.
1+ years hands-on experience manipulating data and building data pipelines.
Hands-on experience with relational and NOSQL databases.
Strong appreciation for test-driven development and developing code standards.
Competencies:
Strong understanding of Python or Scala.
Understanding of workflow orchestrators (ex.
Airflow, Oozie, or Azkaban).
Understanding of test-driven development techniques.
Ability to proactively communicate and collaborate across a growing distributed team.
Quality Control:
Help define and manage overall data quality objectives.
Implement high-quality source code that passes tests.
Achieve and maintain team defined quality thresholds that mitigate solution risks.
Thanks and Regards
Direct Number: 972.777.9484 | M: 315.969.9307
433 E Las Colinas Blvd, # 1240, Irving, TX 75039 USA
http://www.kairostech.com
LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/prasadmamidela
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $130,044.00 - $184,087.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Total IT: 8 years (Required)
NoSQL: 1 year (Required)
Data Engineering: 3 years (Required)
Manipulating data and building data pipelines: 2 years (Required)
Python: 1 year (Preferred)
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Fully Remote
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['nosql', 'scala', 'bigqueri', 'airflow', 'mongodb', 'python', 'google cloud', 'cloud']","['risk', 'healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'etl', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['nosql', 'scala', 'bigqueri', 'airflow', 'mongodb', 'python', 'google cloud', 'cloud', 'risk', 'healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'etl', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Principal Data ScientistFoundational Algorithm CRM Email
Job Summary
A Principal Data Scientist in Neiman Marcus Group (NMG) enhances customers' magical luxury shopping experience and increases NMG's NPV by applying algorithms.
The Data Scientist performs statistical and econometric analysis, AI/Client modeling, and optimization.
The Data Scientist solves use cases related to personalization, marketing promotions, merchandise planning, supply chain, pricing, and cost.
This position will lead data science needs across all Neiman Marcus Group brands, divisions and selling channels.
A major job responsibility for this position is to develop foundational and core machine learning and recommendation engine algorithms for specific uses cases such as CRM based personalized editorial & promo email campaigns.
This Principal Data Scientist will be the key subject matter expert in Data Science and analytics working closely with an agile core team consisting of experts in marketing, portfolio strategy, creative, and product by meeting a fast-paced delivery schedule.
Job Duties
The position will report to the Director of Data Science and will have a dotted-line responsibility to lead, mentor, and train at least three junior- and senior-level data scientists.
Collaborate with cross-organization to ideate and prioritize use cases, business problems, and user stories that can enhance customers experience and increase NMG ROI.
Lead data science projects independently while collaborating with team members and multi-organizational stakeholders.
Perform hands-on advanced analysis in personalization, marketing science, retail analytics, business analytics, and supply-chain analytics using big data in cloud environment to improve customer satisfaction and promote growth.
Leverage state-of-the-art data science tools, methodologies, and algorithms to drive improved decisions
Collaborate in the development and implementation of predictive models, segmentation strategies, optimization algorithms, and data mining analyses with a targeted result of increasing revenue.
Research, innovate, and design algorithms and techniques to contribute in optimization and automation.
Job Requirements
At least a quant-based graduate degree such as Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Math, Statistics, Physics, Economics, or other related fields from a reputed university with course work that includes analytics, coding, statistics, math, and algorithm development.
Ph.D. is Preferred
Strong in Math, Statistic, Finance, and Econometric
Expert Level skills in one or many of the followings:
Graph/Network Theory
Personalized Recommendation Engine for Next Best Action and Next Best Choice
5+ years of hands on experience in Data Science.
Experience in processing and performing multi-faceted analysis with on-line browsing, sales transaction, product, and inventory data.
Experience in working in retail space will be a plus.
Experience in developing or enhancing models applying machine learning and neural network algorithms, graph/network theory, statistical analysis, and optimization theories.
Experience in using Keras, Tensorflow, and scikit-learn
Strong coding skills in SQL, Python.
Experience in working with distributed computing i.e.
Hive, Apache Spark
Experience in working on AWS SageMaker, S3, and SnowFlake will be a plus
Knowledge of descriptive analytics and data visualization
Experience with full lifecycle agile and experimental design methods.
Exceptional standards for quality and strong attention to detail
Ability to manage multiple projects and on-demand business requests simultaneously
Able to work in a fast-paced core team environment with team members from diverse areas such as marketing, creative, strategy, and product.
","['kera', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'visual', 'segment', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'financ', 'neural network', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['kera', 'snowflak', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'python', 'hive', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'predict', 'statist', 'data', 'visual', 'segment', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'financ', 'nn', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"Data Scientist/Machine Learning
Mist is the new global standard for many fortune 500 companies.
The mission of the Data Science team at Mist is to leverage state-of-art ML and AI technologies to build the next-generation self-driving network solution, which can take actions on behalf of or together with human experts to automatically monitor, detect and remediate common network issues.
The team includes a group of experienced and talented data scientists and data science engineers, and builds the end-to-end data analytics infrastructure and ML models of the product.
As a data scientist, you will collaborate with product managers and domain experts to identify use-impacting real customer problems, use your deep DS/ML knowledge to develop data-driven solution with terabytes data, and work closely with data engineers to implement and scale the models in production.
Qualifications/Requirements:
• MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent fields with strong mathematical background
• Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including clustering, anomaly detection, optimization, neural network etc
• 3+ years experiences building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation
• Strong hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and developing machine learning models
• Familiar with one or more machine learning or statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn, MLlib, Tensorflow
• Good team worker with excellent communication skills written, verbal and presentation
Desired Experience:
• Experience with AWS, S3, Flink, Spark, Kafka, ElasticSearch
• Knowledge and experience with NLP technology
• Previous work in a start-up environment
www.dhs.gov/E-Verify
","['python', 'kafka', 'spark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'mllib', 'elasticsearch', 'scikitlearn', 'aw', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'neural network', 'math', 'anomali', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'kafka', 'spark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 's3', 'mllib', 'elasticsearch', 'scikitlearn', 'aw', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'nn', 'math', 'anomali', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Job summary
Join a small, highly skilled data science team using state of the art machine learning and data analysis to improve Wi-Fi networking.
The data is huge in scale, encompassing measurements from millions of users worldwide at time granularity of seconds.
And, your work will improve the performance of consumer products that your friends are buying!
Responsibilities
Utilize machine learning techniques to develop
Predictive models of network parameters such as load and interference
Networking anomaly detection
Client behavior classification
Predicting customer satisfaction and behaviors
Deriving estimates of load, capacity, link rates, etc.
from noisy raw measurements
Specifying tools and data pipelines to enable data analysis and machine learning
Qualifications (Must)
Bachelor's degree or higher in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, or Statistics
At least three years of experience applying data science to networking or wireless communications is required for this position.
This could be work experience, or experience while performing research in a Ph.D. academic program.
Strong ability in Python, SQL, or Scala, good coding skills
Experience working with large databases, high volume data
Familiarity with concepts from statistics
Experience with and fundamental understanding of machine learning techniques
Experience Desired
Experience estimating processing and communications requirements for various data pipelines/learning systems
Experience with a range of data analysis techniques: linear regression, random forest, clustering, factor analysis, NLP techniques, supervised and unsupervised learning,, graph algorithms, etc.
Knowledge of networking protocols such as UDP/TCP behaviors,
Understanding of wireless parameters such as RSSI, MIMO, OFDMA, etc.
","['sql', 'scala', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'anomali', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['sql', 'scala', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'anomali', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Data Scientist
A successful candidate has deep technical expertise in applying AI/ML technologies in security applications and/or adjacent domains, ideally has been through the entire lifecycle of an award winning security product, and must be passionate about cloud security.
You will have the opportunity to work with a team of talented engineers, researchers and data scientists to solve the most challenging cloud security problems.
Responsibilities:
Define scalable data acquisition and labeling strategy for specific use cases;
Work with data engineers to retrieve, clean and normalize data.
Ensure scalable and continuous high-quality data stream;
Work closely with threat research and development team in feature engineering.
Make sure high-quality feature sets are chosen in a systematic way;
Select ML models for defined use cases.
Implement KPIs to ensure optimal algorithms and results;
Conduct strict internal testing to ensure high efficacy, low false positive and false negative rate;
Interpret results and communicate findings;
Document use case, data acquisition, feature engineering, training, validation, deployment, future improvement opportunity and other important aspects;
Work closely with development and QE team in productization;
Promote AI/ML wherever applicable, beyond security use cases;
Qualifications/Requirements:
First of all, must have true startup spirit.
Be willing to wear multiple hats and deliver end-to-end;
Ability of thinking out-of-box and evaluating results based on customer value;
5+ years of industry experience in applying AI/ML, preferably on well-known security products or services, such as malware detection, anomaly detection, security analytics and data security;
Experience of applying AI/ML in more than one domains highly desirable;
Hands-on experience with relevant technology stacks such as CUDA, Python, R, Spark, Flink, Tensorflow;
Hands-on experience using modern big data pipeline;
Natural language process (NLP) and data mining experience highly desirable;
Security research experience and strong security domain knowledge highly desirable;
Energetic self-starter, with the desire to work in a dynamic fast-paced environment;
Excellent verbal and written communication skills;
Ability to influence without authority
Education:
PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Electrical Engineering or equivalent technical degree.
#LI-NW1
","['spark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'kpi', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'kpi', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Position Title: Principal Data Scientist
Duration: Full time
Work with large scale dataset which includes transactional, click-stream, and telematics data;
Help build econometric models to drive operational excellence;
Partner with cross-functional teams to execute product roadmap and ensure data is always a forethought in decision-making;
Work with Data Engineers in building and maintaining near real-time data pipeline and machine learning infrastructure;
Establish and maintain data dictionary;
Own data quality controls and metrics;
Build and mentor a team of awesome data scientists.
Have 5+ years of programming experience (Python preferred);
Have 3+ years of experience in developing models and productionizing it;
Have 3+ years of experience in machine learning infrastructure and AWS data stack;
Are an expert in statistical programming language (eg.
Pandas, MATLAB, R);
Have proficiency in visualization tools (eg.
matplotlib, ggplot2, Tableau);
Have worked on A/B testing, funnel optimization, cohort analysis, and user profiling;
Can split the time between data science and data engineering;
Have Bachelor's Degree (or higher) in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Economics, or similar domain.
Nice to have:
Recent experience working in a startup;
Worked on telematics dataset.
","['excel', 'ggplot2', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'aw']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econometr', 'optim', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'ggplot2', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'aw', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econometr', 'optim', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'pipelin']"
DS,"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation.
The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches.
www.c3.ai
In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions.
Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application.
You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.
Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer.
","['mapreduc', 'scala', 'github', 'excel', 'python', 'javascript', 'java']","['probabl', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'scala', 'github', 'excel', 'python', 'javascript', 'java', 'probabl', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'supervis', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun']"
DS,"The Engineering & Sciences (E&S) organization pushes the boundaries of innovation, redefines engineering capabilities, and drives advances in various sciences.
Join a program that has been around for 16 years and under contract to go at least another 9 years.
The team is currently completely revamping the architecture and bringing it up to date utilizing modern constructs and tools.
Daily you will face complex technical problems involving telecommunications, network engineering, and large data sets requiring strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Solving complex technical problems, including the ability to conduct independent research and develop prototype analytical algorithms is needed.
You will be analyzing performance of modern internet applications such as streaming video, VoIP or other internet transmission protocols and providing recommendations for system performance improvements.
New areas of interest include Model Based System Engineering, Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence.
A current active Top Secret Clearance is required.
Applicants without a clearance may be considered with the understanding that employment will not begin until a TS/SCI clearance is obtained.
CIMS
Qualifications:
Basic Qualifications: Systems Engineer
Bachelor's Degree in a STEM discipline (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math) with 4 years relevant work experience; or a Master's degree in a STEM discipline with 2 years relevant work experience; or a PhD in a STEM discipline with 0 years' experience.
Knowledgeable with at least one software or scripting language (C, C++, PERL, Python, Java, etc.
), Python preferred.
Preferred Qualifications:
Current Top Secret/SCI clearance with CI poly.
Experience developing software solutions on the Unix OS platform.
Experience working with Big Data.
Experience developing and executing test plans.
Graduate Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics.
Knowledge of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence.
Background in a telecommunications and/or network management.
Experience with software and hardware interface development.
Experience with system software development/configuration/ management.
Software integration experience.
Understanding network performance profiling and optimization.
Experience developing software solutions on the Unix OS platform.
Experience utilizing Data analytics tools.
Experience working with Big Data.
Understanding of IP protocols
Your benefits will include the following:
Health Plan
Savings Plan
Paid Time Off
Education Assistance
Training and Development
Flexible Work Arrangements
https://benefits.northropgrumman.com/us/en2/BenefitsOverview/Pages/default.aspx
U.S.
Citizenship is required for most positions.
","['unix', 'python', 'perl', 'c', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['unix', 'python', 'perl', 'c', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
DS,"This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.
Skills and Experience:
Requirements
Masters or PhD in in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Physics, or related field preferred.
5+ years of relevant experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Expertise in extracting insights from real-world structured and unstructured datasets.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
Strong communication skills
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.
","['sql', 'scala', 'python']","['statist', 'commun', 'data', 'visual']",2.0,"['sql', 'scala', 'python', 'statist', 'commun', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"The Engineering & Sciences (E&S) organization pushes the boundaries of innovation, redefines engineering capabilities, and drives advances in various sciences.
Come join a team of highly skilled engineers who have a great collaborative spirit towards a common goal.
The team is currently completely revamping the architecture and bringing it up to date utilizing modern constructs and tools.
Daily you will face complex technical problems involving telecommunications, network engineering, and large data sets requiring strong statistical and data visualization skills.
Solving complex technical problems, including the ability to conduct independent research and develop prototype analytical algorithms is needed.
You will be analyzing performance of modern internet applications such as streaming video, VoIP or other internet transmission protocols and providing recommendations for system performance improvements.
New areas of interest include Model Based System Engineering, Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence.
A current active DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance with the ability to obtain and maintain a Single Scope Polygraph is required.
Applicants without a Single Scope Polygraph Clearance may be considered with the understanding that employment will not begin until a Single Scope Polygraph Clearance is obtained.
This requisition may be filled at a higher grade based on qualifications listed below
#LI-M-105
Qualifications:
Basic Qualifications for a Principal Data Scientist:
Bachelor's Degree with a STEM discipline (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math) with 5 years of relevant work experience, or Master's Degree with 3 years of relevant work experience, or a PhD with 0 years relevant work experience.
Relevant work experience in software test or development using Python, Java, or C/C++
Familiarity with Linux development environment
A current active DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance with the ability to obtain and maintain a Single Scope Polygraph by start date.
Basic Qualifications for a Sr.
Principal Data Scientist:
Bachelor's Degree with a STEM discipline (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math) with 9 years of relevant work experience, or Master's Degree with 7 years of relevant work experience, or a PhD with 4 years relevant work experience.
Relevant work experience in software test or development using Python, Java, or C/C++
Familiarity with Linux development environment
A current active DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance with the ability to obtain and maintain a Single Scope Polygraph by start date.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience developing software solutions on the Unix OS platform.
Experience working with Big Data.
Experience developing and executing test plans.
Graduate Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics.
Knowledge of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence.
Background in a telecommunications and/or network management.
Experience with software and hardware interface development.
Experience with system software development/configuration/ management.
Software integration experience.
Understanding network performance profiling and optimization.
Experience developing software solutions on the Unix OS platform.
Experience utilizing Data analytics tools.
Experience working with Big Data.
Understanding of IP protocols
Your benefits will include the following:
Health Plan
Savings Plan
Paid Time Off
Education Assistance
Training and Development
Flexible Work Arrangements
https://benefits.northropgrumman.com/us/en2/BenefitsOverview/Pages/default.aspx
","['unix', 'linux', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
DS,"In this data science role, you will:
The Planner Team is responsible for ""motion planning"" for the self driving car.
This includes gracefully handling many complex situations involving social interactions (merging, negotiating narrow roads, etc), while dealing with a noisy and uncertain environment.
Evaluation of this onboard decision-making system is a complex, open-ended problem with tremendous potential impact.
Additionally:
Analysis and improvement of existing data sources and metrics
Development of novel approaches to measuring and improving
Self-driving performance (either generally, or for motion planning specifically)
Collaborate with engineers and other data scientists to evaluate and improve core
PhD in statistics, math, or other quantitative area
Progressive statistics background either in academia or industry
Data science and system evaluation experience
Willingness to understand a complex system and its various components
Experience with tools for manipulating big data
Experience with R/Python and statistical libraries
It's preferred if you have experience in:
Experience with C++
Familiarity with Spark/MapReduce
Training or interest in geometry or classical physics
","['mapreduc', 'r', 'spark', 'python']","['statist', 'data', 'big data']",3.0,"['mapreduc', 'r', 'spark', 'python', 'statist', 'data', 'big data']"
DS,"Qualifications
Computer Science
Engineering
Physics
Statistics
You must have experience with / in:
Bayesian Networks
Probabilistic Modeling
Machine Learning Algorithms:
Training
Tuning
Optimization
R, Python, Statistics or Machine Learning Tools
Java or C/C++
NoSQL Databases
Relational Databases
This position will be located in sunny San Jose CA.
When Work Works, recognizes employers that excel at offering a variety of employee initiatives such as work-life fit policies, flexible scheduling and transition to parenthood programs.
Work Authorization/Security Clearance:
This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR §§ 60-1.4(a), 60-300.5(a) and 60-741.5(a).
Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disability.
Candidates will be required to pass a background check.
Per government contract requirements, candidates for these positions must be a citizen of the United States or an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence.
Reports to Technical Director
Job summary
Design and or innovate new idea and technologies
Programming and research
Confirms product performance by designing and conducting tests
Extensive regular contact with assigned project clients
Participating in client/contractor meetings and resolving client/engineering and management project issues
Creating system and software architectures
Developing, testing, and deploying software
Large-scale Software Systems Integration and test
Building commercial products
Conduction research and development
Providing customized consulting services
Application of systems analysis techniques and procedures
Determine hardware, software or system functional specifications
Assist in achieving project goals
Work with multiple projects
Interface with various departments
Other jobs as assigned by supervisor
Abilities Required
Self-starter, able to drive projects to completion in circumstances where little guidance and support is available
Knowledge of Microsoft Office
Must play well with others
Status
Full-time
Exempt
","['nosql', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['tune', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",999.0,"['nosql', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'tune', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"The Opportunity
You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.
Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques.
More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects.
You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week.
Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be crucial.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Skills and Experience
M.S.
in Operations Research, Machine Learning, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
2+ years of experience in Data Science or Machine Learning.
Ph.D. experience accepted
Elite ability in : Linear Algebra, Hypothesis Testing, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus, Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regressions (Linear, GLM), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments preferred
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience preferred but optional
Knowledge of common data structures and ability to write efficient code in Python
Agile experience preferred
Palo Alto, CA
",['python'],"['regress', 'hypothesi', 'deep learning', 'glm', 'sequenc', 'data', 'causal', 'machine learning', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'cnn', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'econom']",2.0,"['python', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'deep learning', 'glm', 'sequenc', 'data', 'causal', 'machine learning', 'random forest', 'dimensionality reduction', 'cnn', 'optim', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'econom']"
DS,"Job Title: Software Engineer (Data Scientist, C,C++,Linux) - 189288
Job Category: R&D SW Engineering
In this role you will be responsible for analyzing modeling data (experimental and synthetic/simulated) and coming up with novel ways to organize it, while deriving meaningful operations and extracting maximum information from this data.
You will also be expected to develop supporting software that will be properly integrated in the modeling suite of tools that are used specifically in modeling of semiconductor manufacturing.
You will be teaming up with a group of senior software engineers contributing to final production-level quality of new components and algorithms and to support existing components.
This is a unique role that will challenge you and allow you to grow in interdisciplinary areas of software engineering and data analysis.
Knowledge and experience in the area of data science/data analysis is preferred.
Some familiarity with physical modeling of any discipline (e.g.
from fields in electrical or mechanical engineering) will be very useful for the suitable candidate.
Job
Qualifications:
The successful candidate will possess the following
combination of education and experience:
BS or
MS in Data Sciences, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics or
Applied Mathematics.
Working
knowledge in development of C and C++ on UNIX and/or LINUX platforms.
Excellent
programming skills in at least one mainstream scripting language, preferably
Python.
Experience/knowledge
in data analysis.
Experience/knowledge
in machine learning technology.
Experience
with Python, Keras and Tensorflow.
Demonstrated
ability to learn and explore new technologies.
Excellent
analysis and problem-solving skills.
Must
have the ability to collaborate closely with other members of the team and
develop critical components consistently and in a timely manner.
Experience
with MATLAB/R or equivalent mathematical package is expected.
This position may require access to export-controlled technology.
#LI-MGRP
#LI-JE1
Organization: Digital Industries
Experience Level: Recent College Graduate
Job Type: Full-time
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Siemens is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, citizenship status, ancestry, sex, age, physical or mental disability unrelated to ability, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity, transgender, sex stereotyping, order of protection status, protected veteran or military status, or an unfavorable discharge from military service, and other categories protected by federal, state or local law.
EEO is the Law
To learn more, Click here.
Pay Transparency Non-Discrimination Provision
Siemens follows Executive Order 11246, including the Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision.
To learn more, Click here.
California Privacy Notice
California residents have the right to receive additional notices about their personal information.
To learn more, click here.
","['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'c']","['machine learning', 'data']",1.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'linux', 'excel', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"The next big thing in data is you!
As a Data Scientist, you will be responsible for utilizing disparate data sources in novel ways, with the aim of generating actionable insights.
The insights can create new offerings or improve the product reliability and performance and the efficiency of existing processes.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Implement the applicable Machine Learning or statistics-based algorithm for prediction and optimization and deliver the trained model to production
Design, build and support algorithms of data transformation, conversion, computation on Hadoop and other distributed Big Data Systems
Work closely with key business stakeholders.
Communicate key analytic findings within the business and to senior stakeholders.
Research, explore, and enable new quantitative techniques and technologies in data science.
Drive thought leadership and embrace emerging industry innovation.
The future.
It’s on you.
Today’s exceptional data challenges require your exceptional skills.
For more information click here.
Este empleador participa in E-Verify.
#LI-AD1
",['hadoop'],"['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['hadoop', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Imagine an air taxi that takes off vertically, then quietly and quickly carries you over the congestion below, giving you back that time you’d otherwise spend sitting in traffic.
Technology has advanced to the point where designing and operating an all-electric aircraft is completely viable.
About the Job
Working as a Data Scientist you will be responsible for developing analytical tools and reporting results from numerous tests and flight operations centered around the powertrain.
You should be able to work cohesively inside of an engineering team, understand both data systems and physical systems, and have an eye for anomalies in physical test data.
You will also need to work closely with your colleagues across a broad set of highly technical disciplines who depend on data.
The ideal candidate is energetic, has a positive attitude, is flexible and excited about learning and using new technologies.
Responsibilities:
Wrangle data from a multitude of formats and systems (TDMS, AVRO, PostgreSQL, AWS, etc).
Make sense of and “clean” data from a number of physical tests (the aircraft, reliability test equipment, subsystem tests, etc.).
Work closely with engineers to understand the test and clearly present on the results.
Work with the data engineering team to develop and maintain efficient data pipelines.
Develop tools to make processing and reporting on data as consistent and easy as possible.
Leverage statistics, numerical fitting methods, and a fundamental knowledge of powertrain systems to draw conclusions.
Required:
University degree in computer science, engineering, physics, or similar field.
Expert knowledge of python and data libraries (pandas, scipy, etc.).
Experience with data system architectures in relation to how to store, fetch, and manipulate data (SQL, custom APIs, etc).
Experience with data visualization tools (matplotlib, bokeh, plotly, etc.).
Experience with physical systems and an intuition around powertrain components and data.
Excellent communication skills.
Ability to support and work closely with a myriad of colleagues who are experts in aircraft design, systems engineering, test engineering, flight test operations, and machine learning.
Desired
Experience with Spark or other big data tools is a big plus.
Experience with anomaly detection.
Experience with streaming architectures (Kafka, Kinesis, etc.).
Experience with machine learning techniques and methodologies.
","['postgresql', 'python', 'kafka', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'scipi', 'aw']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'clean', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['postgresql', 'python', 'kafka', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'scipi', 'aw', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'clean', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job summary
Join a small, highly skilled data science team using state of the art machine learning and data analysis to improve networking security.
The data is huge in scale, encompassing measurements from millions of users worldwide at time granularity of seconds.
And, your work will improve the security of consumer products that your friends are buying!
Responsibilities
Utilize data science and machine learning techniques to:
Analyze and gain insights from emerging cyber attacks
Detect networking anomalies
Classify client behaviors
Develop signatures and cyber attack countermeasures
Perform data analysis and create dashboards to represent the security state of networks
Specify tools and data pipelines to enable real time processing and offline processing
Work with engineering teams to build scalable solutions deployable across millions of homes
Qualifications (Must)
Bachelor's degree or higher in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Data Science, or Statistics
At least three years experience applying data science to cyber security is required for this position.
This could be work experience, or experience while performing research in a Ph.D. academic program.
Strong ability in Python, Scala, or Java, good coding skills
Experience working with large databases, high volume data
Experience with and fundamental understanding of machine learning techniques
Experience Desired
Understanding of computer network & security protocols, cryptography, secure protocols
Real time algorithm development and implementation (responding to changing inputs in seconds)
Experience estimating processing and communications requirements for various data pipelines/learning systems
Familiarity with concepts from statistics
Experience with a range of data analysis techniques: linear regression, random forest, clustering, NLP techniques, supervised and unsupervised learning, graph algorithms, etc.
","['java', 'scala', 'python']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'anomali', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['java', 'scala', 'python', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'anomali', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Requisition ID: 255385Work Area: Software-ResearchExpected Travel: 0 - 10%Career Status: ProfessionalEmployment Type: Regular Full TimeCareer Level: T2Posting Date : 6/10/2020COMPANY DESCRIPTIONSAP started in 1972 as a team of five colleagues with a desire to do something new.
Together, they changed enterprise software and reinvented how business was done.
Integrate or implement data mining/ mathematical methods into products.
Evaluate and test data mining methods and maintains a high level of quality.
Work with the senior data scientist to prototype new innovations and eventually get them into the product.
Contribute to data definitions, data storage infrastructure for data mining purposes and to Data Mining architectures.
Resolve data mining performance issues and monitor data mining system performance and implements efficiency improvements.
Implement data mining algorithms if required.
Work with product management, application developers, information developers and end users.
Performs functional and empirical analysis on data mining topics.
Conduct research on data mining tools and algorithms, implement prototypes and data mining algorithms and validates them on real data.
Contribute to best practices for data mining topics and collaborate with development, universities and research institutes.
5% travel required.Education and Qualifications/Skills and Competencies:Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or a related field and 5 year of experience required.
Requests for reasonable accommodation will be considered on a case-by-case basis.EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability:Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability.Additional Locations :
",[None],"['data mining', 'data', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['data mining', 'data', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Note:
Provide full legal first Name/Family Name
DO: Capitalize first letter of First and Last Name.
Example: John Smith
DON'T: Capitalize entire First and/or Last Name.
Example: JOHN SMITH
NOTE: Use correct grammar for Names with multiple cases.
Example: McDonald or O'Connell
Provide full address details
Resume is required
Multiple attachments can be uploaded including Resume and Cover Letter for each application
• Design, develop and implement advanced predictive models using advanced machine learning techniques inlcluding neural network, and tree-based models .
• Collaborate with other data scientists and engineers to formulate innovative solutions to experiment and implement advanced data mining techniques
• Being able to work with large volumes of data; including extracting and analyzing big data using high-level languages such as Python, SQL, Pig, Hive, R.
• Communicate complex concepts and the results of the analyses in a clear and effective manner through creative visualization
• Design, develop and implement advanced predictive models using advanced machine learning techniques inlcluding neural network, and tree-based models .
• Collaborate with other data scientists and engineers to formulate innovative solutions to experiment and implement advanced data mining techniques
• Being able to work with large volumes of data; including extracting and analyzing big data using high-level languages such as Python, SQL, Pig, Hive, R.
• Communicate complex concepts and the results of the analyses in a clear and effective manner through creative visualization
Qualification:
· Advanced degree (MS or PhD) in science or engineering field.
Level will be determined based on experience.
· Expertise in developing neural network and tree-based models required.
· Machine learning experience in Python, Java, R, Scala and/or other Big Data techniques.
· Ability to deal with a large amount of data and fluency with SQL or SQL-like tools
· Strong problem solving and clear communication skills
· Passion in working on big data and professional experience in machine learning, statistical analysis, predictive modeling, and data manipulation
· Experience in developing recurrent neural network and Convolutional neural network is a strong plus
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
San Jose, California, United States of America
Additional Locations:
","['scala', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'java']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'convolut', 'predict', 'account', 'neural network', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'recurr', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['scala', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'java', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'convolut', 'predict', 'account', 'nn', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'recurr', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists.
Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['etl', 'data', 'econom', 'econometr', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'etl', 'data', 'econom', 'econometr', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"JOB QUALIFICATIONS
KNOWLEDGE REQUIREMENTS
?
Advanced Statistics, operations research/ management, mathematics or business analytics with experience, courses, or project work in an analytic methods such as linear, mixed linear, constraint programming, modeling, simulation, time series analysis, pattern recognition, queuing theory, multivariate analysis, and other various predictive analytics techniques
?
Strong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work effectively in teams and under pressure.
Multi-lingual capability is a plus.
?
Ability to draw conclusions from data and prescribe actionable and measurable activities.
?
Highly motivated and creative, thinking ""out of the box"".
?
Familiarity with non-relational data frameworks (aka NoSQL, eg.
Hive).
?
Experience with Apache Pig, Spark systems.
?
Strong team mentality, interpersonal and communications skills
?
Preferred working directly with management and executives
","['nosql', 'hive', 'pig', 'spark']","['data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['nosql', 'hive', 'pig', 'spark', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"As a critical member of the Product Insights team, this data scientist will have the unique opportunity to influence decision making of the product roadmap with their insights
To be successful in this role:
You would have to strike a balance between strategic thinking and actual hands-on analyses using tools & packages such as SQL, R, Python, Tableau etc.
You possess super strong technical skills to turn big data in Hadoop into actionable insights by using product analytics skills and machine learning skills, e.g.
NLP, image detection, etc;
At the same time, you also have the ability to think about the big picture and connect the dots to evaluate how the insights impact eBays ecosystem.
In addition to delivering insights on existing Product & Tech initiatives, you will come up with innovative product growth opportunities based on insights and create momentum through influence.
Proactive collaboration and effective communication are critical
Additionally, the following background and experience is preferred:
Ability to present complex analyses and insights effectively in simple terms
Good experience with both descriptive and inferential statistics ability to build basic prototype models
Strong quantitative background with bachelors degree in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related.
Masters degree is a plus.
Experience with site experimentation (A/B testing) is a plus
Familiar with ecommerce product experience is a plus
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
","['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'math', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'math', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'econom']"
DS,"Palo Alto, California
Data Scientist
There is still a lot of paper involved, purchasing a policy can take days or even weeks, and the coverage is so complex that it’s hard for entrepreneurs to understand what they are buying.
You will be joining a small, nimble team of 5+ scientists, with lots of room for growth and impact.
Responsibilities:
Iterate and pivot quickly to deliver MVP solutions.
Design quick experiments to maximize learning.
Understand the data and dig deep to extract actionable insights.
Think creatively and outside the box to answer desired experimental questions.
Desired Skills and Experience:
4+ years of hands-on experience in data mining, machine learning, and/or statistical analysis.
MS/Ph.D.
in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math, or related areas from a top university.
Experience in writing both agile exploratory analyses as well as production-level code in a fast-paced environment.
Ability to communicate the results of analyses clearly and effectively.
Fluency with an analytical programming language (preferably python) and the standard numerical packages.
Fluency with data extraction/manipulation tools (preferably SQL and pandas).
Upload
","['panda', 'sql', 'python']","['data mining', 'data', 'exploratori', 'math', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['panda', 'sql', 'python', 'data mining', 'data', 'exploratori', 'math', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Responsibilities·
Analyze large datasets to glean actionable insights and identify emerging opportunities·
Create metrics to measure the success of products, services, and features.·
Use data mining and machine learning skills to design and develop products which drive engagement, growth, retention, and monetization.·
Develop and deploy scalable classification, regression, ranking, and optimization algorithms.·
Work with data engineers and other stakeholders in data products pipeline to enable automation of the data-driven products.·
Communicate both routine and ad-hoc data analysis results in a clear, insightful and actionable way.
Minimum Qualifications ·
BA/BS in Statistics, Computer Science, Math or other related technical fields.·
2+ years prior research, data science, or engineering experience in building and implementing recommender systems, machine learning models/algorithms, etc.·
Excellent programming skills - ability to prototype effective simple or complex algorithms and collaborate with engineering team to implement them in the production system·
Familiarity with or willingness to learn large-scale distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Hive, etc.)
Preferred Qualifications ·
PhD or MSc degrees in Statistics, Computer Science, Math or other related technical field.
·
Proficient in R or Python.
·
Familiar with or have contributed to open source machine learning tools/platforms.·
First author publications in top-tier conferences or journals.
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Job #: 1075054
Please send all resumes to ekingery@apexsystems.com for further consideration.
Title: Data Scientist
Duration: 6 month contract
You will be responsible to use cutting-edge machine learning, data mining, and optimization techniques to design and prototype robust, scalable predictive models and analytics solutions.
You will be a part of a cross-functional team of scientists, engineers, product managers, and business professionals that sit at the intersection of data science, big data, IT infrastructure, and business operations.
Responsibilities:
Perform hands-on data exploration, processing, and analysis on massive data sets.
Pull data from warehouse, perform feature engineering, back-test models, compare model performances and communicate the results to stakeholders.
Research and develop state-of-the-art algorithms that address complex business problems.
Minimum Qualifications:
Technical expertise in data mining, machine learning, and statistical analysis.
Proficient in machine learning and data mining packages in Python.
Experience working with large data sets and distributed computing tools (Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, or Spark).
Programming skills in one of the following languages: SQL, Java, or JavaScript on a UNIX or Linux platform.
Advanced degree (Master or PhD) in any STEM field plus two years of related experience.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, iterative development environment.
Good communication skills, ability to work with cross functional teams of technical and non-technical members.
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
2+ years seller risk management experience
EEO Employer
","['hive', 'unix', 'linux', 'spark', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java']","['risk', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['hive', 'unix', 'linux', 'spark', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java', 'risk', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Due to COVID-19, applicants will be interviewed remotely.
Learn how candidates are getting hiring during COVID.
https://match-relevant.com/your-story
Do you love working for companies that make the world a better place?
To improve your odds of an interview, schedule here: https://calendly.com/jake-villarreal/calendar
The Work:
Working with the founders and Data Scientist team, focused on biological signal processing and algorithm development for biomedical applications.
The Role:
6+ years of experience in signal processing, statistical data analysis, pattern recognition and machine learning
Proficient in one of the following: Matlab, Python, R or similar programming language
Experience and interest in biological signal processing and algorithm development for biomedical applications
Strong analytical skills, detail-oriented and collaborative
MS or PhD in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, or equivalent disciplines
","['r', 'matlab', 'python']","['statist', 'machine learning', 'data']",2.0,"['r', 'matlab', 'python', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"* Furthers scientific understanding about what affects agricultural production.
* Familiarity with machine learning algorithms.
* Excellent programming skills (R or Python preferred).
Citizenship and Immigration's E-Verify program.
","['r', 'excel', 'python']",['machine learning'],999.0,"['r', 'excel', 'python', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist
You may also develop tools and infrastructure to scale and automate the analyses that enable rapid product iteration.
B.S., M.S., Ph.D. in a scientific or quantitative field
2+ years work experience
Excellent statistical intuition and knowledge of various analytical approaches
Superb communication skills and ability to explain your analysis clearly
Proficiency in SQL
Familiarity with Python or similar scripting language
Passion for learning and always improving yourself and the team around you
Experience in working with large data sets and distributed computing tools (Hive, Redshift) is a plus
Email your resume to hala.hillo@motektech.com
","['redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hive']","['statist', 'commun', 'data']",1.0,"['redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hive', 'statist', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 12, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200175199
You will do hands-on image quality testing work, collaborate with developers, continuously track camera algorithm bugs and be able to represent image quality from a user's perspective.
Key Qualifications
A curious mind
An obsession for quality
Background in Data science, Data mining, Multivariate statistics, Computer vision, Machine learning
Experience working with large scale data sets
Solid programming skills including:
Python
C/C++
Experience with data visualization and presentation, familiar with data analysis tools such as Tableau
Excellent problem solving and communication skills
The Data Scientist will work closely with other members of the Video Engineering group to mine data, implement model evaluation pipeline, analyze large scale data, visualize data, and ensure the delivery is of the highest quality.
This position will also require strong coding skills, presentation skills, and collaborating with multiple teams (ex: machine learning, cloud infrastructure support).
The responsibilities of this position includes but not limited to the following for current and future products:
Implement algorithm evaluation methods
Analyze data and build data analysis tools
Deep-dive failure analysis
Discover new perspectives for old data
Produce / Present meaningful data visualization to higher-ups and across various involved teams
Education & Experience
PhD or Masters in Computer Science
","['excel', 'tableau', 'python', 'c', 'cloud']","['data mining', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['excel', 'tableau', 'python', 'c', 'cloud', 'data mining', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"This is what you'll do:You'll take the adventure of a lifetime.
You'll work with a team of top-notch engineers and scientists to build in-vehicle tools tracking vehicle performance and reliability metrics.
You'll create a framework for monitoring and assessing vehicle health that has never been done.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
DS,"This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.
Skills and Experience:
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field.
PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.
","['sql', 'scala', 'python']","['statist', 'data', 'visual']",2.0,"['sql', 'scala', 'python', 'statist', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"Requisition ID: 255385
Work Area: Software-Research
Expected Travel: 0 - 10%
Career Status: Professional
Employment Type: Regular Full Time
Career Level: T2
Posting Date : 6/10/2020
Together, they changed enterprise software and reinvented how business was done.
Because it’s the best-run businesses that make the world run better and improve people’s lives.
Purpose and Objective:
Expectations and Tasks:
Integrate or implement data mining/ mathematical methods into products.
Evaluate and test data mining methods and maintains a high level of quality.
Work with the senior data scientist to prototype new innovations and eventually get them into the product.
Contribute to data definitions, data storage infrastructure for data mining purposes and to Data Mining architectures.
Resolve data mining performance issues and monitor data mining system performance and implements efficiency improvements.
Implement data mining algorithms if required.
Work with product management, application developers, information developers and end users.
Performs functional and empirical analysis on data mining topics.
Conduct research on data mining tools and algorithms, implement prototypes and data mining algorithms and validates them on real data.
Contribute to best practices for data mining topics and collaborate with development, universities and research institutes.
5% travel required.
Education and Qualifications/Skills and Competencies:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or a related field and 5 year of experience required.
Work Experience:
Experience must include 1 year with: Databases; Data exploration including data discovery, data cleansing, data analysis, and feature engineering, including key performance indicators (KPIs); Model discovery including model exploration, model development, including training and validation, and model implementation; Modelling, including univariate and multivariate regression, logistic regression, natural language processing, machine learning and clustering & classification methodologies; preparation of design documents and functional requirements documents (FRDs); Familiarity with at least two of the following languages – Python, R, Java, C++, SQL.
5% travel required.
Travel:5% travel required.
Internal use only: reference code lhrs0000
EX:OUT
Requests for reasonable accommodation will be considered on a case-by-case basis.
EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability:
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability.
Additional Locations :
","['sql', 'r', 'java', 'python']","['regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'kpi', 'natural language processing', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'java', 'python', 'regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'kpi', 'nlp', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"You must have experience in build and evaluate predictive and decision models to be deployed in production systems, or for research.
You should have experience with one or more statistical or machine learning software such as R, Python.
You should have experience in analysis of large amounts of historical data, determining suitability for modeling, data clean-up and filtering, pattern identification and variable creation, selection of sampling criteria, generating performance definitions and variables.
You must have experience to Conducting experiments with different types of algorithms and models, analyzing performance, to identify the best algorithms to employ.
Architect and develop operational models that run at scale thru partnership with data engineer teams.
You should be background in applied statistical modeling on large experimental or observational data sets.
Must have experience extracting data from a variety of sources, and a desire to expand those skills (working knowledge SQL is required, Spark is a plus).
","['r', 'sql', 'spark', 'python']","['data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['r', 'sql', 'spark', 'python', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"About This Role
You will be involved in all parts of the data science lifecycle.
That starts in partnership with the investment team where you'll learn about new industries and work with them to understand they key workflows and how ML can be applied.
Primary Responsibilities
Train and evaluate machine learning models
Build datasets that support the training and evaluation of ML models
Analyze existing data assets to understand their scope, quality, and gaps
Requirements
Demonstrated experience building ML models to solve business problems
Strong software development background
Familiarity with common ML frameworks
Strong verbal and written communication ability
Passion for understanding quickly developing an understanding of new companies and industries
Travel up to 25% of the time
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientist
energy monitoring solution that is radically changing consumer
perspective on energy efficiency.
ground-breaking analytics that can itemize home energy usage data
to the appliance level without using any plug-level monitors.
households across the world and capture a market that is
predicted to be billions of dollars in next few years.
The
combination of big data in energy, data mining and consumer
advertising come together to make this world a greener place by
helping reduce energy consumption at a massive scale.
funded by one of the top cleantech VCs in Silicon Valley.
Position
core team.
The ideal candidate must enjoy diving deep into data
sets and finding interesting patterns through analytical
experiments run in a methodical way.
Be part of a highly
energetic and innovative team that believes nothing is impossible
with some creativity and hard work.
This is an unparalleled
opportunity to work with incredibly smart people.
What you can look forward to
Research and develop advanced statistical and machine
learning models for analysis of large-scale, high-dimensional
data.
Dig deeper into data, understand characteristics of data,
evaluate alternate models and validate hypothesis through
theoretical and empirical approaches.
Productize proven or working models into production quality
code.
Collaborate with product management, marketing and
engineering teams to understand requirements and develop
potential solutions.
Stay current with latest research and technology trends;
share knowledge by clearly articulating results and ideas to
key decision makers.
IP portfolio.
What you'll bring
MS/PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math, or
related areas.
Exceptionally strong candidates with a BS and
relevant work experience welcome.
Strong background in data mining, machine learning and
statistical analysis.
Expert pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
(time series analysis, logistic regression, decision trees,
etc.).
Keen aptitude for large scale data analysis with a knack for
identifying key insights from data.
Fluency in programming languages like Java/Python.
Experience using Big Data
(Hadoop/Cassandra/HDFS/HBase/HIVE/Pig) is a plus.
3+ years hands-on practical experience with large scale data
analysis.
Fluency in analytical tools such as Matlab/R.
Strong communication and collaboration skills.
","['cassandra', 'pig', 'hbase', 'matlab', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['regress', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'research', 'math', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['cassandra', 'pig', 'hbase', 'matlab', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'research', 'math', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"What you'll need:
Education
Master's/PhD (preferred) or Bachelor's (required) in CS/ML/AI or relevant computational/engineering discipline
Machine Learning/Data Science:
Solid theoretical understanding of ML fundamentals: linear algebra, probability, statistics (as relevant to ML), optimization
Knowledge of different ML techniques and when/how to use them: classification, regression, clustering, outlier detection, dimensionality reduction, etc.
Comfortable manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying, heterogeneous sources
Experience with messy real-world data -- handling missing/incomplete/inaccurate data
Proficient in the Python ML ecosystem: NumPy, Pandas, SciPy, Scikit-Learn
Strong understanding of relational databases like PostgreSQL is a plus
Programming experience:
At least 2+ years of experience writing production-quality Python code
Version control: Git, GitHub/Bitbucket
Experience delivering large-scale deployable projects
Great to have
Knowledge of Python (Shapely, GeoPandas, Fiona, CartoPy, etc) and/or database (PostGIS) geometry/geospatial tools
Domain experience in building models for location-based services, transportation, scheduling, vehicle routing
","['postgresql', 'github', 'git', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'geospati', 'outlier', 'dimensionality reduction', 'optim', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['postgresql', 'github', 'git', 'scipi', 'panda', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'data', 'geospati', 'outlier', 'dimensionality reduction', 'optim', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide Data Science leadership to the Product Managers, Sales and Product Marketing Managers
Unlock new opportunities for growth by discovering insights, automate processes, and predictive modeling
Execute Product driven data projects from database to analysis to insights to presentations
Write efficient SQL code and build effective Excel models to fuel analytical frameworks and dashboards
Develop analytical frameworks for future strategic initiatives and provide recommendations Product Managers to drive design decisions
Perform variance analyses against critical benchmarks to identify the root cause behind Product usage trends
Build/modify/maintain dashboards and reports to regularly communicate key Sales metrics and KPIs
Build predictive models based on Product Usage data
REQUIREMENTS
Minimum 4+ years of experience using data to facilitate Product decisions - Product Analytics role or Growth roles
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Business/Economics, STEM Degrees or similar fields
Excellent SQL and Excel skills
Strong understanding of growth principles, product development, and product go to market processes
Enterprise SaaS experience preferred
Great organization skills with the ability to manage competing priorities
Highly analytical with attention to detail
Self-driven with the ability to work in a self-guided manner
Strong problem-solving skills
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Data Scientist
Mountain ViewR&D - Machine learningExperienced
Responsibilities
If yes, this is an opportunity of a lifetime!
What you'll do:
Team up with engineers to design learning solutions.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Partner with international stakeholders in different time zones
Qualifications
- BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with 2+ years of work experience
2+ years of industry experience in predictive analytics and/or statistical modeling role
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
Experience building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and analytical tools (e.g.
Hive, Spark)
Proficiency in scripting languages (SQL, Python, R, etc.)
Experience working with international partners in different time zones
Share to
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"You will work in a dynamic, multidisciplinary team of independent/entrepreneurial computer scientists and engineers who research, develop, and integrate state-of-the-art algorithms, software, hardware, and computer systems solutions to challenging research and development problems.
These positions are in the Computing Directorate.
These positions will be filled at either the SES.2 or SES.3 level depending on your qualifications.
Additional job responsibilities (outlined below) will be assigned if you are selected at the higher level.
Essential Duties
Collaborate with scientists and researchers in one or more of the following areas: data intensive applications, text processing, graph analysis, machine learning, statistical learning, information visualization, low-level data management, data integration, data streaming, scientific data mining, data fusion, massive-scale knowledge fusion using semantic graphs, database technology, programming models for scalable parallel computing, application performance modeling and analysis, scalable tool development, novel architectures (e.g., FPGAs, GPUs and embedded systems), and HPC architecture simulation and evaluation.
Carry out development of data analysis algorithms to address program and sponsor data sciences requirements.
Engage other developers frequently to share relevant knowledge, opinions, and recommendations, working to fulfill deliverables as a team.
Design technical solutions independently, participate as a member of a multidisciplinary team to analyze sponsor requirements and designs, and implement software and perform analyses to address these requirements.
Develop and integrate components-such as web-based user interfaces, access control mechanisms, and commercial indexing products-for creating an operational information and knowledge discovery system.
Perform other duties as assigned.
In Addition at the SES.3 Level
Lead multiple parallel tasks and priorities of customers and partners to ensure complex deadlines are met.
Responsible for various complex projects, use team members’ skills to complete complex projects/tasks, and solve abstract complex problems/ideas and convert them into useable algorithms/software modules.
Provide solutions that require in-depth analysis of multiple factors and the creative use of established methods.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, computer engineering, or related field, or the equivalent combination of education and related experience.
Comprehensive knowledge of one or more of the following: high performance computing, scientific data analysis, statistical analysis, knowledge discovery, computer security, systems programming, large-scale data management, and big data technologies.
Skilled in all aspects of the software project life cycle: feasibility, requirements, design, implementation, integration, test and deployment.
Experience developing software with C++, C, Java, Python, R, or Matlab, software applications in Linux, UNIX, Windows environments, data analysis algorithms, data management approaches, relational databases, or machine learning algorithms.
Demonstrated ability to effectively handle concurrent technical tasks with conflicting priorities, to approach difficult problems with enthusiasm and creativity and to change focus when necessary, and to work independently and implement research concepts in a multi-disciplinary team environment, where commitments and deadlines are important to project success.
Effective interpersonal skills necessary to interact with all levels of personnel.
Proficient verbal and written communication skills necessary to effectively collaborate in a team environment and present and explain technical information.
In Addition at the SES.3 Level
Effective advanced analytical, problem-solving, and decision-making skills to develop creative solutions to complex problems.
Significant experience with demonstrated expertise in the following technical languages, concepts, or constructs and in one or more of the following advanced areas: high performance computing, scientific data analysis, statistical analysis, knowledge discovery, computer security, systems programming, large-scale data management or big data technologies.
Advanced verbal and written communication skills necessary to effectively collaborate in a team environment and present and explain technical information and provide advice to management.
Pre-Employment Drug Test: External applicant(s) selected for this position will be required to pass a post-offer, pre-employment drug test.
Security Clearance: This position requires a Department of Energy (DOE) Q-level clearance.
Q-level clearance requires U.S. citizenship.
If you hold multiple citizenships (U.S. and another country), you may be required to renounce your non-U.S. citizenship before a DOE L or Q clearance will be processed/granted.
Note: This listing has multiple openings; these are Career Indefinite positions.
","['unix', 'linux', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
DS,"About the Role
This position supports, gathers, creates and maintains data and workflows for data analysis, handling and management.
Role is responsible for:
Design, develop, and maintain algorithms and models used in the health analytics platform that reflect the functional needs of the business.
Gather and maintain appropriate data required for the models.
Perform analysis of data for evaluation, validation and optimization.
Present analysis and results using charts, tables, and reports to functional technical and non-technical leaders.
About You
This role requires you to be a proficient technical expert with at least 3 years of working experience in a Data Scientist role.
This role also requires a PhD or Master’s degree in Biostatistics, Statistics, Mathematics or a related field.
Beyond education and years of experience, you should be experienced with multiple statistical programming languages such as Python, R or Matlab.
The most successful candidates will be those who are self-motivated and enthusiastic for working in fast-paced and collaborative environment.
","['r', 'matlab', 'python']","['data', 'biostatist', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist']",2.0,"['r', 'matlab', 'python', 'data', 'biostatist', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist
Tax Terms: W2- Contract
Duration: 12+ Months
· Proven experience as a Data Scientist.
· Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
· Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Scala, Java or C++ is an asset
· Experience using business intelligence tools and data frameworks
· Strong math skills (e.g.
statistics, algebra)
· Excellent communication and presentation skills
· BSc/BA in Computer Science, Engineering or relevant field; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is preferred
","['scala', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['scala', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"In this role, you are responsible for the duties listed below.
Immediate opening for a Data Scientist in Palo Alto, CA who possess:
PhD in a quantitative field in the natural or social sciences e.g.
statistics, economics, genetics, political science, etc.
Significant experience in R or Python
Proficiency working in Linux environment
Strong fundamentals in machine learning
Email your resumes to ajones@simplybiotech.com or call 858.251.3562
The selected candidate will further possess:
Expertise in applied statistics
Experience working with datasets that cannot fit in a typical personal computer’s memory
Proficiency writing high-quality code, using version control, and maintaining documentation
Ability to communicate and collaborate with an inter-disciplinary team
Ability to translate business-level objectives to data science objectives
Experience with clinical or biological data e.g.
genomics, proteomics, imaging, EMR
Experience with association studies in biological domains e.g.
GWAS
Experience with study designs for assessing diagnostic tests
For immediate and confidential consideration, please email your resume to ajones@simplybiotech.com or call 858.251.3562
More information can be found at www.SimplyBiotech.com
Accounting/Finance
Information Technology
Sales/ Customer Service
Engineering Disciplines
Manufacturing
Administration
Logistics
Benefits offered by Kinetic Personnel Group: Medical, Dental, Vision, Sick Pay, Longevity Pay, and Holiday Pay
","['r', 'linux', 'python']","['machine learning', 'logist', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'information technology']",3.0,"['r', 'linux', 'python', 'machine learning', 'logist', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'information technology']"
DS,"As an applied researcher you will focus on machine learning algorithm development, real time data analysis, and the adaptation of cutting edge academic research.
Representative work:
Demonstrated capabilities to explain and distill state-of-the-art research in machine learning
Develop and implement software for novel machine learning techniques
Decompose machine learning algorithms/models into their computational characteristics
Conduct and report on detailed analysis of machine learning models
Algorithm implementation in the areas of graph transforms, linear algebra kernels, and combinatorial optimization
Skills and Qualifications
Experience with at least two machine learning frameworks, such as TensorFlow, Caffe/2, Torch, Theano
Fluency in at least two programming languages, such as Python, C, bash
Proficiency with linear algebra and dynamical systems
Experience with software development engineering
Experience with both asymptotic performance analysis and performance tuning specific case studies
Candidates with Ph.D. and candidates with B.Sc.
","['theano', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'caff', 'c']","['data', 'optim', 'graph', 'research', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['theano', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'caff', 'c', 'data', 'optim', 'graph', 'research', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Job TITLE: Data Scientist
Term: Full Time
Primary focus will be on improving customer business outcomes through optimization and applying data-mining techniques, doing statistical analysis and building high quality prediction systems.
Strong verbal and written communication, thoroughness and self-check personality are critical for success in this role.
• Build statistical & predictive analytics models that can be translated into various product strategy and marketing decisions
• Deep dive into data, understand hidden patterns and trends, build prediction models.
• Perform data analysis, gap analysis and drive to enhance data collection procedures by coordinating with the product team
• Coordinate with the infrastructure team for prediction model integration and to establish feedback loops thru machine learning and recalibration.
• Perform various analyses: sentimental analysis, market bucket analysis, cohort analysis, churns analysis.
• Build & monitor visually appealing real-time dashboards, as well as, develop Splunk queries & Splunk custom inputs.
• Drive for success across teams and customers
• Maintain and manage SLA
• Analyze individual issues in the context of overall platform to proactively identify larger problems
• Documentation of issues, resolutions and processes
• Contribute in data engineering efforts
• Coordinate and collaborate with development team to remain current on code and technology
Experience: • 4+ years of strong experience in Predictive Analysis, Machine Learning & Statistical Modeling using languages like Python, R, Ruby
• 5+ years of strong SQL and RDBMS experience
• 2+ years of strong experience of programming in languages like Python, C++, Java, Ruby
• 2+ years of experience working with AWS including services like RDS, Redshift, DynamoDB, Postgress, data pipeline
• 2+ years of experience in data visualization such as D3.js etc.
• 1+ years of experience working with cloud and web technologies including XML, JSON, HTML5, Web frameworks (Django, Flask), Elastic Search
• Experience with Splunk
• Experience with data analysis
• Desire and ability to learn new technologies
• Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
• Strong written and verbal communications skills
• Experience working with off-shore teams
• Passion of data and data driven decisions
Education: BIG PLUS:
• Experience with map-reduce paradigm with hadoop-hive environment
• Experience with NoSQL databases, MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Redis, Unstructured data
• Any type of contribution to open source community
• Experience with reporting tools Tableau, Pentaho BI
• Experience with ETL and Data-Warehouse
","['splunk', 'redshift', 'python', 'rubi', 'pentaho', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'flask', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'django', 'r', 'cloud', 'sql', 'bi', 'aw']","['regress', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['splunk', 'redshift', 'python', 'rubi', 'pentaho', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'flask', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'django', 'r', 'cloud', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'regress', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You will also help translate data and identify efficiency opportunities.
You will be expected to use data to provide meaningful recommendations and actionable strategies to key stakeholders, and develop best practices, including streamlining of data sources and related programmatic initiatives.
The ideal candidate will have a passion for working in white space and creating impact from the ground up in a fast-paced environment.
Additionally, you will have a proven track record of thought leadership and impact in developing similar analytics and metrics-based programs.
This position is part of the Infrastructure Data Center team and located in Menlo Park, CA.
Responsibilities:
Leverage data and business principles to create and drive large scale FB Data Center programs
Define and develop the program for metrics creation, data collection, modeling, and reporting the operational performance of Facebooks data centers
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Be a self-starter, motivated by a passion for developing the best possible solutions to problems
Identify and implement streamlined processes for data reporting and communication
Use analytical models to identify insights that are used to drive key decisions across the organization
Routinely communicate metrics, trends and other key indicators to leadership
Provide leadership and mentorship to other members of the team
Lead and support various ad hoc projects, as needed, in support of Facebooks Data Center strategy
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms and capacity constraint models
Leverage tools like R, Tableau, PHP, Python, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Mininum Qualifications:
Degree in an analytical field (e.g.
Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Management Science)
3+ years of experience in a role with data analysis and metrics development
3+ years of hands-on experience analyzing and interpreting data, drawing conclusions, defining recommended actions, and reporting results across stakeholders
3+ years of SQL development experience writing queries
3+ years of hands-on project management experience
3+ years of experience with data visualization tools
3+ years of experience with packages such as R, Tableau, SPSS, SAS, STATA, etc.
2+ years of experience with scripting in Python or PHP
Experience leveraging data driven models to drive business decisions
Experience using data access tools and building visualizations using large datasets and multiple data sources
Experience thinking analytically
Experience communicating data to all organizational levels
Experienced with packages such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, dplyr, ggplot2
Knowledge of statistics and optimization techniques
Hands-on experience with medium to large datasets (i.e.
data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation)
Preferred Qualifications:
Technical knowledge of data center operations
","['ggplot2', 'sql', 'php', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'sa']","['data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['ggplot2', 'sql', 'php', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'sa', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Research, design, and develop new machine learning solutions and algorithms
Work on data association, clustering, segmentation, filtering, and estimation
Unlock new opportunities for growth by discovering insights, automate processes, and predictive modeling
Strong storytelling: distill interesting and hard-to-find insights into a compelling story
REQUIREMENTS
Minimum 4+ years of experience using data to facilitate decisions
Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Physics, Operations Research, or other quantitative field
Experience with at least two of the following areas: classical machine learning, deep learning, reinforcement learning/control systems, probability theory, statistics, causal inference, time series forecasting, optimization, dynamic programming
Demonstrated coding and programming abilities (Python preferred).
Self-driven with the ability to work in a self-guided manner
",['python'],"['probabl', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'time series', 'statist', 'econom', 'segment']",2.0,"['python', 'probabl', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'time series', 'statist', 'econom', 'segment']"
DS,"Are you an experienced Data Scientist with 2+ years’ experience who likes solving complex problems?
Would you like to be part of a high caliber team who have access to huge volumes of real-time data?
As a Data Responsibilities will include:
Perform hands-on data exploration and modeling work on massive data sets.
Use data mining and machine learning techniques to develop robust models in areas such as segmentation and profiling, churn assessment, customer loyalty prediction, retention analysis, and product recommendation.
Pull data from warehouse, back-test models, perform feature engineering, compare model performances and communicate the results.
Architect, develop, and maintain data analytics platforms that visualize data and drive business insights that can be translated into product strategies and marketing decisions.
Research state of the art modeling techniques and implement them.
For this role you will need:
Technical expertise in data mining, machine learning, NLP, Information Retrieval, and statistical analysis.
Proficient in machine learning and data mining packages in R, Python, or Weka.
Experience working with large data sets and distributed computing tools (Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, or Spark).
Expertise with shell scripting and automation.
Capabilities of managing end-to-end machine learning pipeline from data exploration, feature engineering, model building, performance evaluation, and online testing with big data set.
Experience with reporting tools such as Tableau and D3.js.
PhD in Computer Science, Statistics or related field; OR a Master’s degree or equivalent in Computer Science, Statistics or related field and 2 years of related experience.
Ability to work independently in a fast-paced, iterative development environment.
Exemplary communication skills, ability to work with large cross functional teams of technical and non-technical members.
Preferred Qualifications
Programming skills in one of the following languages: Java, Scala, C/C++ preferably on a UNIX or Linux platform.
Experience with ETL and Data-Warehouse.
Prior experience in eCommerce or Online Retail.
","['unix', 'scala', 'linux', 'spark', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'c', 'java']","['etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'pipelin', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",2.0,"['unix', 'scala', 'linux', 'spark', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'c', 'java', 'etl', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'pipelin', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"Creativity and innovation are encouraged.
You will use data to drive insight into the product and business with a focus on new user growth, retention and quality.
The ideal candidate would have experience analyzing large and complex data sets related to web products.
You'll be doing plenty of experiment design and post-hoc analysis, both to support product improvements and business decisions, as well as setting up infrastructure and frameworks for more efficient analysis.
You'll be a leader on the team and coming with experience creating real business impact via data.
What you will do:
• Work with the product team and development team to design effective A/B tests.
• Monitor and analyze several A/B tests with statistical rigor, present the data and insights to the team and drive product decisions.
• Be a part of setting up infrastructure to help other analysts be more efficient
• Look at complex problems and come up with testable models and algorithms to optimize the platform.
• Set up BI tools and regular reporting services and interfaces.
• Live and breathe SQL.
• Enjoy great teamwork, have lots of fun, and take pride in building a world-class product that makes a difference on people's lives.
Requirements:
• At least 3 years of experience in a quantitative data analysis role involving user behavior (e.g.
marketing, product)
• Advanced experience with SQL
• Advanced knowledge of statistics, especially as it relates to hypothesis testing
• Expert in using tools like R and Python for data analysis
• Experience analyzing A/B tests
• Experience with BI tools like Tableau and Looker
• Experience analyzing large and complex data sets to drive business insights and decisions
• Great grasp of numbers with love for data and analytics, knowledge of statistics
• Excellent communication (oral and written), attention to detail, time management and organizational skills
• BSc/MA in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Math, Economics, or Engineering
Very competitive salary& equity compensation.
Excellent health, dental, vision coverage.
401k benefits with employer matching contribution; immediately vested.
Awesome people to work with.
Becoming a part of a movement in telemedicine and building something that matters.
#LI-DNI
","['looker', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['looker', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Role: Data Scientist.
Hire Type: 12 Months Contract
Advanced degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or similar.
Extensive experience as a Data Scientist.
Proficiency in R or Python, where the former is preferred.
In-depth understanding of SQL.
Competent in machine learning principles and techniques.
Demonstrable history of devising and overseeing data-centered projects.
Ability to relay insights in layman's terms, such that these can be used to inform business decisions.
Outstanding supervision and mentorship abilities.
Capacity to foster a healthy, stimulating work environment that frequently harnesses teamwork.
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Data Scientists
Share
Job ID: FA-0100-620
Open Since: 2020-02-05
City: San Jose
State: California
Country: United States of America
Job Skills:
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, MySQL, etc
Experience using Spark, Cassandra, TensorFlow etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc
Minimum Experience: 8 Yrs
Education:
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university or equivalent work experience
","['spark', 'cassandra', 'mysql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'neural network', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'cassandra', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'boost', 'random forest', 'nn', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Posted: Jan 16, 2020
Role Number:
200142263
Do you have a curious mind?
Are you passionate about quality and analyze data with a skeptical mindset?
Do you love taking apart complex systems?
Shipping a black box with confidence isn’t easy, but if you are intrigued by these questions, you’ll feel right at home here.
You will get to further machine learning research & development by inspecting, interpreting and evaluating the predictions of machine learnings algorithms and their underlying datasets.
Key Qualifications
Data Analysis, Machine Learning, Statistics, Data Engineering, Mathematics, Computer Science
Comfortable with Python, R, Matlab, and/or other Data Science tools
Experience with highly parallel, distributed, streamed or generally asynchronous data processing environments (Spark, Kafka, BigQuery, Dask, Celery, Hadoop, etc..)
Experience with SQL and NoSQL / Key-value store databases
Experience with analyzing large scale datasets
Confident with basic and advanced statistical methods, e.g.
descriptive and inferential statistics, multivariate regression analysis
Quality driven, detail oriented, with excellent communication skills
CORE RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyzing and visualizing algorithm performance in a concise, illustrative, truthful and comprehensive way
Working with large scale datasets and developing tools and frameworks necessary for processing of such data
Developing test frameworks and routines to ensure high quality of data processing and analysis pipelines
Devising performance metrics, test cases and regression conditions for different models
Researching feasibility of new algorithms and features
Processing raw data and building refined datasets
Ensuring the highest quality of the end user product
Education & Experience
PhD or MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Data Science, Statistics or equivalent in relevant industry experience
3+ years relevant industry experience
Experience with visualizing very large data sets and creating performance reports
Experience with data acquisition operations (defining data collection protocols, logistics…)
Visit jobs.apple.com (http://jobs.apple.com/) to learn more.
","['dask', 'nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'end user', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['dask', 'nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'end user', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Want to shape how millions of people buy, sell, connect, and share around the world?
You will collaborate with researchers to invent, design and implement end-to-end reliable, scalable, efficient production services in Python, Go, or similar languages (Java, Scala), using state-of-the-art big data and Machine Learning tools.
The ideal candidate will have a blend of science and engineering skills, proven track record of solving critical business problems through data science and strong analytical/quantitative and engineering skills.
The candidate will be expected to have strong communication skills and to be capable of cross-group collaborations.
Responsibilities:
Work with data scientists, engineers, and cross functional teams to produce end-to-end production-ready solutions.
Provide technical leadership and mentoring to other team members.
Requirements:
MS in Computer Science, (PhD preferred) or equivalent experience.
Experience in NLP, ML and statistical modeling.
Experience with large data sets and related technologies, e.g., Hadoop and Spark.
Knowledge of SQL is preferred.
Excellent understanding of computer science fundamentals, data structures, and algorithms.
Strong programming skills in Python or Go (plus in one or more of Java, Scala, etc.).
7+ years of related work experience
Strong analytical skills and data-driven decision making
Experience in solving problems using data science and building practical solutions
Agility to adapt to emerging challenges and execute under ambiguity
Strong communication skills.
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
","['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",3.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"If you like working with a high-impact, cross-functional, collaborative team and enjoy autonomy and empowerment… keep reading!
You will be expected to blend in your concrete data driven understanding of product metrics with qualitative feedback and business goals to come up with actionable insights to drive product strategy.
What You'll Do
analyzing user segments, pulling lists for surveys and qualitative user tests, etc.).
Create analytics frameworks and set best practices globally, including development of tools and dashboards
Create sophisticated custom visualizations from large datasets
Build and maintain analytics data pipelines
Help empower data-driven product and marketing efforts
At least 4 years experience analyzing data for marketing and/or product teams.
Experience in digital marketing analytics at a mobile startup is preferred
BA/BS, MS, or Ph.D. in mathematics, statistics, computer science, or a quantitative discipline
Proven track record and enthusiasm for complex problem solving and analysis, including working with large data sets
Quantitative mindset, comfortable and proficient with statistical analyses
Hands-on experience with visualization tools with expertise in building advanced custom visualizations in Power BI, Tableau and state of the art Data Viz frameworks ( D3.js, Processing.js, Raphael.js etc.)
Hands-on experience with Python, R, Matlab, SQL, or other related analytical/programming tools and software
Ability to communicate complex analytical insights in a simple, concise manner and to build strong relationships with marketing and product teams to effectively convert insights into action
Comfortable and confident working as part of a fast-paced, self-directed, dynamic team
Experience with A/B Testing best practices and analysis
","['power bi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'pipelin', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'segment']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'pipelin', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'segment']"
DS,"There’s no better time to join!
You will use data to drive insight into the product and business with a focus on new user growth, retention and quality.
The ideal candidate would have experience analyzing large and complex data sets related to web products.
You'll be doing plenty of experiment design and post-hoc analysis, both to support product improvements and business decisions, as well as setting up infrastructure and frameworks for more efficient analysis.
You'll be a leader on the team and coming with experience creating real business impact via data.
What will you do?
Work with the product team and development team to design effective A/B tests.
Monitor and analyze several A/B tests with statistical rigor, present the data and insights to the team and drive product decisions.
Be a part of setting up infrastructure to help other analysts be more efficient
Look at complex problems and come up with testable models and algorithms to optimize the platform.
Set up BI tools and regular reporting services and interfaces.
Live and breathe SQL.
Enjoy great teamwork, have lots of fun, and take pride in building a world-class product that makes a difference on people's lives.
What will you NOT do?
You will NOT be confined to your ""job"".
You will NOT be bogged down by office politics, ego, or bad attitude.
Only positive, pleasure-to-work-with people allowed here!
You will NOT get yourself burned out.
Really.
Requirements
BSc/MA in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Math, Economics, or Engineering
At least 3 years of experience in a quantitative data analysis role involving user behavior (e.g.
marketing, product)
Advanced experience with SQL
Advanced knowledge of statistics, especially as it relates to hypothesis testing
Expert in using tools like R and Python for data analysis
Experience analyzing A/B tests
Experience with BI tools like Tableau and Looker
Experience analyzing large and complex data sets to drive business insights and decisions
Great grasp of numbers with love for data and analytics, knowledge of statistics
Excellent communication (oral and written), attention to detail, time management and organizational skills
Bonus (great to have but not required):
Experience building predictive models
Experience with web based products
Experience in or supporting a growth team
Coding experience
Benefits
Very competitive salary & equity compensation
Excellent health, dental, vision coverage
401k benefits with employer matching contribution
Office in the heart of downtown Mountain View, a three-minute walk from Caltrain
Catered lunch every day, bottomless snacks (even avocado toast!
), and locally roasted coffee
Commuter benefits, FSA accounts, and Employee Stock Purchase Programs available
Building something that matters - loved by the people and admired by the press
Any piece of hardware or software that will make you happy and productive
Awesome people to work with
Nothing to slow you down
Helping people have a better life, every day
#LI-PK1
","['looker', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",2.0,"['looker', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Data Scientist - Analytics, Trust & Safety
Mountain ViewProduct - Data analysisExperienced
Responsibilities
You will help scope out projects, ideate on new strategies, and most importantly, use data to find insights, diagnose problems and tell compelling stories.
RESPONSIBILITES
Use data to identify trends, conduct root cause analysis and suggest potential opportunities for process improvements.
Develop metrics to evaluate risks of the platform and the effectiveness of safety programs.
Conceptualize, develop and maintain dashboards for risk detection and monitoring.
Influence stakeholders through data-based recommendations and mobilize cross-functional teams by telling compelling stories with data.
Qualifications
- 2+ years of experience in data science or quantitative analysis.
Experience with SQL, ETL, R/Python.
Degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Mathematics) or equivalent practical experience.
Strong communication skills across technical and non-technical audiences and the ability to synthesize and communicate complex concepts and analyses in easy to understand ways.
Experience with data modeling and statistical analysis techniques, including: hypothesis testing, model evaluation, and common regression and classification algorithms.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience in deep learning, distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop), or social network analysis.
Share to
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['risk', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'deep learning', 'econom', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'risk', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'deep learning', 'econom', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Want in?
Build brands consumers love
Build platforms customers love
A Lot About You
You get data.
You have a thirst for knowledge and insight and have the technical and analytical skills to navigate large and complex data sets.
Your data is 100% accurate and credible.
Your reports are always clear and actionable.
You get growth.
You are a consumer-focused, data-driven, and growth-enabling analyst who has supported Growth strategies across the analytics/insights, acquisition/referrals, activation/onboarding, and adoption/retention loop.
You get people.
You effectively communicate and collaborate with cross-functional teams and across all levels of the organization.
You influence without official authority and build relationships to become a trusted advisor.
You can empathize with various perspectives and identify opportunities to add value to diverse stakeholders.
You get mobile/digital.
You have significant industry experience – and a strong understanding of the mobile/digital ecosystem – from apps to advertising and analytics.
You have successfully applied the latest mobile/digital tools to help track, measure, monitor, report, analyze, and optimize marketing campaigns.
You get it done.
Your Day
Analyze user needs and identify/prioritize the problems, pain points, and pleasure points (via analytics, behaviors, clicks/conversions, funnels, etc.)
Build models to gain insights on what drives performance in terms of reach, retention, referral, and revenue growth
Create dashboards and reports that provide analysis and commentary, explaining product, marketing, and business trends for Executive reporting
Inform and update executives and stakeholders on product performance, plans, and progress towards metrics
Define data testing plans and create methodologies that help teams to iterate fast and release new features for testing and, if successful, rollout to all users globally
Focus the product roadmap on achieving the metrics that matter and making ruthless decisions about what to do (and almost as importantly what not to do)
Generate and go deep on consumer insights and competitive intelligence to help teams drive product innovation and iteration
Help teams understand/internalize consumer insights, choices, and preferences – and how these influence the product/testing roadmap to drive growth
Build strong partnerships with product, design, engineering, and marketing teams and enable them to launch new Growth initiatives for testing/iteration
Provide feedback to product and engineering teams on impact of product launches: target launch metrics, A|B testing, post-launch metrics
Distill all metrics from statistically significant deviations that will impact reach, retention, referral, and/or revenue metrics
Investigate data and monitor data quality – partner closely with and provide requirements to the Data Engineering teams that can be clearly acted upon
Frame business problems into questions that can be answered through data analysis, and translate business needs into requirements
Design and lead time-sensitive strategic research projects involving methodology development, analysis, strategic recommendations and presentation of findings to Senior Management
Minimum Qualifications
BS/MS in a highly-quantitative field (Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Analytics, Data Science)
Data analysis, generating insights for consumer-focused companies
Experience with statistical programming languages such as Python or R
Familiarity with Unix/Linux environment highly recommended
Familiarity with query optimization and data ETL
Experience with big data technologies such as Hive, Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark, etc.
Machine Learning skills, including cluster analysis, neural networks, predictive modeling
Experience using Statistical techniques including correlation analysis, design of experimentation, linear and nonlinear regressions, logistic regression, sampling and resampling methods, time series, and longitudinal analysis
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to, and will not be discriminated against based on age, race, gender, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability or any other protected category.
If you need accessibility assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability, please submit a request via the Accommodation Request Form (https://www.verizonmedia.com/careers/contact-us.html) or call 408-336-1409.
Requests and calls received for non-disability related issues, such as following up on an application, will not receive a response.
","['mapreduc', 'unix', 'linux', 'spark', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'etl', 'big data', 'correl', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'dashboard', 'cluster', 'predict', 'optim', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'unix', 'linux', 'spark', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'etl', 'big data', 'correl', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'dashboard', 'cluster', 'predict', 'optim', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"SENIOR DATA SCIENTIST
Position Overview
Be on the leading edge of applying machine learning and data modeling to the world of advanced cyber security – as part of the data science engineering team, you will directly impact the product by developing core algorithms to model complex problems.
Specific responsibilities include:
Prototyping, development and testing of complex mathematical models in order to facilitate the detection of anomalous behavior with a very high degree of accuracy
Development and testing of methods to combine models in order to improve accuracy, as well as automatically training and retraining these models
Innovating around new models to solve new problems
Required Experience
2+ years of post academic work experience in machine learning,
Successfully applied machine learning, statistical methods, data mining to work projects
Strong math/statistics/machine learning background
Parallel programming experience
C++ coding experience
Python or Scala experience
Linux experience
Team player
Qualifications
MS/PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics or related discipline (or equivalent experience)
Experience designing and implementing new algorithms
Statistical package experience: R, Python/Pandas or MATLAB/Octave
Familiarity with systems that make use of multiple machine learning and statistical methods at the same time, ensemble learning
Hadoop ecosystem experience
Database hands-on experience (SQL or noSQL)
Experience working in a software development team
","['nosql', 'linux', 'scala', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop']","['data mining', 'data', 'math', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",2.0,"['nosql', 'linux', 'scala', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'data mining', 'data', 'math', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"POSITION SUMMARY:
The Data Scientist will participate in the design and prototyping of cutting-edge deep learning and statistical algorithms for analysis of genetic data.
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Analyze next-generation sequencing data ranging from single research experiments to commercial data sets of millions of samples.
Design novel deep learning architectures for application in genomics.
Research and develop machine learning and statistical algorithms for genetic diagnostics.
Develop Python software infrastructure to support algorithm testing and simulation studies.
Contribute to research and product development efforts.
Produce correct conclusions based on rigorous mathematical analysis and principles of statistics and probability.
Produce high quality technical documentation including research reports and algorithm specifications.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Masters degree in engineering, applied math, statistics, or similar, PhD preferred.
At least 2-year practical experience in scientific data analysis using software such as Python.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:
Knowledge of deep learning techniques and theory.
Experience applying deep learning methods (to genomic data a plus).
Experience with using CNNs for classification and segmentation a plus
Proficiency in at least one major deep learning framework, preferably TensorFlow.
Strong foundation in probability theory and/or statistics including concepts like joint and conditional probability distributions, parameter estimation and hypothesis testing.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the desire to work in a dynamic and collaborative environment.
Desire to learn about human genetics and sequencing technologies.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS & WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Duties are typically performed in an office setting.
This position requires the ability to use a computer keyboard, communicate over the telephone and read printed material.
Duties may require working outside normal working hours (evenings and weekends) at times.
Competitive Benefits.
Healthy catered lunches, Premium snacks and beverages, Onsite gym with cardio and weight-training equipment, Game room with satellite TV, Onsite dry cleaning and alteration service with pick-up and delivery, Employee-organized sport leagues, Happy hours and BBQs, Generous Employee Referral program.
For more information, visit www.natera.com.
","['tensorflow', 'excel', 'python']","['probabl', 'hypothesi', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cnn', 'clean', 'research', 'math', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['tensorflow', 'excel', 'python', 'probabl', 'hypothesi', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'cnn', 'clean', 'research', 'math', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"The Trust & Safety and Law Enforcement (TSLE) teams are committed to bringing happiness to customers while creating and culture of trust, safety, and respect.
Your job will be to help meet the team challenge through using your skills to help develop threat models, data analytics, and machine learning.
A successful candidate will be self-motivated, and proactively take initiative to research and design and build novel and effective ways to tell stories with data.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Working knowledge of big data tools preferred (SQL, Spark, and Splunk)
Excellent interpersonal, written, and verbal communication skills
Confidence working independently and making key decisions on projects
Knowledge of machine learning algorithms including classifiers, clustering algorithms, and anomaly detection
Develop new techniques and data that will enable answering previously unanswerable and new questions.
Work with engineering to implement detection and mitigation at scale, as well as tools to assist the TSLE team in investigations
Ability to communicate findings to executives and cross-functional product teams.
REQUIREMENTS
You have 3 plus years of industry or graduate level research experience working on platform manipulation, or relevant security issues.
Experience designing a data science road-map and executing the vision behind it.
You are a self-starter who is capable of learning on the job, takes initiative, and can thrive within a large team.
You are intellectually curious and willing to develop new approaches when there are no precedents.
","['excel', 'spark', 'sql', 'splunk']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'anomali', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'spark', 'sql', 'splunk', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'anomali', 'commun']"
DS,"The Opportunity:
Projects will range from causal analysis of observational studies to advanced ML models to predict the dynamics of physiological time series like blood glucose, blood pressure, body weight and behavioral health.
Responsibilities:
This includes formulating business and product needs as machine learning problems; use technical rigor to identify the techniques and algorithms to pragmatically solve problems related to Applied Health Signals, member insights, and behavioral recommendations.
The domains include modeling clinical outcomes/metrics, clinical risks, NLP, behavior change.
Use Python, Tensorflow, PyTorch, and Keras to conduct both exploratory analyses and production modeling using both traditional and deep-learning techniques.
This includes feature engineering, unsupervised learning, supervised learning, reinforcement learning.
Interpret the results of your work for clinical, product and business decision-makers.
Partner closely with clinical leadership, product management and engineering to improve member clinical outcomes using insights and models.
Candidate Profile
What you bring:
3-10 years' experience in Data Science, Machine Learning or a related field in SaaS or consumer companies
Demonstrable depth of expertise in Python, Tensorflow, Spark, and SQL.
A Master's degree or higher in Computer Science, Statistics, Information Systems, Engineering or a related field.
PhD preferred.
Creativity and good judgement for framing problems with statistics and machine learning.
Experience with a broad range of ML algorithms: supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement learning; deep learning and Natural Language Processing; have a good judgement and reasoning capability to choose the appropriate one to generate the hypothesis, conduct experimentation and further address business/product needs.
Expertise with applications in healthcare, causal inference, or time-series analysis is a plus.
Experience designing and building useful, maintainable code for model training, evaluation, and interpretation.
A pragmatic ability to balance prototyping with incremental cleanup and refactoring along the way.
Who you are:
Self-driven and intellectually curious, with a proven track record using statistics and machine learning to solve challenging problems.
A strong team player willing to learn new platforms and tools, keep updated with advanced ML research/publications, and to help other team members adopt those tools and similar spirit.
A combined research and engineering mindset to pursue creative ML solutions for product and member experience improvement.
An active listener who can ""read between the lines"" to infer product needs and underlying context.
An open and kind individual seeking to be part of a high-performing, caring team.
The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names.
Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful?
To create results that matter?
Here you can truly improve lives.
Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python']","['hypothesi', 'reinforc', 'time series', 'statist', 'healthcar', 'risk', 'deep learning', 'data', 'causal', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'research', 'nlp', 'natural language processing', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hypothesi', 'reinforc', 'time series', 'statist', 'healthcar', 'risk', 'deep learning', 'data', 'causal', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'research', 'nlp', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Data Scientist, Networking
Mountain ViewR&DExperienced
Responsibilities
Interact with teams (both internal/external to networking) to understand use cases and define specific requirements for networking data analysis;
Develop scalable software pipeline for collection and aggregation of a vast amount of data retrieved from underlying networking systems, including but not limited to network resource usage, traffic statistics, device operation status, etc., and make the data universally available for both real-time and retrospective/forensic analysis use cases;
Develop analytical models to extract statistical properties and causality from and between networking events;
Continuously make recommendations/predictions based on results derived to optimize networking system efficiency and improve underlying networking infrastructure's availability.
Qualifications
1.
Bachelor's degree or above in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Computer Science, Electrical Engineerings; the master or Ph.D. degree with networking research experience is a plus;
Strong networking and distributed system background with a solid understanding of common protocols, network monitoring techniques such as sFlow, SNMP, etc; experience in large scale networking system development is a plus;
Hands-on experience handling terabyte size datasets, applying statistics and machine learning techniques and algorithms, using visualization tools to present data;
Master of at least one of the mainstream coding languages including Python, Java, R, Scala, Go, C++, etc, and capability to read and understand others;
Great verbal and written communication skills.
Share to
","['r', 'java', 'scala', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['r', 'java', 'scala', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You have:
Played a key role in scaling high growth consumer products.
Become experts of using your own products.
Guided engineering, product, and design team to architect and instrument analytics in deep and complex UI/UX flows with a clear understanding of measurable business and product goals.
Designed the hypotheses generation process, and use your process to plan, analyze, and report A/B testing experiments with measurable business impact.
You will:
Ship key product decisions through large scale behavioral data points.
Drive engineering and product team for data standardization and instrumentation.
Embed deeply with executive team to understand and analyze business goals.
Answer challenging and complex data questions from product teams.
You are:
Highly proficient in modern statistical tools and techniques.
Passionate about consumer product design and end user experiences.
Curious, skeptical and ready to drive deep into the weed.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Responsibilities Responsible for developingenhancing predictive modeling and recommendation capabilities based on website orderpre-orderconfiguration data, abandoned shopping carts, and IoT data from remote devices Building predictive models using advanced statistical methods and machine learning techniques like deep learning neural networks.
Working with large volumes of data, including extracting and analyzing big data.
Identifying key metrics to measure success for new and existing data products.
Consulting and collaborating with non-technical marketing partners and clients.
Communicating complex concepts and the results of the analyses in a clear and effective manner through creative visualizations.
Qualifications 5+ years experience working on data science problems using statistical analysis Google analytics, predictive modeling, and data manipulation.
5+ years experience in R and Python or equivalent.
3+ years in developing statistical and machine learning deep learning models like RNN, CNN using scikit-learn Tensorflow SagemakerMLlib libraries, etc.
Proven experience of building predictive models in retailcustomer360manufacturing Ability to deal with a large volume of data and fluency with SQL and no-SQL data bases.
Problem solvers with strong analytical, mathematical, and programming skills who like to be challenged in complex environments.
Strong AWS experience.
Advanced degree (MS or PhD) in science or engineering.
Building Customer Propensity models Excellent communication skills.
","['python', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'aw', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'cnn', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['python', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'aw', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'cnn', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Posted: Nov 4, 2019
Role Number:
200120447
Play a role in bringing autonomous technologies to the real world.
You will help engineer and generate data-driven insights into system performance and testing, as well as provide a sound statistical basis for determining the performance of autonomous software systems.
Key Qualifications
Experience working with large datasets (Hadoop/Spark preferred)
Expertise in statistical modeling (supervised and unsupervised methods), statistics of rare events, and long tail distributions
Experience developing data science pipelines, tool-chains, and workflows in Python and C++
Experience designing a measurement strategy to evaluate the performance of complex systems against challenging requirements, including A/B experiment design
Ability to create clear and meaningful data visualizations (matplotlib, bokeh, plotly, etc)
Experience with experimental design loops for integrated SW/HW systems
Experience with geospatial datasets & tool-chains (PostGIS a plus)
Signal processing background, including cleaning data, handling missing data, filtering techniques, linear/nonlinear fitting
Assess readiness of autonomous systems based on rigorous statistical methods
Develop informative data visualizations based on scalable data pipelines and analysis
Develop and execute performance measurement strategy for autonomy systems
Deploy novel analytic strategies to evaluate accuracy of simulation methods against real-world data
Develop a statistical basis for determining sufficient depth and breadth of autonomous software simulation testing
Education & Experience
MS/PhD (or equivalent experience) in Physics/Applied Math preferred, CS/Data Science/Mathematics/Statistics/EE or other Scientific background
3+ years data science background including data analytics, modeling, visualization, study design, and statistical methods
Clear and concise written and verbal communication skills
","['hadoop', 'spark', 'python']","['experimental design', 'data', 'geospati', 'supervis', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['hadoop', 'spark', 'python', 'experimental design', 'data', 'geospati', 'supervis', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You will work in a dynamic, multidisciplinary team of independent/entrepreneurial computer scientists and engineers who research, develop, and integrate state-of-the-art algorithms, software, hardware, and computer systems solutions to challenging research and development problems.
This position is in the Global Security Computing Applications Division in the Computing Directorate.
Essential Duties
Collaborate with scientists and researchers in one or more of the following areas: data intensive applications, text processing, graph analysis, machine learning, statistical learning, information visualization, low-level data management, data integration, data streaming, scientific data mining, data fusion, massive-scale knowledge fusion using semantic graphs, database technology, programming models for scalable parallel computing, application performance modeling and analysis, scalable tool development, novel architectures (e.g., FPGAs, GPUs and embedded systems), and HPC architecture simulation and evaluation.
Carry out development of data analysis algorithms to address program and sponsor data sciences requirements.
Engage other developers frequently to share relevant knowledge, opinions, and recommendations, working to fulfill deliverables as a team.
Contribute to technical solutions, participate as a member of a multidisciplinary team to analyze sponsor requirements and designs, and implement software and perform analyses to address these requirements.
Develop and integrate components-such as web-based user interfaces, access control mechanisms, and commercial indexing products-for creating an operational information and knowledge discovery system.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, computer engineering, or related field, or the equivalent combination of education and related experience.
Fundamental knowledge of one or more of the following: high performance computing, scientific data analysis, statistical analysis, knowledge discovery, computer security, systems programming, large-scale data management, and big data technologies.
Skilled in all aspects of the software project life cycle: feasibility, requirements, design, implementation, integration, test and deployment.
Fundamental experience developing software with C++, C, Java, Python, R, or Matlab, software applications in Linux, UNIX, Windows environments, data analysis algorithms, data management approaches, relational databases, or machine learning algorithms.
Ability to effectively handle concurrent technical tasks with conflicting priorities, to approach difficult problems with enthusiasm and creativity and to change focus when necessary, and to work independently and implement research concepts in a multi-disciplinary team environment, where commitments and deadlines are important to project success.
Sufficient interpersonal skills necessary to interact with all levels of personnel.
Sufficient verbal and written communication skills necessary to effectively collaborate in a team environment and present and explain technical information.
Pre-Employment Drug Test: External applicant(s) selected for this position will be required to pass a post-offer, pre-employment drug test.
Security Clearance: This position requires a Department of Energy (DOE) Q-level clearance.
Q-level clearance requires U.S. citizenship.
If you hold multiple citizenships (U.S. and another country), you may be required to renounce your non-U.S. citizenship before a DOE L or Q clearance will be processed/granted.
Note: This listing has multiple openings; these are Career Indefinite positions.
#DICE
","['unix', 'linux', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'graph', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
In this role, you will work as a Data Scientist and problem solver.
You will be a part of a small team where you will switch assignments and projects in a disciplined and fast-paced environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Be innovative and entrepreneurial to work within a ""start-up like"" environment.
Be an advisor to the data science team and provide expertise and direction on complex analytical modeling problems
Work with cross-functional teams to help them implement solutions
Research methods to improve statistical inferences of variables across models
Solve quantitative problems
Consult on industry standard solutions as well as new innovative techniques
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"Key Responsibilities:
Works in project teams as subject matter expert to design and develop program methods to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse ""big data"" sources
Performs ad-hoc statistical and data-mining analysis , using statistical tools like R, SAS and MATlab; input and design of data acquisition systems, data structure and database design.
Interfaces with internal customers for requirements analysis and compiles data for scheduled or special reports and analysis
Works in project teams to develop analytical models, algorithms and automated processes, applying SQL understanding and PHP or Python programming, to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets.
Supports the timely development of products for manufacturing and process information by applying sophisticated data analytics, understands the business data gathering processes of the business
Functional Knowledge
Demonstrates conceptual and practical expertise in own discipline and basic knowledge of related disciplines
Business Expertise
Has knowledge of best practices and how own area integrates with others; is aware of the competition and the factors that differentiate them in the market
Leadership
Acts as a resource for colleagues with less experience; may lead small projects with manageable risks and resource requirements
Problem Solving
Solves complex problems; takes a new perspective on existing solutions; exercises judgment based on the analysis of multiple sources of information
Impact
Impacts a range of customer, operational, project or service activities within own team and other related teams; works within broad guidelines and policies
Interpersonal Skills
Explains difficult or sensitive information; works to build consensus
Qualifications
Education:
Bachelor's Degree
Skills
Certifications:
Languages:
Years of Experience:
4 - 7 Years
Work Experience:
Additional Information
Travel:
No
Yes
","['matlab', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['risk', 'big data', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['matlab', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'risk', 'big data', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide Data Science leadership to the Product Managers, Sales and Product Marketing Managers
Unlock new opportunities for growth by discovering insights, automate processes, and predictive modeling
Execute Product driven data projects from database to analysis to insights to presentations
Write efficient SQL code and build effective Excel models to fuel analytical frameworks and dashboards
Develop analytical frameworks for future strategic initiatives and provide recommendations Product Managers to drive design decisions
Perform variance analyses against critical benchmarks to identify the root cause behind Product usage trends
Build/modify/maintain dashboards and reports to regularly communicate key Sales metrics and KPIs
Build predictive models based on Product Usage data
REQUIREMENTS
Minimum 4+ years of experience using data to facilitate Product decisions – Product Analytics role or Growth roles
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Business/Economics, STEM Degrees or similar fields
Excellent SQL and Excel skills
Strong understanding of growth principles, product development, and product go to market processes
Enterprise SaaS experience preferred
Great organization skills with the ability to manage competing priorities
Highly analytical with attention to detail
Self-driven with the ability to work in a self-guided manner
Strong problem-solving skills
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"virtually every new chip and advanced display in the world.
to transform possibilities into reality.
technology shaping the future.
an individual with strong business acumen and analytical skills to act as an
internal consultant on key workforce issues.
The HR Reporting and Analytics
Team s mission is to provide insights that help optimize business usi
evidence-based decision-making.
In this role, you will support evidence-
based decision making on Human Capital, design, develop and implement data-
based solutions that have a direct and measurable impact.
As a People Analytics Data Scientist, you will work with HR and the business in
achieving business results by using talent data to inform and improve decision-
making.
This position will utilize data analysis methodologies, tools and
approaches to provide insights.
This individual will be responsible for
translating business objectives and challenges into analytics priorities,
communicating the analytics findings to influence and inform business decisions
and solve high-value problems.
The individual must be highly data driven, technically proficient, creative,
detail-oriented, intellectually curious and an effective communicator.
This
role requires a significant understanding of data mining and analytical
techniques.
Key_Responsibilities
Partner closely with Senior Leadership, HR Business Partners, HR
colleagues in other functional areas and fellow HR&A team members to
identify key workforce issues impacting the business.
Use consulting skills to determine and articulate internal customer
business questions, develop the best approach for data analysis and turn
data into actionable insights & recommendations.
Participates in HR analytics projects to investigate potential measures,
correlations and causality connections for critical business issues
Merge structured, semi-structured and unstructured data from several
engaging and retaining talent
Develop hypotheses, document assumptions, and analyze results as they
relate to key business initiatives.
Explore and analyze the data creatively to identify HR analytics
solutions that adds value in the strategic decision-making process.
Perform complex data analysis and generate insight to support the HR
workforce analytics needs of the business, to drive more informed
business decisions
Use sophisticated data analytics techniques such as regression analysis,
factor analysis, t-tests, decision trees, ANOVA and forecasting methods
in application to business problems.
Prediction and trend analysis to anticipate the changes in the business,
and to enable better decision making.
Develop workforce planning frameworks, models and insights to support the
business in making data-driven decisions on complex business problems
Effectively communicate statistical analyses, results, and implications
to technical and non-technical audiences
Deliver high quality analysis, reports, presentations using simple and
effective visualizations that can be scaled for consumption by a larger
audience.
Stay current on industry trends and best practices regarding human
capital/workforce analytics.
Create and maintain monthly and quarterly workforce metrics and analysis.
Develop processes to streamline the compilation of periodic reporting/
analysis
Requirements
Master s degree in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Data
Science, Finance, Engineering, Computer Science, Management Science or
Econometrics.
3+ years experience in a quantitative or analytics role
Experience with Data Analytics using R/Python, statistical packages and
libraries, SQL, visualization tools like Tableau, Business Intelligence
(BI) tools, Hive, Excel.
Experience with data mining techniques and algorithms
Experience manipulating large data sets through statistical software or
other methods
Ability to create ad-hoc queries, join data from multiple sources to
perform complex analysis
Demonstrated ability to analyze complex issues, form hypotheses, analyze
to predict outcomes, determine solutions and recommendations.
Works effectively in an unstructured environment requiring new
perspectives and creative approaches
Stellar communication skills, critical thinking, and high attention to
detail
Strong consultative skills and the ability to build relationships with HR
and cross-functional partners
Ability to learn quickly and work within tight deadlines; self-starter;
must take personal initiative and will assume responsibility and
ownership
Basic financial knowledge (ROI, basic understanding of financial
statements), business acumen.
Proven ability to manage multiple projects and priorities in a dynamic
environment
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team
Ability to innovate through data and analytics to provide new insight to
the business
Preferred_Qualifications
Experience with HRIS systems like Workday
Experience in HR workforce analytics and HR data and metrics
Strong project management skills
#LI
QualificationsEducation:Master's Degree (Required)SkillsCertifications:
Languages:Years of Experience:7 - 10 YearsWork Experience:Additional
InformationTravel:Yes, 10% of the TimeRelocation Eligible:No
Employment Opportunity for Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and
Show moreShow less
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'correl', 'data', 'analyz', 'causal', 'financ', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'regress', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'correl', 'data', 'analyz', 'causal', 'financ', 'predict', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"The SBG team is searching for a Data Scientist.
Ideal candidates love breaking down problems, building solutions, delivering actionable and data-driven insights, and working in a fast-paced, dynamic environment.
Responsibilities:
Lead the design, analysis, and interpretation of projects from data requirement gathering to data processing, modeling, and recommendations
Partner with cross-functional teams to identify new opportunities requiring the use of modern analytical and modeling techniques
Design and execute experiments (e.g., A/B testing, multi-armed bandit)
Effectively communicate insights and recommendations to business leads and influence strategic decision-making
Frequently switch between on-the-ground tactical execution and 30k foot strategy
Mininum Qualifications:
BA/BS in a quantitative discipline like Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, Operations Research, or equivalent training
2+ years of experience in a data science capacity in a business strategy, marketing, finance, engineering, or analytics organization
Experience with data querying and manipulation using SQL, Python, or R
Experience with experimental design
Experience with data analysis and statistical modeling using the R or Python ecosystems, with packages such as pandas, statsmodels, scikit-learn, tidyverse (dplyr, ggplot2, etc.)
Communication and presentation skills
Preferred Qualifications:
An MBA or Masters or Doctorate degree in a quantitative discipline like Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, Operations Research
Self-starter, comfortable with ambiguity, ability to initiate and drive projects with minimal oversight and guidance
Proven track record of leveraging data to deliver business value and present data-driven insights to business audiences
Experience building cross functional relationships across a variety of functions to launch projects to drive business value
Experience communicating with and influencing technical and non-technical audiences (engineers, data scientists, program managers, marketers)
Experience developing data pipelines via SQL and Python-based ETL framework
Experience shipping code into production
Experience writing testable code
Comfortable using version control tools such as git or mercurial
Experience with Small Business landscape and/or online marketing and advertising
Experience working with or in support of diverse communities
","['git', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python']","['etl', 'experimental design', 'data', 'financ', 'bandit', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['git', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'etl', 'experimental design', 'data', 'financ', 'bandit', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Power the Possibilities
that will change the landscape for automotive dealers, original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) and the customers they serve.
Be Part of Something Bigger
It’s time you joined an evolving marketplace where research and development
investment is measured in the tens of billions.
It’s time you were a part of something bigger.
The possibilities for impact are endless.
The ideal candidate will have a mix of skills including engineering best practices, statistical expertise, and a strong business sense.
Your work could vary from building a recommendation model that finds someone the perfect vehicle, to identifying which parts on a vehicle are likely to fail and when.
You will need to take initiative, and be capable of finding solutions where there is no clear path forward.
POSITION CAN BE BASED IN SAN JOSE, CA OR AUSTIN, TX
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field
3-5 years of experience as a data scientist
Expertise with Python, including the data science stack (Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn)
Background in a variety of modeling techniques including recommendation systems, neural networks, XGBoost, NLP, and time-series forecasting.
Expertise using SQL for querying data
Cloud experience, AWS preferred
Proficient using Docker to deploy machine learning solutions
Experience exposing data science solutions as REST APIs and Batch processes
Familiar with big data technologies: Hadoop, Spark, and Hive
Experience with version control systems, CI/CD pipelines, and Agile workflow
Ability to take ill-defined business problems and translate them into actionable plans
Comfort with ambiguity and ability to act under uncertainty
Ability to communicate with engineers, data scientists, and nontechnical audiences
Preferred Skills:
Graduate degree in a quantitative field
Experience with NoSQL databases
Experience with streaming data and analytics using Kafka, Spark Streaming, or equivalent system
You have family, friends, sporting events, and lots of things going on.
","['nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'hive', 'docker', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'hive', 'docker', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Req ID: 94197
Select features, build and optimize classifiers using machine learning techniques
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Create automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
Basic Qualification:
Minimum of 3-5 year of excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, etc
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig and systems like SPARK.
3-5 years of experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Couchbase, or Cassandra
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience with applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience with scripting and programming skills
3-5 years of experience operating successfully in large-scale, highly complicated and global environments – Japan experience is a plus
Advanced technical degree
Nice to have:
Experience with NoSQL databases, such as Cassandra, MongoDB, or CouchDB
Experience with various messaging systems, such as MQTT or RabbitMQ
Experience working in public cloud environments like AWS, Azure.
Good understanding of Lambda Architecture, along with its advantages and drawbacks
Experience with Cloudera/MapR/Hortonworks
Experience working in large-scale, highly complicated and global environments – Japan experience is a plus
A strong team-oriented mindset
Experience with SQL and RDBMS systems for analytic querying
Experience using various ETL techniques and frameworks, such as Flume and Informatica
Nearest Major Market: San Jose
Nearest Secondary Market: Palo Alto
Job Segment:
","['nosql', 'lambda', 'spark', 'pig', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'sql', 'mongodb', 'aw', 'azur', 'hive', 'cloud']","['regress', 'etl', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'nn', 'svm', 'statist', 'anomali', 'segment']",1.0,"['nosql', 'lambda', 'spark', 'pig', 'cassandra', 'excel', 'sql', 'mongodb', 'aw', 'azur', 'hive', 'cloud', 'regress', 'etl', 'bay', 'machine learning', 'nn', 'svm', 'statist', 'anomali', 'segment']"
DS,"Youll be part of a work culture thats been genuinely committed to diversity and inclusion since its founding more than 20 years ago.
Here, you can just be yourself, do your best work, and have a meaningful impact on people across the globe.
If so, wed love to talk to you!
About the team:
selling, buyer experience, payment, risk, marketing, advertising ..
etc.)
with data services & products, the team focus on data engineering & machine learning & data product development.
Recent area you will focus on are abnormal signal detection and forecast upon time series data, natural language processing in argument analytics product, demand signal and forecast, graph embedding algorithms etc.
You will be responsible to work with data engineers on feature engineering, design and train machine learning models, research academic papers, adapt science with product requirements and engineering.
Role:
Anomaly detection of structured time series data
Demand forecasting and campaign optimization
Dynamic network analysis with recent advance in graph embedding techniques
Qualifications:
MS/PhD degree in CS/EE or related areas and top conference publication (ICML, ACL, KDD, WWW) are highly preferred
Outstanding expertise and hands-on 3-5 years of experience on machine learning (generative models, time series and network analysis)
Familiarity with Python with hands coding experience with Pytorch or Tensorflow
Familiarity with distributed data processing/analysis such as Map-Reduce and Spark
Passionate, proactive
Effective communication skills, both verbal and written
Benefits:
Benefits are an essential part of your total compensation for the work you do every day.
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
","['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'python']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'forecast', 'time series', 'commun']",2.0,"['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'python', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'forecast', 'time series', 'commun']"
DS,"Data Scientist - Analytics, Trust & Safety
Mountain ViewProduct - Data analysisExperienced
Responsibilities
TikTok is the leading destination for short-form mobile video.
TikTok has global offices in Los Angeles, Dublin, New York, London, Paris, Berlin, Dubai, Mumbai, Singapore, Jakarta, Seoul, and Tokyo.
You will help scope out projects, ideate on new strategies, and most importantly, use data to find insights, diagnose problems and tell compelling stories.
RESPONSIBILITES
Use data to identify trends, conduct root cause analysis and suggest potential opportunities for process improvements.
Develop metrics to evaluate risks of the platform and the effectiveness of safety programs.
Conceptualize, develop and maintain dashboards for risk detection and monitoring.
Influence stakeholders through data-based recommendations and mobilize cross-functional teams by telling compelling stories with data.
Qualifications
- 2+ years of experience in data science or quantitative analysis.
Experience with SQL, ETL, R/Python.
Degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Mathematics) or equivalent practical experience.
Strong communication skills across technical and non-technical audiences and the ability to synthesize and communicate complex concepts and analyses in easy to understand ways.
Experience with data modeling and statistical analysis techniques, including: hypothesis testing, model evaluation, and common regression and classification algorithms.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience in deep learning, distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop), or social network analysis.
Share to
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['risk', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'deep learning', 'econom', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'risk', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'deep learning', 'econom', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Do you have a passion for solving hard problems at scale?
Are you eager to join a trust- based, globally-connected team, where your contributions will make a meaningful difference?
* You have a sustained track record of making significant, self-directed, and end-to-end contributions to large and impactful machine learning projects.
* You are a driver.
You will be driving technical projects and providing leadership in a ground-breaking and fast-paced environment.
This includes task planning and conducting code reviews, as well as individual code contribution.
* You have a strong sense of data intuition.
You are able to work from first principles and intuition to develop solutions and adapt them to a unique environment.
* You are a broadly skilled data scientist with experience embedding models into always-on production systems, working across a variety of technologies and data sources.
* You have a product-focused mindset.
* You work with confidence and without ego.
You have strongly-held, defensible ideas, and advocate for what you believe is right.
You are also adept at identifying and evaluating trade-offs, willing to be proven wrong, and quick to walk through fire to support your fellow teammates.
* You value, seek out, and foster diversity.
To complement this team, you will welcome ideas that are different from your own and be skilled at finding and building from common ground.
What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate.
WHAT YOU WILL BE DOING:
* Lead Senior Data Scientists serve both as technical individual contributors and people managers.
You will be responsible for owning a technical area as well as building and nurturing a team.
* Lead Senior Data Scientists are end-to-end owners.
* You have an abundance of intellectual curiosity and are enthusiastic to learn (and teach) new technologies / techniques.
* You are you comfortable working on an agile, distributed team spanning multiple time zones and continents.
* You are able to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical audiences.
* You have over 10 years of experience working in a data-driven role, including leading large and impactful technical projects.
You may have an advanced degree in a quantitative field, but it's not a requirement.
All aspects of employment will be based on merit, competence, performance, and business needs.
",[None],"['machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"To get the most out of data-driven operations, businesses need the ability to continuously measure the performance of their data-driven operations at fine granularity across the entire pipeline.
Masters or PhD in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Mathematics, EE, Physics, Computer Science) or equivalent practical experience.
You are well-versed in the following:
Statistical software like R, Python Pandas, MATLAB
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets
Understand engineering performance requirements and translate that to implementation
You also have some experience in:
Striking a balance between statistical rigor and practicality; mastery of deep theory and love for simple stats
Instrumenting data-driven pipelines for continuous accuracy validation
You might also have experience in:
Database query language like SQL
Knowledge and experience with Tensorflow, Pytorch etc.
Understanding of AI/ML techniques
Non-technical attributes:
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction.
Willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to navigate under ambiguity.
","['pytorch', 'matlab', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['pytorch', 'matlab', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience in developing and deploying deep learning models, designing and executing A/B tests, and creating integrated feedback mechanisms for test and learn.
POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with stakeholders to define objectives and measure success, establish KPIs and measurement methodologies
Provide expertise to non-analytical peers within Marketing, Product and Engineering
Develop experimental designs to support test and learn
Size the impact of the models on key business measures
Build machine learning models using Python which can recommend optimal product, offer, content and information.
Provide actionable insights to drive key decisions across the marketing organization using a range of analytical/statistical techniques from descriptive analysis to predictive/explanatory models
Be a self-starter, eager to learn, and motivated by a passion for developing the best possible solutions to problems
REQUIREMENTS:
MS or Ph.D. or equivalent experience in a quantitative field such as computer or data science, economics, applied statistics or life sciences
3+ years of experience in developing and deploying machine learning and deep learning models in a professional setting
Knowledgeable about recent advancement in the field and possess a strong research mindset
Domains of expertise should include at least one of the following: collaborative filtering, content-based recommender systems, link-click prediction, NLP for information retrieval, computer vision or predictive customer targeting.
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as Tensorflow, Keras and/or Pytorch and developing statistical studies in Python/Jupyter
Advanced SQL skills
Practical experience with distributed data platforms: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, SPARK
Usage of cloud compute solutions, eg.
AWS, GCS or Azure
Experience with version control systems such as Github
Hands-on experience with Unix
","['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'aw', 'github', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'jupyt', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'computer vision', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'kpi', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",2.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'aw', 'github', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'jupyt', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'kpi', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
DS,"Minimum qualifications:
Master's degree in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, related field, or equivalent practical experience.
2 years of relevant work experience (e.g., as a data scientist) or equivalent.
Analytical engagements outside class work while at school can be included.
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python) and database languages (e.g., SQL)
Preferred qualifications:
PhD in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Statistics or related field.
4 years of relevant work experience (e.g., as a data scientist), including experience applying advanced analytics to planning and infrastructure problems.
Experience designing and building statistical forecasting models.
Experience designing and building machine learning models.
Excellent problem-framing, problem-solving and project management skills.
Excellent customer service and team collaboration skills.
About the job
As an analyst, you do more than just crunch the numbers.
Identifying the problem is only half the job; you also figure out the solution.
You will be comfortable discussing total cost of management with hardware engineers, resource optimization with software engineers, or reviewing fleet plans and deployment policies with operations executives, all based upon the analytical models that you will be developing.
Responsibilities
Lead projects with hands-on analysis and modeling, drawing from multiple of analytical methods to choose the right tool and right level of complexity appropriate for the business challenges.
Engage broadly with the organization to identify, prioritize, frame, and structure complex and ambiguous challenges, where advanced analytics projects or tools can have the biggest impact.
Identify and communicate the challenges and opportunities that the group should be working on.
Help define the analytical direction and influence the direction of the associated engineering and infrastructure work.
Articulate business questions and use mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using data.
Translate analysis results into business recommendations.
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
DS,"The position will require an incumbent who is comfortable working with some independence; consulting with and advisinginvestigators to refine research questions, define hypotheses and project objectives, design studies and devise analysis plans; and working with project team membersincluding clinicians, trainees, and other statisticians/informaticiststo implement analysis plans and publish findings.
The incumbent must be proficient at balancing involvement in multiple simultaneous projects and prioritizing to manage competing priorities.
The incumbent will work closely with others to interrogate databases to create analytic files, perform quality control and data cleaning, and manage and analyze data.
The incumbent must be an excellent and timely communicator, able to present results in oral and written form to clinical investigators.
Duties include:
Work directly with investigators and independently identify appropriate data analytic approaches; assist in study design and proposal development
Create analytic files with detailed documentation.
Prepare data for analysis by cleaning, identifying cohorts, reshaping data, creating new variables, merging multiple data tables, creating and maintaining new databases as needed.
Implement data analyses using predictive modeling approaches (machine-learning, deep-learning), or inferential statistical methods as appropriate to the project
Develop reusable and well-documented code for all projects, that can be maintained in a repository (e.g.
GitHub) for collaborative use
Quickly learn new skills as needs arise, such as new programming or statistical packages
Communicate and present results for investigators using graphs and tables.
* - Other duties may also be assigned DESIRED QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong background in machine learning, biostatistics, and bioinformatics
Willing and eager to learn new skills
Experience with large datasets and database use
); 2) Deep learning neural networks, transfer learning; 3) Hierarchical/multilevel modeling, propensity score matching/weighting
Experience with free-text data (e.g., natural language processing) is a plus, or else willingness to learn
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES (REQUIRED):
Proficient in SQL
Python experience or willingness to learn quickly, including packages such as Jupyter Notebook, matplotlib, pandas, scikit-learn, tensorflow/keras
Able to use GitHub, write reusable and well-documented code
Outstanding ability to communicate in written and oral English how data analyses were performed, to both technical and non-technical audiences.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS*:
Frequently perform desk based computer tasks, seated work and use light/ fine grasping.
Occasionally stand, walk, and write by hand, lift, carry, push pull objects that weigh up to 10 pounds.
WORKING CONDITIONS:May work extended or non-standard hours based on project or business cycle needs.
WORK STANDARDS:
Additional Information
http://ophthalmology.stanford.edu/
Requisition ID: 86845
","['kera', 'github', 'excel', 'sql', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'clean', 'graph', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']",999.0,"['kera', 'github', 'excel', 'sql', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'predict', 'biostatist', 'clean', 'graph', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat']"
DS,"Data Scientist, ML
Industry Leader
Talented technical team
Tons of room for upward career growth
What You Need for this Position
3+ Years of Data Science experience and knowledge of:
Developing practical ML solutions with an emphasis on regression and classification techniques
Proficiency with Python, R & Git
Strong SQL experience
Experimental Design and A/B testing
Behavioral Economics, Predictive Modeling & Predictive Analytics is highly desired
Bachelors degree (or higher) in Computer Science or related field
Experience with Payment Processing or pricing models is highly preferred
What's In It for You
EXCELLENT benefits Including:
Competitive salaries (DOE)
Bonus/equity
Vacation/PTO
Medical
Dental
Vision
401(k) and much more!
OR send your resume AND salary requirements to me directly: brenna.boies@gmail.com
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['r', 'git', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'predict', 'econom']",1.0,"['r', 'git', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'predict', 'econom']"
DS,"Responsibilities
), GWAS, EMR data, systems biology data, and more
Collaborate with software engineers and drug discovery researchers to implement and extend state-of-the-art algorithms and automated pipelines
Identify and evaluate potential new biomedical data sources and bioinformatic methodologies
Work cross-functionally with other internal teams to create and perform end-to-end analyses that include design, data gathering, processing, analysis, iteration with stakeholders, and presentation of results
Distill complex and heterogeneous data into actionable and interpretable insights
Requirements/Qualifications
Minimum of M.S.
degree in bioinformatics, computational biology, human genetics or a related field, and a sound understanding of both biology and statistics with 5 years independent bioinformatic research experience (PhD fulfills research experience and is a significant plus); or a B.S.
in physics, statistics, computer science and at least 5 years of industry experience in bioinformatics
Experience with statistics, omics, large-scale data ETL & integration, and machine learning is required
Preference for hands-on experience with packages like Salmon, Limma, VEP, NumPy, and SciKit-Learn
Proficiency in Python, R, and a Linux environment are required
Demonstrated problem solving and attention to detail are musts to be successful in this role
Demonstrated familiarity with best software engineering practices (testing, version control, etc.)
is preferred
Prior experience in an industry R&D environment is a plus
Demonstrated ability to rapidly learn new concepts
Startup minded: high energy, low maintenance, self-starter that is comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Cultural fit: genuine, collaborative, innovative, data-driven, and goal-oriented
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['linux', 'r', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['etl', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['linux', 'r', 'python', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'etl', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Lead Unlock new opportunities for growth by discovering insights, automate processes, and predictive modeling
Mentor junior data scientist with their career development and strengthen their analytical framework
Write efficient SQL code and build effective Excel models to fuel analytical frameworks and dashboards
Strong storytelling: distill interesting and hard-to-find insights into a compelling story
Build/modify/maintain dashboards and reports to regularly communicate key product, sales & marketing metrics and KPIs
REQUIREMENTS
6+ years of data science overall experience and 2+ years leading & building and data teams
Master's degree in Business/Economics, STEM Degrees or similar fields
Expert knowledge of one or more scientific computing languages and SQL
Strong understanding of growth principles, product development, and product go to market processes
Great organization skills with the ability to manage competing priorities
Highly analytical with attention to detail
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"It is supported by leading global investors and pharmaceutical, technology, and healthcare companies.
For more information, please visit www.grail.com
Working closely with scientists, clinicians, and engineers, you will develop machine learning and statistical methods to pull signals out of ultra-deep sequencing data and identify cancer at its earliest stages.
Your analysis will result in exciting discoveries in cancer biology, impactful publications, and products for early detection of cancer.
You Will:
Modeling and analysis of large, complex genomics datasets using advanced machine learning and statistical methods to generate predictions and biological insights.
Create and perform end-to-end analysis that include design, data gathering, processing, analysis, iteration with stakeholders, and presentation of results.
Interact cross-functionally with other teams including software, clinical, operations, research, and product development.
Maintain an active external scientific presence.
Your Background Will Include:
M.Sc.
or Ph.D in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, Statistics, Computational Biology, Genomics, Physics, or equivalent preparation and experience.
3 to 7 years (depending on level) relevant experience in positions of increasing responsibility.
Deep understanding of machine learning and statistics.
Proven track record of strong contributions demonstrated by highly cited publications, impactful tools, products, data sets used by the scientific community, presentations at international conferences, or awards.
Strong knowledge in at least one major programming language (e.g.
Python, Go, C++, R, Java) and proficiency in Linux environment, version control tools, and reproducible research practices.
Technical leadership and self-direction, willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
","['r', 'java', 'linux', 'python']","['sequenc', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'java', 'linux', 'python', 'sequenc', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Passionate about precision medicine and advancing the healthcare industry?Recent advancements in underlying technology have finally made it possible for AI to impact clinical care in a meaningful way.
",[None],['healthcar'],999.0,['healthcar']
DS,", 2020
Role Number:
200165871
Imagine what you could do here.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish!
A successful candidate will have a bent for proactive research and have the ability to tell stories using data.
Key Qualifications
Working knowledge of big data tools preferred (SQL, Spark, and Splunk)
EXCELLENT INTERPERSONAL, WRITTEN, AND VERBAL COMMUNICATION SKILLS
Confidence working independently and making key decisions on projects
Knowledge of machine learning algorithms including classifiers, clustering algorithms, and anomaly detection a plus
You will work hand-in-hand with other engineers, program managers, and business partners to identify problems, define solutions, execute plans, measure and communicate results on a regular basis.
Education & Experience
Master’s degree in a quantitive field preferred
Additional Requirements
","['excel', 'spark', 'sql', 'splunk']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'anomali']",2.0,"['excel', 'spark', 'sql', 'splunk', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'anomali']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"underlying radically more efficient logistics businesses.
freight market, Haulistix has been developed with the ambition to create a hyper growth
business.
intelligence at scale to have a real-life impact on the operational and financial
performance of hundreds of thousands of small and medium-sized trucking companies.
understanding real-life user behavior and creating innovative business models
market into highly profitable freight trips and sell them to small and medium-sized
trucking companies.
carriers' dispatch function and attack their tremendous inefficiency at one of its
root causes.
Unlike with simple load bookings directly through brokers or expensive software
materially improving their profitability one business transaction at a time.
Role
Working
directly with the founders, the data scientists/engineers will be interfacing cross-
house operations team as well as external contractors and select clients.
Key focus of
demand prediction, data-driven route optimization, pricing and revenue management
modeling, etc.
Responsibility
Building demand prediction models for future shipping orders (in terms of both
the volume and the price)
model for truck drivers trip planning
Building real-time and stochastic models for the events of traffic delay,
warehouse loading delay, accidents, etc.
for routing planning, revenue management, and robust sequential decision
making.
Skills
Critical Skills
Currently has obtained, or is in the process of obtaining Masters or Ph.D. degree
in highly quantitative field (CS, mathematics, statistics, operations research) or
equivalent experience
Experience applying various machine learning techniques on large-scale
datasets in Python or R
Experience in data visualization and exploratory data analysis
Experience building optimization models and designing dynamic programming
algorithms for real-world problems
Development experience in at least one scripting language, Python, Perl, or R
Thrive in the environment of a start-up, have a bias for action and be a thoughtful
and highly dedicated contributor and collaborator,
Have superior communication skills.
Preferred Skills:
Experience in web crawling and scrapping that ensure data integrity and create
data pipelines
Experience in route optimization and revenue management
Understanding of the mathematical underpinnings of the learning and
optimization models and algorithms, such as algorithms for convex, linear,
integer programs and Markov Decision Processes/Reinforcement Learning.
Strong programming skills in Java / Javascript
Employment Type
Full-time.
color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression,
pregnancy, age, religion, marital status, height, weight, familial status, disability, military
service, genetic information, or any other category protected by federal, state or local law.
Powered by JazzHR
","['python', 'r', 'perl', 'javascript', 'java']","['machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['python', 'r', 'perl', 'javascript', 'java', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'predict', 'reinforc', 'optim', 'research', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The Opportunity
The ideal candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field and experience working with product teams and making data-driven decisions.
You will collaborate with other data scientists, engineers, product managers, product designers, user researchers and education partners to build user-facing experiences to influence the direction of Education!
With Summit Learning, students gain the skills, knowledge and habits to succeed in college and enter adulthood with a clear vision for achieving purpose and wellbeing in life.
For example, how product impacts student performance on cognitive skills, how schools onboard onto the program or how professional development impacts on onboarding etc.
The data science team defines measurements, product metrics, provides product insights through analysis, recommends what to improve and build next, as well as collaborates & communicates with the cross-functional & leadership teams.
You will
Leverage data to understand product, identify areas of opportunity, and execute projects to drive retention & engagement of users on existing features & new pilots.
Collaborate & communicate with product, engineering, data, research, user research, educators and leadership & cross organization teams to execute, inform on current roadmap & influence next roadmap.
Design and develop product metrics, create insightful automated dashboards and data visualization to track them and extract actionable product insights.
Analyze both structured and unstructured data; develop exploratory & deep-dive analysis.
Conduct written and verbal presentation to share insights and recommendations to audiences of varying levels of technical sophistication.
You have
4+ years of product related work experience or equivalent within tech, finance, consulting or a related industry.
Extensive quantitative or statistical analysis experience, for example, hypothesis testing, experimentation, statistical modeling, time series analysis, natural language processing and psychometrics.
Extensive work experience including metrics development, data exploration, solving problems using data, building product intuition, data visualization, and providing practical business insight using data.
Excellent coding skills in SQL, and R or Python.
Excellent communications skills, with the ability to synthesize, simplify and explain complex problems to different types of audience, including executives.
Experience in working with cross-functional teams of product managers, engineers, designers, researchers and other data scientists & analysts.
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python']","['hypothesi', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'natural language processing', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'nlp', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Are you excited by the prospect of using Big Data and AI to drive business processes?
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Pitch your ideas to senior executives
Demonstrated thought-leadership with a passion for translating data into action and business insights
Manage cross-functional teams (Product + Engineering, Marketing, Sales …) to get your ideas off the ground
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Mentor junior data scientists on best practices
WHO YOU ARE
MS/PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics or other quantitative fields
5+ years professional experience in a data science role
Proficient in Python or Scala/Java.
Familiarity with Javascript or R preferred
Expertise in SQL and working with relational databases.
Experience with Spark or Hadoop a plus
Familiarity in Linux/Unix environments
Demonstrated ability to design and develop, and launch machine learning-driven data products
Exceptional ability to communicate and build relationships with senior executives
BENEFITS
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY
","['unix', 'linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'javascript', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Note:
Provide full legal first Name/Family Name
DO: Capitalize first letter of First and Last Name.
Example: John Smith
DON'T: Capitalize entire First and/or Last Name.
Example: JOHN SMITH
NOTE: Use correct grammar for Names with multiple cases.
Example: McDonald or O'Connell
Provide full address details
Resume is required
Multiple attachments can be uploaded including Resume and Cover Letter for each application
In the role, your responsibilities will be:
Transform large amount of complex data into business insights and solutions by using latest technology in machine learning, pattern recognition, text mining, and parallel/distributed computing
Conduct research on latest technologies and tools in data-mining industry and develop prototype for business use cases
Provide technology and research support in design of new products
Rapidly learn new concepts and contexts (technical, risk, payments, ecommerce)
The ideal candidates are problem solvers, equipped with strong analytical, mathematical, and programming skills suited to approach various kinds of challenges in complex environments.
Candidates must be quick learners with a strong sense of personal responsibility and a technical orientation, and have Passion for data analytics, innovation and technologies
Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering or similar
Experience in modeling and analytics
Good working knowledge of Python/Java or other major programming languages.
Fluent in Linux/Unix environment
1-2 years related work experience and payment industry knowledge - an advantage
Hadoop experience (MapReduce, PIG, Hive, Spark) – an advantage
Strong interpersonal skills and capability to work successfully in a collaborative environment
Quick-thinker, fast learner, wide general knowledge, problem solver
Team worker, responsible, delivery-oriented
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
San Jose, California, United States of America
Additional Locations:
","['mapreduc', 'unix', 'linux', 'spark', 'pig', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'unix', 'linux', 'spark', 'pig', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA
Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or Mathematics, related quantitative discipline, or equivalent practical experience.
Experience in data science with a focus on marketing analytics, statistical modeling, machine learning, forecasting and optimization.
Experience in Python and/or R, and in data management systems.
Preferred qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, or Mathematics.
Experience with big data and cloud platforms to deploy large-scale data science solutions.
Experience working in industries such as retail, financial services, telecommunications and automotive (including in a client-facing consulting or advisory capacity), and the ability to navigate complex business organizations and manage multiple cross-functional stakeholders.
Understanding of media and the statistical algorithms typically used in marketing analytics.
About the job
gTech’s Professional Services team takes a creative, collaborative, and customer-centric approach to provide foundational services and forward-looking business solutions to top advertiser and publisher customers.
Through technical implementation, optimization, and key solutions, gTech Professional Services helps customers attain their business goals while building long-term capabilities.
gTech Professional Services takes a creative, collaborative, and customer-centric approach to provide foundational services and forward-looking business solutions to top advertiser and publisher customers.
Through technical implementation, optimization, and key solutions, gTech Professional Services helps customers attain their business goals while building long-term capabilities.
Responsibilities
Designing new methodologies, pulling necessary data, building statistical and machine-learned models with accuracy, and analyzing experiments, applying critical thinking throughout.
Collaborating across internal teams and clients, and managing opportunities and challenges in ways that improve processes and help clients become more data savvy.
Communicating and visualising insights to multiple levels of stakeholders with clarity, informing decision-making.
","['r', 'cloud', 'python']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['r', 'cloud', 'python', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 24, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200177341
The Ad Platforms Data Insights team is seeking a data scientist to join in developing the next generation of analytical solutions.
Within this data centric team, you will drive the exploration, analysis, development, execution, and measurement of advanced analytical solutions.
You will be responsible for turning the huge amounts of data generated by user searches, app content, and App Store context into business insights that improve the customer experience for the end-user, as well as drive discovery and productivity for app developers.
A successful candidate will have deep experience in applied methods (pattern mining, anomaly detection, text analytics, predictive modeling, classification, and optimization) and using those methods to drive key business insights.
The role requires both a broad knowledge of existing data mining algorithms and creativity to invent and customize.
Be ready to partner with a broad range of data professionals and business leaders within sales, marketing, finance, product, and Engineering.
Successful analytics teams involve a diverse group of data scientists and data engineers working hand in hand to build insightful and efficient solutions.
In this role, expect to be a key team member of a multi-functional team that delivers insights that have a direct and measurable impact!
Key Qualifications
4+ years of recent data science and or analytics experience.
Preferably experience in the digital advertising industry or related field.
Experience in a product analytics role is preferred.
Are you able to operate comfortably and effectively in a fast-paced, highly cross-functional, rapidly changing environment?
Programming skills in Python and SQL, and comfortable with advanced analytics tools such as R, Spark, and Tableau.
Ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner with product and leadership teams to influence the overall strategy of the product.
Experience in advanced quantitative analysis including regression, classification, clustering, and time-series analyses.
Shown experience with end to end implementation of a model prototype specifically processing, feature engineering, and model outputs.
Comfortable working with modern data technologies.
Familiarity with database modeling and data warehousing principles.
- Support Product Marketing, Partner Development, and the Executive Team with analytics for product performance and customer insights.
Empower the global Partner Development teams with insights to advise and fulfill their strategic objectives and goals for every fiscal quarter.
Work closely with the product team to identify and size new opportunities, develop data requirements, establish appropriate KPIs, and establish accurate reporting.
Quantify the impact of product, sales, and marketing initiatives on customer happiness, and future behavior.
Manage business analytic projects through all phases, including data quality, data modeling, algorithm/KPI development, statistical analysis, data visualization, and presentation of results and deliverables.
Design and evaluate experiments that help define opportunities for increased usage, improved marketplace performance, and greater customer happiness.
Develop reusable models and assets working closely with Data Technology team to ensure scalability and industrialization as models move into production.
Education & Experience
Masters or Bachelors degree in a quantitative field of study including statistics, math, economics, operations research or a related discipline.
","['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['regress', 'text analytics', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'text analytics', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'data modeling']"
DS,"By applying for this role, you could choose to work in the following locations:
Los Angeles
Sunnyvale
San Francisco
Are you a Data Scientist or ML Engineer who’s interested in tackling very challenging adversarial problems and passionate about defending online users against abuse, spam, and manipulation?
Do you love working on complicated problems that require a multi-disciplinary approach, creative solutions, and rapid product iterations?
Will you be proud to work on a real-time, scalable system that serves millions of users daily?
Joining the team today means you’ll make the conversations of tomorrow possible.
It’s not always easy, but nothing worth doing ever is.
What You’ll Do:
You will be a key member of the Integrity Data Science (IDS) team within Health Engineering.
As such, you will:
Write complex data flows using Spark, Scalding, Scala, Python and SQL.
Use Graph processing to model user and engagement data allowing to detect platform manipulations and inauthentic behaviors.
Work with engineering to implement detection and mitigation at scale, as well as tools to assist agents in their investigations.
Communicate findings to executives and multi-functional product teams.
Who You Are:
Capable of operation at senior level or above as a Data Scientist or ML Engineer.
3 plus years of industry or graduate level research experience working on platform manipulation, or relevant security issues.
A self-starter who is capable of learning on the job, takes initiative, and can thrive within a large team.
You can pivot from blockers and develop an innovative approach when there are no precedents.
You form sound hypotheses for largely unknown problems (through a combination of product domain knowledge and logical reasoning) and quickly iterate on data exploration.
You are a strategic problem solver and are able to synthesize methodology and data into meaningful product and/or public policy strategy from your analyses.
Here’s all the legal good stuff:
","['sql', 'scala', 'spark', 'python']","['graph', 'research', 'commun', 'data']",2.0,"['sql', 'scala', 'spark', 'python', 'graph', 'research', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"You will have the opportunity to work on a broad spectrum of areas such as hardware or Equipment Failure Prediction, Operational Tools Automation, Demand Forecasting, Alert Optimization, Supply Chain Optimization, Inventory & Capacity Planning, Process Design & Optimization, and Financial Modeling.
This is a full-time role based in Fremont, CA.
Responsibilities:
Partner with internal stakeholders on projects to identify and articulate opportunities, see beyond the data to identify solutions that will raise the bar for decision making.
Collaborate with cross-functional data and product teams across business applications to access and manipulate data, explain data gathering requirements, make recommendations, display results, and build efficient and scalable analytics solutions.
Analysis of operational data and user behavior to improve overall business performance.
Define, compute, track, and continuously validate business metrics with descriptive and predictive analytics.
Architect, build and maintain data driven machine learning models, experiments, forecasting algorithms, and optimization models.
Mentor others as needed on best practices for design and implementation of cutting-edge analytics solutions.
Communicate final recommendations and drive decision making.
Mininum Qualifications:
MS in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Quantitative Finance, Math, Statistics, Physics or a related Engineering degree.
Experience with Machine Learning, Statistics, or other data analysis tools and techniques.
Experience with statistics methods such as forecasting, time series, hypothesis testing, classification, clustering or regression analysis.
Experience writing testable code and shipping code into production.
Experience using version control tools such as git or mercurial.
7+ years experience in building models and developing algorithms for machine learning, statistics, mathematical programming, and simulation in industry and/or academia.
7+ years experience in managing and analyzing large-scale structured and unstructured data using R or Python.
7+ years experience in SQL in big data environments (i.e.
Hadoop) and data modeling.
Experience with scientific computing and analysis packages such as NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, dplyr, or ggplot2.
Experience with machine learning libraries and packages such as PyTorch, Caffe2, TensorFlow, Keras or Theano.
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Matplotlib, Pyplot, ggplot2.
Preferred Qualifications:
PhD in Computer Science or relevant fields.
Knowledge of deep learning research.
Familiarity with object-oriented programming languages (such as C++ or Java) and visualization tools (such as Tableau).
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'git', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'predict', 'time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'hardwar', 'regress', 'financial modeling', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",3.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'git', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'tensorflow', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'predict', 'time series', 'statist', 'data modeling', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'hardwar', 'regress', 'financial modeling', 'cluster', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Seeking a high performing, analytical data scientist to build and maintain data pipelines, scripts and dashboards and supporting the development of experiment design and tools to monitor and explain key metrics due to program changes and/or machine learning enhancements.
Top Responsibilities:
Build and maintain data pipelines and scripts that support pipelines.
Build and maintain dashboards that report on key model performance metrics.
Additional statistical analysis providing insight into program change impact and key metrics.
Skill/Experience/Education
experience working in a cross-functional data science team
experience working with all different stages of data analysis: data querying, building reporting pipelines, running statistical analysis, building dashboards.
strong business acumen
SQL, R or Python
MS/MA Degree Required - technical concentration (Mathematics, statistics, physics, engineering, computer science, etc.)
2+ yrs experience in data analytics/data science/ data engineering role
strong understanding of machine learning models
This is a contractor position (40 hr/wk full time role) at Google -- includes health benefits & 401k
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"There are many examples of disruption in the consumer space – Uber disrupting the cab industry, Airbnb disrupting the hospitality industry and so on; but have you wondered who is disrupting support and operations?
The ideal candidate will have experience in several of the following areas:
Experience in designing and developing software and algorithms for natural language processing and conversational AI.
Experience Development and implementation of novel methods for data extraction from free text data, including named entity recognition, relation extraction, part of speech tagging, etc.
Experience coding and debugging deep learning neural networks for text processing in PyTorch, Keras and/or TensorFlow using Python
Experience in building large-scale NLP systems from researching a prototype to production
Experience in Development and implementation of methods for topic modeling, document clustering and text summarization.
Experience with the key open source software resources in these domains.
Strong communication and writing skills in English are essential.
The ideal candidate will have a proven track record of scientific publication in the fields of machine learning, deep learning, and/or natural language processing.
Must be eligible to work in the U.S.
Education / Experience:
3 - 5 years Experience with a Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Natural Language Processing, Computational Linguistics, Statistics, Mathematics or related discipline.
","['tensorflow', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['tensorflow', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'nlp', 'nn', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Principal Data Scientist-Search
Artificial Intelligence is transforming the world in almost every industry.
Everyone knows only good training data can produce the best machine learning solutions.
However, creating training data with high quality in a scalable way is very challenging, and very few companies can do it.
The whole AI world is starving for great training data.
It generates all kinds of training data like content relevance, image & video, text & audio, as well as data capturing.
You will build crowd CRM systems to mine, engage, match, and recommend good crowd workers with most suitable data labelling jobs.
Key Responsibilities
Build search and recommendation systems to match high-quality crowd workers with most suitable projects;
Participate in cutting edge research in the recommendation system, search ranking, and crowd management areas.
Serve as subject matter expert and drive thought leadership in the areas of machine learning, recommendation, relevance ranking, and information retrieval areas.
Mentoring and coaching junior staff, driving internal operational excellence, and developing a career for junior data scientists.
Requirements
Master or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science or related areas is required for this position.
7+ years of industrial experience in recommendation systems, relevance ranking, and information retrieval areas.
Solid understanding of deep learning tech
Excellent communications skills, both verbal and written in English
Hands-on experience in developing backend services.
Familiar with Java, Python, or other programming languages.
Have good track records of architecting and developing recommendation systems and search engine solutions in large scale industry setup.
Have extensive industry experience in the recommendation and search domain with the ability to validate ideas before implementation.
Please note that by applying to this role, you are agreeing to be considered for multiple positions.
","['excel', 'java', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'java', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: New York, NY, USA; Mountain View, CA, USA; Seattle, WA, USA
Minimum qualifications:
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Bioinformatics, Economics) or equivalent practical experience.
10 years of experience in data analysis or related field as a Statistician, Data Scientist, Computational Biologist, or bioinformatician.
5 years of experience in people management or leadership.
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages.
Preferred qualifications:
Doctorate's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Operations Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Industrial Engineering).
12 years of tech industry work experience as a statistician, bioinformatician, or data scientist.
Experience in statistical data analysis, such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, and sampling methods.
8 years of leadership experience, including people management.
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Ability to select the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem.
About the job
As a Technical Lead, you do more than just crunch the numbers.
Identifying the problem is only half the job; you also figure out the solution.
With your leadership and professional expertise, you manage a team of analysts, plan project goals and lead the overall strategy for your group.
You are a recognized authority in your functional area and develop, organize and launch projects that span engineering and analysis.
Responsibilities
Work with large datasets and solve difficult analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods.
Conduct end-to-end analyses, including data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Make business recommendations with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.
Research and develop analyses and forecasting and optimization methods across ads quality, search quality, end-user behavioral modeling, and live experiments.
Manage a data science team.
","['r', 'panda', 'matlab', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'panda', 'matlab', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The cost of that exclusion is significant $25 billion is lost by migrants every year through remittance fees.
You will enjoy working with rich financial and behavioral data sets, a world class team, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products and strategy on a regular basis.
The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, experience working with large data sets, data-driven decision making, and trading or investing experience especially in high frequency environments for currencies.
You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive understanding, growth, and success of a product and/or strategy.
Responsibilities:
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems, inform solutions creatively with a variety of data, and identify trends and opportunities
The Data Scientist Gateway Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Exploratory Analysis: Understanding the liquidity partner, exchange, and broker/dealer relationships to develop strategies to lower cost, Understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends, Building models for user or partner behaviors for analysis to power production systems, Identifying new levers to help move key metrics
Product Leadership: Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, communicating state of business, experiment results, etc.
to product teams
Data Infrastructure: Working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica, Automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:
4+ years experience doing quantitative analysis in a fast paced environment
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent experience
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Knowledge of statistics (e.g.
hypothesis testing, regressions)
Proven experience leading data-driven projects from definition to execution: defining metrics, experiment design, communicating actionable insights
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex.
R, SAS) or other methods
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in high frequency trading FX
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
","['perl', 'sql', 'mysql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa']","['regress', 'etl', 'data', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['perl', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa', 'regress', 'etl', 'data', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Posted: May 18, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200161665
The Product Marketing Customer Analytics team is seeking a Sr. Data Scientist with deep technical and consultative experience in business analytics and analytic engineering.
Key Qualifications
Excellent understanding of analytical methods and machine learning algorithms including regression, clustering, classification, optimization, regularization, dimensionality reduction and other advanced analytic techniques.
5+ years of industry experience building data science driven solutions to solve business problems.
3+ years of hands-on coding skills (Python, R, and Spark preferred) processing large-scale data, deriving key insights, developing machine learning models on structured and unstructured data, and maintaining production machine learning pipelines that are part of a production-type analytic solution.
Solid technical database and data modeling knowledge (Oracle, Hadoop, Teradata), and experience optimizing SQL queries on large dataset.
2+ years of experience working with Tableau or other data visualization technologies.
Outstanding written, verbal, and presentation skills with the ability to develop and present conclusions and recommendation to senior executives.
Able to work effectively on sometimes ambiguous data and constructs within an fast changing environment, tight deadlines and priority changes.
Team player who enjoys collaborating with others.
Support Product Marketing, Investor Relations, and the Executive Team with analytics for customer product and services engagement.
Conduct regular and ad-hoc analyses, data mining and predictive analytics to provide leadership with actionable insights at tactical and strategic levels related to the active customer and device install base.
Conceive and design end-to-end optimized data modeling pipelines and customer analytic scripted solutions using Python and/or Spark.
Manage data science projects through all phases, including data quality, data modeling, algorithm/feature development, statistical analysis, and data visualization.
Education & Experience
Graduate degree required in Business (with quantitative emphasis), Statistics, Data Mining, Machine Learning, Analytics, Econometrics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, or related field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'oracl']","['regress', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'dimensionality reduction', 'predict', 'econometr', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'oracl', 'regress', 'data modeling', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'dimensionality reduction', 'predict', 'econometr', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Do you love the idea of rapidly iterating on new features and finding the ones which move the needle and hit customer engagement out of the ballpark?
AWS* Experience developing, building and scaling machine learning models in business applications using large amounts of data* Ability to communicate and explain data science concepts to diverse audiences, craft a compelling story* Focus on business practicality and the 80/20 rule; very high bar for output quality, but recognize the business benefit of ""having something now"" vs ""perfection sometime in the future""* Agile development mindset, appreciating the benefit of constant iteration and improvementIt's great, but not required, if you have* Experience working in an enterprise or B2B space, as well as the consumer or B2C space* Familiarity working with go-to-market (GTM), buyer experience and Growth teams (in addition to Product and Engineering)* Experience with Hive, Hadoop or other large-scale data frameworks* Knowledge of A/B experimentationOur teamThis team is being built within the broader Analytics group and tasked to pursue business opportunities that can generate revenue or MAU improvements.
The team works multi-functionally across the organization, using insights generated by marketing and product analytics that can be scaled or automated to generate business value.
","['hadoop', 'hive', 'aw']","['machine learning', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['hadoop', 'hive', 'aw', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; San Bruno, CA, USA; Seattle, WA, USA; San Francisco, CA, USA
Minimum qualifications:
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., Statistics, Operations Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Industrial Engineering) or equivalent practical experience.
2 years of work experience in data analysis related field.
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL)
Preferred qualifications:
PhD degree in a quantitative discipline.
4 years of relevant work experience, including expertise with statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, sampling methods.
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating and translating business questions and using statistical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction.
Willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
About the job
You will collaborate with a multi-disciplinary team of engineers and analysts on a wide range of problems.
This position will bring scientific rigor and statistical methods to the challenges of product creation, development and improvement with an appreciation for the behaviors of the end user.
Responsibilities
Work with large, complex data sets.
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Conduct analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Interact cross-functionally, making business recommendations (e.g., cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'panda', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"As a Senior Principal Data Scientist within the Data Science & Services (DSS) team at DIS, you are responsible for conceptualizing, planning and executing advanced analytics projects to discover key insights improving NAVIFY product portfolio leading to better and more efficient patient care.
In close cooperation with other more Scientists you will design and execute advanced analytics projects building on a wide range of commercial and research datasets containing deep medical information.
As a Senior Principal Data Scientist, you will also ensure that design, execution, and presentation of analytical results are adhering to industry standards and potentially improve and redefine current industry standards.
You will rely on your oncology expertise, advanced analytical skills, and your ability to interact with cross-functional experts such as biostatisticians, clinical scientists and oncologists, to discover novel insights demonstrating impact of various treatment decisions, and uncover key elements leading to best outcomes for patients.
In addition, you will maintain and expand knowledge of available healthcare data sources and applicable state-of-the- art analytical methodologies, large scale data processing and visualization, and languages and tools (R, Python, (no-)SQL, Hadoop, Spark, etc.).
Responsibilities Include:
Drive data science and analytical software development teams; develop solutions to support insight generation facilitating successful development, verification and commercialization of diagnostics services and products.
Contribute to broad product support initiatives, lead and deliver on complex projects, and interact with external partners without supervision.
Perform high quality, timely and accurate analyses using most relevant state-of-the-art methodologies, tools and resources.
Committed to offering innovation, finding opportunities to enhance ways of working (including processes, methods, technology etc.)
and sharing new techniques and lessons learned pro-actively with peers.
Use and continue to foster strong working relationships with global colleagues and customers and builds a strong network in order to jointly explore vendor relationships, data assets, analytical methodologies and toolsets.
Build and maintain partnerships with other data scientists and analysts, biostatistics, medical and business leaders, and other key functional experts.
Responsible for planning and timely delivery of assigned projects.
Drive creation of best practices to other team members.
Proactively share learnings/experience with colleagues both internal and external to the function.
Act as a positive role model for peers and help coach colleagues to improve in their role with both technical and interpersonal skills.
Influence as thought leader in your industry and an influential subject matter expert to your team members and the businesses you support.
Leverage strategic organizational awareness and systems mindset to implement sustainable, science based practices.
Who you are:
Data savvy creative thinker, problem solver and mentor.
Reliable team player, strong collaborator with ability to influence and a thought partner/leader.
Organizationally savvy, systems thinker.
Excellent communication skills, effective stakeholder management ability.
Life learner, constructive at giving and receiving feedback.
Strong solution finding, resiliency and a sense of ownership; Effective prioritization skills, attention to detail and accuracy; Adaptable, embraces and endorses change.
Minimum Skills and Experience:
Master’s degree (PhD strongly preferred) in a Data Science or related field (e.g.
Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, etc.)
required plus 16 years of experience; or PhD and 12 years of experience.
Graduate training or experience in biological/medical field is highly preferred.
Strong background in Oncology, either by education or professional experience.
Strong Programming experience with R, Python, and/or other quantitative software.
Strong experience in applying statistical modeling, machine learning, exploratory, and confirmatory data analysis in mid to large volume biomedical data sets.
Experience using big data platforms such as Hadoop (Spark is a plus).
In-depth knowledge of relational database principles and corresponding query language skills (e.g.
SQL) is of interest.
Familiarity with regulatory framework and guidelines for pharma/diagnostics products is a plus.
Good knowledge of English in a business environment.
Excellent communication skills with an ability to negotiate successfully; strong influencing skills; self-contained and outgoing approach.
Strong solution finding, prioritization and attention to details skills while embracing/endorsing change.
Research & Development, Research & Development > Modelling & Simulation
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'biostatist', 'supervis', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Posted: Sep 11, 2019
Role Number:
200101632
Do you have a passion for invention and self-challenge?
Do you thrive on pushing the limits of what’s considered feasible?
You’ll work across disciplines to transform improved hardware elements into a single, integrated design.
This position works for Battery/Cell Development team within HW Engineering to identify trends, mine data, and help battery team improve performance.
Key Qualifications
3-5 years as data scientist or analyst.
Battery Engineering experience desired.
Strong working knowledge of Minitab, JMP, Python, or Tableau necessary.
Solid competency in statistics and the ability to provide valuable analysis.
Working knowledge and experience with big data.
Self-starter with entrepreneurial experience and ability to interact with other functions in matrix environment.
Proven creativity to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to the problem.
Familiarity with database modeling and data warehousing principles.
- Provide insight to problem solving by using engineering skills and all available data.
Analyze factory, user, and failure data and use engineering understanding mechanisms to resolve battery problems.
Design, implement, process and interpret data
Automate reporting where possible to make team more efficient Utilize advanced technologies, for modeling enhancements
Work with diverse teams including data scientists, engineers, product managers, and executives
Deliver high quality analytic insights from a very large scale data warehouse
Set up quality reporting system for sharing information
Provide ad-hoc reporting as necessary (sometimes urgent escalation)
Education & Experience
MS or Ph.D. in Battery Engineering, Data Mining, Machine Learning, Statistics, Operations Research or related field.
CSSBB, CQE desired.
","['tableau', 'python']","['big data', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",2.0,"['tableau', 'python', 'big data', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis.
The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making.
You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product.
Responsibilities:
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operations: Forecasting and setting product team goals, designing and evaluating experiments, monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics, building and analyzing dashboards and reports, building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis, and evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis: proposing what to build in the next roadmap, understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends, identifying new levers to help move key metric, and building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership: influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, communicating state of business, experiment results, etc.
to product teams and spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure: working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica, and automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Knowledge of statistics (e.g.
hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (e.g.
R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Experience working within the tech sector preferred
","['perl', 'sql', 'mysql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa']","['regress', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['perl', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa', 'regress', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Posted: May 21, 2020
Role Number:
200161835
These engineers build secure, end-to-end solutions.
Do you want to make impact on how decisions are made by Engineering teams?
If you love statistics, data, analysis and influencing teams on how to run experiments then look no further.
This role will be working daily with researchers and engineers on the Search and Recommendations teams as they develop better algorithms and improve their models.
Key Qualifications
Five or more years relevant industry experience required.
Extensive knowledge in statistical methods and data mining.
Excellent application skills in experimentation methodologies and causal inferences.
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R/Python and libraries like pandas, dplyr and ggplot.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL and Hive.
Experience with Big Data systems and distributed computing, such as Hadoop and Spark.
Excellent communication skills with the ability to explain findings in layman terms and influence decision makers.
Attention to data detail with regards to quality, transformation and potential impact.
Your primary focus will be on applying statistical methods, developing A/B testing procedures, and automating data pipelines to develop new metrics.
In this role you will: Work with engineering teams to improve data collection procedures.
Process, clean, and verify the integrity of data.
Design experiments that will measure and test for key performance indicators.
Model and analyze data using state-of-the-art methods.
Generate reports (that can be automated) to present key insights to partners across a variety of teams.
Drive end-to-end data applications to address business needs.
Education & Experience
Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related discipline.
PhD preferred.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'causal', 'analyz', 'clean', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'dplyr', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'big data', 'data mining', 'data', 'causal', 'analyz', 'clean', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"WhatsApp is a private, simple and reliable way to talk to anyone in the world.
2+ billion people in over 180 countries use WhatsApp to connect with friends and family.
You will have the unique opportunity to be part of this incredible lean team thats making this magic happen.WhatsApp is seeking a Data Scientist with experience in differential privacy.
In this role, you will partner with a cross functional team, including product, engineering, legal, marketing, etc.
to drive privacy focused initiatives.
Responsibilities:
Drive strategic org-wide initiatives and serve as tech lead on critical projects on data privacy
Develop and articulate long term strategy around data privacy
Establish strong collaboration with a diverse cross functional team
Mininum Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science or other quantitative fields, or equivalent practical experience.
7+ years experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Experience in differential privacy.
Experience in Python, SQL or other programming languages.
Understanding of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, statistical inference, regressions, ML systems).
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product.
Preferred Qualifications:
Development experience in any scripting language (Python, R, etc.)
Experience in designing or implementing differential privacy in data systems
Outstanding communication skills
Experience to visualize data in a meaningful way to tell a story
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'data', 'econom', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'data', 'econom', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Who You Are
What A Great Candidate Looks Like:
‍Outstanding quantitative analytical ability
Independent and creative approach to problem solving
At least 5+ years of professional industry experience, in addition to your academic experience
MS or higher in the following areas: Statistics and Mathematics
In-depth knowledge of Statistics/Probability/Machine learning
General Statistical concepts such as hypothesis testing, estimation, inference
Supervised and unsupervised statistical models such as regression (linear / logistic), time series models (ARIMA / DLM), clustering, dimension reduction
Predictive Machine Learning algorithms such as Random Forest, Boosting, SVMs
Strong programming experience in two or more of the following: R, Python, Scala/Java
Understanding of algorithm complexity and performance implications
Knowledge of elementary data structures
Exposure to NLP models such as Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA), Latent Semantic Analysis (LSA), Sentiment models, Named Entity Recognition (NER) is a big plus
Basic knowledge in SQL
Members of the Data Science team translate real world problems into quantitative language, find or create algorithms to solve those problems, and implement them in code.
","['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['probabl', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'probabl', 'hypothesi', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'svm', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Note:
Provide full legal first Name/Family Name
DO: Capitalize first letter of First and Last Name.
Example: John Smith
DON'T: Capitalize entire First and/or Last Name.
Example: JOHN SMITH
NOTE: Use correct grammar for Names with multiple cases.
Example: McDonald or O'Connell
Provide full address details
Resume is required
Multiple attachments can be uploaded including Resume and Cover Letter for each application
Design, develop and implement advanced predictive models using advanced data mining and machine learning techniques
Collaborate with other data scientists and engineers to formulate innovative solutions to experiment and implement advanced data mining techniques
Work with large volumes of data; extract and manipulate large datasets using standard tools such as Python, Hadoop, R, SQL and SAS
Analyze data covering a wide range of information from user profile to transaction history.
Identify new customer behavior patterns through data mining
Communicate complex concepts and the results of the analyses in a clear and effective manner through creative visualization
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
San Jose, California, United States of America
Additional Locations:
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'account', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'account', 'visual', 'commun']"
DS,"FB processes tens of billions of dollars annually for advertisers, partners, and users.
As a result, you will get a chance to work with a team of ML engineers, and help them with their strategies and experimentations.This role will focus on 5 key areas:
Coach/Tech lead other ICs on the team
You are a fit if you:
Enjoy catching fraudsters in an adversarial system.
Enjoy holistic thinking through tradeoffs and optimization.
Are energized by product iterations through pattern surfacing, hypothesis testing, and deep behavioral analytics.
Enjoy driving or influencing product roadmaps with your cross functional partnersTend to see/seize opportunities in complex or ambiguous areas.
Responsibilities:
Define problems and opportunities in a complex or ambiguous area
Monitor events through dashboards, detect anomalies, and conduct deep dive analysis on specific issues to understand root cause
Drive strategies and decision via analytics
Communicate to broad cross-functional teams the opportunities and provide actionable next steps
Partner closely with product, engineering, ops and other cross-functional teams to drive product direction and prioritize roadmap
Mininum Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Econometrics, or similar domain
5+ years of experience working in an analytics organization
Experience working independently and as a member of a cross-functional team
Experience in querying and manipulating large datasets for analysis
Python and SQL experience
Strategic thinking and can drive the direction of the team
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in Tech leading large project
","['sql', 'python']","['hypothesi', 'dashboard', 'optim', 'anomali', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'hypothesi', 'dashboard', 'optim', 'anomali', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Leading the future of luxury mobility
Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.
Data generated by electric vehicles is a rich and diverse and driving insight from them is a very exciting and challenging task.
This opportunity involves defining the path to discover trends, patterns and hidden insights from these data while collaborating with the most brilliant talents in the automotive industry.
The Role
Work on state-of-the-art large-scale data analytics and machine learning projects
Design and develop data science pipeline using PySprak, Scala, SQL for parallel processing.
Drive predictive analytics from billions of time series data points
Help define the analytical direction and influence the direction of the associated engineering and infrastructure work.
Articulate business questions and use mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using data.
Translate analysis results into business recommendations.
Partner with internal stakeholders on projects to identify and articulate opportunities, see beyond the data to identify solutions that will raise the bar for decision making.
Extract actionable insights from broad, open-ended questions
Adapt machine learning and data mining algorithms to solve problems across several teams
Lead projects with hands-on analysis and modeling, drawing from multiple analytical methods to choose the right tool and right level of complexity appropriate for the challenge.
Engage broadly with the organization to identify, prioritize, frame, and structure complex and ambiguous challenges, where advanced analytics projects or tools can have the biggest impact.
Qualifications
Ph.D. or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related field.
3+ years of Data or Machine learning Science experience working on highly complex problems in a dynamic setting
Strong programming skills, especially in Scala or Python with 3+ years of relevant experience in a programming intensive role.
Technical expertise in one or more of the following Data Science topics:
Statistics, time-series data analysis and modeling
Traditional Machine Learning methods
Deep learning and CNNs
Optimization and operations research
Natural Language Processing (NLP), text mining, sentiment analysis, information retrieval, etc.
Relevant work experience, including experience applying advanced analytics, and data mining techniques.
Experience with distributed computing platforms, particularly Kubernetes or the Hadoop/Spark ecosystem
Experience with rule engine applications using distributed computing MapReduce, Spark, etc.
Experience with data presentation and visualization with tools such as Tableau, Zeppelin and other similar tools.
Proven track record of developing and deploying algorithms for a production-ready recommendation, data mining or prediction systems using languages and big data platforms such as Scala, Python, Java, Spark, Presto, and Hive
Excellent communication and presentation skills.
Nice to Have:
Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, Caffe, MXNet, etc.
Experience with telematics data analytics and decision modeling is a plus
Relevant experience in Automotive, Transportation or Manufacturing is a plus
Be part of something amazing
Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry.
If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.
","['mapreduc', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'tensorflow', 'hadoop', 'python', 'caff', 'hive', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'cnn', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'tensorflow', 'hadoop', 'python', 'caff', 'hive', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'cnn', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Posted: May 4, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200149723
Do you have a passion for deep learning and computer vision problems?
Key Qualifications
Solid mathematical foundation in statistics and algebra
Profound knowledge in machine learning and deep learning techniques
Experience in building datasets for computer vision tasks
Strong coding skills in python
Experience working with and creating data structures / architectures.
Proficiency in at least one major machine learning framework, such as Tensorflow, PyTorch etc.
Experience visualizing data to partners
Creativity and curiosity for solving highly complex problems
Excellent communication and collaboration skills
In this role, you will analyze and optimize algorithms and datasets for challenging real world problems in the domain of scene understanding and reasoning.
YOUR KEY RESPONSIBILITIES IN THIS ROLE ARE:
Work with multi-functional partners to identify Data sources and automate the injection process into out machine learning frameworks
Preprocess structured and unstructured data
Develop processes and tools to analyze model performances
Present results to partners
Education & Experience
MS in Computer Science or related field with focus on machine learning, computer vision, robotics or similar; and
PhD degree with focus on deep learning or alternatively a comparable industry career of 3+ years
","['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'python']","['deep learning', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'commun']",3.0,"['tensorflow', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'python', 'deep learning', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Power the Possibilities
that will change the landscape for automotive dealers, original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) and the customers they serve.
Be Part of Something Bigger
It’s time you joined an evolving marketplace where research and development
investment is measured in the tens of billions.
It’s time you were a part of something bigger.
The possibilities for impact are endless.
The ideal candidate will have a mix of skills including engineering best practices, statistical expertise, and a strong business sense.
Your work could vary from building a recommendation model that finds someone the perfect vehicle, to identifying which parts on a vehicle are likely to fail and when.
You will need to take initiative, and be capable of finding solutions where there is no clear path forward.
POSITION CAN BE BASED IN SAN JOSE, CA OR AUSTIN, TX
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field
3-5 years of experience as a data scientist
Expertise with Python, including the data science stack (Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-learn)
Background in a variety of modeling techniques including recommendation systems, neural networks, XGBoost, NLP, and time-series forecasting.
Expertise using SQL for querying data
Cloud experience, AWS preferred
Proficient using Docker to deploy machine learning solutions
Experience exposing data science solutions as REST APIs and Batch processes
Familiar with big data technologies: Hadoop, Spark, and Hive
Experience with version control systems, CI/CD pipelines, and Agile workflow
Ability to take ill-defined business problems and translate them into actionable plans
Comfort with ambiguity and ability to act under uncertainty
Ability to communicate with engineers, data scientists, and nontechnical audiences
Preferred Skills:
Graduate degree in a quantitative field
Experience with NoSQL databases
Experience with streaming data and analytics using Kafka, Spark Streaming, or equivalent system
You have family, friends, sporting events, and lots of things going on.
","['nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'hive', 'docker', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['nosql', 'kafka', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'hive', 'docker', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Requisition ID: 255369
Work Area: Software-Research
Expected Travel: 0 - 50%
Career Status: Professional
Employment Type: Regular Full Time
Career Level: T3
Posting Date : 6/10/2020
Together, they changed enterprise software and reinvented how business was done.
Because it’s the best-run businesses that make the world run better and improve people’s lives.
Work and communicate as a part of a high-performance team in an international environment.
50% travel required.
Education and Qualifications/Skills and Competencies: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or related field of study and 6 years of experience required.
Work Experience: Experience must involve 4 years in the following: Foundation topics in Linear Algebra, Probability & Statistics, Multivariate Calculus; programming with SQL, Python, R; working with big data preferably in a productive project.
Experience must also involve: supervised and unsupervised Machine Learning algorithms and deep learning frameworks; Data Visualization; data wrangling, developing pipelines for Machine Learning and data preparation activities for developing a Machine Learning application; and Distributed Application development.
50% travel required.
Travel: 50% travel required.
Internal use only: reference code lhrs4262
EX:OUT
Requests for reasonable accommodation will be considered on a case-by-case basis.
EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability:
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability.
Additional Locations :
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'probabl', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"- Worked as principal contributor and lead in end-to-end phases for building statistical data science and NLP projects - Hands on experience in Python, Java, Bootstrap, BPM, Oracle SQL, Chart JS.
- Experience and understanding of SOA, REST web services and micro services, BPN 2.0, CICD in Agile environment - Team player, self-motivated, innovator with strong interpersonal skills
","['sql', 'oracl', 'java', 'python']","['statist', 'data', 'nlp']",999.0,"['sql', 'oracl', 'java', 'python', 'statist', 'data', 'nlp']"
DS,"building engineering and data solutions spanning business
intelligence, brand and direct marketing, customer engagement for
over twenty years.
Currently serving more than 150 clients
globally they provide solutions by developing enterprise systems
using several programming languages, tools and platforms.
This
can range from building data warehouses, to web applications to
implementing reporting platforms.
----------------------------------------------------------------
Responsibilities:* Gathering Business Requirements and System
Specification from business users.
Translate business problems to an analytics problem,
recommending and applying the most appropriate methods to yield
insights and results
Identify & document data sources and transformation rules
required to populate and maintain the data warehouse
Research and develop statistical learning models for data
analysis
Develop and maintain new data sets and data pipelines thus
ensuring data availability at all times Perform data validations
and data quality checks to improve the reliability of the system
Prepare design and technical documentation that describes the
project workflow and processes involved
Required Skills:* 5 years of IT experience working in data
engineering and analytics projects
Proficient in at least one or other language for applied to
statistics, data analysis, or machine learning - Python, R,
Matlab, SPSS
Strong data analysis, data verification and problem-solving
abilities
Familiarity with cloud platforms such as Google Cloud Platform,
Microsoft Azure, AWS, IBM Cloud to use/deploy analytics resources
Strong technical knowledge in data mining, reporting tools, and
statistical analysis
Experience in applied analytics in space of sales, finance,
marketing, or product engineering; track record of success
Effective spreadsheet modeling skills
","['python', 'google cloud', 'spss', 'microsoft', 'matlab', 'r', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud']","['data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['python', 'google cloud', 'spss', 'microsoft', 'matlab', 'r', 'aw', 'azur', 'cloud', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The Statistical Modeling team’s primary mission is to mathematically model the sequencer and use those models to guide research and development within RSS.
You will also perform deep dives into data and distill both experiments and simulations to help guide experimental teams in hitting both near-term development targets and multi-year moonshots.
Responsibilities Include:
Build strong working relationships with experimental teams to provide guidance
Develop biophysics and electrochemical models
Commit to work proactively and collaboratively, find opportunities to enhance processes
Write elegant, readable code
Assist experimental groups with statistical modeling and analysis
Perform deep analyses on experimental data using a variety of internal pipelines
Collaborate with bioinformatics, signal processing, deep learning, and software engineering teams
Responsible for planning and timely delivery of assigned projects.
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD degree in Physics, Biophysics, or related scientific discipline, plus a minimum of 5 years of experience
Very strong foundation in modeling, simulation, inference, with an academic or industry track record
Very strong foundation in Data Science and analytics
Strong algorithms development skills: Python, C++
Track record in cloud and cluster computing
Fluency with modern software engineering practices: version control, code reviews, automated testing, etc.
Previous experience in DNA sequencing or bioinformatics
Clear thinker and communicator, verbal and in-writing; collaborative attitude
Research & Development, Research & Development > Modelling & Simulation
","['cloud', 'python']","['deep learning', 'sequenc', 'data', 'cluster', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['cloud', 'python', 'deep learning', 'sequenc', 'data', 'cluster', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Posted: May 23, 2019
Role Number:
200063205
Join the team that provides software security technologies to help users protect their accounts.
A successful candidate will have a bent for applied research with expertise in pattern mining, anomaly detection, predictive modeling, classification and optimization.
The candidate will take end-to-end responsibility for translating customer needs into analytical solutions from feature engineering, implementation, model training and reporting.
The role requires working in a fast paced environment, handling multiple assignments and being self driven.
Candidates also need to show initiative and be able to take ownership of a problem area.
Key Qualifications
Strong working knowledge of data mining algorithms including classifiers, clustering algorithms and anomaly detection techniques
Familiarity with database modeling and data warehousing principles and SQL
Familiarity with Big Data tools like Spark, Hive etc.
Strong programming skills in Java, Python, Scala or similar language
Passion for problem-solving and analysis
Highly motivated and organized, with the ability to accept ambiguity and deliver exceptional results on tight schedules
Understanding of privacy-preserving techniques is a plus
You will work hand-in-hand with security engineers, software engineers, program managers and business partners to understand problems, define data-driven solutions, execute plans and communicate results on a regular basis.
Education & Experience
MS or PhD in quantitative field, such as Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or Statistics, or equivalent industry experience
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'python', 'hive', 'java']","['big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'python', 'hive', 'java', 'big data', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
DS,"Principal Data Scientist
14-Jul-2020
Provides strategic leadership for the development, validation and delivery of algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools.
Req#
71813BR
Job Group
Data & Analytics
Full or Part Time
Full Time
Supervisory Responsibilities
No
Percent of Travel Required
0 - 10%
Posting Job Title
Principal Data Scientist
Additional Locations
CA-Cupertino
CA-Cupertino
EEO Statement
Resource Group
2
Fundamental Components
Leads development and execution of new and/or highly complex algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes.
Establishes analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses.
Manages highly complex analytical projects from data exploration, model building, performance evaluation and testing.
Applies in-depth knowledge of systems and products to consult and advise on additional efforts across organization/enterprise.
Motivates team members and probes into technical details, and mentors others to do the same.
Provides thought leadership and direction for analytic solutions, tools and studies.
Anticipates and solves strategic and high risk business problems with broad impact on the business area by applying leading-edge theories and techniques to investigate problems, detect patterns and recommend solutions.
Provides guidance to develop enterprise-wide analytics strategy and roadmap.
Interacts with internal and external peers and management to share highly complex information/solutions related to areas of expertise and/or to gain acceptance of new or enhanced technology/ business solutions.
Background Experience
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.Superior skills to effectively communicate and negotiate across the business and in the external health care environment.Expertise in advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.Expertise in innovating and implementing novel machine learning techniques.Comprehensive knowledge on health care industry, products, systems, business strategies and products.Demonstrates advanced in-depth specialization in mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling.Superior ability to communicate technical ideas and results to non-technical clients in written and verbal form.10 or more years of progressively complex related experience.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related discipline.Master’s degree or PhD preferred.
Benefits Program
Benefit eligibility may vary by position.
Candidate Privacy Information
from you via e-mail.
Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter.
Clinical Licensure Required
N/A
",['excel'],"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 18, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200170870
Do you get excited by driving product impact via measurement and evaluation, for products and services used by hundreds of millions of people globally?
Within this organization the mission of the Search Analytics team is to inform product evolution through measurement, evaluation, and analysis of the user experience.
You will partner with Search engineering teams to improve search quality and guide feature development with data, to deliver amazing search experiences across iPhone, iPad, HomePod, Mac, Watch, tv, across dozens of languages.
Key Qualifications
Proficiency in data science, machine learning, and analytics, including statistical data analysis and A/B testing.
Experience crafting, conducting, analyzing, and interpreting experiments and investigations.
Experience articulating and translating business questions and using statistical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data.
Capable of driving projects of varying sizes and scopes - some will take months and some weeks — and you will need to know when to dive deep.
Strong communication skills and the ability to naturally explain difficult technical topics (especially causal topics) to everyone from data scientists to engineers to business partners.
Strong programming skills, including data-querying skills (SQL and/or Spark, etc.)
and experience with a scripting language for data processing and development (e.g., Python, R, or Scala).
5 years of relevant work experience.
Research and develop evaluation methods to improve the quality of Siri’s user facing products.
Work with evaluation/experimentation engineering teams to get your methodological developments translated into technologies that Siri engineering will use every day.
Work with large, complex data sets.
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Conduct analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing work, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Develop comprehensive knowledge of Siri Search data structures and metrics, advocating for changes where needed for product development.
Partner closely with Siri search engineering teams on core machine learning algorithms and systems that are part of Siri’s ability to understand and respond to requests.
You should be passionate about building outstanding products.
This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation.
Education & Experience
Advanced degree in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Operational Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Computer Science, Sociology, Mathematics, Physics, or similar quantitative field.
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'bioinformat', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Data Scientist — Risk
Mountain ViewR&D - SecurityExperienced
Responsibilities
Key Responsibilities：
Work with engineers to design machine learning solutions for anti-abuse systems
Partner with operatives to quickly respond to rapidly evolving threats
Qualifications
Minimum Requirements：
BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with 2+ year of work experience
Solid technical / data-mining skills and ability to work with large volume data to detect and identify abusive actions in Bytedance products (e.g.
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
2+ years of industry experience in predictive analytics and/or statistical modeling role
Share to
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'predict', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'predict', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"This is what you’ll do:
You’ll take the adventure of a lifetime.
You’ll work with a team of top-notch engineers and scientists to build in-vehicle tools tracking vehicle performance and reliability metrics.
You’ll create a framework for monitoring and assessing vehicle health that has never been done.
· Build ground-up models to predict vehicle wear and need for service based on vehicle diagnostic signals
· Develop models describing vehicle and drive unit performance based on manufacturing assembly data
· Create performance-based metrics and acceptability thresholds at the edge
· Work with available in-vehicle signals to provide early detection of unique wear mechanisms
This is what you’ll need:
· Awesomeness
· Passion for building an amazing product
· Interest in working on a unique team with diverse technical backgrounds to create a ground-breaking vehicle application
· MS/PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, or related field
· Excellent Python and/or R programming skills
· Strong experience with weakly supervised and unsupervised learning methodologies
· Strong ability to work and communicate with many different teams of stakeholders
· Ability to own all project data science needs, while collaborating with firmware and mechanical engineers working alongside you; ability to thrive in a close-knit cross-functional environment.
· Experience with mechanical and/or audio systems preferred
· Excellent communication skills, ability to explain complex concepts to non-data science teammates
This is where you’ll work:
Department: Reliability Diagnostics
","['r', 'excel', 'python']","['supervis', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'data']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'python', 'supervis', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"Clinical Data Scientist
Salary:
Highly Competitive Salary
Job type:
Permanent
Discipline:
Clinical Scientist
United States
Redwood City, USA
Posting date: 01 May 2020
Reference:
CR.CN.29315
Shortlist
A successful candidate will have at least a Bachelor's degree, a background in Data Science, and experience with documentation management and/or TMF/eTMF (Trial File Master).
Job Responsibilities:
Work with management in the development, implementation and maintenance of classification and filing systems to meet administrative, research, regulatory, legal, and financial requirements
Data mining/modeling (e.g.
statistical models) and enhancing data collection procedures to identify patterns and extract knowledge from large data sets
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Ensure record filing is kept up to date is performed accurately
Participate in the development, implementation and maintenance of internal systems and processes used to manage collections of agreements and filing of documents
Track and maintain departmental metrics related to operational activities, progress of contract filing and archive, quality measurements and other variables.
Develops appropriate tool sets for capturing metrics and generating reports.
Skills and Requirements:
3-5 plus years of relevant experience
BA/BS required
3+ years of data science experience with common data science toolkits and data visualization tools
Good scripting/programming skill and applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
preferred
Expert in Microsoft programs including, but not limited to, SQL, MSWord, PowerPoint, Visio, Access, and Excel
Experience as Clinical Research Associate (CRA) or relevant records management/ TMF management experience equivalent experience preferred
Exemplary interpersonal skills with proven demonstration
Knowledge of FDA and other global clinical trial regulations, as well as detailed knowledge of ICH and GCP guidelines related to Clinical Document Management
Please include a short note outlining why you are interested in the role and why you think you are suitable.
#LI-CN1
#ClinicalResearch
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'gcp']","['regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'research', 'visual', 'statist']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'gcp', 'regress', 'data mining', 'classif', 'data', 'cleans', 'research', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"Do you have a passion for crafting products and insights with data?
Do you love the idea of rapidly iterating on new features and finding the ones which move the needle and hit customer engagement out of the ballpark?
In this role, you'll get to
Craft machine learning and predictive models to drive intelligent product features
MS or PhD in a quantitative subject (statistics, math, engineering, physics or computer science)
5+ years of related industry experience in the data science domain
Development experience in a programming language, Python is strongly preferred
Expertise in SQL and knowledge of cloud data environments e.g.
AWS
Experience developing, building and scaling machine learning models in business applications using large amounts of data
Ability to communicate and explain data science concepts to diverse audiences, craft a compelling story
Focus on business practicality and the 80/20 rule; very high bar for output quality, but recognize the business benefit of ""having something now"" vs ""perfection sometime in the future""
Agile development mindset, appreciating the benefit of constant iteration and improvement
It's great, but not required, if you have
Experience working in an enterprise or B2B space, as well as the consumer or B2C space
Familiarity working with go-to-market (GTM), buyer experience and Growth teams (in addition to Product and Engineering)
Experience with Hive, Hadoop or other large-scale data frameworks
Knowledge of A/B experimentation
This team is being built within the broader Analytics group and tasked to pursue business opportunities that can generate revenue or MAU improvements.
The team works multi-functionally across the organization, using insights generated by marketing and product analytics that can be scaled or automated to generate business value.
The team will be highly nimble, with a focus on velocity between ideation and initial output, and laser-focused on business impact.
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['python', 'sql', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'cloud']","['data', 'predict', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['python', 'sql', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'cloud', 'data', 'predict', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Do you have:
Expertise in the development, execution, and improvement of action plans with regards to Software Engineering?
Experience leading and participating in medium- to large-scale projects?
Directing medium to large projects?
Leading a small team of engineers for assigned projects?
Creating and supporting the implementation of business solutions?
Troubleshooting business and production issues?
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Use machine learning and data mining techniques to understand the patterns in large volumes of data, classify data sets, detect data anomalies, and identify relationships.
Experience in creating projections, models, reports, and presentations to support business.
Work on problems of diverse scope and complexity in a collaborative fashion alongside other individuals or teams.
Obtain data from multiple data sources including structured, semi structured and unstructured data.
Design and build algorithms and predictive models using techniques such as linear and logistic regression, ensemble models (random forest and/or gradient boosted trees), support vector machines, neural networks, and clustering techniques.
Have experience with AI development, Deep Learning models, Tensorflow experience, agile software launching, and/or working with data integration developers to assess data quality and define data processing business rules for cleansing, aggregation, enhancement, supporting analysis and predictive modelling activities.
Can exercise independent judgment and decision making on complex issues regarding job duties and related tasks
Work using independent judgment
You will need:
Master's Degree
Experience with deploying model pipelines across various technologies
Experience with Natural Language Processing
Experience working in Agile environments
Experience leading a team that collects new data and improves/refines data collection techniques.
Have been a Senior designer and builder of algorithms, models and products with the aim to derive deep insight from varied, complex Big Data sets.
Be able to communicate findings effectively across the business to drive stakeholder engagement.
To have solved challenging data science problems fundamental to their business.
Contributed to scientific publications, white papers and industry conference presentations.
",['tensorflow'],"['regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'anomali', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['tensorflow', 'regress', 'big data', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'logist', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'svm', 'anomali', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Posted: Feb 28, 2020
Role Number:
200155433
You are skilled analytically, with a deep understanding of the businesses you support.
You will be a thought partner to the business, understand their goals and then use your data science skills and tools to surface actionable insights that support your partners key KPI’s.
You will collaborate with partners across product, design, engineering, and business teams to help turn your recommendations into action.
Key Qualifications
5+ years of recent experience in a data science or data analyst role.
Experience measuring UX impact, customer engagement and planning and analyzing AB experiments.
A real passion for improving the customer experience through refining the product.
Excellent presentation, communication and social skills, with strong attention to detail.
Demonstrated ability to deal with ambiguity and balance between multiple priorities to lead high quality work to tight deadlines!
Well-versed with SQL.
Experience with big data technologies such as Hadoop and Spark preferred.
Familiarity with Python or R and data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Ability to comprehensively understand data elements, sources and relationships in business and technical terms.
Strong familiarity with multiple platforms, tools, methodologies in data analysis and insight synthesis.
Well versed working with predictive and causal problems
Prior experience working with financial products desirable
As a member of the analytics team, you will support a product function.
You will partner with business owners, understand goals, craft critical metrics and measure ongoing performance.
You will use your analytics expertise to uncover new opportunities as well as tune existing features.
Your Day to Day Activities will Include:
Deep dives in large-scale data to identify key insights that inform product improvements and business strategy.
Supervised and unsupervised learning.
A/B testing and causal modeling.
Engage with business, engineering, product management teams as a thought partner.
Education & Experience
Master’s degree in Economics, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or relevant field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop']","['big data', 'data', 'causal', 'kpi', 'predict', 'tune', 'econom', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'big data', 'data', 'causal', 'kpi', 'predict', 'tune', 'econom', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Reliability is at the core of Electric Adventure Vehicles.
This is what you will do:
Use big data to systematically characterize a broad set of damage metrics for vehicles, utilizing simple or rainflow counts to aggregate cumulative damage over time.
Create methods to easily summarize damage in representative aggregates that allows further analysis with faster processing speeds.
Lead the utilization of parametric data coming from the vehicle for physics-of-failure based reliability models.
Explore machine learning methods to identify non-obvious reliability predictions by utilizing rich log data sets and connecting various data sources together (service center data, manufacturing, supplier etc).
Drive meaningful actions and new feature implementation based on results.
Collaborate with the reliability diagnostics team and all design teams to create the data acquisition strategy in terms of frequency, granularity and retention in order to support identified reliability models based on aggregation of signals.
Extract useful statistics and usage profiles from the existing fielded fleet in order to drive accurate design requirements for next generation vehicles.
Create visualization methods to communicate data in a meaningful and actionable manner.
Work cross functionally with Service, IT, the cloud team and other data stakeholders to drive implementation of meaningful data interfaces to support science for reliability.
Architect the big data dashboards and visualizations for reliability engineering.
Partner with the rest of the reliability functions (Design-for-Reliability, Manufacturing and Supplier Reliability, Failure Analysis, Reliability Testing, Reliability Diagnostics, Functional Safety) to seamlessly connect data generated across different processes, systems and platforms
This is what you’ll need:
Experience in architecting and visualizing field reliability big data for an OEM, preferably in an automotive setting
Experience working with large datasets
Expert in SQL
Expert in Python with Pandas
Software engineering experience and understanding of software development is a plus
This is where you’ll work:
Department: Reliability
","['panda', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python']","['big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['panda', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
• Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
• Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
·
• Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
• Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
• 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
• Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
• Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
• Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
• Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
• Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
• Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
• Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
• Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 2, 2020
Role Number:
200173544
Would you like to help with quantitative analysis of high dimensional data to draw insights that would impact hundreds of millions of users?
Does the idea of developing software to analyze battery life and system performance excite you?
Key Qualifications
- Strong statistical analysis skills
- Experience with data analytics and visualization
- Strong coding skills and software development experience
- Strong analytical thinking to solve challenging problems
- Self-motivated and able to work independently
- Excellent spoken and written communication skills
You will need to analyze high dimensional data to derive meaningful insights.
You will also be developing software and analytics infrastructure for streamlined analysis of large datasets.
You must also have a strong software engineering background and be able to write production level code.
Education & Experience
M.S.
or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, or equivalent
Preferred skills and experience:
- Experience with statistical packages in R, Python or MATLAB
- Experience with programming languages like C, C++ or Java
- Proficiency in MapReduce technologies such as Hadoop, Hive and Pig
- Strong system level understanding
","['mapreduc', 'pig', 'excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'c', 'java']","['statist', 'commun', 'data', 'visual']",2.0,"['mapreduc', 'pig', 'excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'c', 'java', 'statist', 'commun', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"These teams develop innovative solutions to increase demand for in-stream ads from advertisers while optimizing the video viewer experience so that ads are less interruptive for users and are supporting the most valuable video content.
This includes experimenting with new ways to deliver ads while analyzing the broader ecosystem impact across surfaces on FB (News Feed and Watch) of changes in monetization.An ideal fit for this role is a Data Scientist with deep technical knowledge and expertise in quantitative analytics and experimental design (e.g.
statistical inference, hypothesis testing, prediction modeling), with the ability to turn data into business insights.
Excellent communication and leadership skills will be essential to influence the strategic decisions about the future of video monetization.
The data scientist must be able to operate autonomously and scope out large analytical projects that deliver impact.
Responsibilities:
Define problems and identify new opportunities in a complex and ambiguous area
Design and evaluate experiments to understand trade-offs and make launch decisions
Partner with a cross-functional team to solve problems and identify new levers to improve user experience
Monitor key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics
Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, and clearly communicating state of business, experiment results, etc.
to product teams
Mininum Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Business, Computer Science or other quantitative fields, or equivalent practical experience
7+ years of experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches
Communication and data presentation skills
Experience in SQL, R, Python or other statistical programming languages
Understanding of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, statistical inference, regressions, ML systems)
Experience communicating the results of analyses to influence the strategy for a product
Preferred Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Business, Computer Science or other quantitative fields with 5+ years of work experience
Experience working in the video or advertising industries
Outstanding communication skills
Experience visualizing data in a meaningful way to tell a story
Experience building and training statistical models
Experience designing and evaluating complex experiments
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'hypothesi', 'experimental design', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'experimental design', 'data', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"An ideal candidate for Data Scientist at Alexa should have strong data mining and modeling skills and is comfortable working from concept to execution to completion.
The candidate will be an individual contributor who is comfortable with ambiguity and able to successfully drive projects to completion.
In addition to the modeling and technical skills, the candidate should possess strong written and verbal communication skills, strong focus on internal customers and high intellectual curiosity with the ability to learn new concepts/frameworks, algorithms, and technology rapidly as changes arise.
Data Scientists at Alexa will design, evangelize, and implement solutions to address complex, business questions using advanced statistical techniques, experimentation, and big data.
You will be interacting with science and research teams to define metrics that drive key business decisions, and working with program managers, quality assurance engineers and software developers, to develop data pipelines, build tools to drive continuous experimentation to generate data set, conduct statistical analyses, and provide actionable insights for business decisions.
Key responsibilities:
· Adopt best practices and implement strategies for data audit, data integrity, and validation
· Utilize code (Python, R, Scala, etc.)
for analyzing data and building statistical models to solve specific business problems
· Execute end to end insights projects include data collecting, data cleaning, exploratory analysis, model selection, model evaluation, and interpreting results
· Analyze and extract relevant information from large amounts of historical data to help automate and optimize key processes
· Analyze key metrics to uncover trends and root causes of issues
· Communicate verbally and in writing to business customers and leadership team with various levels of technical knowledge, and share insights and recommendations
Basic Qualifications
· Master's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or a related field
· Basic knowledge in Automatic Speech Recognition
· 3+ years experience with dashboard and data visualization by Excel, Tableau, Quicksight or other similar tool
· 2+ years of coding experience in at least one modern programming language (R, Python, Ruby, Scala, Java, Spark etc.)
· Experience with statistical modeling / machine learning and parameters that affect their performance
· Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills and an ability to effectively communicate with both business and technical teams
Preferred Qualifications
· PhD in a relevant field
· Track record of diving into data to discover hidden patterns and of conducting error/deviation analysis
· Ability to develop experimental and analytic plans for data modeling processes, ability to accurately determine cause and effect relations
· Understanding of relevant statistical measures such as confidence intervals, significance of error measurements, development and evaluation data sets, etc.
· Proven ability to meet tight deadlines, multi-task, and prioritize workload
· Track record for being detail-oriented with a demonstrated ability to self-motivate and follow-through on projects
· A desire to work in a collaborative, intellectually curious environment
","['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'rubi', 'java']","['data modeling', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'rubi', 'java', 'data modeling', 'big data', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"storytelling around the world.
With over 180 million members in 190 countries,
customer journey.
contact experience to the next level via advanced analytics, experimentation
and predictive modeling.
As a senior member of this team, this role will also
within customer contact experience.
Los Gatos, California Product Data Science and Engineering Senior Data
shaping the evolution of storytelling around the world.
With over 180 million
experience throughout the customer journey.
motivated Senior Data Scientist to join the Customer Service Data Science and
level via advanced analytics, experimentation and predictive modeling.
As a
business stakeholders and shape decision making within customer contact
experience.
Proactively perform data exploration to understand user behavior and identify
efficiency
Lead the design, analysis, and interpretation of experiments
Join a stunning team of data experts with diverse skill set, and contribute to
decision-making process
You have deep statistical skills utilized in A/B testing, Quasi experimentation
and analyzing observational data
You are comfortable working with large data sets and analyzing complex data
with SQL and other tools such as Python or R
PhD or MS degree in a quantitative or computational field and 2+ years relevant
experience
You are enthusiastic about innovating iteratively, comfortable with ambiguity,
and can drive your own projects
You can effectively communicate with experts from different backgrounds, and
build strong stakeholder relationships
Show moreShow less
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['statist', 'predict', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'statist', 'predict', 'data', 'busi']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms, and machine learning models
Leverage tools like Python, R, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Communicate final recommendations and drive decision making
Mininum Qualifications:
Degree in quantitative field (e.g.
Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research or other related field)
2+ years of industry or graduate research experience solving analytical problems and building models using quantitative, statistical or machine learning approaches
Experience with Machine Learning, Statistics, or other data analysis tools and techniques
Experience performing data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation for medium to large datasets
Experience with at least one programming language (i.e.
Python, R, Java, or C++)
Experience writing SQL queries
Experience with scientific computing and analysis packages such as NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, dplyr, or ggplot2
Experience with statistics methods such as forecasting, time series, hypothesis testing, classification, clustering or regression analysis
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Matplotlib, Pyplot, ggplot2
Experience with machine learning libraries and packages such as PyTorch, Caffe2, TensorFlow, Keras or Theano
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree (Masters or PhD or Equivalent experience) in quantitative field
Experience working with distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Hive, Spark, etc.)
Proficiency in algorithmic complexity
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'spark', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java']","['regress', 'hypothesi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'theano', 'spark', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Clinical Data Manager
Redwood City, CA
Direct-Hire, 2 Positions Available
These roles will look at data management, data flow, data development, data analysis, data reconciliation, and design of case report forms (CRFs)
These individuals will also design, program, validate, and maintain the clinical databases.
They will also assist with data validation, quality, testing, and maintenance are critical in database integrity and continuity.
They will further interface extensively with the clinical and biostatistics team.
Requirements
Requirements:
BS, or equivalent
One position requires 5-8 years of experience, and one is 8-10+ years of experience.
Both positions require 5+ years of experience managing data in a pharma or biotech environment.
Proven CDM background with CDISC standards/ SDTM terminology.
Excellent communication and documentation skills required.
Benefits
Excellent benefits and salary for the right candidates!
",['excel'],"['biostatist', 'commun', 'data']",1.0,"['excel', 'biostatist', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created account - click Sign In.
Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications.
Note:
Provide full legal first Name/Family Name
DO: Capitalize first letter of First and Last Name.
Example: John Smith
DON'T: Capitalize entire First and/or Last Name.
Example: JOHN SMITH
NOTE: Use correct grammar for Names with multiple cases.
Example: McDonald or O'Connell
Provide full address details
Resume is required
Multiple attachments can be uploaded including Resume and Cover Letter for each application
In your role you will Collaborate with other data scientists, product managers and engineers to formulate innovative ideas, and test / implement through advanced data science technique
You will interact with cross functional teams to:
Design, develop and implement data-driven strategies and machine learning models for card auth optimization and conversion improvement
Create innovative features and data for payment strategies and models, align with stakeholders and implement these capabilities
Analyze and monitor data science solutions, and communicate analysis results and complex concepts to conclude actionable insights
Job Requirements:
Professional industry experience in a quantitative analysis role (2+ years preferred), with advanced degree (Masters or PhD.)
in Math, Statistics, Operations Research, or Computer Science
Proficiency in languages used for querying (e.g.
SQL/Hive/Pig/Spark), preprocessing (e.g.
Unix/Python), and statistical analysis (e.g.
Python/R)
Experience with machine learning algorithms and statistical methods
Strong verbal and written communication skills to express data science concepts and solutions to product managers, data scientists, business partners of varying technical levels, and influence and negotiate to reach alignment on how to execute strategies and improve models.
Team worker, responsible, delivery-oriented
Knowledge about card issuers and card payment processing is a strong plus
Subsidiary:
Travel Percent:
0
San Jose, California, United States of America
Additional Locations:
","['unix', 'spark', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['unix', 'spark', 'pig', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"The incumbent for this key role will have a strong customer focus to help secure innovation and growth from both new and existing customers.
What you can look forward to
Assisting customers in solving business related problems using advanced data analysis and data driven technologies
Supporting implementation of advanced analytics in industry
Analyzing large amounts of data and building data driven models
Initiating, leading and driving customer projects
Supporting sales (pre/post)
Supporting marketing & development
Performing regular follow up with customers to track satisfaction, secure project momentum and discover additional opportunities
Creating technical documents
Attending and presenting at conferences, seminars and forums
Developing & cultivating strong relationships with external and internal stakeholders
Being part of a team of data scientists
Skills and experience
Minimum a master’s degree in a relevant field (engineering, life sciences, informatics, automation/control, etc.
), Ph.D. preferred
Minimum five years’ work experience within Biopharma or Pharma
Minimum five years’ working knowledge of applied statistics including MVDA, DOE, MSPC, PAT, QbD, Model Predictive Control (MPC), MMPC, AI/Machine learning
Strong bioprocess knowledge preferred
Familiarity with Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions preferred (MODDE, SIMCA, SIMCA-online, Control Advisor, Active Dashboard)
Working knowledge of prescriptive analytics preferred
Working knowledge of Python scripting preferred
Working knowledge of MATLAB, data historians and control strategies a plus
Teaching, consulting and project management experience preferred
Excellent communications skills, strong presentation skills
Comfortable working independently
Comfortable working from home office, willingness to travel (~25%)
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin.
Please view equal employment opportunity posters provided by OFCCP here
https://e-verify.uscis.gov/esp/media/resourcesContents/EverifyPosterEnglish.pdf
https://e-verify.uscis.gov/esp/media/resourcesContents/EverifyPosterSpanish.pdf
https://e-verify.uscis.gov/esp/media/resourcesContents/WebBPPOSTERRtoWEnglishversion.pdf
https://e-verify.uscis.gov/esp/media/resourcesContents/WebBPPOSTERRtoWSpanishversion.pdf
Interested?
","['excel', 'matlab', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'matlab', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,", 2019
Role Number:
200021167
Imagine what you could do here.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish.
You will have a bent for self-directed research and have the ability to tell stories using data.
Key Qualifications
Working knowledge of SQL, Spark, or Hive preferred
Excellent social, written, and verbal communication skills
Confidence working independently and making key decisions on projects
Knowledge of machine learning algorithms including classifiers, clustering algorithms, and anomaly detection a plus
You will work hand-in-hand with other engineers, program managers, and business partners to identify problems, define solutions, execute plans, measure and communicate results on a regular basis.
Education & Experience
Masters degree in a quantitive field preferred
Additional Requirements
","['hive', 'excel', 'sql', 'spark']","['machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'anomali']",2.0,"['hive', 'excel', 'sql', 'spark', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'anomali']"
DS,"DescriptionAre you interested in championing a product that makes work better?
These small, scientifically-backed suggestions help each person build better habits, work smarter, and connect with their colleagues-and are the most effective way to drive positive change throughout an organization.
and statistical software (e.g., R, SAS, Stata)* Experience working with either people data or product usage data (e.g., survey data, HR data, psychological study data, human behavior data, or product interaction data)* Strong communication skills with a growth and learning mindset
","['r', 'sa']","['statist', 'commun', 'data']",999.0,"['r', 'sa', 'statist', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"The RoleThe position is to support daily data analytics activities and process improvements suggestions based on fleet data and known field returns for all cell programs with focus on cell production build issues.
Candidate is expected to lead or support quality focused multidisciplinary cell-related projects, typically involving R&D, Design or Production organization.
The engineer must be extremely organized, detail orientated, with strong ability to prioritize and multitask, successfully collaborate on projects with a range of business objectives.
This person must exhibit the knowledge, leadership, and drive needed to not only challenge the status quo, but also define and execute the optimal path forward.Responsibilities* Perform extensive data study on all field failures and correlation studies with upstream cell manufacturing process.
Create algorithms and test models to ensure proper detection and outlier rejection criteria for field rejects.
* Identify trends from field return data and quantify reliability risks for diagnostics of key critical signals/metrics.
* Create data visualizations to communicate analysis results with cross-functional teams and drive decision making of key failure modes on field.
* Produce cogent and intelligible data visualizations, author technical presentations and summarize high-impact technical findings with strong data analysis package.Requirements* Experience in Big Data technologies SPARK* Strong SQL, Python queries for data analytics, applied knowledge of statistical analysis, time series analysis, working knowledge of reliability statistics such as Weibull Analysis* Strong data visualization skills Tableau/JMP* Excellent verbal and written communication skills - ability to break down complex technical topics and deliver visual technical presentations (e.g.
PowerPoint) to groups of engineers, scientists, and technicians* B.S/M.S.
in Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science or Data Science with 1-2+ years of industry experienceDesirable Attributes* Experience to recommend statistical/analytical models based on manufacturing data and process setup changes to improve quality of product* Quality control experience in test/manufacturing environment* Design of experiments for process optimization
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['risk', 'big data', 'correl', 'data', 'outlier', 'optim', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'risk', 'big data', 'correl', 'data', 'outlier', 'optim', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Best of all...it’s free!
Needless to say, it’s an ambitious undertaking which requires a spirit of winning together and a strong growth mindset.
About the role
Collaborate to evolve the data platform with user-friendly tools, solutions and dashboards so that relevant information can be efficiently gathered and easily interpreted by business teams.
In addition to having a strong data science background, an ideal candidate for this role should have experience coordinating with a cross-functional business team, external partner teams, and ability to inspire confidence in data-driven decision making.
At least 5 years as a Data Scientist in a customer experience function
BS or MS in CS,Math, Statistics, Engineering, Analytics
Strong understanding of the CX domain
Define, quantify & help prioritize Customer Pain Points to eliminate & Customer Experience Best Practices to scale
Build complex models to identify patterns, correlations and causal relationships in customer behavior to drive profitability
Designs qualitative and quantitative CX analysis and research efforts
Hands on with statistical analysis and experimentation, and capacity to drive conclusions & recommendations from the analysis
Ensures stakeholders understand insights & how to interpret and bring together all CX data sources, including NPS survey results, customer touchpoints data, merchandising, in-visit experience, etc and make the information actionable
Effectively use and visualize data to tell stories, communicate key insights through internal reports, presentations and dashboards to drive business decisions & bring the customers voice into daily operations
Lead business reviews meetings with leadership teams and external partners and advocate for the Customer Experience across the organization
Evaluate and quantify the effect of experimentations and various tests through data analysis and statistical methods, and makes data-driven recommendations, including designing and conducting A/B tests with statistical rigor
Share daily/weekly business performance
Hands-on expertise with SQL, python and any other programming language
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc)
Experience working with data-warehouse, business intelligence technologies, and databases
Experience with running A/B tests and familiar with experimentation platforms
The duties, responsibilities, and qualifications of the position are subject to change without notice.
All offers of employment are subject to background checks and drug screens prior to start date.
All qualified applicants are welcome and will be considered for employment without regard to race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, gender, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetics, disability, veteran status, or other applicable protected characteristic under local, state, or federal law.
#LI-ENJOY
","['excel', 'sql', 'python', 'spss', 'sa']","['correl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'causal', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'correl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'causal', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
DS,"You will collaborate with a team of world-class software, data and energy experts working at the forefront of advanced data science, artificial intelligence, machine learning and high-performance computing.
Position Overview
This high-performance forecasting, optimization and real-time control engine is the core component responsible for intelligently and continuously managing complex energy networks.
Responsibilities
Implement and deploy your algorithms on big-data platforms, in production
Prototype new methods and analyses on customer data sets
Work closely with product management, engineering and QA teams to manage the full product lifecycle including requirements, architecture, algorithmics and QA
About you
MS. or Ph.D. in computer science, operations research, statistics or related field
Exposure to very large forecasting and optimization problems and techniques, including large-scale time series forecasting and stochastic linear programming
Good understanding of algorithms, data structures and performance optimization techniques
Excellent programming skills in Python, Java or C++
Nice to have
Experience building production python applications.
Specifically, knowledge of the Celery and Django frameworks is a plus
Hands-on experience with the energy industry
Understanding of and experience with Big Data / NoSQL frameworks, Spark, HBase, Hadoop / MapReduce, HDFS, etc.
Knowledge of relational databases (SQL)
Powered by JazzHR
BbQ6V64mAk
","['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'spark', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'django', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']",3.0,"['mapreduc', 'nosql', 'spark', 'excel', 'hbase', 'sql', 'django', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'time series', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Collaborate with scientists and other engineering groups, understand their data-science and bioinformatics requirement and propose solutions and lead them to completion.
Help design, analyze, and interpret single-molecule sequencing experiments using custom and standard analysis tools.
Develop and improve algorithms for next-generation sequencing based diagnostics products.
Develop and modify analyses that depend on standard next-generation sequencing analysis tools.
Write clean, maintainable, documented code using best engineering practices in the industry (design patterns, TDD, peer review, CI, automated testing etc.).
Prepare documentation and participate in design reviews.
Define in-depth statistical error profiles and their impact on secondary and tertiary analysis.
Document analysis procedures and results and present findings in meetings.
Utilize knowledge of bioinformatics, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization to help analyze and develop sequencing technology.
Requirements:
PhD in Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computation Biology, Computer Science or related technical/scientific field with a minimum of 2 years of direct related professional experience.
Experience in the use of high-level programming languages such as Python (preferred), Java and R for complex data analysis.
Experience with data visualization and report generation.
Experience with next generation sequencing a plus.
Research & Development, Research & Development > Modelling & Simulation
","['r', 'java', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'biostatist', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'bioinformat']",3.0,"['r', 'java', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'biostatist', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'bioinformat']"
DS,"The Opportunity:
Projects will range from causal analysis of observational studies to advanced ML models to predict the dynamics of physiological time series like blood glucose, blood pressure, and body weight.
Responsibilities:
Use advanced machine learning approaches to understand and improve member outcomes.
Partner closely with clinical leadership, product management and engineering to improve member clinical outcomes using insights and models.
Qualifications:
What you bring
5+ years' experience in Data Science, Business Analytics or a related field in SaaS or consumer
companies.
Demonstrable depth of expertise in Python or R.
A Master's degree or higher in Computer Science, Statistics, Information Systems, Engineering or
a related field.
PhD preferred.
An ability to use statistics and machine learning to distill complex problems into clear solutions
Creativity and good judgement for framing problems with statistics and machine learning.
Expertise with applications in healthcare, causal inference, or time-series analysis is a plus.
Experience designing and building useful, maintainable code for model training, evaluation, and
interpretation.
A pragmatic ability to balance prototyping with incremental cleanup and refactoring along the
way.
Who you are:
Self-driven and intellectually curious, with a proven track record using statistics and machine learning to solve challenging problems.
A strong team player willing to learn new platforms and tools, and to help other team members adopt those tools.
An active listener who can ""read between the lines"" to infer product needs and underlying context.
An open and kind individual seeking to be part of a high-performing, caring team.
The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names.
Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful?
To create results that matter?
Here you can truly improve lives.
Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.
",['python'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"ENERGY INDUSTRY TRANSFORMATION
The trillion dollar energy industry is undergoing a disruptive transformation.
Energy generation is going from centralized to decentralized.
Utilities are shifting from vertically integrated power producers and distributors (think PG&E; SoCal Edison) to nimbler energy services providers operating in increasingly deregulated environments.
New generation assets are smaller in scale, distributed, powered through renewable sources, and owned by the customers.
This shift will lead to over $10 Trillion in new energy investments by 2040.
With this dramatic change, energy providers must run their business in new ways.
Energy providers of the future will be data-driven, where effective use of data will determine who wins and who loses.
Founded 2011 by Amit Narayan.
Early backers include U.S. Department of Energy and Stanford University
SaaS platform and applications sold to regulated and deregulated energy companies worldwide.
Predictive Control technology tying together data science, AI, big data, IoT and high-performance computing to create 4th gen AI-driven real-time controls platform.
Open Architecture is able to integrate with all vendors and all equipment throughout the energy ecosystem.
Established thought leadership and high visibility within the industry.
Highly differentiated in the market.
No one approaches AutoGrids capabilities, performance, ease of deployment and cost.
Products sold directly and through partners.
Deal size ranges from $100,000 to $5 million+.
100%/year growth rate in revenues
Well-Funded.
$75+ million to date.
Many of them are also customers.
CANDIDATE PROFILE
Experience in energy / utility or related markets is desirable but not necessary.
Experience in building mission critical, highly scalable optimization applications is a must.
About the Job
Develop and maintain the optimization models and software implementation that drives AutoGrids predictive controls platform for managing distributed energy resources
Contribute to improving scalability and reliability of the system
Work with product owners to develop new features and capabilities
About You
B.S., MS., or Ph.D. in computer science, operations research, industrial engineering, or related field
Deep understanding of algorithms, data structures, performance optimization techniques, relational databases, and software development in a team environment
Excellent programming skills in Python, Java or C++
Experience with optimization modeling languages (e.g.
Pyomo, GAMS) and solvers (e.g.
CBC, Cplex, Gurobi)
Nice to Have
Experienced with decomposition approaches to solving large-scale optimization problems
Hands-on experience with time series forecasting
Understanding of energy and capacity markets
Start-up experience, entrepreneurial spirit, energetic!
WEBSITE LINKS
Recent Press
In search of the perfect rate: Portland General tests 12 pilots on DR rate design
Virtual Power Plants: Ready to Serve a Grid Near You
CPS Demand Response Program wins POWERGRID International Project of the Year Award
350 Percent Growth Highlights Dynamism of Distributed Energy Resources Market
Demand Management, Distributed Power, And Virtual Power Plants
European Utilities Fight Back Against Threats by Investing in Their Startup Competitors
A New Smart City Model Is Emerging
AutoGrids $20M VC Round Brings New Strategic Partners On Board for Big Energy Data
Theres Big Money In Energy Big Data
Analytics Challenges In A Renewable Energy Paradigm
Data Platforms Supplying Smarts to the Power Grid
CHP Update: Policies, Partnerships, and Challenges
How Software Can Eat The Energy Industry And Help Save The World
The Emerging Energy IoT
Lions, Pizza & the Energy Internet of Things
Analytics Comes to the Smart Grid
Half of UK consumers under 44 would consider buying smart-home devices
Smart Grids Attract Smart Money
Power to the People, Literally
Californias Cleantech Revolution
Solar array with cloud predicting technology launched in WA
Machine 'learners' compute cloud cover to balance power supplies
Bonneville Power Deploys AutoGrids Big Data Software
How Bonneville Is Tapping Demand Response to Balance Power From Dams, Wind and Sun
Forbes: A Software Startup Helps Utilities Decode Smart Meter Data
TIME Magazine: Smart Power
A Few Videos
New Champions panel at the World Economic Forum in Tianjin, China
World Economic Forum: Data-Driven Smart Power Grids
Software Defined Power Plants
Turning Big Data Into Power
Customer Testimonial: City of Palo Alto Utilities (CPAU)
Co-Developer Testimonial: NTT DATA
Partner Testimonial: Schneider Electric
Partner Testimonial: Lawrence Berkeley National Labs (LBNL)
Partner Testimonial: SilverSpring Networks
Lets Get Social
Follow twitter.com/AutoGridSystems
Like facebook.com/AutoGridSystems
Connect linkedin.com/company/autogrid-systems
Visit www.auto-grid.com
Contact info@auto-grid.com
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'java', 'cloud', 'python']","['big data', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'java', 'cloud', 'python', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'econom']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Build long term vision and scope out the area for the team
Understand the complex E2E recommendation system and identify the bottlenecks and opportunities
Identify the gaps and develop the solutions in Machine Learning stack
Build and validate the hypothesis of modeling product ideas
Leverage data to inform the right business decision, such as designing how to evaluate model updates and whether they should be launched
Understand model stability and sources of volatility
Design and implement data-driven systems to increase the value of modeling, labeling, signal development, ranking and efficiency for all Ads Ranking teams
Drive understanding and strategy for data and features in Ads systems
Mininum Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Econometrics, or similar domain
5+ years of experience working in an analytics organization
Genuine interest in going into the data to build theory and tell story from it
Proven Machine Learning sense and statistical knowledge
Experience working independently and as a member of a cross-functional team
Experience in querying and manipulating large datasets for analysis
Python and SQL experience
Experience answering big picture questions by framing the business question into an analytical plan and communicate to stakeholders
Strategic thinking and can drive the direction of the team
Preferred Qualifications:
Ads/Advertiser experience
Experience with large scale Machine Learning systems such as search/recommendation
Experience in leading large projects
","['sql', 'python']","['hypothesi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'hypothesi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"But making games is challenging work.
About the Role
You will use your expertise in applied machine learning and artificial intelligence to guide essential decisions in a cross-functional environment.
As a technical lead, you will have opportunities for project management and mentoring of junior data scientists.
The lead data scientist will work with producers across different game studios identifying new business opportunities, developing advanced customized algorithms to answer said questions, and conducting experiments to validate assumptions about said algorithms.
Responsibilities
Develop meaningful relationships with partners throughout the studio organization to identify new opportunities for the team, both in addressing partners different pain points and proposing machine-learning-aided innovations to player experience.
Research and build impactful data products that improve player experiences, driving them from conception, to experimentation, to productionization in-game.
Contribute to the architecture and development of model deployment platforms, in particular providing guidance on automated model re-training, online training, scalability, failure recovery, updates with minimal downtime, model/pipeline versioning, performance monitoring.
Stay up-to-date on latest developments in machine learning best practices, technologies, and research so as to expand the range of opportunities the team can handle.
Guide technical projects and provide leadership through collaboration with game producers and central tech engineers.
Technical Qualifications
A PhD in Computer Science, Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Statistics, or related quantitative field
5+ years of experience applying data science/machine learning/deep learning methodologies to real-world problems
Expertise in analyzing extremely large, complex, multi-dimensional data sets with a variety of tools, including Python, SQL, and Spark.
Experience with big data technologies, distributed data query and computing engine.
Programming experience in a system programming language such as C/C++ or Java.
Familiarity with at least one scripting language: R, Python, or Scala
Experience deploying machine learning systems using AWS, GCP, Virtual Machines, or Docker.
Experience developing customizable, modular, and scalable deep learning algorithms in Keras/Pytorch/Tensorflow
Research and design creative approaches to ambiguous problems, aiding in the implementation and scaling of these cutting edge systems
Good tracking record on collaborating with business and engineering team on long-term projects, pushing excellence in the rest of the data science organization
Personality Traits
Hypothesis driven uses data to test ideas rigorously and objectively
Willing to teach and mentor colleagues
Eager to stay on the cutting edge of methodologies and technologies
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'gcp', 'c', 'python', 'docker', 'java']","['deep learning', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'gcp', 'c', 'python', 'docker', 'java', 'deep learning', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Role: Senior Data Scientist
Experience: 6+ years
Employment Type: C2C
· ML/NLP/Statistics/Engineering Mathematics
· Strong understanding in Statistics, Optimization Techniques and Time Series (ARIMA) with academic and industry Experience
· Candidate must be very strong in Machine Learning and Deep Learning
· Worked as principal contributor and lead in end-to-end phases for building statistical data science and NLP projects
· Statistics, Data Analysis, Data Wrangling
· Architectural knowledge and understanding
· Strong in Python, Data blending and should have work experience
· Good in SQL
· Team player, self-motivated, innovator with strong interpersonal skills
Qualification:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science or Engineering with relevant industry experience
Job Type: Contract
Work Remotely:
No
","['sql', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Title:ÂSenior Data Scientist
Duration: Long Term
Education:ÂBachelors or Masters in Computer Science or Engineering with relevant industry experience
Required Experience/Skills:
- Strong in ML/NLP/Statistics/Engineering Mathematics
- Strong understanding in Statistics, Optimization Techniques and Time Series (ARIMA) with academic and industry experience.
- Worked as principal contributor and lead in end-to-end phases for building statistical data science and NLP projects
- Hands on experience in Python, Java, Bootstrap, BPM, Oracle SQL, Chart JS.
- Experience and understanding of SOA, REST web services and micro services, BPN 2.0, CI/CD in Agile environment
- Team player, self-motivated, innovator with strong interpersonal skills
Â
","['sql', 'oracl', 'java', 'python']","['data', 'optim', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist']",2.0,"['sql', 'oracl', 'java', 'python', 'data', 'optim', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist']"
DS,"Were focused on expanding use cases and smart assistant capabilities, adding new third party integrations, and expanding into new markets as well as continuously improving the user experience.
Responsibilities:
Initiate and lead cross-functional data science and modeling projects with multiple contributors.
Aggregate and analyze complex data sets across multiple teams to identify and interpret large scale trends and patterns to help drive strategy across several teams.
Work with members of the team and multiple partners to surface strategic issues and overall direction to product group leadership.
Use technologies and methods such as Dataswarm, Hive, Python, R, SQL to create deep scalable and repeatable insights that will empower the team while informing roadmap and team priorities.
Mininum Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, econometrics, computer science, applied mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering) or equivalent experience
5+ years experience doing quantitative analysis or statistical modeling
Experience working independently and as a member of a cross-functional team
Proven experience influencing cross-functional partners and work across teams
Experience in querying and manipulating large datasets for analysis
SQL experience
Preferred Qualifications:
Python or R experience
","['r', 'hive', 'sql', 'python']","['statist', 'research', 'data', 'econometr']",1.0,"['r', 'hive', 'sql', 'python', 'statist', 'research', 'data', 'econometr']"
DS,"Responsibilities:
Work on small and large data sets of structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data to discover hidden knowledge about the client’s business and develop methods to leverage that knowledge for their business.
Identify and solve business challenges working closely with cross-functional teams, such as Delivery, Business Consulting, Engineering and Product Management.
Develop prescriptive and predictive statistical, behavioral or other models via machine learning and/or traditional statistical modeling techniques, and understand which type of model applies best in a given business situation.
Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources.
Analyze and interpret the results of product experiments.
Competencies:
A proven passion for generating insights from data.
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources.
Expertise in mathematics and applied statistics, computer science, and visualization capabilities.
Curious and an excellent learner.
Able to research, explore and acquire working knowledge in new areas.
A complete understanding of standard statistical techniques like MLE/QMLE, GMM, OLS/GLS, univariate and multivariate time series models (e.g.
ARIMA, DLM's, VAR's), regression model diagnostics for time series and cross sectional data, along with Machine Learning methodologies like Random Forests, SVM's and Boosting/Bagging.
Expert knowledge of an analysis tool/statistical package such as R, JMP, Stata, SPSS, SAS, Matlab
Highly effective communicator; able to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise & actionable way that is meaningful to general business audience and credible to client’s data scientists.
Fluency with at least one scripting language such as Python, Java, or C/C++.
Expertise with relational databases and SQL.
NoSQL is a big plus.
REQUIREMENTS:
MS or Ph.D. preferred in a quantitative Social Science (e.g.
Economics) or Statistics with a substantive field interest.
At least 5 years’ experience in business, consulting or applied field research with project lead responsibilities for solving analytics problems using quantitative approaches.
Demonstrated track record producing models and actionable insights using advanced statistical methods.
Experience working with large data sets using distributed computing tools, e.g.
Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, etc.
","['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'hive', 'c', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['nosql', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'hive', 'c', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'econom', 'research', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"All candidates should be able to commit to a consecutive 16-week timeframe for successful completion of the program.
This is a 16-week position based in Menlo Park, CA; Seattle, WA; and Boston, MA.
Responsibilities:
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms, and machine learning models
Leverage tools like Python, R, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Communicate final recommendations and drive decision making
Mininum Qualifications:
Degree in quantitative field (e.g.
Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research or other related field)
2+ years of industry or graduate research experience solving analytical problems and building models using quantitative, statistical or machine learning approaches
Experience with Machine Learning, Statistics, or other data analysis tools and techniques
Experience performing data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation for medium to large datasets
Experience with at least one programming language (i.e.
Python, R, Java, or C++)
Experience writing SQL queries
Experience with scientific computing and analysis packages such as NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, Scikit-learn, dplyr, or ggplot2
Experience with statistics methods such as forecasting, time series, hypothesis testing, classification, clustering or regression analysis
Experience with data visualization libraries such as Matplotlib, Pyplot, ggplot2
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree (Masters or PhD or Equivalent experience) in quantitative field
Experience working with distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Hive, Spark, etc.)
Proficiency in algorithmic complexity
","['spark', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java']","['regress', 'hypothesi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['spark', 'ggplot2', 'sql', 'scipi', 'dplyr', 'r', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'java', 'regress', 'hypothesi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
- Top 10 Companies for Global DiversityNational Association of Female Executives - Top 50 Companies for Female ExecutivesWorking Mother - 100 Best Companies2016 Climate Leadership AwardRequired Technical and Professional Expertise* PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.About IBMIBM's greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Minimum qualifications:
PhD degree in Statistics, Biostatistics, Operations Research, Physics, Economics, Applied Mathematics, or similar quantitative discipline, or equivalent practical experience.
Relevant internship or work experience with data analysis.
Experience with statistical software (R, Python, S-Plus, SAS, or similar) and experience with database languages (e.g.
SQL).
Preferred qualifications:
Authorization to legally work in the United States.
1 year of relevant work experience, including experience with statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, sampling methods.
Ability to draw conclusions from data and recommend actions.
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction.
Demonstrated willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
About the job
As an analyst, you do more than just crunch the numbers.
Identifying the problem is only half the job; you also figure out the solution.
As a key member of the team, you work with engineers to analyze and interpret data, develop metrics to measure results and integrate new methodologies into existing systems.
Responsibilities
Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide variety of people and teams.
Make business recommendations (e.g.
cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.
","['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['data', 'biostatist', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'data', 'biostatist', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"It also makes the platform an ideal place to conduct analyses and research to learn how to improve marketing in the new mobile world.
They would be intellectually curious, a great communicator, data-driven, a fast learner and able to move fast while keeping focused on high impact projects.
Applicants should have a strong quantitative understanding, a strong data a talent for taking complex concepts and distilling them into clear accessible learnings.
Responsibilities:
Develop deep understanding of the Auction, analyze current performance by targeting and objectives
Drive learnings on campaign optimization
Recommend product or positioning changes based on robust analysis of user and advertiser behavior
Mininum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in an analytical field (such as Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Economics, or Finance)
Experience driving action based on data-driven insights
Experience communicating concepts to all audiences
Experience operating independently and delivering results
Experience with SQL and development experience in a scripting language such as R or Python
Experience working with machine learning algorithms
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with experimental design and understanding of statistical data analysis (e.g.
regression, probability)
Understanding of statistical analysis, experience with packages such as R, MATLAB, SPSS, SAS, Stata, etc.
Advanced degree in analytical field
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa']","['probabl', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'probabl', 'regress', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'financ', 'econom', 'optim', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"The successful candidate will have experience in working in innovative projects with fast-paced delivery schedules in startups large enterprises Proven track record of analyzing large-scale complex data sets, modeling and machine learning algorithms Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, etc.
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas ), Matlab Experience in deep learning frameworks (e.g., Tensorflow, MxNet), and Large-scale optimization preferred.
Experience with NLP toolkits such as NLTK, OpenNLP, Stanford CoreNLP, etc.
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
5 ndash 10 years of experience in Applied Machine learning Educational background in a relevant field (Computer Science, Applied Math, Statistics)
","['nltk', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'numpi']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'bay', 'data', 'nn', 'optim', 'math', 'svm', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['nltk', 'nosql', 'cassandra', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tensorflow', 'scipi', 'r', 'panda', 'mongodb', 'python', 'numpi', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'bay', 'data', 'nn', 'optim', 'math', 'svm', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Jobs at Instagram
Data Scientist Manager, Instagram Well-being
The Instagram Well-being organization is working on ensuring that Instagram is a positive force in people’s lives.
A core part of delivering on that, is making sure that people are safe from harm when they use Instagram, feel supported by Instagram when they need it, and are enabled to support each other and their communities.
At the heart of the Instagram Well-being organization is the data science team whose empirical studies and rigorous analyses shape the direction of Well-being product development, striving to protect Instagram users and their data and enables seamless development of safe and supportive products.
The Support teams are tasked with a wide range of challenges from promoting charitable giving to setting social norms that limit bullying or mitigate body image insecurities.
You will work in close partnership with a top-notch group of researchers and data scientists across FB Inc. to translate user research and expert insights into data-driven product strategies.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting-edge technology, and the ability to see your strategic thinking and ideas turned into real products on a regular basis.
You should be flexible and comfortable working in a cross-functional capacity within a fast-paced, multi-disciplinary environment.
Responsibilities
Develop product strategy and provide team leadership for Well-being in partnership with disciplines including product management, engineering, design, research and policy.
Identify high-impact analytical problems and find innovative ways to tackle these problems via data analysis, experimentation, and statistical modeling.
Size opportunities to ensure product teams are prioritizing the most impactful work.
Ensure product strategy has actionable measurement plans by owning goal metrics and evaluating product team performance.
Lead cross-functional and cross-team relationship building and collaboration with product, user research and engineering teams.
Minimum Qualifications
6+ years of experience with quantitative analysis
6+ years of experience with people management
5+ years experience with SQL or other programming languages
Experience initiating and driving projects to completion with minimal guidance
Experience communicating the results of analysis
Preferred Qualifications
Ph.D. in a behavioral science discipline (economics, psychology, neuroscience, etc.)
Understanding of statistical analysis, experience with packages, such as R, MATLAB, SPSS, SAS, Stata, etc.
Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Instagram is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer.
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'hive', 'sa']","['data', 'econom', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']",3.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'hive', 'sa', 'data', 'econom', 'research', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 26, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200125817
Imagine what you could do here.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish.
It takes deeply dedicated, intelligent and hard-working individuals excel at AI.
Key Qualifications
10 years of experience in data science
Excellent analytical skills, advanced level of statistics with the ability to identify and predict trends and anomalies
Superb software development/scripting skills with proficiency in C++ and Python, including libraries such as scikit-learn, pandas, scipy, Spacy, NLTK, and PyTorch
Data visualization experience with tools such as Tableau and Matplotlib, creating dashboards and presenting data through reports
History of presenting to senior leadership and to large cross-functional teams
Prior experience in voice assistants and AI/ML is a plus
The Data Scientist will utilize data, infrastructure, and analytic tools to isolate and key drivers of user satisfaction.
You will drive initiatives for better data collection and reporting, ensure data integrity across multiple data sources, and reduce analysis time through automation and creative solutions.
You should have the expertise required to understand complex data sets: product testing, big data, and user research.
Select and configure appropriate technologies and programming languages required to ensure successful business impact.
The position requires a software programming skillset, utilization of statistical techniques, experience understanding data integrity, and implementing automated solutions.
You will need to have a grasp of relational database management systems, design, and structured query language.
THE ROLE INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:
• Employ statistical techniques to drive customer understanding
• Answer complex questions through data, analysis, and clearly communicate findings to multi-functional teams for direction
• Seek opportunities to improve data collection, reporting, and consumption
• Regularly collaborate with internal and external teams to resolve data and collection issues
Education & Experience
Master’s or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Business Analytics, Machine Learning, Engineering, or equivalent experience
","['nltk', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'spaci', 'scikit']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['nltk', 'pytorch', 'excel', 'tableau', 'scipi', 'panda', 'matplotlib', 'python', 'spaci', 'scikit', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,", 2019
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200058263
• Experience in applying machine learning in information retrieval domain such as search engines, natural language processing, or similar areas.
• Desire to solve challenging problems at the intersection of user experience and computational algorithms
• Strong programming experience in one or more of the following: Java, C++, Python or equivalent
• Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Key Qualifications
You would work on applied natural language processing algorithms to understand user query and intent.
You would work on applied machine learning algorithms and models that help improve search relevance and experience.
You would also work on developing scalable tools and platform foundations that enable other engineers and scientists to develop, evaluate and release algorithms, models and features quickly.
This position involves a wide variety of skills and innovation, and is a unique opportunity that sits at the cutting-edge of machine learning and natural language understanding.
Ultimately, your work would have a huge impact on millions of users across the globe.
As a fundamental tool for human activity, Maps technology is evolving and new techniques are emerging.
Education & Experience
BS/MS in Computer Science or equivalent.
PhD preferred.
Additional Requirements
","['excel', 'java', 'python']","['natural language processing', 'commun', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['excel', 'java', 'python', 'nlp', 'commun', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The Finance DS team is a uniquely data intensive part of Facebooks Finance organization and plays a crucial role in delivering key financial insights to management through forecasting, analysis and modeling.
This position will primarily focus on analyzing and modeling the financial ecosystem and developing actionable insights for the business to influence decision makers to enable strong financial decision making.
This role will challenge the candidate to both understand and contribute to many facets of a rapidly growing business, including revenue forecasting, analytics, and strategic decision support.
Ideal candidates love breaking down problems, building solutions, delivering actionable and data-driven insights, and working in a fast-paced, dynamic environment.
Responsibilities:
Assess market opportunities, analyze current business performance and build statistical models to extrapolate current and historical trends into forward-looking forecasts
Lead and coordinate cross-functional projects
Mininum Qualifications:
BA/BS in Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, or other quantitative field
5+ years of experience in data science, business strategy, marketing, finance, engineering, or analytics
Fluency in SQL or a similar database querying language
Experience working with statistical packages such as R, MATLAB, SPSS, SAS, Stata, etc
Experienced in Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint
Experience in synthesizing strategic insights and problem-solve individually or in a group setting with knowledge on financial drivers of the business
Experience in shifting priorities while maintaining a degree of organization and control
Preferred Qualifications:
Development experience in at least one scripting language (Python, JavaScript, etc.)
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'matlab', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'javascript', 'sa']","['data', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'matlab', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'javascript', 'sa', 'data', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"* Develop technology for vehicles and robots to help people enjoy new levels of independence, access, and mobility.
* Bring advanced mobility technology to market faster.
* Discover new materials that will make batteries and hydrogen fuel cells smaller, lighter, less expensive and more powerful.
* Develop human-centered AI systems to augment (not replace) human decision making to increase the quality of decisions (e.g.
Start your impossible with us.TRI's Machine Assisted Cognition team is developing AI systems to augment (not replace) human decision making.
* Mentor and advise others.Qualifications:* Bachelor's or Master's degree in a quantitative field (e.g.
Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, Chemistry).
Ph.D.
preferred.
* Deep expertise in machine learning and deep learning.
* Proficiency in causal inference and advanced statistics.
* Experience architecting and deploying machine learning systems in an industry setting.
* Experience in providing technical leadership and mentorship.
* Strong track record of driving and executing complex, open-ended, cross-functional projects.
* Strong interpersonal skills.
Great teammate.
",[None],"['deep learning', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'causal']",1.0,"['deep learning', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'causal']"
DS,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together.
The Support teams are tasked with a wide range of challenges from promoting charitable giving to setting social norms that limit bullying or mitigate body image insecurities.
You will work in close partnership with a top-notch group of researchers and data scientists across FB Inc. to translate user research and expert insights into data-driven product strategies.
You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting-edge technology, and the ability to see your strategic thinking and ideas turned into real products on a regular basis.
You should be flexible and comfortable working in a cross-functional capacity within a fast-paced, multi-disciplinary environment.Responsibilities* Develop product strategy and provide team leadership for Well-being in partnership with disciplines including product management, engineering, design, research and policy.
* Identify high-impact analytical problems and find innovative ways to tackle these problems via data analysis, experimentation, and statistical modeling.
* Size opportunities to ensure product teams are prioritizing the most impactful work.
* Ensure product strategy has actionable measurement plans by owning goal metrics and evaluating product team performance.
)* Understanding of statistical analysis, experience with packages, such as R, MATLAB, SPSS, SAS, Stata, etc.
* Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
","['matlab', 'r', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'hive', 'sa']","['statist', 'research', 'commun', 'data']",999.0,"['matlab', 'r', 'hadoop', 'spss', 'hive', 'sa', 'statist', 'research', 'commun', 'data']"
DS,"Posted: May 21, 2020
Role Number:
200133136
These engineers build secure, end-to-end solutions.
Are you passionate about analyzing data patterns for large scale search engines?
The team represents the user’s perspective as they vet new features being introduced to AMP.
Your day-to-day responsibilities will include analyzing and creating innovative ideas to help improve AMP search and recommendations features, and reporting systematic issues to leadership, engineering, and product teams.
Key Qualifications
At least 5 years industry experience
Deep understanding of the software development for machine-learned products and services, and how analytics and human evaluation data can help improve those products
Self-sufficient in analyzing and drawing conclusions about the quality and product opportunity from raw and refined product data
Good product sense, with the ability to translate between product goals, business goals and technical requirements for data analytics
Self-motivated and proactive, with demonstrated creative and critical thinking capabilities
Outstanding communication and presentation skills, written and verbal, to all levels of an organization
Innate capability to, directly and indirectly, influence large teams for success
Excellent applied statistics skills, such as hypothesis testing, experimental design, sample size determination and non-parametric statistics
Experience with big data systems and distributed computing, such as Hadoop
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, pandas, dplyr, NumPy, etc
Experience with data visualization tools, such as GGplot, etc
Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive and SparkSQL
Experience with programming languages such as Scala, Spark or Python
Lead the product vision and project execution for all data infrastructure, analytics, and offline evaluation for an AMP product line (App Store, Music, Books, etc.)
Champion an industry-leading privacy-focused strategy for product measurement, human evaluation, and analytics.
Own and evangelize best practices for product analysis, measurement, and instrumentation.
Lead human evaluation design and management exercises.
Evaluate and improve the quality of KPIs for key products by analyzing customer pain points.
Empower others to understand and leverage data for decision making.
Ensure the measurement of new features are designed and instrumented in every release cycle.
Productize dashboards that help product teams to improve Search & Recommendations every day.
Keep teams focused on the right priorities to meet aggressive deadlines; clearly, communicate project progress to leads and executive team.
Education & Experience
Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related discipline.
PhD preferred.
","['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'dplyr', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'experimental design', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'dplyr', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'numpi', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'experimental design', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"retailer of mens clothing, and the largest mens formalwear provider in the
United States and Canada.
The Companys retail stores operate under the Mens
Wearhouse, Mens Wearhouse and Tux, Jos.
A.
Bank, Moores, and K&G brand
names.
40M annual visits, and generates approximately $3B in omnichannel revenue.
Strategy & Analytics group is led by an executive committee member and is
its strategy for profitable growth.
The Role
The Senior Data Scientist, Pricing will be
& Allocation Analytics.
This role will be responsible for all analytics and
advanced data science tools and techniques.
Key Accountabilities:
Pricing & Promotions team to identify areas of leverage and ensure insights
are translated into actions and results.
Measure product
performance during internal/external promotional events to assess the
elasticity of demand across the product portfolio.
Build in-house
price recommendation solutions that optimize revenue, profit and
sell-though in order to drive shareholder value.
Research and
implement modern data science techniques to solve pricing and promotions problems
in a scalable and robust manner.
data engineering team to seamlessly integrate analytical solutions into
business tools and processes.
Skills, Abilities, Experience & Qualifications:
PhD preferred (minimum BS plus 4 years' experience), in applied mathematics, physics, engineering, statistics, ecology, or closely related field with formal training in statistics and experimental design, with demonstrable track record of peer-reviewed publications.
Experience with machine learning and statistical concepts, packages and libraries.
Skilled in data visualization, statistical analysis and process automation
Proficient in SQL and relational database experience
Proficient in Python and R
Work Locations: 02098A Corporate Office 6100 Stevenson Blvd Fremont 94538-2453
Job: Strategy & Analytics
Shift: Day Job
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['experimental design', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",1.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'experimental design', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"Posted: Dec 6, 2019
Role Number:
200128996
You are skilled analytically with a strong business sense.
You will be a partner to the business, understand their goals and then use your skills and subject matter expertise to surface actionable insights that drive business and customer benefits.
You will collaborate with partners across product, design, engineering, and business teams to drive your findings and recommendations into action.
Key Qualifications
5 + years of recent experience in a data science or data analyst role.
Strong passion for applied empirical analytics, data mining and predictive analytics to provide with actionable insights.
Experience measuring UX impact, customer engagement, planning and analyzing AB experiments.
Confirmed collaboration, communication and story telling skills with ability to adapt and connect across a variety of audiences.
This includes strong writing, and data visualization skills with the ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, detailed, and actionable manner to senior executives.
Ability to partner with the data engineering and BI teams to run workflows, requirements and project roadmap to ensure consistent data availability, data quality and data accessibility.
Excellent time management skills to operate with tight deadlines and balance the pressure of product launches and executive requests.
Be a self-starter, driven, accountable and a high-energy teammate!
Strong familiarity with multiple platforms, tools, methodologies in data analysis and insight synthesis.
Have strong working knowledge of database structures and data warehousing principles and have authoritative level SQL with the ability to ETL both structured and unstructured data from various sources.
Conceive and execute the design of end to end scripted analytics solutions using SQL/TeraData as well as modern analytical systems in Spark SQL, PySpark/Hadoop as well as experience using Notebooks.
Experience in data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Prior experience working with financial products or large multinational marketplaces/e-commerce desirable!
You will play a key role improving the AMP commerce, payments & subscription platform.
As a member of this team you will help optimize the platform by developing new data products and tuning existing features.
A few areas your work will influence include account and payment creation flows, transaction efficiency and authorizations, and subscription management and renewals.
Your day to day activities will include:
Deep dives in large-scale data to identify key insights that inform product improvements and business strategy.
Supervised and unsupervised learning.
A/B testing and causal modeling.
Define how best to measure and monitor commerce products and features.
Engage with business, engineering, product management teams as a thought partner.
Education & Experience
Minimum of bachelor’s degree, preferably in economics, statistics, computer science, or related quantitative field.
Advanced degree in Applied Econometrics, Statistics, Data Mining, Machine Learning, Analytics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, or related field preferred.
","['spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'hadoop']","['etl', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",1.0,"['spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"Position Summary...
What you'll do...
Data Source Identification: Understands the priority order of requirements and service level agreements.
Defines and identifies the most suitable sources for required data that is fit for purpose, referring to external sources as required.
Performs initial data quality checks on the extracted data.
Reviews the deliverables of junior associates and provides guidance.
Data Strategy: Understands, articulates, interprets, and applies the principles of the defined strategy to unique, moderately complex business problems that may span one or main functions or domains.
Problem Formulation: Analyzes the business problem within one's discipline and questions assumptions to help the business identify the root cause.
Identifies and recommends approach to resolve the business problem.
Sets data analytics, big data analytics, automation goals, and deliverables based on the established success criteria and define key metrics to measure progress and effectiveness of the solution.
Quantifies business impact.
Analytical Modeling: Selects appropriate modeling techniques for complex problems with large scale, multiple structured and unstructured data sets.
Selects and develops variables and features iteratively based on model responses in collaboration with the business.
Conducts exploratory data analysis activities (for example, basic statistical analysis, hypothesis testing, statistical inferences) on available data.
Identifies dimensions and designs of experiments and creates test and learn frameworks.
Interprets data to identify trends to go across future data sets.
Creates continuous, online model learning along with iterative model enhancements.
Guides the team on feature engineering, experimentation, and advanced modeling techniques to be used for complex problems with unstructured and multiple data sets (for example, streaming data, raw text data).
Model Deployment & Scaling: Deploys models to production.
Continuously logs and tracks model behavior once it is deployed against the defined metrics.
Identifies model parameters which may need modifications depending on scale of deployment.
Code Development & Testing: Writes code to develop the required solution and application features by determining the appropriate programming language and leveraging business, technical, and data requirements.
Creates test cases to review and validate the proposed solution design.
Creates proofs of concept.
Tests the code using the appropriate testing approach.
Deploys software to production servers.
Contributes code documentation, maintains playbooks, and provides timely progress updates.
Applied Business Acumen: Evaluates proposed business cases for projects and initiatives.
Influences business stakeholder decision making.
Translate business requirements into strategies, initiatives, and projects and aligns them to business strategy and objectives, and drives the execution of deliverables.
Builds and articulates the business case and return on investment and delivers work that has demonstrable value.
Challenge business assumptions on topics related to one's domain expertise.
Develops new organization-wide processes and ways of working.
Teaches and guides others on best practices.
Model Assessment & Validation: Identifies and reviews model evaluation metrics based on analytical requirements.
Applies suitable techniques for model testing and tuning, to assess accuracy, fit, validity, and robustness.
Ensures testing information is documented and maintained by the team.
Data Visualization: Identifies and recommends the most suitable visualization tools based on context.
Generates appropriate graphical representations of data and model outcomes.
Understands customer requirements to design appropriate data representation for complex data sets and drive User Experience designers and User Interface engineers to build front end applications.
Defines application design based on customer requirements.
Builds compelling stories based on context to integrate multiple pieces of information into cohesive insights.
Presents to and influences diverse audiences using the appropriate frameworks and conveys clear messages through deep business and stakeholder understanding.
Customizes communication style based on stakeholders and leverages relationships to drive behavioral change.
Guides and mentors junior associates on story types, structures, and techniques based on context.
Drives the execution of multiple business plans and projects by identifying customer and operational needs; developing and communicating business plans and priorities; removing barriers and obstacles that impact performance; providing resources; identifying performance standards; measuring progress and adjusting performance accordingly; developing contingency plans; and demonstrating adaptability and supporting continuous learning.
Minimum Qualifications...
Outlined below are the required minimum qualifications for this position.
If none are listed, there are no minimum qualifications.
Option 1: Bachelors degree in Statistics, Economics, Analytics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Technology or related field and 5 years' experience in an analytics related field.
Option 2: Masters degree in Statistics, Economics, Analytics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Information Technology or related field and 3 years' experience in an analytics related field.
Option 3: 7 years' experience in an analytics or related field.
Preferred Qualifications...
Outlined below are the optional preferred qualifications for this position.
If none are listed, there are no preferred qualifications.
Data science, machine learning, optimization models, PhD in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Information Technology, Operations Research, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Econometrics, Publications or active peer reviewer in related journals or conference, Successful completion of one or more assessments in Python, Spark, Scala, or R, Using open source frameworks (for example, scikit learn, tensorflow, torch)
","['scala', 'spark', 'r', 'python', 'scikit']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology', 'econometr']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'r', 'python', 'scikit', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology', 'econometr']"
DS,"Key Responsibilities:
Works in project teams as subject matter expert to design and develop program methods to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse ""big data"" sources
Performs ad-hoc statistical and data-mining analysis , using statistical tools like R, SAS and MATlab; input and design of data acquisition systems, data structure and database design.
Interfaces with internal customers for requirements analysis and compiles data for scheduled or special reports and analysis
Works in project teams to develop analytical models, algorithms and automated processes, applying SQL understanding and PHP or Python programming, to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets.
Supports the timely development of products for manufacturing and process information by applying sophisticated data analytics, understands the business data gathering processes of the business
Functional Knowledge
Demonstrates conceptual and practical expertise in own discipline and basic knowledge of related disciplines
Business Expertise
Has knowledge of best practices and how own area integrates with others; is aware of the competition and the factors that differentiate them in the market
Leadership
Acts as a resource for colleagues with less experience; may lead small projects with manageable risks and resource requirements
Problem Solving
Solves complex problems; takes a new perspective on existing solutions; exercises judgment based on the analysis of multiple sources of information
Impact
Impacts a range of customer, operational, project or service activities within own team and other related teams; works within broad guidelines and policies
Interpersonal Skills
Explains difficult or sensitive information; works to build consensus
Qualifications
Education:
Skills
Certifications:
Languages:
Years of Experience:
Work Experience:
Additional Information
Travel:
Yes, 10% of the Time
Yes
","['matlab', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['risk', 'big data', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist']",999.0,"['matlab', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'risk', 'big data', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist']"
DS,"Business Growth Business Unit owns the marketing and advertising technology platform of JD.COM.
You will be working with a group of elite research scientists and economists to tackle both challenging strategic and tactical problems to drive the growth of JD.COM's marketing and advertising platform as well as the e-commerce platform as a whole.
Such projects include, e.g.
improving advertising efficiency through model enhancement, data integration and/or new business model developments, analyzing customers lifetime value and develop data-driven processes to improve customer engagements.
As a senior data scientist, you will be able to work with the data generated by hundreds of millions of JD.COM's active users and your work will directly influence how customers shop within and outside the JD platform.
Responsibilities:
Work with business, engineering and product management teams to form understandings of the requirements, processes as well as limitations of existing systems.
Analyze and validate real-world data, work with engineering and product management teams to design solutions to improve data quality.
Identify key drivers for business growth through data driven processes and create insights for enhancement strategies using data driven progresses.
Build prototypes to demonstrate and validate improvement proposals.
Summarize and document findings to communicate with senior leaderships.
Qualifications:
Master or Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Operational Research, Statistics or related fields.
2+ years of work experience in Data Scientist role.
Experience in consumer segments, especially e-commerce is strongly preferred.
Hands-on experience with large scale data and computing platforms such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark.
Highly experienced in data manipulation and analysis using SQL.
Development experience in scripting languages such as Python.
Ability to communicate the analysis results with the leadership teams to influence the strategy of product and business development.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
About JD-Business Growth
The Business Growth BU at JD.com was established in 2011.
The engineering team is a group of dynamic geeks from world-class universities and industry-leading companies working in fields such as machine learning, analytics, statistics, NLP, information retrieval, system infrastructures, etc., based in Beijing and Mountain View, CA.
JD.com is an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"The mission of the Spark Org is to build a world class platform for Augmented Reality (AR).
and new AR use cases (AR Ads, AR Games, etc.).
This means that data scientists on this team will be uniquely positioned to inform data-driven product strategy and influence teams across the family of apps!
Responsibilities:
Initiate and lead cross-functional data science and modeling projects with multiple contributors.
Aggregate and analyze complex data sets across multiple teams to identify and interpret large scale trends and patterns to help drive strategy across several teams.
Work with members of the team and multiple partners to surface strategic issues and overall direction to product group leadership.
Use technologies and methods such as Dataswarm, Hive, Python, R, SQL to create deep scalable and repeatable insights that will empower the team while informing roadmap and team priorities.
Mininum Qualifications:
MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, econometrics, computer science, applied mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering) or equivalent experience
8+ years experience doing quantitative analysis or statistical modeling
Knowledge of at least one modeling framework (e.g., Scikit-Learn, TensorFlow, SAS, R, MATLAB)
Experience influencing product strategy through data-centric presentations (to product, business, and other stakeholders)
Experience extracting and manipulating large datasets
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Proven experience influencing cross-functional partners and work across teams
Preferred Qualifications:
","['python', 'spark', 'sql', 'matlab', 'php', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'hive', 'scikit', 'sa']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econometr']",2.0,"['python', 'spark', 'sql', 'matlab', 'php', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'perl', 'hive', 'scikit', 'sa', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econometr']"
DS,"You will collaborate with other expert scientists, as well as engineers who accelerate, scale and open-source algorithms, and demonstrate the effectiveness of deep learning in these problem domains.
What you'll be doing:
Competing and using RAPIDS on Kaggle and other major ML/DL competitions.
Sharing your findings and improvements through blogs, articles, and other posts
Developing libraries and algorithms that improve the RAPIDS ecosystem.
Developing and training new deep learning architectures for sparse, graph and tabular data problems in a variety of problem domains, while demonstrating that your algorithms perform better than traditional, non-DL based methods.
Staying on top of the latest algorithms and model architectures.
Collaborating globally with DL & AI Researchers in leading universities and industrial research labs.
Demonstrated prowess in ML in public competitions: Kaggle Grandmaster, or top rank at other worldwide competitions, etc
BS, MS, or PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Economics, Physics, Mathematics or related field or equivalent work experience
An ability to share and communicate your ideas clearly through blog posts, kernels, GitHub, etc.
10+ years of optimization, Machine Learning, or Computational statistics knowledge with several years of applicable competition, work or research experience.
Strong Python programming skills and an understanding of the Python deep learning ecosystem (PyTorch, Tensorflow, MXNet, etc) for training and ideally for production.
Previous experience in working with sparse and tabular data.
Track record of applied research excellence or significant product development.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills are required, along with the ability to work in a dynamic, product oriented, global team.
Your history of mentoring junior engineers and interns is a plus.
GPU computing is the most productive and pervasive platform for deep learning and AI.
New internet services, like Google Assistant, have learned speech from sound and provide a more natural way to access information.
Self-driving cars use deep learning to recognize the space the car inhabits, the lanes in which it drives, and the objects to avoid.
In healthcare, neural networks trained with millions of medical images can find clues in MRIs that until now could only be found through invasive biopsies.
These are just a few examples.
AI will spur a wave of social progress unmatched since the industrial revolution.
Are you creative and autonomous?
Do you love a challenge?
","['pytorch', 'mxnet', 'github', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'neural network', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['pytorch', 'mxnet', 'github', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'nn', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Responsibilities
Perform data preparation activities, such as collecting, cleaning, and organizing.
Work with appropriate parties to resolve or remediate data quality issues.
Produce clear, understandable visualizations, dashboard and reports to share with Senior Management and business partners, provide the insightful story from the data perspective to business owners.
Establish data modeling frameworks for addressing the growth opportunity and lifting the experience of the customers across the ecosystem.
Deep dive into cases through data and ad hoc analyses, recover the ground truth of the customer behavior, preference and paint points to boost the customer engagement.
Communicate Results on a regular basis to stakeholders around the world, including executive leadership
Qualifications
Master degree (Ph.D. is a plus) in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering or a similar quantitative field, or equivalent practical experience.
Strong data modeling skillset, hands on mastery of data manipulation and experience with data analytics tools (SQL, R, Python, Hive, Spark, etc.)
and data visualization tools (Tableau, Splunk, etc.)
Business driven thinking with insightful data interpretation, experience working in payment industry or growth team is desired but not mandatory
Creative problem solving and critical thinking skills
Effective verbal and written communication in English.
Ability to collaborate well on a geo-distributed and diversity team
","['splunk', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive']","['dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",2.0,"['splunk', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
DS,"As a CVS Health colleague, youll be at the center of it all.
This position lies within the Attain team.
70445
Fundamental Components:
Provides strategic leadership for the development, validation and delivery of algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools.
Leads development and execution of new and/or highly complex algorithms and statistical predictive models and determines analytical approaches and modeling techniques to evaluate scenarios and potential future outcomes.
Establishes analytical rigor and statistical methods to analyze large amounts of data, using advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses.
Manages highly complex analytical projects from data exploration, model building, performance evaluation and testing.
Applies in-depth knowledge of systems and products to consult and advise on additional efforts across organization/enterprise.
Motivates team members and probes into technical details, and mentors others to do the same.
Provides thought leadership and direction for analytic solutions, tools and studies.
Anticipates and solves strategic and high risk business problems with broad impact on the business area by applying leading-edge theories and techniques to investigate problems, detect patterns and recommend solutions.
Provides guidance to develop enterprise-wide analytics strategy and roadmap.
Interacts with internal and external peers and management to share highly complex information/solutions related to areas of expertise and/or to gain acceptance of new or enhanced technology/ business solutions.
Background Experience:
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.Strong organizational, management and leadership skills.Superior skills to effectively communicate and negotiate across the business and in the external health care environment.
Expertise in advanced analytics tools and languages to analyze large data sets from multiple data sources.Expertise in innovating and implementing novel machine learning techniques.
Comprehensive knowledge on health care industry, products, systems, business strategies and products.
Demonstrates advanced in-depth specialization in mathematical analysis methods, machine learning, statistical analyses, and predictive modeling.Superior ability to communicate technical ideas and results to non-technical clients in written and verbal form.
10 or more years of progressively complex related experience.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related discipline.Masters degree or PhD preferred.
from you via e-mail.
Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter.
#LI-DT1
",['excel'],"['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Lab126 began in 2004 as a subsidiary of Amazon.com, Inc., originally creating the best-selling Kindle family of products.
Work hard.
Have fun.
Make history.
The ROLE
The Medical Data Scientitst should be an expert familiar with all of the data warehousing technical components (e.g.
ETL, Reporting, Data Model), infrastructure (e.g.
hardware and software) and their integration.
The ideal candidate will be responsible for developing overall architecture and high level design.
The candidate must have extensive experience with Star Schemas, Dimensional Models, and Datamarts.
The individual is expected to build efficient, flexible, extensible, and scalable ETL design and mappings.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills are required as the candidate will work very closely with diverse teams.
Responsibilities include:
· Ensure completeness and compatibility of the technical infrastructure to support system performance, availability and architecture requirements
· Design and plans for the integration for all data warehouse technical components
· Provide input and recommendations on technical issues to the project manager
· Responsible for data design, data extracts and transforms
· Develop the implementation and operation support plans
· Lead architecture design and implementation of next generation BI solution.
· Build robust and scalable data integration (ETL) pipelines using SQL, EMR, Python and Spark.
· Mentor and develop other DE's and BIE's.
· Build and deliver high quality data architecture to support business analyst, data scientists, and customer reporting needs.
· Interface with other technology teams to extract, transform, and load data from a wide variety of data sources.
· Continually improve ongoing reporting and analysis processes, automating or simplifying self-service support for customers
Basic Qualifications
*Bachelor's degree or higher in a quantitative/technical field (e.g.
Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering).
*10+ years of relevant experience in one of the following areas: Data engineering, database engineering, business intelligence or business analytics.
*5+ years of hands-on experience in writing complex, highly-optimized SQL queries across large data sets.
*5+ years of experience in scripting languages like Python etc.
Preferred Qualifications
*Proven success in communicating with users, other technical teams, and senior management to collect requirements, describe data modeling decisions and data engineering strategy
*Experience providing technical leadership and mentoring other engineers for best practices on data engineering
*Knowledge of software engineering best practices across the development life cycle, including agile methodologies, coding standards, code reviews, source management, build processes, testing, and operations
*Masters in computer science, mathematics, statistics, economics, or other quantitative field
*Data Science / Medical experience preferred
The short training linked below can help explain why these revisions are necessary.
Learn about EEO and Hiring the Best!
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'python']","['data modeling', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'python', 'data modeling', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Passionate about precision medicine and advancing the healthcare industry?
Recent advancements in underlying technology have finally made it possible for AI to impact clinical care in a meaningful way.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with product, science, engineering, and business development teams to build the most advanced data platform in precision medicine
Design and prototype novel data visualization and analysis tools and algorithms
Wrangle and analyze large diverse sparse datasets, extract insights, and drive further research opportunities
Interrogate analytical results for robustness, validity, and out of sample stability
Document, summarize, and present your findings to a group of peers and stakeholders
Qualifications
Degree in computer science, software engineering, statistics, machine learning, bioinformatics or related technical field
2+ years full time employment experience building and validating predictive models on structured or unstructured data
Proficient in Python, and SQL
Experience with the following: Pandas, NumPy, SciPy, Scikit-learn, Jupyter Notebooks
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms, and ensemble methods, such as: K-Means, PCA, Regression, Neural Networks, Decision Trees, Gradient Boosting
Experience working in a Linux / Mac environment
Outstanding programming and problem solving skills
Self-driven and work well in an interdisciplinary team with minimal direction
A strong desire to understand why things work the way they do
Thrive in a fast-paced environment and willing to shift priorities seamlessly
Experience with communicating insights and presenting concepts to diverse audiences
Nice to Haves
Kaggle.com competitions and/or kernels track record
Experience working with clinical and/or genomic data
Experience with AWS architecture
Experience with: Git, matplotlib, seaborn, HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, D3, Plot.ly, Flask, Dask
Experience in agile environments and comfort with quick iterations
","['dask', 'd3', 'linux', 'git', 'sql', 'seaborn', 'scipi', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'flask', 'python', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'aw']","['regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'pca', 'boost', 'predict', 'supervis', 'neural network', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['dask', 'd3', 'linux', 'git', 'sql', 'seaborn', 'scipi', 'panda', 'jupyt', 'flask', 'python', 'javascript', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'aw', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'pca', 'boost', 'predict', 'supervis', 'nn', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning', 'bioinformat', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Slots and CSR.
Here’s where you would come in: identify and formalize problems related to campaign optimization.
Design and develop systems and services to optimize campaigns at scale.
Be innovative, be creative, use every bit of that key commodity – data.
Your solutions to difficult problems will need to be demonstrably impactful, visual and maintainable.
You will collaborate with engineering teams to build proof-of-concept and MVPs of campaign bidders and optimizers.
You will collaborate with User Acquisition Managers, Product Managers, and Engineers to deliver business impact.
Responsibilities:
Design and implement scalable systems and models to experiment with campaigns and creatives across channels and acquire users at scale
Work with large amounts of data to find and realize opportunities to acquire and re-target users profitably delivering unambiguous business metric impact
Craft effective campaign strategies to acquire users across a multitude of user acquisition channels
Drive and empower user acquisition team to make quantitatively informed, evidence based decisions - through custom visualizations, and ETLs to augment user data
Models may include but not limited to LTV modelling, campaign bid recommendations, budget allocation, clustering/segmentation, forecasting, fraud detection, and / or reinforcement learning
Build prototypes and MVPs of services and applications that improve effectiveness of campaigns, creatives, ad networks and/or user segments.
Required Skills and Experience:
B.S.
or B.A.
in Math, Statistics, Comp Sci, Engineering, or other quantitative field required; Masters, MBA or PhD preferred
5+ years of relevant work experience in data science or analytics role in a Marketing Analytics or a User Acquisition Analytics Team
Familiar with mobile performance marketing and/or user acquisition landscape
Strong experience in SQL;
Proficient in Python; Proven fundamental programming skills (algorithms, data structures, OOP, OS, Networking, AWS Cloud); Ability to design distributed systems
Ability to build and maintain software services and systems at scale; experience in deploying services in at least one cloud provider (AWS, Google Cloud or Azure)
Proven experience with some of the following: machine learning, predictive modeling, deep learning
Experience in analyzing large datasets, preferably in a Hadoop or Spark environment, and deploying production ready systems at scale
Strong written and oral communication skills
Strong passion for gaming and performance marketing!
","['spark', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['spark', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
DS,"As a Data Scientist, you will develop novel solutions to market-driven problems using knowledge of the latest ML techniques, rigorous statistical analysis, and practical experience on previous data science projects.
You will collaborate with internal and external stakeholders (external customers, other D&B data scientists, sales team members, business unit product leaders, development teams, and global partners) to understand business needs and technical requirements.
You will also:
Serve as a Subject Matter Expert on internal D&B data, and estimation of business size.
Participate and support other teams as needed for all aspects of model development, including design, model implementation, validation, calibration, documentation, product implementation, monitoring, and reporting
Research complex business issues and recommend solutions, including customer data input requirements, other required data sets, modeling approaches, and end products
Basic Qualifications:
Masters in a quantitative / applied field (Engineering, Computer Science, Operations Research, Mathematics, Data Science, Economics, Statistics).
2+ years of experience in data science roles.
Strong knowledge of programming and modeling using Python, R, or SAS.
Strong SQL skills and experience working with large data sets.
Experience working collaboratively, including building and maintaining relationships with internal and external stakeholders/clients.
Experience advising a team on innovative methodologies, data science tools, and environments.
Experience communicating complex ideas to both a technical and non-technical audience.
Experience applying modern machine learning techniques.
Preferred Qualities
Strong writing skills.
Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are made on a case-by-case basis.
","['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis.
The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making.
You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product.
Responsibilities:
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operation: forecasting and setting product team goals, designing and evaluating experiments, monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics, building and analyzing dashboards and reports, building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis, evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis: proposing what to build in the next roadmap, understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends, identifying new levers to help move key metrics, building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership: influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, communicating state of business, experiment results, etc.
to product teams, spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure: working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica, automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Knowledge of statistics (e.g.
hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (e.g.
R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Experience working within the tech sector preferred
","['perl', 'sql', 'mysql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa']","['regress', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['perl', 'sql', 'php', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'sa', 'regress', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Minimum qualifications:
3 years of experience in an analyst or Data Science role.
Experience using SQL to work with multiple datasets.
Experience designing data models and building data structures.
Experience in a language for statistical computing (R, Python/pandas, Stata, etc.).
Preferred qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Engineering, Data Science, or related field (e.g.
Mathematics, Physics, etc.).
Experience designing databases, and defining and implementing system requirements for data collection.
Proficiency with statistical data analysis (a/b tests, hypothesis testing, experiment setting, etc.
), and creating models to answer business questions.
Knowledge of Machine Learning libraries (such as TensorFlow, Scikit-learn, Keras).
Excellent oral and written communication skills, including the ability to communicate findings in a structured and clear manner to a non-technical audience.
About the job
The Cloud Support Data and Analytics team provides data solutions that power the Cloud Support organization.
In this role, you will work on projects in a growing organization with opportunities to address problems that will needing creative solutions and models.
You will collaborate closely with stakeholders from technical solutions engineering, product programs, vendor operations, support operations and support experience teams.
Responsibilities
Provide decision-making support for key projects, and research new ways of modeling data to unlock actionable insights or improve processes.
Contribute to the development of the frameworks, tools, skills and culture for the team and wider organization.
Use predictive analytics and/or machine learning to facilitate forecasting for a growing and global support operation.
Write and review technical documents, including requirements and design documents for existing and future data systems, as well as data standards and policies.
Partner with non-technical stakeholders to understand their needs, help frame the problem by asking the right questions, and document and prioritize requirements.
Communicate results of technical work.
Design, write, and support extract, transform, and load (ETL) processes to automate data collection and manage pipelines.
","['kera', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['hypothesi', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['kera', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'hypothesi', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"You will be supported by an established data platform with an advanced analytics toolkit.
Good business sense and an aptitude for framing and answering questions analytically is key in this role.
WHAT YOU'LL DO:
Mine and analyze data from analytics databases to drive optimization and improvement of commercialization tactics, agency operations, marketing techniques, product team planning and other business strategies through advanced forecasting and statistical methodology
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes
Consult and guide team members on A/B testing best practices and test model quality
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy (confidence intervals, accuracy rates, etc.)
Write maintainable, clean model code using best practices from software engineering where applicable
REQUIREMENTS / QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field, or equivalent applied professional experience
2-5+ years experience as a data scientist, decision scientist, data analyst, data engineer or other adjacent roles
Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Solid mathematical foundation and knowledge of a variety of statistical methods (e.g.
regression, classification, clustering, experimental design, advanced forecasting)
Strong proficiency in SQL and either Python or R
Strong proficiency in data visualization
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
MS or PhD with quantitative focus or relevant applied research/experience
Experience with modern software engineering workflows and best practices (e.g.
writing reproducible code, Git)
Familiarity with research design / experimental methods (i.e.
solid understanding of confounding, sources of bias in data, methods to infer causality, etc.)
BENEFITS + PERKS:
Competitive Compensation & Stock Option Offering
Health, Dental, Vision & Disability Coverages
HSA offering + employer contribution
Unlimited PTO + flexibility to enjoy it
Paid Parental Leave Program
Commuter Benefits (up to $100/month)Wellness perk ($100/month)
Learning & Development Stipends
Onsite Full Service Barista
Wednesday Catered Lunch + Fully Stocked Fridges
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
**No external recruiters or agents, please.
**
","['excel', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'analyz', 'causal', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'git', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'experimental design', 'data', 'analyz', 'causal', 'predict', 'clean', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"JOB QUALIFICATIONS
KNOWLEDGE REQUIREMENTS
?
Advanced Statistics, operations research/ management, mathematics or business analytics with experience, courses, or project work in an analytic methods such as linear, mixed linear, constraint programming, modeling, simulation, time series analysis, pattern recognition, queuing theory, multivariate analysis, and other various predictive analytics techniques
?
Strong written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work effectively in teams and under pressure.
Multi-lingual capability is a plus.
?
Ability to draw conclusions from data and prescribe actionable and measurable activities.
?
Highly motivated and creative, thinking ""out of the box"".
?
Familiarity with non-relational data frameworks (aka NoSQL, eg.
Hive).
?
Experience with Apache Pig, Spark systems.
?
Strong team mentality, interpersonal and communications skills
?
Preferred working directly with management and executives
","['nosql', 'hive', 'pig', 'spark']","['data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['nosql', 'hive', 'pig', 'spark', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"This role is responsible for helping internal marketing teams measure and optimize marketing programs and investments across paid, owned and earned media channels to drive customer engagement, brand equity and store profitability.
In this capacity, this person will leverage marketing measurement techniques, including media mix models, a/b testing, multi-touch attribution, and synthetic control groups, to quantify the impact of marketing tactics on business and financial outcomes in the short and long term.
They will partner with media planners and marketing program managers to deliver analytically derived insights to optimize media efficiency and maximize campaign profitability.
Above and beyond strong data and technical skills, the right candidate for this position will have a strong understanding of business and marketing performance.
Position is located in Austin, TX.
The following duties are essential in successful execution of the position:
Build, maintain and evolve marketing attribution models to quantify the effect of marketing communications on customer behavior, sales and profitability across paid, owned and earned channels (e. g., tv, radio, out of home, paid search, display, online video, direct mail, social media, etc.).
Prepare quarterly media marketing effectiveness reviews to inform media plans, financial forecasting, and identify areas for efficiency improvements.
Work closely with the Media Planning team to solve key marketing measurement challenges and ensure that analyses are relevant and useful to inform marketing strategy.
Design data visualizations and presentations to track marketing channel performance and communicate business impact to marketing leadership teams.
Explain complex modeling approaches in simple terms; Develop compelling narratives that connect modeling results with marketing problems.
Build & maintains strong working relationships across departments or teams based on trust and mutual respect.
Communicate with senior stakeholder to balance stakeholder and analytics perspectives.
Partner with marketing program and channel managers to ensure that tracking, reporting and analytics are tied to marketing campaign objectives.
Work with media agencies and marketing operations teams to ensure that media tracking is in place with high levels of data quality.
Nurture strong working relationships across departments and cross-functional stakeholders based on trust and mutual respect.
Communicate with senior stakeholders to balance stakeholder vis- -vis analytics perspectives
Desired Skills & Experience
Bachelors degree in Statistics, Business, Economics, or related quantitative discipline.
Advanced degree strongly preferred.
3-5 years professional experience in Analytics, Marketing, Business Analysis.
Experience utilizing marketing measurement methods preferred, including a/b testing, multi-touch attribution, and media mix modeling.
Strong knowledge of SQL, R, Python, strongly preferred.
Scala and Java are a plus.
Experience working with large enterprise databases and distributed processing systems (e.g., Hadoop, EMR), with demonstrated ability to independently query and prepare data for analysis.
Strong communication skills with the ability to explain complex analytical work to audiences with varying technical knowledge.
Working knowledge of marketing operations, ad tech, media planning, and media performance metrics.
Experience with advanced analytical techniques, including time series forecasting, clustering, and machine learning (classification and regression).
Experience with brick and mortar retail is a plus.
Exceptional analytic skills coupled with solid business thinking.
Self-directed, innovative thinker.
In addition to a strong attention to detail, strong candidates will also be able to see the strategic implications for the business in the big picture.
You are fluent in telling the story to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Strong candidates will have a curious mind, a passion for synthesizing information from multiple sources, the ability to interpret data through the lens of shopper behavior, and a habit of translating data into insights that drive action.
","['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['scala', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,", 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200178070
Imagine what you could do here.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish.
On this team, you will push the limits of existing data science methods while delivering tangible business value.
Key Qualifications
Practical experience with and theoretical understanding of algorithms for classification, regression, clustering, and anomaly detection
Working knowledge of relational databases, including SQL, and large-scale distributed systems such as Hadoop and Spark
Ability to implement data science pipelines and applications in a general programming language such as Python, Scala, or Java
Ability to comprehend and debug complex systems integrations spanning toolchains and teams
Ability to extract meaningful business insights from data and identify the stories behind the patterns
Excellent presentation skills, distilling complex analysis and concepts into concise business-focused takeaways
Creativity to engineer novel features and signals, and to push beyond current tools and approaches
- Engage with business teams to find opportunities, understand requirements, and translate those requirements into technical solutions
Design data science approach, applying tried-and-true techniques or developing custom algorithms as needed by the business problem
Collaborate with data engineers and platform architects to implement robust production real-time and batch decisioning solutions
Ensure operational and business metric health by monitoring production decision points
Investigate adversarial trends, identify behavior patterns, and respond with agile logic changes
Communicate results of analyses to business partners and executives
Research new technologies and methods across data science, data engineering, and data visualization to improve the technical capabilities of the team
Education & Experience
- Ph.D. in Computer Science, Machine Learning, Statistics, Operations Research or related field; or
Ph.D. in Math, Engineering, Economics, or hard science with data science fellowship; or
M.S.
in related field with 3+ years experience applying data science to real business problems
Additional Requirements
","['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'cluster', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Decision Science contains both data scientists and software engineers responsible for creating and implementing state of the art machine learning algorithms for fraud detection and risk assessment in support of Risk Management.
The primary responsibility of this role is to assist in algorithm development inside of a high throughput, low latency, big data environment.
Primary Job Responsibilities
The data scientist will support the risk department, leveraging big data technologies to aggregate, transform, and perform meaningful feature engineering that includes structured transactional data, unstructured natural language data, and image-based data.
As a member of the decision science team, you will research and develop new methodologies and techniques to improve the overall effectiveness of risk management.
You will mine and analyze massive amount of unique internal and external data to gain deep business knowledge and insight on customer activity and usage behaviors and their relationships with fraud, credit risks, and other types of behaviors.
You will act as the technical owner of projects that may require significant customization of existing analytic tools, techniques, processes or development of new ones.
Perform statistical data analysis and understanding, ensure data quality, and develop tracking and reporting systems to determine the effectiveness of models, rules, and other risk initiatives and programs.
Design and create systems to structure, aggregate, and turn petabytes of messy information into statistically significant features for modeling purposes.
Required Skills and Experience:
Advanced degree in Computer Science or quantitative field, MS/PHD preferred
Entry to mid-level role.
Experience in SQL, relational databases
Experience with Big Data technology: Hadoop framework: Hive, Spark, CUDA, etc.
a plus.
Expertise in machine learning packages Python, R
Strong knowledge of 1 or more scripting and programming languages (Python, Java, Scala, etc.)
Proven background and applied knowledge of Natural Language Processing (NLP), Computer Vision and low-level vision.
Modern Frameworks such as Google BERT, OpenNLP.
Strong Background in Image Feature Engineering
Background in a variety of modeling techniques: LSTM, Convolutional Neural Network, Deep Neural Networks, Statistical NLP, Gradient Boosted Trees.
Strong analytical skills with good problem-solving ability
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status.
For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
","['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java']","['risk', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'lstm', 'boost', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'convolut']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'java', 'risk', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'lstm', 'boost', 'nlp', 'nn', 'research', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'convolut']"
DS,"As a result, they see significant improvement in performance and a decrease in spam and other attacks.
* Understand data landscape i.e tooling, tech stack, source systems etc.
and work closely with the data engineering team to improve the data collection and quality.
* Understand business/product strategy and high-level road map and align analysis efforts to enable them with data insights and help achieve their strategic goals.
* Use your strong audience focused presentation and storytelling skills focused on key takeaways in a crisp and concise manner.
* Define, implement, and train statistical, machine learning, and deep learning models.
* Ability to define and spot macro and micro levels trends with statistical significance on a regular basis and understand key drivers driving those trends.
* Active role in hiring, growing, and mentoring the data scientist team in Austin.Examples of desirable skills, knowledge and experience* M.S or Ph.D in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics or other quantitative field.
* 5+ years of data scientist experience with proven industry experience in a large scale environment (petabyte scale, globally distributed teams).
* Strong experience in scientific computing using Python, R, or Scala.
* Experience with Spark, SQL, Tableau, Google Analytics, Hive and BigQuery (or any other Big data/Cloud equivalent) etc.
* Experience working with and processing structured, unstructured, and semi-structured data.
* Work closely with data engineering team to ensure robust data pipelines and model deployment.
* Proven track record of applying data insights and machine learning in order to address business needs and drive revenue.
* Capable of working closely with business, engineering, and product teams to ensure data initiatives are aligned with business needs.
All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to their, or any other person's, perceived or actual race, color, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, or any other basis protected by law.
Examples of reasonable accommodations include, but are not limited to, changing the application process, providing documents in an alternate format, using a sign language interpreter, or using specialized equipment.
","['scala', 'spark', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'bigqueri', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Job Posting Title:
Remote Sensing Data Scientist
----
Hiring Department:
----
Position Open To:
All Applicants
----
Weekly Scheduled Hours:
40
----
FLSA Status:
Exempt
----
Earliest Start Date:
Immediately
----
Position Duration:
Expected to Continue
----
----
Exploitation and analysis of remotely sensed (airborne and space-based), geospatial data for a variety of applications.
----
Job Details:
Responsibilities
Develop software and algorithm solutions for remote sensing applications.
Provide guidance and technical leadership in the area of remote sensing.
Provide support in business development through proposals and sponsor engagement.
Other related functions as assigned.
Required Qualifications
Demonstrated experience and proficiency in working with remotely sensed data, and data products.
Applicant should have proficiency in programming for development and conceptual derivation.
Applicant must be willing to work with new technologies, be highly organized, and capable of planning and coordinating multiple tasks and managing their time.
The position will require attention to detail, effective problem solving skills, and innovation.
Ability to work independently with sensitive and confidential information, maintain a professional demeanor, work as a team member without day-to-day supervision and effectively communicate with diverse groups of clients.
Regular and punctual attendance is required.
Preferred Qualifications
Significant experience related to remote sensing applications (orbital mechanics, geodesy, geospatial statistics, climatology, meteorology, geology, ecology, and hydrology).
Demonstrated experience and familiarity in working with 3-D geospatial data, data registration and big data analysis.
Knowledge of 2D (imagery) and 3D geospatial data exploitation methods is also desired.
Applicant should have prior experience in geospatial application solutions using novel algorithm techniques and working knowledge of processing, exploitation and dissemination workflows for airborne and space-based remote sensing.
Demonstrated interpersonal communication skills and technical leadership.
History of publication in relevant peer reviewed journals and/or industry conferences.
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 with a 3.5 in major coursework or higher.
General Notes
An agency designated by the federal government handles the investigation as to the requirement for eligibility for access to classified information.
Factors considered during this investigation include but are not limited to allegiance to the United States, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations, drug involvement, the likelihood of continuation of such conduct, etc.
Please mark ""yes"" on the application question that asks if additional materials are required.
Failure to attach all additional materials listed below may result in a delay in application processing.
Salary Range
$90,000-$115,000+/negotiable depending on qualifications
Working Conditions
Working Conditions
Standard office conditions
Repetitive use of a keyboard at a workstation
Use of manual dexterity
Some weekend, evening and holiday work
Possible interstate/intrastate travel
Required Materials
Resume/CV
3 work references with their contact information; at least one reference should be from a supervisor
Letter of interest
Unoffiical college transcripts
Any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.)
will be uploaded in the Application Questions section; you will be able to multi-select additional files.
Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded.
Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.
This information will be pulled in to your application.
The application is one page and you will be prompted to upload your resume.
In addition, you must respond to the application questions presented to upload any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.)
that were noted above.
----
Employment Eligibility:
Regular staff who have been employed in their current position for the last six continuous months are eligible for openings being recruited for through University-Wide or Open Recruiting, to include both promotional opportunities and lateral transfers.
----
Retirement Plan Eligibility:
The retirement plan for this position is Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS), subject to the position being at least 20 hours per week and at least 135 days in length.
This position has the option to elect the Optional Retirement Program (ORP) instead of TRS, subject to the position being 40 hours per week and at least 135 days in length.
----
Background Checks:
A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.
----
Equal Opportunity Employer:
The University of Texas at Austin, as an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer, complies with all applicable federal and state laws regarding nondiscrimination and affirmative action.
The University is committed to a policy of equal opportunity for all persons and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, or veteran status in employment, educational programs and activities, and admissions.
----
Pay Transparency:
----
Employment Eligibility Verification:
If hired, you will be required to complete the federal Employment Eligibility Verification I-9 form.
You will be required to present acceptable and original documents to prove your identity and authorization to work in the United States.
Documents need to be presented no later than the third day of employment.
Failure to do so will result in loss of employment at the university.
----
E-Verify:
The University of Texas at Austin use E-Verify to check the work authorization of all new hires effective May 2015.
For more information about E-Verify, please see the following:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----
Compliance:
If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting.
You may access the 2019 report here or obtain a copy at University Compliance Services, 1616 Guadalupe, Suite UTA 2.206, Austin, TX 78701.
",[None],"['big data', 'data', 'geospati', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['big data', 'data', 'geospati', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Slots and CSR.
Heres where you would come in: identify and formalize problems predicting user behavior.
Then create and implement your models to find solutions.
Be innovative, be creative, use every bit of that key commodity data.
Your solutions will need to be demonstrably impactful and visual.
You will collaborate with Product Managers, Game Designers, and Engineers to deliver business impact.
And, change current practices in line with new findings and insights.
Responsibilities:
Work closely with game studios to design, test, verify and implement machine learning models with Zyngas games that impact the daily life of millions of users
Design and evaluate novel scalable approaches to experiments for gameplay
Real-time in-app content personalization
Required Skills and Experience:
BS in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Economics, or other quantitative field; Masters or PhD strongly preferred
5+ years of work experience in data science, machine learning or analytics roles
Proven experience with some or all of the following: machine learning, data mining, predictive modeling, statistics, experimental design, computational analytics, econometric modeling, data visualization
Fluent in SQL
Fluent in R and/or Python; Strong experience with programming
Experience in applying machine learning on large datasets, preferably in a Hadoop or Spark environment
Demonstrated ability to work independently to get an idea from inception to implementation, including knowledge of techniques for validation and testing
Strong written and oral communication skills
Capability to work effectively in a fast-paced environment with changing priorities
Ability to collaborate effectively with engineers, product managers, analysts, business, and marketing functions to deliver unambiguous business impact
Excellent client management skills
Full medical, dental, vision benefits as well as life insurance
Generous Paid Maternity/Paternity leave
Flexible working hours on many teams
Work alongside driven individuals towards a common goal
#LI-KM1
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop']","['data mining', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'data mining', 'experimental design', 'data', 'machine learning', 'predict', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'econometr']"
DS,"Summary
*** Remote full-time opportunity for both a Senior Data Scientist and Data Scientist ***
This is a great opportunity to join a small team to help share your expertise but also provides you the opportunity to grow in your career.
You will be responsible for obtaining, developing and analyzing data, prove/disprove hypotheses, exploring new data sources and structures, and develop insights.
You will have the opportunity to consult with internal customers to develop business requirements and provide possible solutions and approaches to their analytic needs.
Your customers will include marketing, branding, underwriting, field leadership, senior business leaders and the data office.
This role will require in depth understanding of financial services, big data technologies (Hadoop, Python, R), statistical modeling and be a team player with strong communication skills.
In the Senior Data Scientist position you will also have the opportunity to teach/lead others in principles of predictive analytics.
Job Duties and Responsibilities
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, marketing targeting and other business outcomes.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Job Qualifications
Strong problem-solving skills in Financial Services, with extensive familiarization in related life, health, and investment product sets.
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SAS, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures, both structured and non-structured.
Knowledge of a variety of predictive analytics and machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
At least 7 years of experience for the Senior Data Scientist opening.
Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or equivalent experience.
Familiar with the following software/tools:
Coding knowledge and experience with R, Python and/or SAS.
Statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, social network analysis, etc.
Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Demographic providers (Wunderman, Acxiom, Claritas), Google Analytics, and other web/social data providers.
Distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc.
Data mapping using R, SAS, or Tableau.
","['spark', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'busi', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
In this role, you will work as a Data Scientist and problem solver.
You will be a part of a small team where you will switch assignments and projects in a disciplined and fast-paced environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Be innovative and entrepreneurial to work within a ""start-up like"" environment.
Be an advisor to the data science team and provide expertise and direction on complex analytical modeling problems
Work with cross-functional teams to help them implement solutions
Research methods to improve statistical inferences of variables across models
Solve quantitative problems
Consult on industry standard solutions as well as new innovative techniques
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"What Youll Get to Do
Be part of a high-performing, multi-disciplinary team supporting rapid and innovative prototype development of warfighting capabilities that increase lethality, survivability, and warfighter effectiveness in support of the Air Force Tactical Exploitation of National Capabilities (AF TENCAP) mission to exploit national systems, educate warfighters, and influence development of future requirements.
As a member of the team you will integrate with cross-functional teams to conduct research, design, development, prototyping, systems engineering, integration, testing and evaluation, transitioning, and training across multiple technology areas to include: Geolocation and Tagging, Tracking, Locating; Sensor, Data Fusion, and Dissemination; Unconventional / Asymmetric Warfare / Support to Special Operations; Situational Awareness; Cyberspace and Spectrum Warfare Operations; Air Superiority; Command, Control and Spectrum Utilization; Real-Time/Near Real Time Large Data Analytics and Virtualization.
Projects in the portfolio will range in quantity, scope, duration, and complexity.
Projects are designed to transition to warfighters and/or national intelligence agencies for operational use, sustainment and appropriate acquisition Programs of Record for further development.
More About the Role
Identify and develop actionable insights through problem definition, application of statistical models, and analysis against existing and future data
Assists in identification of important data sets for exploitation and analysis, and prepare briefings, analyses, and visualizations in support of leadership
Assists in the visualize, interpret, and report data findings.
Youll Bring These Qualifications
Top Secret
Possess a bachelors or masters degree.
Hands-on experience creating algorithms and engineering tools for data processing and modeling and simulation.
Practical understanding in modeling and simulation with a focus on optimization, including theoretical and numerical methods for analysis of current and future systems.
Fundamental knowledge in applying ML and AI to image processing and information discovery Software development experience using C++, Python, Java or equivalent.
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have
Eligibility for TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph (U.S.
Citizenship required for clearance)
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
US-Washington-DC-AUSTIN
","['java', 'python']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'visual', 'statist']",1.0,"['java', 'python', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'visual', 'statist']"
DS,"Posted: Jun 24, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200177343
The Ad Platforms Data Insights team is seeking a data scientist to join in developing the next generation of analytical solutions.
Within this data centric team, you will drive the exploration, analysis, development, execution, and measurement of advanced analytical solutions.
You will be responsible for turning the huge amounts of data generated by user searches, app content, and App Store context into business insights that improve the customer experience for the end-user, as well as drive discovery and productivity for app developers.
A successful candidate will have deep experience in applied methods (pattern mining, anomaly detection, text analytics, predictive modeling, classification, and optimization) and using those methods to drive key business insights.
The role requires both a broad knowledge of existing data mining algorithms and creativity to invent and customize.
Be ready to partner with a broad range of data professionals and business leaders within sales, marketing, finance, product, and Engineering.
Successful analytics teams involve a diverse group of data scientists and data engineers working hand in hand to build insightful and efficient solutions.
In this role, expect to be a key team member of a multi-functional team that delivers insights that have a direct and measurable impact!
Key Qualifications
4+ years of recent data science and or analytics experience.
Preferably experience in the digital advertising industry or related field.
Experience in a product analytics role is preferred.
Are you able to operate comfortably and effectively in a fast-paced, highly cross-functional, rapidly changing environment?
Programming skills in Python and SQL, and comfortable with advanced analytics tools such as R, Spark, and Tableau.
Ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner with product and leadership teams to influence the overall strategy of the product.
Experience in advanced quantitative analysis including regression, classification, clustering, and time-series analyses.
Shown experience with end to end implementation of a model prototype specifically processing, feature engineering, and model outputs.
Comfortable working with modern data technologies.
Familiarity with database modeling and data warehousing principles.
- Support Product Marketing, Partner Development, and the Executive Team with analytics for product performance and customer insights.
Empower the global Partner Development teams with insights to advise and fulfill their strategic objectives and goals for every fiscal quarter.
Work closely with the product team to identify and size new opportunities, develop data requirements, establish appropriate KPIs, and establish accurate reporting.
Quantify the impact of product, sales, and marketing initiatives on customer happiness, and future behavior.
Manage business analytic projects through all phases, including data quality, data modeling, algorithm/KPI development, statistical analysis, data visualization, and presentation of results and deliverables.
Design and evaluate experiments that help define opportunities for increased usage, improved marketplace performance, and greater customer happiness.
Develop reusable models and assets working closely with Data Technology team to ensure scalability and industrialization as models move into production.
Education & Experience
Masters or Bachelors degree in a quantitative field of study including statistics, math, economics, operations research or a related discipline.
","['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['regress', 'text analytics', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'text analytics', 'data warehousing', 'classif', 'data mining', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'anomali', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'data modeling']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Required Security Clearance: Top Secret or above
Required Education: Desired not required: BA/BS or MA/MS in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science (6 years of work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree)
This role works with customers to understand changing requirements and recommends solutions based on quantitative analysis.
This role provides recommendations for the development of tools and applications that improve process effectiveness and efficiency.
Experience and Qualifications:
• Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
• Excellent reading comprehension skills
• Detail-oriented with a proficiency for researching, analyzing, and prioritizing intelligence reports and cables
• Ability to work with IC tools and databases
• Strong problem-solving, analytic, and written and oral communication skills
• Excellent attention to detail and ability to accurately follow SOPs • Ability to work shift work/extended hours • Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work well both independently and in a team environment
Preferred Skills and Education:
• Experience in modern machine learning, AI, biometrics, social network analysis, or geospatial analysis
• Experience/knowledge of link analysis tools (e.g.
Palantir, i2 Analyst's Notebook)
• Experience with cloud architectures including AWS
• Experience with distributed computing and storage technologies
Working Conditions:
Work is typically based in a busy office environment and subject to frequent interruptions.
Business work hours are normally set from Monday through Friday 8:00am to 5:00pm, however some extended or weekend hours may be required.
Additional details on the precise hours will be informed to the candidate from the Program Manager/Hiring Manager.
Physical Requirements: Office work.
Background Screening/Check/Investigation: Successful Completion of a Background Screening/Check/Investigation will be required as a condition of hire.
Employment Type: Full-time
Benefits:
Other:
That does not unlawfully discriminate in any of its programs or activities on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.
","['aw', 'excel', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'geospati', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'geospati', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Who is Moxie?
Moxie integrates the power of email, chat, and real-time collaboration with a mature, robust, and multi-channel customer engagement platform, comprehensive analytics, and a fully integrated, system-wide knowledgebase.
More than 600 of the worlds leading brands rely on Moxie to engage with their constantly connected customers resulting in increased revenue, conversion, and total customer value.
Your Contribution
Key problems include information extraction of semi-structured text, text segmentation, entity classification, etc.
You will help prototype novel methods and productionize promising methods.
You will collaborate with other team members, product managers, and engineers of other projects to add value to Moxies product offering.
Your Skills and Experience
· 2+ years of relevant professional experience and/or an advanced degree
· Knowledge of foundational techniques with NLP, such as text processing, document classification, sentiment analysis, etc.
· Experience in programming languages (Python, Java, etc.)
· Familiarity with NLP tools, such as NLTK, Gensim, SpaCy, and Word2Vec
· Working knowledge of statistics and probability (statistical inference, Bayesian statistics)
· Good written and spoken communication skills
Following Skills are a Plus
· Deep understanding of English grammar, syntax, semantics and human speech
· Data visualization and presentation of data-driven insights
· Experience with distributed computing (Hadoop/Spark)
","['nltk', 'spark', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spaci', 'java']","['probabl', 'classif', 'data', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['nltk', 'spark', 'python', 'hadoop', 'spaci', 'java', 'probabl', 'classif', 'data', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"Almost all clinical trials fall behind schedule, leaving patients unable to access the most promising treatments and pharmaceutical and biotech companies unable to quickly carry their innovations to market.
Here's your chance to really make a difference, both in your career and in the lives millions.
About the position
This successful candidate will perform the following:
Create and maintain insightful reporting for all business activities.
Report to team on high-level summary statistics, key performance indicators, and trend/deviation estimates.
Methods include field experiments (A/B testing), structural modeling, and econometric analysis.
Employ statistical, time-series, and structural models to provide forecasts of key business indicators.
Forecasts are used for internal planning as well as guidance for external partners.
Provide recommendations to managers on optimal business decisions and strategy.
Explore growth and effiiciency-enhancing opportunities, and deliver empirical and structural evidence to support improvements across all operations.
Qualifications and Skills
Graduate training in economics, or related field such as operations, statistics, finance, or quantitative marketing.
Coursework in econometrics or advanced statistics required.
Working knowledge of SQL and relational databases
Fluency in Excel
Fluency in Python, R or another advanced data programming language
Strong skills in presentation and data visualization
Strong working knowledge of Tableau or other visualization platforms
Autonomous and self-motivated work ethic.
Inclination to assume ownership of both short- and long-term projects.
Rockstar analytic and problem solving skills
Ability to extract meaningful business insights from data and identify the stories behind the patterns
Benefits
Full Medical, Dental, and Vision Benefits
401(k)
Paid time off
Paid holidays
Casual office
Flexible vacation
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'financ', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'financ', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"The Data Scientist will be a technical role in leading data science projects, combining predictive analytics, data modeling, and machine learning.
In this position, you will be responsible for building it, it’s attributes, and its parameters while modifying solutions to evolving business challenges
Requirements:
Required 4+ years of experience in relevant role
Bachelor’s degree in related field (mathematics, statistics, computer science, engineering or a related quantitative field)
Expertise and deep knowledge of typical data science techniques such as classification, regression and optimization
Experience/proficiency in statistical programming languages: R, SAS, SPSS, etc.· Experience/proficiency in one or more of the following scripting languages: Python, Perl, Java or Ruby
Experience/proficiency in relational databases such as: SQL, Oracle, Teradata
Understanding of:
BI tools (SAP business Intelligence, MicroStrategy, Tableau, QlikSense)
Big Data ecosystems& Distributed file systems / data frameworks (Apache Hadoop, AWS)
Machine learning tools/packages
Proficient level of MS Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, Powerpoint, Sharepoint, OneNote) and presentation tools
Responsibilities:
Independently and collaboratively explore, develop and deliver solutions to meet the business needs.
Undertake data collection, processing and analysis.
Analyze complex unstructured data sets to recommendations and implement solutions.
Build business intelligence system for the business integrating all and future platforms with multiple sources of data.
Independently convert business management questions into analyzable problems with solutions.
","['ms office', 'aw', 'spss', 'excel', 'perl', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'aw', 'spss', 'excel', 'perl', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
DS,"The online travel market never stands still.
At Expedia Group, were smack in the middle of it.
About you:
Using the latest cloud and data technologies to train and deploy machine learning models at scale, if you can prove your approaches are good, they'll be quickly deployed to production.
Be passionate about asking and answering questions in large datasets and able to communicate that passion.
Have a keen desire to tackle problems and live to find patterns and insights within structured and unstructured data.
Propose analytics strategies and solutions that challenge and expand the thinking of everyone around you.
Looking for a role with diverse growth opportunities and having fun while at it.
Staying ahead of the latest data science industry developments, whilst coaching the team on them.
Your experiences:
MSc or PhD degree in machine learning, or computer science/statistics/Physics with strong machine learning component
Knowledge of Python programming language
Good programming practices, ability to write readable, fast, object-oriented code
Expertise in machine learning: framing business problems as machine learning problems, building datasets, selecting and engineering features, building and optimizing algorithms
Good understanding of supervised, unsupervised and reinforcement learning (plus) machine learning algorithms
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as Scikit-learn, Spark ML, excellence in at least one of these is highly desirable
Very good understanding of data technologies; Hadoop, Spark, and standard relational database structures along with query languages (SQL); experience in the Cloud a plus
Experience working in a fast paced commercial environment and excellent organisational skills - this is a fast-moving operation in a high-growth phase, so it's critical to be able to keep multiple balls in the air
Ability to work collaboratively, as well as to handle workflow in accordance with project timelines is required
Good communication and team management skills to technical and business audiences, able to explain complex topics in simple terms, adapting communication technical depth to the audience
Strong business/commercial sense to combine with analytics to help drive recommendations; ability to demonstrate an understanding of the commercial impact of their activities
Working knowledge of statistics: hypothesis testing, confidence intervals and A/B tests.
If you have a hunger to make a difference with one of the most loved consumer brands in the world and to work in the dynamic travel industry, this is the job for you.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, disability or age.
Expedia is committed to creating an inclusive work environment with a diverse workforce.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
This employer participates in E-Verify.
The employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']",3.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'python', 'hadoop', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Posted: Jul 10, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200168864
There is a job and then there is a calling.
The one that wakes you before the alarm rings every morning and makes you excited to be at work.
As a Data Scientist, you're passionate about finding patterns in data that can point to opportunities and insights.
You thrive on cross-functional alignment, pay attention to minute details and don't stop short of the finish line despite all the challenges you face.
It's imperative to tailor your message to a wide range of audience - senior management, product management, marketing, finance and business.
The position will be located in Austin or Cupertino
Key Qualifications
Do you have 7+ years of hands-on experience in the Web and business analytics arena?
Experience in digital advertising industry or related field a plus
Partner effectively with cross-functional partners to translate business needs into analytical requirements
Ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner with product and leadership teams to influence the overall strategy of the product
Ability to operate comfortably and optimally in a fast-paced, highly cross-functional, constantly evolving environment.
Familiarity with agile methods such as scrum
Experience in exploratory data analysis and familiarity with advanced quantitative analysis and statistical techniques
In-depth knowledge of data analytics technologies such as SQL and visualization tools especially Tableau and Python viz packages
Strong knowledge of Python and working knowledge of Hadoop, Spark.
Statistics background and ability to develop custom data models and algorithms
Fluency in Mandarin Chinese is a plus!
- Support Product Marketing, Sales, and/or the Executive Team with analytics for product/ business performance and customer insights
Empower Sales, Marketing, or Product teams with insights to advise and fulfill strategic objectives and goals
Deliver business analytics work through all phases, including data quality, data analysis, data visualization, and presentation of results and deliverables
Monitor usage metrics, understand business-based explanations for large scale trends and patterns in customer lifecycle behavior
Automate insights delivery balancing the scale of data with performance
Join us… to do your life’s best work.
Education & Experience
Masters or Bachelors degree in a quantitative field of study including statistics, math, economics, operations research or a related discipline
","['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop']","['data', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'hadoop', 'data', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Lead Data Scientist
Job type Permanent – Full TimeLocation Austin, Texas
In this role you will direct the delivery of analysis services and products in collaboration with other Data Scientists and under the direction of an Engagement Manager.
This position requires a deep knowledge of applied statistics and expert proficiency in developing new methods to solve problems, modeling and simulation of asset operations, data visualization and analysis, cost and risk evaluation, developing data requirements for mathematical models, software scripting, and operations research techniques.
You must also be able to demonstrated experience in statistical analysis, data management, and statistical model design.
Exceptional knowledge of software scripting, programming languages, simulation-based modeling and analysis expertise is required.
Responsibilities
Works autonomously under the technical direction of an Engagement Manager on client projects and internal projects.
Applies the scientific method to evaluate multi-layered processes, assets and operations with abstract models by applying constraints, assumptions and statistical modeling to extract focused insight that supports client decision-making.
Leads studies in enterprise asset management across the full lifecycle: design, engineering, construction, operations, sustainment, refurbishment, eventual retirement or replacement.
Understand and applies client operations and analytical requirements to deliver both highly specified analyses and guided discovery for evolving analytical needs and follow-on work.
Support client strategic and operational goals by delivering insight to reduce cost, increase readiness, quantify uncertainty, bound risk, reduce waste and add confidence.
Evaluates simulation analysis output to reveal key insights about unstructured, chaotic, real-world systems.
Proposes new or revised analytical methods and projects in the areas of simulation analysis and predictive modeling.
Applies programming languages and modeling platforms to write code that represents complex systems with logic for use in high-resolution predictive simulation models.
Approve final technical analysis results to be included in deliverables on consulting contracts.
Develop specifications, statements of work, evaluation criteria, and proposals.
Propose new or revised analytical methods and projects in the areas of simulation analysis and predictive modeling.
Support Director of Consulting and Chief Scientist as required.
Assignments include but are not be limited to:
Leading data cleansing and data analysis processes
Leading statistical analysis of historical input data and simulation output data
Constructing simulation analysis models
Developing software to enhance data management tools for use in predictive analysis
Preparing and presenting interim and final briefings to clients
Requirements
BS/BA with 6 years of experience, MS with 4 years of experience or PhD with 2 years of experience.
Degree fields include Probability & Statistics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, or closely related scientific or technical discipline.
Experience with statistical modeling, machine learning (classification and regression), distribution fitting, design of experiments, numerical optimization.
Experience with SQL, database schema development and best practices, familiarity with any common database technologies (MySQL, PostgreSQL, Oracle, etc.)
Experience with scripting or programming language (Python, R, S+, Java, etc.)
Ability to communicate complex ideas through strong technical writing and impactful visualizations
Preferred Experience
Experience in reliability engineering such as reliability analysis, development/execution of RCM program, Condition Based Maintenance (CBM)
Experience in developing, testing and analyzing simulation models
Experience in Agile development environment
Familiarity with data integration and ETL concepts
Occasional travel required (
","['postgresql', 'sql', 'mysql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['postgresql', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Position Purpose:
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develop, document and/or implement application/program testing and validation
Design and implement software modules and interfaces among applications or databases
Analyze data sets, ranging from sparse datasets to large data and/or unstructured datasets, in order to extract insights, and drive further research opportunities
Document, summarize, and present findings to customers, subject matter experts, and other data scientists
Research, design, implement, and deploy full-stack scalable computer vision, deep learning, and machine learning solutions to novel problems
Required Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
Experience designing and implementing data interpretation approaches to address complex questions, with a preference for experience with scientific questions
Experience developing data visualizations to facilitate interpretation and data insights
Experience in the use of statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques, and optimization algorithms
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms, and ensemble methods, such as: K-Means, PCA, Regression, Neural Networks, Decision Trees, Gradient Boosting
Experience with machine learning/deep learning tools or frameworks such as Scikit learn, XGBoost, Spark, Tensorflow, Keras, or PyTorch
Technical fluency; comfortable understanding and discussing architectural concepts and algorithms, assessing tradeoffs and new opportunities with technical team members
Experience communicating data insights and presenting concepts to technical and non-technical audiences
Scientific background (with a focus on chemistry or biology) and/or experience with CBRNE applications preferred
Motivated to contribute in a team environment and collaborate across scientific and technical disciplines
Able to balance multiple on-going tasks while operating efficiently and with minimal supervision
Education/Experience:
Proficient in at least one programming language, with preference for R, Python, Javascript, C, C#, C++
Certificates and Licenses:
None required
Clearance:
Candidate must be able to obtain a Secret level security clearance.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
N/A
Working Conditions/ Equipment:
Ability to work in varying conditions to include: traditional office environments with sedentary extended periods required for voluminous data analysis via office automation;
Incumbents will follow any other instructions, and perform any other related duties, as assigned by their supervisor.
","['kera', 'xgboost', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'scikit']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'computer vision', 'pca', 'boost', 'predict', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'neural network', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['kera', 'xgboost', 'pytorch', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'scikit', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'decision tree', 'data', 'analyz', 'computer vision', 'pca', 'boost', 'predict', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'nn', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Job Posting Title:
Remote Sensing Data Scientist
----
Hiring Department:
Applied Research Laboratories
----
Position Open To:
All Applicants
----
Weekly Scheduled Hours:
40
----
FLSA Status:
Exempt
----
Earliest Start Date:
Immediately
----
Position Duration:
Expected to Continue
----
PICKLE RESEARCH CAMPUS
----
Explore and develop new research technologies.
----
Job Details:
Responsibilities
Develop software and algorithm solutions for remote sensing applications.
Provide support in business development through proposals and sponsor engagement.
Publish and present research results.
Other related functions as assigned.
Required Qualifications
Ph.D in engineering, geoscience or other applied sciences.
Demonstrated experience and proficiency in working with remotely sensed data, and data products.
Applicant should have proficiency in programming for development and conceptual derivation.
Regular and punctual attendance is required.
Preferred Qualifications
Significant experience related to remote sensing applications (orbital mechanics, geodesy, geospatial statistics, climatology, meteorology, geology, ecology, and hydrology).
Demonstrated experience and familiarity in working with 3-D geospatial data, data registration and big data analysis.
Demonstrated interpersonal communication skills and technical leadership.
General Notes
Failure to attach all additional materials listed below may result in a delay in application processing.
Salary Range
$90,000-$115,000+/negotiable depending on qualifications
Working Conditions
Working Conditions
Standard office conditions
Some weekend, evening and holiday work
Possible interstate/intrastate travel
Required Materials
Resume/CV
Unoffiical college transcripts
Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded.
Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.
This information will be pulled in to your application.
that were noted above.
----
Employment Eligibility:
----
Retirement Plan Eligibility:
----
Background Checks:
A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.
----
Equal Opportunity Employer:
----
Pay Transparency:
----
Employment Eligibility Verification:
----
E-Verify:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----
Compliance:
If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting.
",[None],"['big data', 'data', 'geospati', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['big data', 'data', 'geospati', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Design and develop statistical models with Big Data, IoT, ERP, Supply Chain, etc.
to drive major operational business decisions
Understand customer and business requirements and implement reliable technical solutions for non-technical end users.
Identify opportunities to improve data collection, reporting, and analysis based on business needs.
Regularly interface with client sponsors and team members to meet project deadlines and provide clear communication with the team.
Provide documentation and explanation of technical solutions in a professional manner
Ability to create and deliver presentations in the Data Science and Advanced Analytics space
Ability to take complex problems/concepts and simplify down for a variety of audiences
Requirements
Strong and proven background of analytical, mathematical and critical thinking
Passion for data analytics, modeling, programming, and machine learning.
Strong Python and/or R programming experience.
Exposure to data ETL, storage, and manipulation tools including SQL, XML/JSON, and APIs
4+ years of experience in Data Science or related field.
BS or MS in Computer Science, Computational Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, Data Science, Statistics or equivalent
Travels to client sites.
Delighters
Having examples of scaling production-facing applications or open-source contributions.
2+ years of consulting experience
Experience using Big Data and Cloud technologies
Familiarity with Spark and Data Lakes
Prior experience in the Oil and Gas industry
Benefits
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'erp', 'cloud']","['etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'erp', 'cloud', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Lead Data Scientist – Secret Clearance
Required – Austin, TX
Do you want to build your brand by working for a leading
Are you interested in
leveraging your analytical skills and strategic ideas to improve mission
execution?
brings deep industry expertise, rigorous analytical capabilities and a
Join
future and help transform the Federal marketplace.
Work you’ll do
The Lead Data Scientist will join a team responsible for
developing advanced analytics products; applying data visualization and
statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable the key
mission outcomes.
In this role, they will support all phases of analytic work
product development, from the identification of key business questions, through
data collection and ETL, from performing analyses and using a wide range of
statistical, machine learning, and applied mathematical techniques to delivery
insights to decision-makers.
This role requires special attention to the
interplay between data and the business processes that produce it and the
decision-makers that consume insights
The team
Analytics & Cognitive
In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the
future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven
choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.
The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data,
analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden
relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform
decision-making.
Analytics portfolio helps clients transform their business by architecting
organizational intelligence programs and differentiated strategies to win in
their chosen markets.
·
Implement large-scale data
ecosystems including data management, governance and the integration of
structured and unstructured data to generate insights leveraging cloud-based
platforms
·
Leverage automation, cognitive
and science-based techniques to manage data, predict scenarios and prescribe
actions
·
Drive operational efficiency by
maintaining their data ecosystems, sourcing analytics expertise and providing
As-a-Service offerings for continuous insights and improvements
Qualifications
Required:
·
Minimum Active Secret
Security Clearance
·
10+ overall years of
relevant professional experience
·
5+ years of experience
leveraging data analysis to construct strategic narratives
·
5+ years of experience
with programming languages such as Python, R
·
5+ years of experience
with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, PowerBI, or equivalent
·
3+ years data
engineering experience with ETL, NoSQL Apache Hadoop
·
2+ years experience
with cloud computing technology, especially Microsoft Azure
·
Bachelor's degree in Computer
Science, Engineering, Mathematics or other business-related field
Preferred:
·
2+ years of relevant consulting
or industry experience
·
Prior professional services or
federal consulting experience
·
Familiarity with
Agile project management principles
·
Confidence to drive
assignments to completion
·
Eagerness to learn
and develop
How you’ll grow
people at every level of their career to identify and use their strengths to do
their best work every day.
believe there’s always room to learn.
skills in addition to hands-on experience in the global, fast-changing business
world.
From on-the-job learning experiences to formal development
opportunities to continue to grow throughout their career.
Center.
Benefits
Learn more about what working
their best work every day.
uniqueness and offering them the flexibility to make daily choices that can
help them to be healthy, centered, confident, and aware.
well-being programs and are continuously looking for new ways to maintain a
Learn more about Life at
Corporate citizenship
This
inspire and transform.
impact on the world.
Recruiter tips
prepared and confident.
your research: know some background about the organization and the business
Check out recruiting tips from
Certain services may not be available to attest clients under the rules and regulations of public accounting.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable law.
Requisition code: E21AUSCSRMJE110632
","['nosql', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud']","['etl', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['nosql', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'etl', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Posted: Jul 8, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200170823
Imagine what you could do here.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish!
AppleCare Business Insight is a dynamic data science organization that provides insight to improve the post-sale ownership experience and to drive business impact.
This role is for a full-stack data scientist within the AppleCare BI team to provide data driven insight to improve revenue and margin for AppleCare’s extended warranty products.
You will build data engineering assets and statistical/machine learning models to surface actionable business insights.
The role engages with cross functional business teams to define the problem statement, design analytical solutions and operationalize the solutions.
Please note: this position can be located in either Austin or Santa Clara Valley
Key Qualifications
Expertise in data engineering using SQL
Expertise in building predictive models using R/Python is required
Proficient in building Tableau Dashboards
A strong quantitative academic background
Ability to network broadly across the organization and to drive collaboration
Exceptional oral and written communication skills
Experience providing analytics support for subscription business is a plus
You will provide data driven solution to solve business problems.
This will include 'building KPIs to track business performance, performing descriptive and inquisitive analytics using SQL and Tableau, building predictive models in R/Python and communicating the insight to business stakeholders.
Education & Experience
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Statistics, Computer Science, Ops Research etc.)
required.
Master’s degree a plus.
","['sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Principal Data Scientist
Job type Permanent – Full TimeLocation Austin, Texas
In this role you will direct the delivery of analysis services and products in collaboration with other Data Scientists and under the direction of an Engagement Manager or VP of Services.
The ideal candidate must demonstrate a profound knowledge of applied math and statistics and possess expert proficiency in developing new methods to solve problems through modeling and simulation, data analysis and visualization, cost and risk analysis, as well as developing data requirements for mathematical models.
In addition, you must demonstrate the ability to effectively and efficiently communicate highly technical methods and results to peers, subordinates, managers and customers.
This position requires expert level knowledge and experience in database design, querying, and manipulation as well as exceptional expertise with scripting and programming languages
Responsibilities
Works autonomously under the technical direction of an Engagement Manager on client projects and internal projects.
Applies the scientific method to evaluate multi-layered processes, assets and operations with abstract models by applying constraints, assumptions and statistical modeling to extract focused insight that supports client decision-making.
Support client strategic and operational goals by delivering insight to reduce cost, increase readiness, quantify uncertainty, bound risk, reduce waste and add confidence.
Evaluates simulation analysis output to reveal key insights about unstructured, chaotic, real-world systems.
Proposes new or revised analytical methods and projects in the areas of simulation analysis and predictive modeling.
Applies programming languages and modeling platforms to write code that represents complex systems with logic for use in high-resolution predictive simulation models.
Approve final technical analysis results to be included in deliverables on consulting contracts.
Develop specifications, statements of work, evaluation criteria, and proposals.
Propose new or revised analytical methods and projects in the areas of simulation analysis and predictive modeling.
Support Director of Consulting and Chief Scientist as required.
Assignments include but are not be limited to:
Research and development of analysis methodologies and the practical application of them
Leading data extracting, cleansing and data analysis processes
Leading statistical analysis of historical input data and simulation output data
Constructing simulation analysis models
Developing software to enhance data management tools for use in predictive analysis
Preparing and presenting interim and final briefings to clients
Requirements
Minimum of 5 years utilizing data science skills in industrial asset setting.
BS/BA with 10 years of experience, MS with 8 years of experience or PhD with 6 years of experience.
Degree fields include Probability & Statistics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering or closely related scientific or technical discipline.
Strong background in statistical modeling, artificial intelligence, machine learning (classification and regression), distribution fitting, design of experiments, numerical optimization.
3+ years’ experience with SQL, database schema development and best practices, familiarity with any common database technologies (MySQL, PostgreSQL, Hive, Oracle, etc.)
Expert knowledge of scripting or programming language (Spark, Python, R, S+, Java, etc.)
Able to communicate complex ideas through strong technical writing and impactful visualizations
Preferred Experience
Experience in reliability engineering such as reliability analysis, development/execution of RCM program.
Experience with equipment sensor data in a Condition Based Maintenance (CBM) program or setting.
Experience in developing, testing and analyzing simulation models
Experience in Agile development environment
Familiarity with data integration and ETL concepts
Occasional travel required (
","['postgresql', 'spark', 'sql', 'mysql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'oracl', 'java']","['risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['postgresql', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hive', 'oracl', 'java', 'risk', 'probabl', 'regress', 'classif', 'etl', 'data', 'cleans', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Remote Senior Data Scientist (Healthcare / Claims Data)
-Urgently hiring fully remote senior data scientists-
-Must have stable employment history - NO JOB HOPPERS!-
Job Title: Senior Data Scientist
Requirements: 3-7+ Years as a data scientist working across Python (or R), Machine Learning, etc.
+ healthcare (w/ claims data)
- 100% remote
- Competitive salary ($150k - $200k)
- Dynamic and exciting work environment
- Full Benefits (health, dental, vision, etc.)
- 401k
- Casual work environment
- Stability
What You Will Be Doing
- Accessing and analyzing rich healthcare data to generate insights and make proactive recommendations
- Formulating success metrics for optimizing healthcare resources and patient experience, creating visualization to monitor them
What You Need for this Position
-Must have stable employment history - NO JOB HOPPERS!-
- 3-7+ years as a Data Scientist
- PhD or Masters in a quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research, Engineering
- Working knowledge of health care systems and healthcare terminology
- Experience with claims data
- Expert in analyzing large complex, multi-dimensional data sets with a variety of tools
- Ability to thrive and demonstrate constant applied learning in highly complex, interdisciplinary, and dynamic work environment
- Strong programming experience in R, or Python
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['r', 'python']","['data', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'data', 'research', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Posted: Apr 22, 2020
Role Number:
200167173
This role will involve working with Internet-scale search data across numerous product, undertaking in-depth quantitative analysis and building machine learning models to drive product and strategy.
The team’s culture centers around rapid iteration with open feedback and debate along the way, plus strong collaboration with product, engineering, business, and marketing partners.
Key Qualifications
3+ years demonstrated ability in a Data Scientist or Data Analyst role, preferably from a role passionate about search and discovery.
Proven experience in music, mobile apps, or video content is a plus.
Strong proficiency with SQL-based languages.
Experience with large scale analytics technologies such as Hadoop and Spark preferred
Familiarity with Python or R and data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Proficiency with text mining and NLP methods.
Curious business attitude with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action.
Excellent communication, social and presentation skills with meticulous attention to detail.
Strong time management skills with the ability to handle work to tight deadlines and the pressure of executive requests.
Craft how best to supervise, measure and understand product and business performance.
Collaborate with business, marketing, finance and executive teams to generate regular presentations for C-level.
Your creative skills will be utilized daily.
Education & Experience
Minimum of a Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Economics or related field.
Ideally, Masters or PhD in related field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c']","['visual', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'c', 'visual', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'nlp', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Job Posting Title:
Cybersecurity Data Scientist
----
Hiring Department:
Information Security Office
----
Position Open To:
All Applicants
----
Weekly Scheduled Hours:
40
----
FLSA Status:
Exempt
----
Earliest Start Date:
Immediately
----
Position Duration:
Expected to Continue
----
UT MAIN CAMPUS
----
----
Job Details:
General Notes
This position requires you to maintain internet service and a mobile phone with voice and data plans to be used when required for work.
Responsibilities
Other related functions as assigned
Required Qualifications
Ability to implement applications in a general programming language such as Python, Scala, or Java
Excellent data presentation skills, distilling complex analysis into clear outcomes
Creativity to engineer novel features and signals, and to push beyond current approaches
Relevant education and experience may be substituted as appropriate.
Preferred Qualifications
Experience applying your data science skills in a cybersecurity context
Experience with machine learning frameworks like PyTorch, TensorFlow, Theano, Keras
Experience with large-scale distributed systems such as Hadoop and Spark
Experience with natural language processing, analytics using very large data sets, and associated graphing/visualization techniques
Salary Range
$95,000 + depending on qualifications
Working Conditions
May work around standard office conditions
Required Materials
Resume/CV
Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded.
Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.
This information will be pulled in to your application.
that were noted above.
----
Employment Eligibility:
----
Retirement Plan Eligibility:
----
Background Checks:
A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.
----
Equal Opportunity Employer:
----
Pay Transparency:
----
Employment Eligibility Verification:
----
E-Verify:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----
Compliance:
If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting.
","['kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['natural language processing', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['kera', 'pytorch', 'scala', 'theano', 'spark', 'excel', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'nlp', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual']"
DS,"Posted: Dec 6, 2019
Role Number:
200129001
You are skilled analytically with a strong business sense.
You will be a partner to the business, understand their goals and then use your skills and subject matter expertise to surface actionable insights that drive business and customer benefits.
You will collaborate with partners across product, design, engineering, and business teams to drive your findings and recommendations into action.
Key Qualifications
5 + years of recent experience in a data science or data analyst role.
Strong passion for applied empirical analytics, data mining and predictive analytics to provide with actionable insights.
Experience measuring UX impact, customer engagement, planning and analyzing AB experiments.
Confirmed collaboration, communication and story telling skills with ability to adapt and connect across a variety of audiences.
This includes strong writing, and data visualization skills with the ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, detailed, and actionable manner to senior executives.
Ability to partner with the data engineering and BI teams to run workflows, requirements and project roadmap to ensure consistent data availability, data quality and data accessibility.
Excellent time management skills to operate with tight deadlines and balance the pressure of product launches and executive requests.
Be a self-starter, driven, accountable and a high-energy teammate!
Strong familiarity with multiple platforms, tools, methodologies in data analysis and insight synthesis.
Have strong working knowledge of database structures and data warehousing principles and have authoritative level SQL with the ability to ETL both structured and unstructured data from various sources.
Conceive and execute the design of end to end scripted analytics solutions using SQL/TeraData as well as modern analytical systems in Spark SQL, PySpark/Hadoop as well as experience using Notebooks.
Experience in data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Prior experience working with financial products or large multinational marketplaces/e-commerce desirable!
You will play a key role improving the AMP commerce, payments & subscription platform.
As a member of this team you will help optimize the platform by developing new data products and tuning existing features.
A few areas your work will influence include account and payment creation flows, transaction efficiency and authorizations, and subscription management and renewals.
Your day to day activities will include:
Deep dives in large-scale data to identify key insights that inform product improvements and business strategy.
Supervised and unsupervised learning.
A/B testing and causal modeling.
Define how best to measure and monitor commerce products and features.
Engage with business, engineering, product management teams as a thought partner.
Education & Experience
Minimum of bachelor’s degree, preferably in economics, statistics, computer science, or related quantitative field.
Advanced degree in Applied Econometrics, Statistics, Data Mining, Machine Learning, Analytics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, or related field preferred.
","['spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'hadoop']","['etl', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",1.0,"['spark', 'pyspark', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'predict', 'account', 'econom', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'unsupervis', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Principal Data Scientist-Developer Experience (SDK, CLI, Developer Services (Join OCI-SDE)-20000JHX Applicants are required to read, write, and speak the following languages: English
Preferred Qualifications
provide you the opportunity to build and operate a suite of massive scale,
integrated cloud services in a broadly distributed, multi-tenant cloud
environment.
OCI is committed to providing the best in cloud products
biggest challenges.
smart, hands-on engineers with the expertise and passion to solve difficult
problems in distributed highly available services and virtualized
infrastructure.
technical and business impact designing and building innovative new
Do you envision that a program has
intelligence to solve new problems on its own?
Are you
passionate about leveraging data to drive decisions?
Do you love to find
patterns in large data sets, even at petabyte-scale, real-time or offline?
Do you dream of building
something completely new from ground up?
Cloud Infrastructure engineering organization, focused on creating new
cloud services from scratch – compute, storage, networking, database,
security, and an expanding set of foundational services, operating at
high-scale in a globally distributed multi-tenant cloud environment.
This is a rare opportunity to join a team of highly regarded tech industry
veterans in a greenfield venture, using a fresh approach and cutting edge technologies to build an
innovative new cloud platform.
modeling, data analytics, and technical components such
as ETL, Kafka, Hadoop, SQL, and Spark.
Excellent written and verbal
communication skills are required as you will work very closely with
Engineering.
Your role will involve using services,
tools, and automated processes to polish, integrate and evaluate large
datasets from multiple disparate sources to extract business insights, measure
success, and forecast the future.
You will drive the
forecast what's next.
looking for a self-motivated technical leader who can deal with ambiguous problems and complex datasets without
supervision.
She/he is a curious person, passionate about finding patterns and insights
in massive datasets and across disparate sources.
cloud business.
Must have qualifications for this position are:
Good understanding of data mining,
data processing, data science, data modeling, and hypothesis testing
Solid programming skills, preferably Java
Strong
technical leadership skills
Effective communication skills and very strong problem
resolution skills
Ability to work in a fast-paced Agile development and
rapid deployment environment
Solid experience with SQL and/or MapReduce
BS or MS, with a minimum 5 years of relevant experience
Desirable qualifications for this position are (one or more):
Experience with statistical programming languages,
such as R / Python
Experience with statistical/mathematical
predictive modeling
Experience with using,
maintaining, and operating cloud services
Experience
with machine learning / artificial intelligence
All
qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard
to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender
identity, disability, protected veterans status, age, or any other
characteristic protected by law.
Design, develop, troubleshoot and debug software programs for databases, applications, tools, networks etc.
As a member of the software engineering division, you will assist in defining and developing software for tasks associated with the developing, debugging or designing of software applications or operating systems.
Provide technical leadership to other software developers.
Specify, design and implement modest changes to existing software architecture to meet changing needs.
Duties and tasks are varied and complex needing independent judgment.
Fully competent in own area of expertise.
May have project lead role and or supervise lower level personnel.
BS or MS degree or equivalent experience relevant to functional area.
4 years of software engineering or related experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, protected veterans status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Job
: Product Development
: US-TX,Texas-Austin
Job Type
: Regular Employee Hire
Organization
","['mapreduc', 'kafka', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['hypothesi', 'etl', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['mapreduc', 'kafka', 'spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'hypothesi', 'etl', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'supervis', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Posted: May 11, 2020
Role Number:
200170199
This role will involve working with Internet-scale data across numerous product and customer touch points, undertaking in-depth quantitative analysis and building models to drive strategy.
The team’s culture is centered around rapid iteration with open feedback and debate along the way, plus strong collaboration with product, engineering, business, and marketing partners.
Key Qualifications
3+ years of experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst, preferably for an app or digital subscription business.
You should have a strong and curious business mindset with an ability to condense complex concepts and analysis into clear and concise takeaways that drive action.
Proficient in SQL languages.
Experience with big data technologies such as Hadoop and Spark preferred, building models for data analytics a plus.
Experience using relevant statistical packages to build predictive/ML models!
Excellent communication, interpersonal and presentation skills with meticulous attention to detail.
You will craft how best to monitor, measure and understand performance!
You will be collaborating with product, business, marketing, finance and executive teams to generate regular presentations for C-level.
Education & Experience
Minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Economics or relevant field.
Ideally, Masters in related field.
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'hadoop', 'c']","['big data', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'hadoop', 'c', 'big data', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
**Your Role and Responsibilities**Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
**_Recognitions_**Fortune - Most Admired CompaniesDiversityInc.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Title: Data Scientist/AI developer (DTJP00006737)
Duration: 0-9 months
Pay rate: Up to $60-78/hr on W2 ***If candidates have more of a developer background they will need to be submitted more towards the minimum rate.
If candidates have data scientist background they can be submitted up to the max rate***
Purpose: The Data Scientist/AI developer will lead the design efforts for Dell EMC to create industry-leading, turnkey AI systems and solutions for the rapidly growing intelligent data analytics needs of the industry.
Responsibilities:
The Data Scientist/AI developer will help design and implement Deep Learning (DL) systems for a wide variety of use cases and applications.
This position will work with other Dell AI, Big Data and HPC architects, engineers, developers, and product managers to ensure that new DL solutions are best-in-class matched to customer needs, cost-effective, supportable, and have potential for significant impact and revenue.
Data Scientist/AI developer will be involved in developing and implementing DL algorithms and models for various use cases.
Provides technical and consultative support on solutions opportunities.
Participates as needed in pre-sales qualifications and delivery of technical architectural design, strategies and plans for engagements; works on single workstream within broader project; support and instruct less experienced co-workers through formal training or on-the-job mentoring; trains customer personnel.
Supports Sr. Consultant/PM for project related items and advises on effort required
Requirements:
o M.S.
(or BSc + additional experience) in Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics or Statistics o 2+ year experience with proven record in the DL and data analytics domain o Programming experience in C/C++, Python or Scala o Experience in Neutral network.
Require experience in at least one NN frameworks such as TensorFlow or Caffe o Strong programming foundation with a good understanding of data structures and programming concepts o Must have good language and communication skills.
Must be able to clearly articulate advanced concepts.
For a given project candidate must be able to clearly explain the objective, methodology used, and results obtained.
Desired skills:
o Experience in Spark programming.
Understanding of RDDs and Dataframes.
o Experience with data processing using packages like panda, numpy, Scikit-learn o Understand of data processing, including building complex data pipelines Notes: • Open to candidates working remotely.
Foundational knowledge is as important as the number of years of experience in desired field.
• The candidates must be prepared for a technical interview.
They should have access to a computer connected to the internet and be ready to write sample codes.
Notes from PMO:
All candidates must be W2 and they can sit remote
***If candidates have more of a developer background they will need to be submitted more towards the minimum rate.
If candidates have data scientist background they can be submitted up to the max rate***
THESE QUESTIONS/ANSWERS MUST BE PROVIDED AT THE TOP OF THE RESUME UPON SUBMITTALS OR CANDIDATES WILL BE REJECTED.
1.
Provide an example project you worked on that used neural network
2.
Did you build the Neural Network from scratch or was there an existing ecosystem or internally build setup that you leveraged instead?
3.
What is your role on the project?
How many people were in your team?
4.
Why did you choose this specific model against others?
5.
Can you elaborate on a couple of challenges you faced and how did you solve them?
Top Skills:
• 2+ year experience with proven record in the DL and data analytics domain
• Programming experience in C/C++, Python or Scala
• Experience in Neutral network.
Require experience in at least one NN frameworks such as TensorFlow or Caffe
","['scala', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'c', 'python', 'caff', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'nn', 'neural network', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'tensorflow', 'panda', 'c', 'python', 'caff', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'data', 'nn', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"As a result, they see significant improvement in performance and a decrease in spam and other attacks.
You will bring your experience to a team that integrates knowledge in software engineering, DevOps, machine learning and cybersecurity.
All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to their, or any other person's, perceived or actual race, color, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, or any other basis protected by law.
Examples of reasonable accommodations include, but are not limited to, changing the application process, providing documents in an alternate format, using a sign language interpreter, or using specialized equipment.
",[None],['machine learning'],999.0,['machine learning']
DS,"Job Posting Title:
Geospatial Software Developer and Data Scientist
----
Hiring Department:
Applied Research Laboratories
----
Position Open To:
All Applicants
----
Weekly Scheduled Hours:
40
----
FLSA Status:
Exempt
----
Earliest Start Date:
Immediately
----
Position Duration:
Expected to Continue
----
PICKLE RESEARCH CAMPUS
----
Innovate machine learning and deep learning techniques for exciting programs for diverse sponsor needs.
Enhance and improve existing machine learning algorithms using modern machine learning methods.
Innovate solutions to accommodate clustering and cloud based capabilities.
----
Job Details:
Responsibilities
Develop new software and algorithms for remote sensing data production, evaluation and applications.
Collaborate with sponsor technical team and manage project progress.
Other related functions as assigned.
Required Qualifications
Applicant must have expertise in Python and Unix shell scripting.
Proficient with algorithm design and development.
Applicant must be comfortable using a Linux command line interface and have practical experience using Git/Gitlab/Github or other modern software version control system.
Experience with one or more machine learning toolkits, like ScikitLearn, Keras, PyTorch, or Tensorflow.
Experience with common machine learning algorithms and supervised training methods, like dimensionality reduction, clustering, ensemble learning, decision trees, SVMs, and CNNs.
Preferred Qualifications
Hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning techniques using U-Nets, GANs, Autoencoders, or Reinforcement Learning.
Demonstrated experience with end-to-end machine learning pipelines with real-world data-sets, including data cleaning, feature engineering, cross-validation, three-sets, and hyper-parameter tuning.
Experience with R or MATLAB.
Demonstrated experience with algorithm development for remote sensing data product processing, analysis and applications.
General Notes
Salary Range
$82,000-$129,000+/negotiable depending on qualifications
Working Conditions
Standard office conditions
Some weekend, evening, or holiday work
Possible interstate/intrastate travel
Required Materials
Resume/CV
Unofficial college transcripts
Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded.
Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.
This information will be pulled in to your application.
that were noted above.
----
Employment Eligibility:
----
Retirement Plan Eligibility:
----
Background Checks:
A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.
----
Equal Opportunity Employer:
----
Pay Transparency:
----
Employment Eligibility Verification:
----
E-Verify:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----
Compliance:
If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting.
","['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'linux', 'github', 'git', 'matlab', 'net', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'scikitlearn', 'python', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'geospati', 'dimensionality reduction', 'cnn', 'clean', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'research', 'svm', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'linux', 'github', 'git', 'matlab', 'net', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'scikitlearn', 'python', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'geospati', 'dimensionality reduction', 'cnn', 'clean', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'research', 'svm', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Duration: 3 Months (Strong possibility of going perm)
Design, develop, test, and implement high quality machine learning and AI code into dev, test, and production environments.
Maintain a professional attitude at all times, provide thought leadership, and display problem solving skills.
Be prepared to present 1x1 or in a group setting.
Qualifications:
Master's Degree or PhD Required (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or Physics Preferred).
Fluent in R or Python
Must have Git Hub experience and comfort with version control procedures.
Deep Learning experience with Keras required.
NLP and Reinforcement Learning experience preferred.
Regards,
Vikas
","['r', 'kera', 'git', 'python']","['deep learning', 'machine learning', 'reinforc', 'problem solving', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom']",2.0,"['r', 'kera', 'git', 'python', 'deep learning', 'machine learning', 'reinforc', 'problem solving', 'nlp', 'statist', 'econom']"
DS,"Job Posting Title:
Geospatial Software Developer and Data Scientist
----
Hiring Department:
----
Position Open To:
All Applicants
----
Weekly Scheduled Hours:
40
----
FLSA Status:
Exempt
----
Earliest Start Date:
Immediately
----
Position Duration:
Expected to Continue
----
----
Development and implementation of geospatial algorithms for a variety of remote sensing technologies and applications (airborne and space-based).
Innovate machine learning and deep learning techniques for exciting programs for diverse sponsor needs.
Enhance and improve existing machine learning algorithms using modern machine learning methods.
Innovate solutions to accommodate clustering and cloud based capabilities.
----
Job Details:
Responsibilities
Develop new software and algorithms for remote sensing data production, evaluation and applications.
Collaborate with sponsor technical team and manage project progress.
Other related functions as assigned.
Required Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in engineering or computer science and three years of related experience.
Applicant must have expertise in Python and Unix shell scripting.
Proficient with algorithm design and development.
Applicant must be comfortable using a Linux command line interface and have practical experience using Git/Gitlab/Github or other modern software version control system.
Experience with one or more machine learning toolkits, like ScikitLearn, Keras, PyTorch, or Tensorflow.
Experience with common machine learning algorithms and supervised training methods, like dimensionality reduction, clustering, ensemble learning, decision trees, SVMs, and CNNs.
Ability to work with sensitive and confidential information, maintain a professional demeanor, work as a team member without daily supervision and effectively communicate with diverse groups of clients.
Preferred Qualifications
Hands-on experience with state-of-the-art machine learning techniques using U-Nets, GANs, Autoencoders, or Reinforcement Learning.
Demonstrated experience with end-to-end machine learning pipelines with real-world data-sets, including data cleaning, feature engineering, cross-validation, three-sets, and hyper-parameter tuning.
Experience with R or MATLAB.
Demonstrated experience with algorithm development for remote sensing data product processing, analysis and applications.
Understanding of best practices of software development such as code reviews, test-driven development, and continuous integration/continuous deployment.
Cumulative GPA of 3.0.
General Notes
An agency designated by the federal government handles the investigation as to the requirement for eligibility for access to classified information.
Factors considered during this investigation include but are not limited to allegiance to the United States, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations, drug involvement, the likelihood of continuation of such conduct, etc.
Salary Range
$82,000-$129,000+/negotiable depending on qualifications
Working Conditions
Standard office conditions
Use of manual dexterity
Repetitive use of keyboard at a workstation
Some weekend, evening, or holiday work
Possible interstate/intrastate travel
Required Materials
Resume/CV
3 work references with their contact information; at least one reference should be from a supervisor
Letter of interest
Unofficial college transcripts
Any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.)
will be uploaded in the Application Questions section; you will be able to multi-select additional files.
Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded.
Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.
This information will be pulled in to your application.
The application is one page and you will be prompted to upload your resume.
In addition, you must respond to the application questions presented to upload any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.)
that were noted above.
----
Employment Eligibility:
Regular staff who have been employed in their current position for the last six continuous months are eligible for openings being recruited for through University-Wide or Open Recruiting, to include both promotional opportunities and lateral transfers.
----
Retirement Plan Eligibility:
The retirement plan for this position is Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS), subject to the position being at least 20 hours per week and at least 135 days in length.
----
Background Checks:
A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.
----
Equal Opportunity Employer:
The University of Texas at Austin, as an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer, complies with all applicable federal and state laws regarding nondiscrimination and affirmative action.
The University is committed to a policy of equal opportunity for all persons and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, or veteran status in employment, educational programs and activities, and admissions.
----
Pay Transparency:
----
Employment Eligibility Verification:
If hired, you will be required to complete the federal Employment Eligibility Verification I-9 form.
You will be required to present acceptable and original documents to prove your identity and authorization to work in the United States.
Documents need to be presented no later than the third day of employment.
Failure to do so will result in loss of employment at the university.
----
E-Verify:
The University of Texas at Austin use E-Verify to check the work authorization of all new hires effective May 2015.
For more information about E-Verify, please see the following:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----
Compliance:
If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting.
You may access the 2019 report here or obtain a copy at University Compliance Services, 1616 Guadalupe, Suite UTA 2.206, Austin, TX 78701.
","['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'linux', 'github', 'git', 'matlab', 'net', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'scikitlearn', 'python', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'geospati', 'dimensionality reduction', 'cnn', 'clean', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'svm', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['unix', 'kera', 'pytorch', 'linux', 'github', 'git', 'matlab', 'net', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'scikitlearn', 'python', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'decision tree', 'data', 'cluster', 'geospati', 'dimensionality reduction', 'cnn', 'clean', 'reinforc', 'supervis', 'svm', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"The ideal candidate has experience applying data analytics, machine learning and statistical analysis to diverse problems in order to address customer and mission analytic needs.
The candidate will work across multiple projects including external resources to develop innovative data-driven solutions.
Maintain up-to-date awareness of state of the art data science/engineering approaches, tools, and techniques.
Connect academic ML work with domain applications to produce new models to detect or identify signatures, and/or predict future outcomes.
Develop prototypes and proofs-of-concept, applying the latest academic research, to diverse problems and datasets, to improve system and mission operator performance
Hands-on software development skills (Python, R, C++, C#, Java, Javascript)
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience conducting original research using data science techniques, including machine learning, deep learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization.
Required Skills:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Mathematics or related field with a concentration in software development
10+ years software development experience in a professional setting with at least 1 modern programming language, preferably C, C++, Python or Java
Security clearances are granted to U.S. citizens.
Desired Skills:
Masters or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science, Mathematics, Science related, or other related field.
Experience with Open Architecture development
An understanding of object-oriented design and implementation
Solid understanding of computer science fundamentals in data structures, algorithm design and problem solving
Familiar with software architecture design principles
Effective communication skills
2+ years working with messaging technologies such as ActiveMQ or RabbitMQ
4+ years software development experience using Red Hat Enterprise Linux
Knowledge of Agile/Scrum development methodology
Knowledge of Version Control system such as Git or Subversion
May require periodical (quarterly on average) travel for technical interchange meetings, customer meetings, and integration/usability testing activities
Physical Requirements:
Frequently required to sit and use manual dexterity
Works in an office environment with little or occasional light physical effort
Works on a computer, requiring the ability to view a monitor for long periods of time
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this classification.
They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.
A review of this classification has excluded the marginal functions of the classification that are incidental to the performance of fundamental job duties.
The requirements in this document are the minimum levels of knowledge, skills, or abilities.
This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 601.4(a), 60300.5(a) and 60741.5(a).
Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.
Reasonable accommodation statement: If you need an accommodation for any part of the application process, please email careers@ultra-us-gbs.com
","['linux', 'git', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']","['deep learning', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['linux', 'git', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'java', 'deep learning', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Senior Data Scientist @Sunnyvale, CA
Duration : 12+ Months
Request Summary:
ML/NLP/Statistics/Engineering Mathematics
Strong understanding in Statistics, Optimization Techniques and Time Series (ARIMA) with academic and industry
experience
Candidate must be very strong in Machine Learning and Deep Learning Worked as principal contributor and lead in end-to-end phases for building statistical data science and NLP
projects
Statistics, Data Analysis, Data Wrangling
Architectural knowledge and understanding
Strong in Python, Data blending and should have work experience
Good in SQL
Team player, self-motivated, innovator with strong interpersonal skills
Qualification:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science or Engineering with relevant industry experience
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $115,561.00 - $180,385.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data science and NLP: 5 years (Required)
Machine Learning and Deep Learning: 5 years (Required)
Senior Data Scientist: 6 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['sql', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'optim', 'time series', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 6+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
- Top 10 Companies for Global DiversityNational Association of Female Executives - Top 50 Companies for Female ExecutivesWorking Mother - 100 Best Companies2016 Climate Leadership AwardRequired Technical and Professional Expertise* PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.About IBMIBM's greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Job Responsibilities and Duties
Responsibilities:
Lead model development, providing methodology, strategy, ideas, architect, and solutions for real-word, industrial-scale and mission-critical business operations
Develop AI/ML models for business applications
Build and integrate models into a full-functioning AI business software
Interact with business clients, understand business requirements, propose AI software solutions to meet the business requirements, deliver and present AI software to clients
Understand the data set used for the modeling, prepare and preprocess data sets, train and test models and perform model feature engineering
Communicate effectively with team members, management, and clients
Requirements
Proven ability to work with large structured and unstructured datasets
Demonstrable, hands-on experience in developing advanced analytics algorithms/models, including time series forecasting, machine learning and deep learning, image processing, natural language processing, and speech recognition
Excellent hands-on code development skills in Python
Good Knowledge of Machine Learning frameworks and packages, including Keras, TensorFlow, MXnet, Scikit-Learn and cloud technology (Amazon, Azure, etc.)
Experiences in Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Computer Vision, and Natural Language Processing
PhD degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, or related disciplines
At least 3 years of Artificial Intelligence
At least 3 years of Machine Learning
Background in Property and Casulity Insurance a big plus!
Additional Qualifications
Parallel and distributed processing experience is a plus
Expertise in data Extraction Transformation and Loading (ETL) is a strong plus (Spark, Hadoop, SQL) in big data environments.
Domain knowledge in financial and insurance industries is a big plus
The candidate must be able to work out of the Houston Texas office but remote work will be considered for extremely strong candidate
You must have a PHD to be considered for this position.
Benefits
Compensation package (base salary + performance bonus + stock options) commensurate with experience.
Industry (tech/software industry) standard benefits package - medical, dental, vision, 401(k) plan, work-from-home (if applicable), flexible holidays, and more.
","['kera', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'scikit', 'cloud']","['deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['kera', 'spark', 'mxnet', 'excel', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'scikit', 'cloud', 'deep learning', 'etl', 'big data', 'computer vision', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Data Scientist - Big Data, ML, NLP
What You Need for this Position
MS/PhD in related field
6+ years of experience in Big Data, AI, Machine Learning, NLP, Deep Learning
Python
Java / Scala
Statistical & Predictive Modeling
Clustering & Classification
Supervised Learning
Recommendation/Optimization algorithms
BONUS: Confluence, JIRA, Spark, Azure, Keras, Scikit-learn, Bit bucket, Jupyter Notebook, MonetdB, OrientDB, SQL, Spark
..
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['kera', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'jira', 'scikit', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'supervis', 'optim', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']",2.0,"['kera', 'scala', 'spark', 'sql', 'jupyt', 'python', 'azur', 'jira', 'scikit', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'supervis', 'optim', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend']"
DS,"*About the Role - Data Scientist*
Your job will be to architect what data should be collected and build analytical models to derive rich meaningful insights.
1.
B.S / M.S in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field with 5+ years of relevant industry experience.
2.
Rock-solid software engineering foundation and a commitment to writing clean, documented, and well-architected code.
3.
5+ Yrs of experience with statistics, mathematical modeling, R, Python, Machine Learning, Computer Vision, Natural Language Processing, etc.
4.
Experience with large data sets, developing data analytics, and dashboards for enterprise applications.
5.
Ability to architect analytics pipelines and develop insightful models from scratch.
Job Type: Full-time
","['r', 'python']","['computer vision', 'dashboard', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'clean', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['r', 'python', 'computer vision', 'dashboard', 'data', 'nlp', 'clean', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Data Scientist with Active Secret Clearance
Are you interested in leveraging your skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution?
Work you’ll do
The Data Scientist will join a team responsible for developing advanced analytics products; applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable the key mission outcomes.
In this role, she will support all phases of analytic work product development, from the identification of key business questions, through data collection and ETL, from performing analyses and using a wide range of statistical, machine learning, and applied mathematical techniques to delivery insights to decision-makers.
This role requires special attention to the interplay between data and the business processes that produce it and the decision-makers that consume insights.
The team
Analytics & Cognitive
In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.
The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data, analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform decision-making.
Qualifications
Required Skills:
Bachelors degree
2+ relevant experience within data science or analysis
Experience with programming languages such as Python, R, and VBA; and query languages such as SQL
Experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, PowerBI, d3.js and other web application technologies, or equivalent
Experience with SQL and NoSQL database technologies such as SQL Server, Oracle SQL
Proficiency with data extraction, transformation, and loading to support advanced analytics
Experience with a wide range of analytics techniques, such as statistics, machine learning, natural language processing, optimization, simulation, or closely related techniques
Strong strategic communication skills to include presenting quantitative concepts in easy to understand formats and actively listening to identify business problems and their causes
A curious, questioning attitude that leads them to look past superficial appearances to find deeper problems, insights, and solutions
Thrives in fast-paced work environment with multiple stakeholders
High-performing team player who believes that cross-functional teams are greater than the sum of its parts
Must be able to obtain/maintain a minimum of a Secret clearance
Hold an active Secret security clearance
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in the future.
Travel up to 5% (While 5% of travel is a requirement of the role, due to COVID-19, non-essential travel has been suspended until further notice.)
Desired Skills:
Experience leveraging data analysis to construct strategic narratives
Familiarity with cloud computing technology, especially Microsoft Azure
Familiarity with Agile project management principles
Confidence to drive assignments to completion
Eagerness to learn and develop
How you’ll grow
Benefits
Corporate citizenship
Recruiter tips
Certain services may not be available to attest clients under the rules and regulations of public accounting.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable law.
Requisition code: E21AUSSRCSA1001-AC
","['nosql', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'azur', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['nosql', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'azur', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'etl', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"This role works with customers to understand changing requirements and recommends solutions based on quantitative analysis.
This role provides recommendations for the development of tools and applications that improve process effectiveness and efficiency.
Palantir, i2 Analyst's Notebook) • Experience with cloud architectures including AWS • Experience with distributed computing and storage technologies Working Conditions: Work is typically based in a busy office environment and subject to frequent interruptions.
Business work hours are normally set from Monday through Friday 8:00am to 5:00pm, however some extended or weekend hours may be required.
Additional details on the precise hours will be informed to the candidate from the Program Manager/Hiring Manager.
Physical Requirements: Office work.
That does not unlawfully discriminate in any of its programs or activities on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other basis prohibited by applicable law.
","['aw', 'cloud']","['recommend', 'busi']",2.0,"['aw', 'cloud', 'recommend', 'busi']"
DS,"Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
- Top 10 Companies for Global DiversityNational Association of Female Executives - Top 50 Companies for Female ExecutivesWorking Mother - 100 Best Companies2016 Climate Leadership AwardRequired Technical and Professional Expertise* PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities - where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust - where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.About IBMIBM's greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"The AI/DL Data Scientist will help design and implement AI/DL systems for a wide variety of use cases and applications.
Primary responsibilities:
• Assist customers in POCs by developing and optimizing Deep Learning models for GPU environments.
Help design and deploy solutions for the leading customers
• Develop optimized model repository for common use cases and verticals (finance, life sciences, etc) on Dell + NVIDIA technology to provide a starting point for customers
• Familiarity with the Frameworks such as Tensorflow, py torch, mxnet, caffe 2 etc.
• Develop best practices for GPU training at scale (Example: Optimal usage of tensorcores and FP16 training, Using TensorRT for model optimization before deployment)
• Maintain constant awareness of the emerging AI techniques and will participate in research activities to maintain technical vision and perspective.
• Python programming experience.
","['tensorflow', 'caff', 'mxnet', 'python']","['deep learning', 'data', 'financ', 'optim', 'research']",999.0,"['tensorflow', 'caff', 'mxnet', 'python', 'deep learning', 'data', 'financ', 'optim', 'research']"
DS,"Title: Master Architect - AI/ML Data Scientist (DTJP00019052)
Duration: 12 month(s) [with potential to extend to 2 years]
About Business Unit:
You will also build/maintain AI/ML infrastructure.
You will contribute to testing and provide customer focus to produce high quality products globally.
Key Responsibilities:
• Develop and maintain high quality Python code under Linux for creating models for different use cases
• Plan and execute complex and challenging technical projects
• Possess strong interpersonal skills and consistently demonstrate ability to work in a team environment and with cross-functional global teams
Generate intellectual property
• Expert-level knowledge in learning algorithms such as inverse reinforcement learning, deep reinforcement learning and probabilistic inference for decision support systems
• Knowledge and hands-on expertise in deep neural network topologies such as convolutional nets, recurrent nets,
• RBMs, causal reasoning, probabilistic programming
• Mathematically minded with experience in manipulating high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources to highlight patterns, anomalies, relationships and trends with machine learning techniques
• Develop requirements and evaluation methods for artificial intelligence technologies and benchmark vendor technologies
• Provide expert peer review for new AI concepts, partners and vendors
• Promote AI across the organization
• Effective verbal/written communication along with strong interpersonal skills.
Team player
• This position is responsible for timely and accurate completion of other tasks as defined by the Manager
Leads teams in the development and execution of solution strategies and roadmaps Provides strategic leadership for planning, designing and implementing an enterprise architecture strategy and implementation approach Provides master-level technical oversight and support to technical staff Advises and leads technical teams in developing solutions to enterprise wide business problems Defines scope and problem domain for the architecture in a crisp and structured way: defining the problem with stakeholders and identifying key issues Strategizes efforts for research, discovery, planning and implementation to improve business processes Oversees the Solution Architecture Review for projects, applications and infrastructure Strategizes and defines architecture processes and technologies Evaluates and applies emerging technologies to meet current or emerging business needs Acts as the primary consultant to the business to elicit enterprise-class business requirements
Requirements:
• Bachelor of Science in Information Technology or equivalent with 12+ years of overall IT experience
• 3-5 years AI work experience
• Experience in designing, building or implementing AI business solutions is essential
• This role is all about delivering practical AI pilots in a business environment and is less about developing the theory
• 3+ years of experience with Machine Learning, Statistical Models, and Natural Language Processing
• Experience with Python, TensorFlow, Keras, StackStorm
• Solid understanding of Data Structures, Algorithms & Object-Oriented design concepts
• Excellent academic qualifications are essential with a strong preference for a post graduate qualification
Accountabilities:
Statements of Work, SLA documentation, etc.)
Best,
Kushal Shah
kushal@apninc.com
","['kera', 'linux', 'excel', 'net', 'tensorflow', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'convolut', 'natural language processing', 'account', 'reinforc', 'neural network', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'recurr', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['kera', 'linux', 'excel', 'net', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'causal', 'convolut', 'nlp', 'account', 'reinforc', 'nn', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'recurr', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
DS,"Lead Data Scientist - Secret Clearance Required - Austin, TX
Are you interested in leveraging your analytical skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution?
Work you'll do
The Lead Data Scientist will join a team responsible for developing advanced analytics products; applying data visualization and statistical programming tools to enterprise data to advance and enable the key mission outcomes.
In this role, they will support all phases of analytic work product development, from the identification of key business questions, through data collection and ETL, from performing analyses and using a wide range of statistical, machine learning, and applied mathematical techniques to delivery insights to decision-makers.
This role requires special attention to the interplay between data and the business processes that produce it and the decision-makers that consume insights
The team
Analytics & Cognitive
In this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.
The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data, analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform decision-making.
Implement large-scale data ecosystems including data management, governance and the integration of structured and unstructured data to generate insights leveraging cloud-based platforms
Leverage automation, cognitive and science-based techniques to manage data, predict scenarios and prescribe actions
Drive operational efficiency by maintaining their data ecosystems, sourcing analytics expertise and providing As-a-Service offerings for continuous insights and improvements
Qualifications
Required:
Minimum Active Secret Security Clearance
10+ overall years of relevant professional experience
5+ years of experience leveraging data analysis to construct strategic narratives
5+ years of experience with programming languages such as Python, R
5+ years of experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, Qlik, PowerBI, or equivalent
3+ years data engineering experience with ETL, NoSQL Apache Hadoop
2+ years experience with cloud computing technology, especially Microsoft Azure
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics or other business-related field
Preferred:
2+ years of relevant consulting or industry experience
Prior professional services or federal consulting experience
Familiarity with Agile project management principles
Confidence to drive assignments to completion
Eagerness to learn and develop
How you'll grow
Benefits
Corporate citizenship
Recruiter tips
Certain services may not be available to attest clients under the rules and regulations of public accounting.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable law.
Requisition code: E21AUSCSRMJE110632
*
*
*
","['nosql', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud']","['etl', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['nosql', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'powerbi', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'cloud', 'etl', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Are you interested in leveraging your skills and strategic ideas to improve mission execution?
In this role, she will support all phases of analytic work product development, from the identification of key business questions, through data collection and ETL, from performing analyses and using a wide range of statistical, machine learning, and applied mathematical techniques to delivery insights to decision-makers.
This role requires special attention to the interplay between data and the business processes that produce it and the decision-makers that consume insights.The teamAnalytics & CognitiveIn this age of disruption, organizations need to navigate the future with confidence, embracing decision making with clear, data-driven choices that deliver enterprise value in a dynamic business environment.The Analytics & Cognitive team leverages the power of data, analytics, robotics, science and cognitive technologies to uncover hidden relationships from vast troves of data, generate insights, and inform decision-making.
* Travel up to 5% (While 5% of travel is a requirement of the role, due to COVID-19, non-essential travel has been suspended until further notice.
Learn more about Life at Deloitte.Corporate citizenshipDeloitte is led by a purpose: to make an impact that matters.
Certain services may not be available to attest clients under the rules and regulations of public accounting.All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable law.Requisition code: E21AUSSRCSA1001-AC******
",[None],"['etl', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['etl', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)?
Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models?
AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.
AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team.
A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.
This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.
Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations
Preferred Qualifications
· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'data modeling', 'computer vision', 'data', 'nlp', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'hardwar']"
DS,"Job Title: Sr. Data Scientist
Type: Full Time
Responsibilities:
Build Predictive modeling ecosystems for real-time consumption
Design and develop advanced Machine Learning algorithms to rapidly build analytics apps and operationalize them into production
Deliver innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional data sets.
Develop Analytics applications using R/Python/Spark with Regression, SVM, and Neural Networks techniques
Work with support teams in resolving operational & performance issues
Work in a Big Data environment with Hadoop, Spark, Hive
Education:
Bachelor’s, Masters or Doctorate in Computer Science, Information Systems and related Engineering disciplines
","['spark', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'exploratori', 'neural network', 'svm', 'machine learning']",1.0,"['spark', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'big data', 'data', 'predict', 'exploratori', 'nn', 'svm', 'machine learning']"
DS,"The Business
GradTests.com is a leading provider of practice psychometric tests to graduates, students and young professionals.
The Role
A data science all rounder role.
The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.
You'll do things like:
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of business problems, from customer churn through to
Set up, run and analyse A/B experiments for the website and email marketing campaigns
Help devise and layout a high quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!
Skills and experience
Non negotiables:
SQL
Python or R
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and maths
Experience in actually productionising models and exposing to real customers
Business acumen
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Nice to haves:
Experience in working with developers, especially on experimentation
Some kind of cloud based experience (AWS preferred)
Some basic knowledge of source control with Git
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $120,000.00 /year
Experience:
Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['python', 'git', 'sql', 'net', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data', 'tune', 'math', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Job Title: Data Scientist III
Candidate should have experience in some form of SQL (e.g.
HIVE, PostgreSQL,
MSSQL, etc.)
and either Python or R for statistical application development.
Experience in a
Hadoop environment and / or statistical development tool (e.g.
RapidMiner, Knime) a plus.
Data Scientist
• Develop and communicate a deep understanding of client needs, perform analytical deep-
dives to identify problems, opportunities and specific actions required
• Develop reproducible and deployable statistical applications on platform such as
R/Python/Spark using techniques such as Regression, SVM, and Neural Networks
• Implementing processes that improve and lead to greater data quality
• Conducting statistical analyses to develop strategies
• Documenting all processes and research
• Building new algorithms and model training
• Executing projects involving analytics
• Identifying data patterns and trends
• Analyzing data to develop predictive models
• Creating, managing, and maintaining analytically rigorous data
• Possessing a solid machine learning foundation
• Proven record of successful statistical product delivery
• Ability to execute health insurance use cases via statistical applications such as R or Python
• Efficiently access data via multiple vectors (e.g.
NFS, FTP, SSH, SQL, Sqoop, Flume, Spark)
• Significant experience with SQL and working with large datasets required
• Work with cross-functional teams (including Product Management, Engineering, and senior
executives) to rapidly execute and iterate
• Noting anomaly detection and running diagnostics
• Performing graphical model analysis
• Strong verbal and written communication skills
All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, color, sex, religion, age, physical or mental disability, veteran status, citizenship status or any other status protected by federal, state or local law.""
","['postgresql', 'rapidmin', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive']","['regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'neural network', 'research', 'anomali', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['postgresql', 'rapidmin', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'nn', 'research', 'anomali', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Hello,
Hope you are doing good.
Â
Position:ÂSr.
Data Scientist
Duration:Â12+months
Â
Skills Required:
Must have hands on working experience with Machine Learning, Python or R
Â
This individual will be working with many parts of the organization from the executive teams to the operational and commercial businesses.Â
They will also be heading up a data science team of 2 or 3 in the future as well.
Thank You,
Anvesh
Main: (888) 266-9166 Ext: 403 | Direct:Â239-420-4287
Email:Âanvesh@conchtech.com
Leading IT solutions provider for more than a Decade!ÂFind out why!
","['r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data']",999.0,"['r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"Overview:
Responsibility also includes coding, testing, and documentation of new or modified scalable analytic data systems including automation for deployment and monitoring.
This role participates along with team counterparts to architect an end-to-end framework developed on a group of core data technologies.
Other aspects of the role include developing standards and processes for computational learning projects and initiatives.
Responsibilities:
JOB DUTIES
Evaluate, research, experiment with computational learning technologies in a lab to keep pace with industry innovation while assessing business impact and viability for use cases associated with efforts in hand
Work with statisticians, data engineers, application developers, and related groups to inform on and showcase capabilities of emerging technologies and to enable the adoption of these new technologies, computational learning and associated algorithms
Work closely with statisticians, data engineers, application developers, other IT counterparts, and business partners to develop, integrate and deploy computational learning as part of applications
Code, test, deploy, monitor, document and troubleshoot computational learning processing and associated automation
Educate and develop system engineers on distributed systems engineering so as to enable future data science and practice
Perform other duties as assigned
Qualifications:
Knowledge
Excellent knowledge of Linux, AIX, or other Unix flavors
Experience with recent computational learning technologies such TensorFlow, Caffe, Torch, Neon, SystemML, or Theano
Experience with directed analytic graph processing using Beam, Nifi, Flink, and/or Samza
Experience with messaging technologies such as Kafka, RabbitMQ, ZeroMQ, or MQTT
Experience with high dimensional visualization using t-SNE or PCA or other related technologies such as Ayasdi
Working knowledge of cloud based computational learning technologies such as Google Cloud Machine Learning, Microsoft Azure Machine Learning, or IBM Watson
Working knowledge of Rasa, Spacey/Prodigy, NLTK, Standford CoreNLP, ELMo, and other natural language understanding and processing frameworks and modeling
Skills
Demonstrated strong track record on delivering computational learning based solutions that solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches that are a blend of analytical, mathematical and technical skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Experienced with solution development, deployment, and/or administration of distributed computational learning and/or analysis systems such as Spark, H2O, SAS Grid, Tensorflow or Hadoop
Education
High School Diploma or equivalent required
Masters Degree in operations research, applied statistics, data mining, machine learning, physics or related quantitative discipline required
Experience
2-4 years hands-on experience with NoSQL data stores such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Riak or other technologies that embed NoSQL such as MarkLogic or Lily Enterprise required
3-5 years data science experience required
5-7 years software engineering in languages to include Java, SAS, and Python required
5-7 years hands-on experience with SQL databases and Business Intelligence tools such as Oracle, DB2, Postrges, MySQL, SAS, Cognos, Oracle BI Enterprise Edition, SAP BusinessObjects, or Tableau required #LI-TS1
","['linux', 'cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'mysql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'caff', 'nltk', 'spark', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'oracl', 'java', 'unix', 'nosql', 'kafka', 'theano', 'cassandra', 'sa', 'cloud', 'h2o', 'sql', 'bi']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'pca', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['linux', 'cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tensorflow', 'python', 'caff', 'nltk', 'spark', 'hbase', 'tableau', 'mongodb', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'oracl', 'java', 'unix', 'nosql', 'kafka', 'theano', 'cassandra', 'sa', 'cloud', 'h2o', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'pca', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Data Scientist designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to analyze structured and unstructured diverse big data sources.
Develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and model complex business problems.
Is familiar with disciplines such as Machine Learning, Natural Language Processing, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis, and Hypothesis testing.
Works with cross-discipline teams in order to leverage subject-matter expertise to develop tools, algorithms, dashboards, and queries to monitor and improve business performance.
Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big data trends and technologies.
Requires knowledge of various technical domains including systems coding, various software programming languages, and deep mathematical calculation and algorithms to provide intricate analytic solutions to meet end user needs.
Has various tool knowledge with both software development and engineering research to create models of relevancy.
Responsible for the delivery, quality, communications, and accuracy associated with all outputs.
Communicate analytical findings to management and customer on a regular basis.
Lead small teams in execution of projects.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors, Masters or PhD degree in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics or equivalent experience
15+ years experience with Predictive Analytics and Machine Learning Methodologies
Experienced with the application of statistics and data-mining in a business environment (trend discovery and analysis, correlation and pattern discovery, text mining, etc.)
Understanding of CRISP-DM Methodologies
Experience in operations analysis, data analytics, computer science or related field.
Familiar with SQL, and able to create/perform basic queries.
Strong interpersonal communications skills (verbal, presentation, and written).
Strong problem-solving skills, inquisitive mindset
Focused on results and able to work closely with others in collaborative environment.
Energetic & Self-Starting
Desired Skills:
Experience using R, Python, MATLAB, or other data analytics toolsets
Proficient with JMP or other data discovery / statistical analysis tools
Proficient with MS and Oracle SQL
Technical leadership of small- to medium-size teams
Lean Six Sigma (Green Belt or Black Belt Certification)
Operations Background
Facilitation
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
job.Qualifications
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision.
Theyre dangerous.
Critical.
Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives.
EXPERIENCE LEVEL:
Experienced Professional
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'oracl']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'correl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'machine learning', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'correl', 'data', 'dashboard', 'machine learning', 'nlp', 'predict', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Summary
*** Remote full-time opportunity for both a Senior Data Scientist and Data Scientist ***
This is a great opportunity to join a small team to help share your expertise but also provides you the opportunity to grow in your career.
You will be responsible for obtaining, developing and analyzing data, prove/disprove hypotheses, exploring new data sources and structures, and develop insights.
You will have the opportunity to consult with internal customers to develop business requirements and provide possible solutions and approaches to their analytic needs.
Your customers will include marketing, branding, underwriting, field leadership, senior business leaders and the data office.
This role will require in depth understanding of financial services, big data technologies (Hadoop, Python, R), statistical modeling and be a team player with strong communication skills.
In the Senior Data Scientist position you will also have the opportunity to teach/lead others in principles of predictive analytics.
Job Duties and Responsibilities
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, marketing targeting and other business outcomes.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Job Qualifications
Strong problem-solving skills in Financial Services, with extensive familiarization in related life, health, and investment product sets.
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SAS, etc.)
to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures, both structured and non-structured.
Knowledge of a variety of predictive analytics and machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.)
and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.)
and experience with applications.
3+ years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
At least 7 years of experience for the Senior Data Scientist opening.
Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or equivalent experience.
Familiar with the following software/tools:
Coding knowledge and experience with R, Python and/or SAS.
Statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, Support Vector Machines, Neural Networks, social network analysis, etc.
Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Demographic providers (Wunderman, Acxiom, Claritas), Google Analytics, and other web/social data providers.
Distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc.
Data mapping using R, SAS, or Tableau.
","['spark', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'neural network', 'busi', 'support vector machine', 'statist', 'commun']",2.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'regress', 'big data', 'data mining', 'glm', 'decision tree', 'data', 'machine learning', 'boost', 'random forest', 'predict', 'nn', 'busi', 'svm', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Data Scientist
That means you’ll be instrumental in making a big impact.
This team is responsible for providing analytical support, performing market analysis, identifying market trends, and telling stories with data.
Share your brilliance!
- Looking for Big Data Engineers that well versed with big data tech like Spark, Kafka, Streams, SQL/NSQL database modeling.
Responsibilities:
Working with Data Science team on both internal and external data sets.
Collaborate and work closely with cross-functional business partners to identify gaps and structure problems.
Use large data sets of structured and un-structured data to Client insights.
Work in a fast-paced, dynamic environment to deliver results while meeting deadlines.
Promoting process improvement using machine learning techniques.
Design data visualizations to communicate complex ideas to various leadership teams.
Qualifications:
MS or PhD in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering or other quantitative disciplines.
Complete understanding of and expertise with various machine learning packages.
Experience applying machine learning to real-world problems.
Experience in feature engineering methods such as PCA, ANOVA and multivariate analysis.
Comprehension of modeling techniques such as classification and regression.
Good understanding of various statistical methods, not limited to hypothesis testing, resampling, and Bayesian inference.
Fluent in R, Python (including Numpy, Pandas and Scikit-learn).
Experience in different distributed systems, such as Hadoop or Spark Proficient in SQL.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Helping Your Business Thrive With Human Capital Solutions
www.ateroz.com
","['kafka', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit']","['regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'pca', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']",2.0,"['kafka', 'spark', 'sql', 'r', 'panda', 'python', 'hadoop', 'numpi', 'scikit', 'regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'pca', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']"
DS,"Objective:
The Data Scientist will be a technical role in leading data science projects, combining predictive analytics, data modeling, and machine learning.
You’ll have a strong business acumen to assist in decision-making for complex business problems across the digital platform.
You aren’t just reporting the data – you’ll be the key role in building it, it’s attributes, and its parameters while tailoring solutions to emerging business challenges.
Profile:
Required 4+ years of experience in relevant role (data/ decision science role, preferably in e-commerce and/or omni-channel)
Bachelor’s degree in related field (mathematics, statistics, computer science, engineering or a related quantitative field)
Expertise and deep knowledge of typical data science techniques such as classification, regression and optimization
Experience/proficiency in statistical programming languages: R, SAS, SPSS, etc.· Experience/proficiency in one or more of the following scripting languages: Python, Perl, Java or Ruby
Experience/proficiency in relational databases such as: SQL, Oracle, Teradata
Familiarity with:
BI tools (SAP business Intelligence, MicroStrategy, Tableau, QlikSense)
Big Data ecosystems & Distributed file systems / data frameworks (Apache Hadoop, AWS)
Machine learning tools/packages
Proficient level of MS Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, Powerpoint, Sharepoint, OneNote) and presentation tools
Duties:
Independently and collaboratively explore, develop and deliver solutions to meet the business needs.
Undertake data collection, processing and analysis.
Analyze complex unstructured data sets to recommendations and implement solutions.
Build business intelligence system for the business integrating all and future platforms with multiple sources of data.
Independently convert business management questions into analyzable problems with solutions.
Skills:
Analytical mind with a business acumen (customer centricity)
Attentive to details – very detail oriented
Strong portfolio of design projects
A strong working knowledge of product UX design and creative processes
Job Type: Full-time
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Schedule::
Monday to Friday
","['ms office', 'aw', 'spss', 'excel', 'perl', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'aw', 'spss', 'excel', 'perl', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'hadoop', 'rubi', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'big data', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Locations: Washington, DC
People who use data to solve hard problems.
Including ones that did not exist a few years ago.
You are:
More than a data and statistics expert.
You are the applied intelligence expert.
You are confident working on design algorithms and large-scale statistical models.
You want to help your client deliver faster and better services to U.S. citizens and improve people's quality of life where it matters most.
The work:
Work with clients to create questions and define technology opportunities
Drive the exploration of data sources and analytic techniques to create new modeling approaches
Work with large data sets to solve complex problems
Lead and oversee teams to solve clients' solutions
",[None],"['statist', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'data']"
DS,"The Senior Data Scientist is the subject matter expert with an in depth knowledge of quantitative methods and diligent knowledge of data sources and tools.
JOB DUTIES
Provides leadership, coaching, and/or mentoring to Data Scientists I and II
Performs research, analysis, and modeling on organizational data
Assists in analyzing key metrics and performing data analysis
Builds technical knowledge to support research and analytic responsibilities including advanced techniques and algorithms
Conducts research projects, incorporate project design, data collection and analysis, summarizing findings, developing recommendations and effectively communicating to leadership the impact to the business
Develops and applies algorithms or models to key business metrics with the goal of improving operations or answering business questions
Presents findings and analysis for use in decision making
Partners with and provide recommendations to business leadership on the appropriate application of analytics to business strategies and effectively communicate analysis and implications to senior leadership
Prioritizes tasks and meets project deadlines in a fast paced work environment
Perform other duties as assigned
Knowledge
Strong quantitative, analytical and data interprestation skills with a solid foundation of mathematics, probability, and statistics
Ability to identify and understand business issues and map these issues into quantitative questions
Advanced knowledge and demonstrated understanding of applied methodologies including least squares regression, logistic regression, sampling methodologies, time series, survival analysis, cluster analysis, categorical data analysis, decision trees, multivariate methodologies, non-parametric techniques, principal components, and linear programming techniques
Advanced skills in Python, SAS, SQL, R, JMP, Excel, Word, PowerPoint
Ability to design and implement model documentation and monitoring protocols
Comprehensive knowledge and experience with technical systems, datasets, data warehouses, and data analysis techniques
Efficiently work with large datasets
Skills
Provides leadership, coaching, and/or mentoring to Data Scientists I and II
MS Office required
Proficient in Python or SAS required
Strong written and verbal presentation skills with an ability to communicate effectively with Senior Management by making complex concepts easy to understand
Ability to be curious, ask questions, explore, and be creative when analyzing data and business problems
Ability to identify and seek needed information/research skills
Analytical thinking skills
Ability to interact collaboratively with internal and external customers
Capable of managing multiple and varied projects, including the ability to coordinate and balance numerous tasks in a time-sensitive environment, under pressure
Strong problem solving skills
Education
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Econometrics, Economics, Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Computer Science, or similar quantitative field required
Experience
4+ yrs as a Data Scientist or similar quantitative field required
Working Conditions
Normal office environment
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['probabl', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'probabl', 'regress', 'decision tree', 'data', 'logist', 'cluster', 'econom', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'econometr']"
DS,"This is an exciting full-time opportunity to work in a fast-paced environment with a team of passionate technologists.
As a solution builder, you will be working to support the clients mission and goals of building an enterprise analytics platform.
#CGIFederalERPJob
#BePartofCGIMomentum
#LI-HS1
It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.
Your future duties and responsibilities
• Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities with the ability to support multiple work streams and drive assimilation of new techniques and solutions.
• Develop robust data platforms for enterprise analytics business intelligence solutions.
• Evaluate data quality using SQL and data analysis techniques that improve client-reporting capabilities.
• Participate in team problem solving efforts and offer ideas to solve client issues.
• Understand data needs and construct data pipelines for automating and accelerating data preparation.
Required qualifications to be successful in this role
Basic Qualifications:
• Bachelors degree or masters degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Technology or STEM related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, training, or work experience.
• 1+ Years of Experience developing data solutions using relational database management systems such as Oracle, SQL Server, Redshift, SAP HANA, etc.
• 1+ Years of Experience using Python, PowerShell, Perl or other scripting languages to extract and manipulate data.
• 1+ Years of Experience in creating complex SQL queries and functions, data structures and strong analytical problem solving skills.
• Experience working with messy data, building data pipelines and automation activities.
• Experience working in an Agile based environment.
• Strong technical and troubleshooting techniques.
","['python', 'redshift', 'sql', 'hana', 'perl', 'oracl']","['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'information technology', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['python', 'redshift', 'sql', 'hana', 'perl', 'oracl', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'information technology', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Your efforts will be integral to the success of these initiatives.
As team member, you will be expected to be solutions-oriented, innovative, collaborative and agile.
Performing as part of, or in support of a S CRUM team, you will be expected to thrive in organized chaos and immediately adopt agile team self-organizing methods and techniques.
Responsibilities Specifically, the Data Engineer has a passion for data, and creatively leverages expertise with data tools and programming languages to assess, transform, organize, optimize, and exploit systems and platform data.
Further, you will be responsible for generating representative data sets for demonstrations, technology evaluation, systems development, and data science initiatives.
You will be expected to help automate processes, and articulate methods to gain data management efficiencies, as well implementing and adopting of Data Engineering Best Practices to include mentoring projects and team members toward success.
Qualifications Senior skill level 4+ years of data engineering, schema design, dimensional data modeling, and or data management experience Proficient with data management tools, such as Python, SQL, Java, and use of Git Demonstrated experience with extracting, cleaning, managing, optimizing, and exploiting large and very complex data sets Experience with best practices for compute, storage, and transfer optimization in processing large volumes of data Active SECRET security clearance is required.
Preferred Experience with graph databases and event sourcing models Familiarity with machine learning, artificial intelligence, and or geospatial data analysis Strong interpersonal skills combined with ability to multi-task and maintain flexibility and creativity in a variety of situations
","['sql', 'git', 'java', 'python']","['data', 'geospati', 'optim', 'graph', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['sql', 'git', 'java', 'python', 'data', 'geospati', 'optim', 'graph', 'machine learning', 'data modeling']"
DS,"The Team
The Role
As a Data Scientist, you'll have ownership across a breadth of data science projects working end-to-end from building proof-of-concepts to productionalizing models.
You'll also have an opportunity to work alongside a talented team that values curiosity, humility, drive and teamwork.
Strong academic credentials with a M.S.
in statistics, mathematics, computer science or a related quantitative field of study with a preference for a PhD
Comfort with programming (ideally in Python and R)
Rigorous quantitative background
Predictive modeling experience is preferred
Strong sense of intellectual curiosity balanced with humility
Numerically-savvy with ability to operate at a speedy pace
What you'll love:
Competitive compensation (base + bonus & equity)
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Personal development and technology & ergonomic budgets
Life insurance and disability benefits
Clubs and Activities (game nights, Fitstarters, Superwomen, book club, investing club, money discussions, photography club and basketball teams)
Generous vacation policy
401(k) retirement plan
Catered lunches + snacks & drinks
","['r', 'python']","['statist', 'predict', 'data']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'statist', 'predict', 'data']"
DS,"The Team
The Role
If data is the new oil, then you'll be responsible for the refining process that creates the most premium fuel possible.
Knowledgeable in applied stats (e.g., hypothesis testing, linear and logistic regression)
Experience with SQL and R/Python
Strong sense of intellectual curiosity balanced with humility, drive and teamwork
Numerically-savvy and smart with ability to operate at a speedy pace
Ability to quickly piece together disparate pieces of information to form a broader picture
Ability to use data to detect bugs, surprises, and other important business issues
Determination to pursue a question until reaching a satisfactory conclusion
Experience with consumer (especially consumer finance) data a plus
Data visualization skills preferred
MS or PhD preferred
What you'll love:
Competitive compensation (base + bonus & equity)
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Personal development and technology & ergonomic budgets
Life insurance and disability benefits
Clubs and Activities (game nights, Fitstarters, Superwomen, book club, investing club, money discussions, photography club and basketball teams)
Generous vacation policy
401(k) retirement plan
Catered lunches + snacks & drinks
","['r', 'sql', 'python']","['regress', 'data', 'logist', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'python', 'regress', 'data', 'logist', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual']"
DS,"The Team
The Role
As a Senior Data Scientist, you'll have ownership across a breadth of data science projects working end-to-end from building proof-of-concepts to productionalizing models.
You'll also have an opportunity to work alongside a talented team that values curiosity, humility, drive and teamwork.
Strong academic credentials with a master's degree in computer science, statistics, mathematics, or other quantitative areas of study; Ph.D. preferred
5+ years relevant experience with detailed understanding of building good technical solutions; ability to convert ideas into testable hypotheses and/or next steps
Programming skills in Python and/or R
Full-stack expertise with all steps of the modeling process from ideation to productionalizing code; OR deep expertise in either statistical modeling or machine learning
Knowledge of machine learning, pipelines and engineering architecture helpful
Interest in growing in technical and/or people leadership is a plus
Strong sense of intellectual curiosity balanced with humility, drive and teamwork
Numerically-savvy and smart with ability to operate at a speedy pace
What you'll love:
Competitive compensation (base + bonus & equity)
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Personal development and technology & ergonomic budgets
Life insurance and disability benefits
Clubs and Activities (game nights, Fitstarters, Superwomen, book club, investing club, money discussions, photography club and basketball teams)
Generous vacation policy
401(k) retirement plan
Catered lunches + snacks & drinks
","['r', 'python']","['statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'python', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'data', 'pipelin']"
DS,"There are multiple positions under this posting located in Columbus, Ohio, and Dayton, Ohio.
Work will support Wright-Patterson AFB in Dayton, Ohio.
This position is contingent on award of contract and candidates are expected to start within 30 days of contract award.
JOB SUMMARY
The selected candidate(s) will serve as a member of a team of highly qualified and motivated individuals supporting timely and mission-critical effort related to Publicly Available Information/Open Source (PAI/OS) data on foreign developments in current and future weapons systems, subsystems, and technologies impacting air, space, and cyberspace, missiles, and other new initiatives.
The candidate will work with a team of cleared linguists, scientists, intelligence analysts, engineers, and other relevant subject matter experts for collection, organization, and analysis.
The position will be responsible for developing and maintaining data processing and analysis solutions, which will aid in parsing and formatting large data sets, advanced searching and collection, natural language processing (NLP), triaging, and language translation for Scientific & Technical (S&T) open source information.
This will include direct collaboration with team members to maximize collection and interpretation efforts for a wide variety of data aligned with mission requirements.
The candidate will also be responsible for data visualization, web scraping technologies, digital libraries and databases, appropriate algorithms, and similar tasks in support of the project.
S/he will provide direct input to finished products in the form of visualizations, datasets, and recommendations for further collection and analysis, among other duties.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Provides data science solutions for digital library development, human language translations, optical character recognition, and technical analysis of foreign language materials and technologies.
Supports data science solutions to integrate, ingest, reformat, and transform PAI data.
Catalogs and scans translated material to identify data of interest based on specific requests.
Develops and maintains data collection solutions for PAI/OS information, including web scrapers and technologies for sensitive searching.
Works with a multi-disciplinary team to leverage data science and NLP tools to collect, organize, and analyze diverse science and technology information from multiple sources.
Uses data visualization techniques to provide insights on large data sets and input to finished reports.
Builds and maintains databases in support of analyst and subject matter expert use.
Uses NLP tools to support language translation and science and technology assessments.
Must be able to work independently with some oversight and function effectively as part of a team in a joint working environment.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science, or similar technical field.
At least 0-5 years of experience as a data scientist, statistician, applied mathematician, or equivalent to fulfill the job requirements.
Proficiency in a high-level programming language, i.e.
Python, R, Perl.
Experience working in U.S. national security, e.g.
intelligence community, military, joint operations, or related government contracting.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Master’s degree in the above areas.
Experience with shell scripting (bash, ksh, or equivalent).
At least 5-10 years of experience as a data scientist, statistician, applied mathematician, or equivalent to fulfill the job requirements.
Experience using NLP tools to collect, assemble, interpret, translate, and analyze open-source data, such as scientific publications, social media, and databases, and synthesizing knowledge into actionable intelligence.
Experience using NLP tools to support assessments and technical reporting on technologies and scientific topics, i.e.
technology readiness levels (TRL) and critical technology elements (CTE).
Subject matter expertise in and support of U.S. air- and space-related programs and technologies.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities, and skills required of staff members.
BENEFITS
","['r', 'perl', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['r', 'perl', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"There is no shortage of computational and statistical challenges to tackle.
In addition to telematics risk-scoring, the Data Science team works on core problems in pricing model development, reserving methodology, marketing, and strategic business forecasts.
This includes taking high-level business challenges, translating them into a concrete, quantitative framework, and shepherding solutions from R&D into production.
Data Scientists typically work on cross-functional teams, regularly engaging with the members of various departments including Product, Actuarial, Marketing, and Engineering.
Responsibilities:
Learning the required tools to get the job done, e.g.
Python, R, Spark, SQL, etc.
Building data processing pipelines to quickly iterate on research ideas and put them into production.
Effectively communicating insights from complex analyses.
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
PhD in a quantitative discipline and/or 3+ years of applying advanced quantitative techniques to problems in industry.
Strong demonstrable knowledge of topics such as statistical inference, numerical linear algebra, machine learning, and numerical optimization.
Exceptional communicator and storyteller.
Strong programming skills with experience using modern packages in R and Python.
Demonstrated experience building, validating, and applying statistical machine learning methods to real world problems.
If you are the kind of person that loves tackling big problems with a collaborative group of people until you find solutions, you belong here.
Fair.
Affordable.
Personal.
Easy.
Accessible.
Beyond.
","['r', 'sql', 'spark', 'python']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",3.0,"['r', 'sql', 'spark', 'python', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Battelles work is grounded in the belief that science, technology and a passion for excellence can make industries more competitive and the world a better place.
JOB SUMMARY
This position located in Columbus, OH.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Support model development activities concerning inhalation, ingestion, dermal, and radiation exposure hazards, response to CBRNE events, and decision support.
Perform rigorous mathematical and statistical analysis on large data sets.
Design and develop graphical user interfaces for mathematical models.
Develop code to support database and back-end server interface.
Test model code for accuracy and performance.
Collect, reduce, process, and present model input and output data.
Write reports of methods used and results obtained.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
0 to 2 years of experience in software development, mathematical modeling, statistical analysis, data science, or related field.
Education reflecting on of the following:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Computer Science Engineering with a minor, certificate, or relevant work experience in in a scientific or mathematical field (e.g., statistics, data analysis, biology, engineering).
Bachelor’s degree in Physics, Physics engineering, Actuarial science, Mathematics, Biology, or Engineering with a minor or certificate in computer science or relevant work experience requiring computer programming.
Must have a GPA of 3.0 or above.
Completed coursework in higher-level mathematics (e.g., calculus, differential equations, linear algebra).
Completed coursework in computer science and/or mathematical modeling.
Experience using object-oriented programming in C++, C#, Java, or python for significant classroom assignments, undergraduate research, or other work experience.
Ability to learn and understand new programing languages and mathematical concepts.
Must be a U.S. Citizen with the ability to obtain and maintain a Secret DoD clearance.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Coursework in statistics or probability (at least one formal class).
Coursework in engineering (e.g., transport phenomenon, reaction kinetics).
Significant programming experience in an object-oriented programming language (e.g., C++, C#, Java, or python.
Matlab, LabVIEW, Mathcad, Mathematica would not be considered relevant experience).
Experience with JavaScript/HTML/CSS.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members.
BENEFITS
Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.
","['excel', 'matlab', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']","['probabl', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'statist']",1.0,"['excel', 'matlab', 'python', 'javascript', 'c', 'java', 'probabl', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'statist']"
DS,"Columbus, Ohio Engineering - Full-Time
Seamless.AI delivers the world's best sales leads.
Maximize revenue, increase sales and acquire your total addressable market instantly using artificial intelligence.
Request a demo here
This person will have an opportunity to solve significant data problems that are positively impacting millions of business professionals and helping the world connect to opportunity and each other faster than ever before.
Responsibilities
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including such areas as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization, transformation, etc.
Collaborate with colleagues with engineering, QA and business backgrounds
Identify, communicate, and create innovative solutions for product design, processes, and business problems by using advanced machine learning, statistical modeling and optimization techniques.
Test and evaluate the quality of algorithms using statistical methods.
Lead internal tactical and strategic projects and reports project progress for quality, deliverables and cost to VP of Operations.
Mentor and guide other team members and colleagues in the domain area as owner of data science projects end-to-end.
Minimum Qualifications:
3 - 5+ years of professional (not academic) experience in data science and/or big data.
Expert knowledge of data science, predictive modeling, statistics and machine learning in general.
Deep experience with algorithms, statistics, and data analytics.
If you like to solve puzzles in your free time, this is the right opportunity for you!
Strategic thinker and problem solver to develop data science strategies as a principal data scientist.
Background in making impactful data decisions with hundreds of millions of data points quickly and efficiently.
Analytical and detail oriented with the ability to prioritize, execute and deliver projects accurately and on time.
Committed leader and team player who can work autonomously in data science responsibilities, be proactive, take ownership over the success of their projects, and work hard to support those around them.
Drive and leadership skills to help build and manage team of data analysts.
Must be comfortable with unstructured, fast moving and constantly evolving high growth environment.
Solid communication and writing skills to effectively communicate with business and data science leaders on project status, timeline, strategy, ideas and technical results.
Self-motivated and able to work efficiently with both on-location and remote teams.
M.S.
focused on Data Science or related field
Desired but not required:
Knowledge and experience in marketing channel optimization, customer behavior/journey modeling and prediction, product recommendation systems, online testing and etc.
is highly desired.
Background in handling multi-terabyte size datasets in the cloud.
Proficient in computer software development, web development and engineering.
Experience working with distributed systems and grid computing.
Data security knowledge, risk, compliance (ie.
GDPR, etc...).
Experience working in online products or SaaS based products.
Prior work at a fast paced early stage start up.
No Recruiters.
Pay, Perks & Such:
:)
Take the chance to contribute to an upbeat, fully engaged culture that's addicted to winning.
No Recruiters.
PI121259112
",['cloud'],"['risk', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['cloud', 'risk', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'optim', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"There are multiple positions under this posting located in Columbus, Ohio, and Dayton, Ohio.
Work will support Wright-Patterson AFB in Dayton, Ohio.
This position is contingent on award of contract and candidates are expected to start within 30 days of contract award.
JOB SUMMARY
The selected candidate(s) will serve as a member of a team of highly qualified and motivated individuals supporting timely and mission-critical effort related to Publicly Available Information/Open Source (PAI/OS) data on foreign developments in current and future weapons systems, subsystems, and technologies impacting air, space, and cyberspace, missiles, and other new initiatives.
The candidate will work with a team of cleared linguists, scientists, intelligence analysts, engineers, and other relevant subject matter experts for collection, organization, and analysis.
The position will be responsible for leading the development and maintenance of data processing and analysis solutions, which will aid in parsing and formatting large data sets, advanced searching and collection, natural language processing (NLP), triaging, and language translation for Scientific & Technical (S&T) open-source information.
This will include direct collaboration with team members to maximize collection and interpretation efforts for a wide variety of data aligned with mission requirements.
The candidate will also be responsible for data visualization, web scraping technologies, digital libraries and databases, appropriate algorithms, and similar tasks in support of the project.
S/he will provide direct input to finished products in the form of visualizations, datasets, and recommendations for further collection and analysis, among other duties.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Leads data science solutions for digital library development, human language translations, optical character recognition, and technical analysis of foreign language materials and technologies.
Leads the development of data science solutions to integrate, ingest, reformat, and transform PAI data.
Catalogs and scans translated material to identify data of interest based on specific requests.
Develops and maintains data collection solutions for PAI/OS information, including web scrapers and technologies for sensitive searching.
Works with a multi-disciplinary team to leverage data science and NLP tools to collect, organize, and analyze diverse science and technology information from multiple sources.
Uses data visualization techniques to provide insights on large data sets and input to finished reports.
Leads building and maintaining of databases in support of analyst and subject matter expert use.
Uses NLP tools to support language translation and science and technology assessments.
Must be able to oversee teams and lead tasking to deliver outcomes on time and effectively as part of a team in a joint working environment.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science, or similar technical field.
At least 5-10 years of experience as a data scientist, statistician, applied mathematician, or equivalent to fulfill the job requirements.
Proficiency with a high-level programming language, i.e.
Python, R, Perl.
Experience working in U.S. national security, e.g.
intelligence community, military, joint operations, or related government contracting.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Master’s degree in the above areas.
Experience with shell scripting (bash, ksh, or equivalent).
More than 10 years of experience as a data scientist, statistician, applied mathematician, or equivalent to fulfill the job requirements.
Experience using NLP tools to collect, assemble, interpret, translate, and analyze open-source data, such as scientific publications, social media, and databases, and synthesizing knowledge into actionable intelligence.
Experience using NLP tools to support assessments and technical reporting on technologies and scientific topics, i.e.
technology readiness levels (TRL) and critical technology elements (CTE).
Subject matter expertise in and support of U.S. air- and space-related programs and technologies.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities, and skills required of staff members.
BENEFITS
","['r', 'perl', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['r', 'perl', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'nlp', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Responsibilities
Responsible for the end-to-end architecture of the Data Science and Natural Language Processing (NLP) solution, including its assembly and integration into the client’s IT architecture.
Responsible for the management and mitigation of technical risks, ensuring that the solution services can be realistically delivered by the underlying technology components.
The ideal candidate should be experienced in architecting highly scalable end-to-end data science platforms.
Required Skills
Experience working with senior decision-makers
Strong communication/interpersonal skills
Proven analytical background
Advanced Excel skills
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'nlp', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'nlp', 'nlp', 'commun']"
DS,"Data scientists are passionate about data and applying analytical methods while simultaneously understanding the business context in order to arrive at a solution.
Data scientists add business value by leveraging vast quantities of data and building accurate mathematical models.
Data scientists are skilled in putting well-defined parameters around potentially ambiguous problems, evaluating success based on business-important criteria, and applying modern artificial intelligence and machine learning techniques to large datasets to solve complex business problems.
Duties:
Develop, plan, and execute analytical projects as an individual contributor and in teams
Synthesize analytical findings for consumption by senior business executives
Participate in multiple, assigned research projects with minimal supervision and within time and budget constraints
Organize data from many different types of sources and at significantly varying scales for subsequent analysis
Critically evaluate data for quality measures such as completeness, accuracy, and applicability, applying understanding of relevant research area nomenclature
Solve unusual problems using a combination of appropriate statistics, machine learning, and computational methods
Create technical reports and presentations, describing results with visualization in a manner that the client can understand
Perform other duties as assigned
Qualifications:
Master's Degree in Statistics, Economics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research, Physics, Data Science fields and 0-2 years’ experience OR Bachelor's with 2-5 years’ experience.
Experience across a broad range of modern data science and analytics tools (e.g., SQL, Hive, Hadoop, Spark, Python, R)
Experienced with data cleansing, reconciliation, conversion, and validation
Expert knowledge in quantitative methods for business and advanced data science
Proven track record of various artificial intelligence and machine learning techniques to create models that drive significant business results
Demonstrated analytical, multi-tasking, problem solving, organizational, and planning skills
Ability to interpret reports, analyze trends and provide insights
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to communicate complicated statistical analytical concepts to business stakeholders in a simplified, comprehendible manner.
Trusted advisor and thought leader on data and analytical techniques
Collaborative team player: Selfless, places team above self.
Embraces feedback and shares knowledge with team.
Establish and manage relationships with clients and internal partners
Plan and carry out appropriate professional self-development activities
Ability to travel as required
Desired, but not required:
PhD in Statistics, Economics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research, Physics, Data Science fields
Experience with Natural Language Processing
Knowledge and experience in chemistry, drug discovery/development, or medical related industry
Conducting analyses using cloud platforms
Experience delivering analytics in a consulting role
EEO/Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran.
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'econom', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'nlp', 'econom', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"Why Choose A Career with Designer Brands?
Shared commitment to creating a culture fueled by engagement, excitement, optimism and fun
Dedicated to giving back and community involvement
About Designer Brands:
Designer Brands Inc. is one of North America’s largest designers, producers and retailers of footwear and accessories.
Designer Brands designs and produces footwear and accessories through Camuto Group, a leading manufacturer selling in more than 5,400 doors worldwide.
Job Segment:
Database, Computer Science, Developer, Java, Marketing, Technology
",['java'],"['optim', 'commun', 'segment']",999.0,"['java', 'optim', 'commun', 'segment']"
DS,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
In this role, you will work as a Data Scientist and problem solver.
You will be a part of a small team where you will switch assignments and projects in a disciplined and fast-paced environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Be innovative and entrepreneurial to work within a ""start-up like"" environment.
Be an advisor to the data science team and provide expertise and direction on complex analytical modeling problems
Work with cross-functional teams to help them implement solutions
Research methods to improve statistical inferences of variables across models
Solve quantitative problems
Consult on industry standard solutions as well as new innovative techniques
",[None],"['statist', 'research', 'data']",999.0,"['statist', 'research', 'data']"
DS,"JOB SUMMARY
Someone in this role is expected to:
Perform sophisticated modeling and analyses of datasets in order to answer specific research questions
Determine appropriate methods, fill in technical details, identify problems and implement solutions, and develop new methods if necessary
Oversee others in extracting data from existing databases or literature and prepare data for data analysis using statistical and machine learning methods
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Participate in multiple, assigned research projects with minimal supervision and within time and budget constraints
Organize data from many different types of sources and at significantly varying scales for subsequent analysis
Critically evaluate data for quality measures such as completeness, accuracy, and applicability, applying understanding of relevant research area nomenclature
Solve unusual problems using a combination of appropriate statistics, machine learning, and computational methods
Create technical reports and presentations, describing results with tables, graphs, and software tools in a manner that the client can understand
Build relationships with internal and external clients
Support business development efforts led by others
Plan and carry out appropriate professional self-development activities
Perform other duties as assigned
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Master's Degree in Statistics, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Computer Science, or Electrical Engineering (with a data analysis focus) or relevant related field OR Bachelor's with at least 2+ years’ experience.
Expertise in manipulating and analyzing data (e.g., regression, classification, machine learning methods, mixed and generalized linear models, time series analysis, longitudinal methods, Bayesian methods).
Programming experience in R, Python, and/or Matlab.
Strong analytical, multi-tasking, problem solving, organizational, and planning skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Attention to detail and adaptability.
Ability to obtain and maintain a government security clearance or current active clearance.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Experience with other statistical languages, such as Stata or SAS
Experience with C, C++, C#, Java, or similar programming languages
Demonstrated machine learning experience
Experience either as an intern, a research assistant, or an applied project consultant, demonstrating capabilities in data analysis and programming.
Ability to write and understand scientific algorithms
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members.
BENEFITS
Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.
","['excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'c', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun']"
DS,"· Working closely with the technology and learning teams, theData Scientist will be responsible for the following:
· Creating infrastructure for thedelivery team; Maintain a working knowledge of data mining and visualizationbest practices; Work in coordination with the team for better and quickresults;
· Being able to develop or program databases; Having theability to query databases and perform statistical analysis; Analyze the dataavailable and provide the relevant output;
· Collaborate with engineering colleagues to define the datamodeling goals for designated project areas;
· Having a good understanding of design and architectureprinciples; Understand the importance of the system development and help ingetting it implemented;
· Have good time management skills and should be able to meetthe expected deliverables;
· Being able to create examples, prototypes, demonstrations tohelp management better understand the work;
· Capacity to motivate and train junior scientists and offercounsel to peers.
Being able to work autonomously;
Basic Qualifications:
Passion, commitment, resourcefulness, and a drive to continuelearning are essential prerequisites.
For this role, were also looking for someonewho meets the following criteria:
· PhD/ Master's Degree in Statistics,Mathematics, Computer Science, or equivalent; 5+ years of data science/miningexperience;
· Excellent knowledge of at least twocoding languages, e.g.
Python, Java, Scala, R Language, SQL, ETL Tools, Perland Pig;
· Should have worked on different toolslike Java, SQL, Python, etc.
; Good experience with SQL, Linux shell scripts,Perl, and AWK;
· Domain knowledge in at least twoindustries; Minimum five years of experience in customer-facing activities;
· Overall knowledge of BusinessIntelligence; in particular, data modeling, ETL, and reporting tools;
· Extensive hands-on experience workingwith very large data sets, including statistical analyses, data visualization,data mining, and data cleansing/transformation;
","['python', 'linux', 'scala', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'perl', 'java']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'visual', 'statist', 'data modeling']",2.0,"['python', 'linux', 'scala', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'perl', 'java', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'visual', 'statist', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Core Job Responsibilities for the Data Scientist/Programmer, Sr. Analyst:
Collaborate with cross functional and non-technical partners to evaluate opportunities to utilize data analytics to maximize marketing and sales success
Leverage machine learning to help create applications that solve eCommerce business problems
Create powerful business intelligence tools to provide stakeholders with easily consumable, actionable information/insights
Develop algorithms that help to automatically identify critical business issues
Develop and gain alignment on best visualization content that is in line with industry best practices and ease of user adoption to convey the story inside the data
Complete ad-hoc requests to support tactical and strategic business needs
Communicate analysis and findings clearly to senior leaders and non-technical audiences
Basic Qualifications
2 to 10 years experience in data science, machine learning, computer science, and/or analytics
Significant experience in at least one of the following programming languages: R, C#, Python, SQL
Experience with data visualization tools such as PowerBI or Tableau
Excellent communication skills, both oral and written, and the ability to communicate technical analysis and findings clearly to senior leaders and non-technical audiences
BS in Business Analytics, Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or related field
Preferred Qualifications
MS degree in Business Analytics, Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or related field
Some familiarity with JavaScript, CSS, HTML, and C#
Experience with Machine Learning platforms such as Amazon SageMaker, Google Cloud AI, etc.
Familiarity with Selenium or any other web-based automation tool
Columbus OH
","['excel', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'google cloud', 'javascript', 'c', 'cloud']","['machine learning', 'data', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'sagemak', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'google cloud', 'javascript', 'c', 'cloud', 'machine learning', 'data', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The team provides expertise in big data, business intelligence, web analytics, program analysis and optimization of various media types (paid, owned & earned) and marketing channels (video, display, search, affiliate, mobile, email and social).
Must be able to think outside the box to implement creative solutions that solve business problems.Proven ability to work in a fast paced environment, meet deadlines.
Must be detail oriented, organized, and perform at high standardsBachelor's degree in a quantitative or related field.
",[None],"['optim', 'data', 'big data', 'busi']",1.0,"['optim', 'data', 'big data', 'busi']"
DS,"Enable the legal and ethical use of data.
But true expertise requires constant change - to always learn and to always adapt.
APPLIED DATA TEAM
Team members will often support both pre-sales and customer success efforts to ensure customers derive value from their siloed data, to get buy-in from analytical end users, and to gather feedback to consider for future development.
YOUR ROLE
They will be a hybrid architect and practitioner, able to pivot from high level technical architecture discussions to prescribing the details required for ground level execution.
This is a position for a data scientist who enjoys jumping into new problem sets and technologies, interacting with customers, conducting training, and backing every insight with data.
A primary focus will be in developing design patterns of analytics architecture on various cloud platforms, such as Amazon Web Services and Microsoft Azure.
You will:
- Work on high impact projects that improve data availability and quality, and provide reliable access to data for the rest of the business
- Be the first to master new features of the product, whether that’s a new data classification service, anonymization technique or a database technology integration
- Build relationships across Sales, Customer Success and Product teams to communicate best practices and potential improvements
The ideal candidate will be able to dive into a new problem set quickly and architect modern solutions to solve it.
Strong written and verbal communication skills are required.
- Have excellent communication skills and can effectively discuss technical issues with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
- Have extensive experience in data processing and analysis, preferably in an enterprise setting
- Are outstanding problem solvers
TECHNOLOGIES YOU'LL USE
- Multiple business intelligence tools, including Tableau, Looker and Power BI
- Python, SQL & Spark
- Kubernetes, Docker, & AWS Infrastructure
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment.
","['kubernet', 'spark', 'power bi', 'aw', 'looker', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'amazon web services', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'cloud']","['classif', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['kubernet', 'spark', 'powerbi', 'aw', 'looker', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'azur', 'docker', 'cloud', 'classif', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
DS,"*Data Scientist Sr.
Customers can choose how and where they want to bank: 5,200 branches, 16,000 ATMs, mobile, online and by phone.
For more information, go to Chase.com.
The team encompasses a variety of Data & Analytics disciplines, from data governance and data strategy/partnerships to reporting, data science and machine learning, and are actively engaged in ensuring impact at the front-line and the customer through Sales and Marketing transformation.
The team also offers significant learning and mobility opportunities for career development and future growth.
The MLAI Garage team, part of CCB Data and Analytics team, builds best in class ML and AI solutions for CCB Operations in an Agile environment.
**Position Overview**The role is a unique opportunity for an experienced practitioner in data science and analytics.
The team is responsible for data analysis supporting the MLAI garages, and is fully embedded with product teams following an Agile delivery methodology.
",[None],"['machine learning', 'data']",999.0,"['machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"Title: Data Science
Duration: 11+ months with extension possible
Basic Qualifications
MS. in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Statistics, or Mathematics
4 years of hands on working with data , 2+ years of predictive modeling, machine learning and data science experience
2 / 2 + years of hands on R Coding involving focused on DS packages –
Proficiency in statistical and other tools/languages - R, S-plus, SAS, STATA, Python, Java, Scala
Preferred Skills:
Coding experience with R/ SAS/ open source programming platforms
Thank You,
Shibu Singha
Assistant Manager - Recruitment
3155 North Point Pkwy Bldg.
G
Suite 100, Alpharetta GA 30005
Shibu.S@avacend.com
Required Skills
Data Science, Predictive Modeling, Scala,
R, S-plus, SAS, STATA, Python, Java, Scala
Reliability models, Markov Models, Stochastic models, Bayesian Modeling, Classification Models, Cluster Analysis, Neural Network, Non-parametric Methods, Multivariate Statistics
Required Experience
Columbus, US-OH
","['scala', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java']","['classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'neural network', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']",999.0,"['scala', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'java', 'classif', 'data', 'cluster', 'predict', 'nn', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'machine learning']"
DS,"As the steward of U.S. economic and financial systems, Treasury is a major and influential leader in today's global economy.
Come Join the Department of the Treasury and Invest in Tomorrow.
See Other Information for Locations
Positions are to be filled in the Large Business & International (LB&I), Data Solutions division.
Eight (8) positions are to be filled in any of the following locations:
Birmingham, AL
Fayetteville, AR
Little Rock, AR
Phoenix, AZ
El Monte, CA
Glendale, CA
Laguna Niguel, CA
Los Angeles, CA
Long Beach, CA
Oakland, CA
Sacramento, CA
San Diego, CA
San Francisco, CA
San Jose, CA
Santa Ana, CA
Lakewood, CO
Hartford, CT
New Haven, CT
Norwalk, CT
Washington, DC
Newark, DE
Miami, FL
Ft. Myers, FL
Jacksonville, FL
Maitland, FL
Plantation, FL
Tampa, FL
West Palm Beach, FL
Atlanta, GA
Honolulu, HI
Des Moines, IA
Chicago, IL
Downers Grove, IL
Schiller Park, IL
Springfield, IL
Indianapolis, IN
Wichita, KS
Louisville, KY
New Orleans, LA
Boston, MA
Brockton, MA
Stoneham, MA
Southborough, MA
Baltimore, MD
Lanham-Seabrook, MD
Rockville, MD
Ann Arbor, MI
Clinton Township, MI
Detroit, MI
Farmington Hills, MI
Flint, MI
Grand Rapids, MI
Pontiac, MI
Bloomington, MN
Chesterfield, MO
Lee's Summit, MO
Charlotte, NC
Greensboro, NC
Raleigh, NC
Omaha, NE
Edison, NJ
Iselin, NJ
Mountainside, NJ
Paterson, NJ
Las Vegas, NV
Albany, NY
Bethpage, NY
Buffalo, NY
New York, NY
Rochester, NY
Cincinnati, OH
Columbus, OH
Independence, OH
Oklahoma City, OK
Tulsa, OK
Portland, OR
Philadelphia, PA
Pittsburgh, PA
King Of Prussia, PA
Guaynabo, PR
Warwick, RI
Franklin, TN
Memphis, TN
Nashville, TN
Austin, TX
Farmers Branch, TX
Fort Worth, TX
Houston, TX
San Antonio, TX
Ogden, UT
Salt Lake City, UT
Norfolk, VA
Richmond, VA
Vienna, VA
Seattle, WA
Milwaukee, WI
Waukesha, WI
Kearneysville, WV
Martinsburg, WV
WHAT DOES A DATA SCIENTIST DO?
The Data Scientist utilizes advanced analytical, statistical, and computer programming skills to develop data- driven solutions to difficult business challenges.
This is accomplished by utilizing a wide range of technical competencies such as statistics and machine learning, coding languages, data wrangling, and reporting and visualization techniques.
As a Data Scientist, you will:
Serve as a technical expert with responsibility for the initiation, planning, implementation, controlling, modifying and executing of all or part of an entire project, including such tasks as formulation of workload estimates for program segments, specification of the methodology to be used, preparation of appropriate specifications and procedures, and review of computer systems specifications and materials and instructions needed for assuring the adequacy of the project’s design and objectives.
Explore novel methods of retrieving data and develop innovative recommendations to management and senior leadership as a means for making data driven decisions such as modification of processes and policies.
Review, evaluate, validate, and document the results of the findings.
Assist the supervisor in determining the scope, goals and schedules for future programs in the Office.
Collaborate with business or technology partners to understand business needs, identify opportunities, and develop and implement analytical solutions.
Identify and assess relevant data sources’ validity and reliability to meet project needs.
Collate, clean, transform, analyze, and integrate structured and unstructured data from various sources in preparation for analysis.
Develop data product solutions to improve customer experiences, anomaly detection, and business outcomes.
Develop proofs of concept or demonstrations to evaluate feasibility of project solutions and recommend visualization strategies.
Document project work and review deliverables for validity, reliability and timeliness.
Communicate analytic solutions to technical and non-technical stakeholders, including during executive- level and/or cross-agency meetings, in a clear and effective manner using oral and written communications.
Maintain knowledge of state-of-the-art innovations in data science from both academic and industry sources and identify opportunities for implementation.
Lead or participate in statistical projects or studies in survey sampling (design and estimation), modeling, or statistical research.
Act as a troubleshooter in resolving bottlenecks at any step in a project by identifying and proposing solutions; this may include coordination with other project team members or stakeholders to mitigate issues.
#LI-POST
You must meet the following requirements by the closing date of this announcement
BASIC QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:
GS-1530 Statistician All Grades:
You must have a Bachelor's degree that included 15 semester hours in statistics (or in mathematics and statistics, provided at least 6 semester hours were in statistics), and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc.
Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing.
OR
Combination of education and experience -- courses as shown above, plus appropriate experience or additional education.
The experience should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as (a) sampling, (b) collecting, computing, and analyzing statistical data, and (c) applying statistical techniques such as measurement of central tendency, dispersion, skewness, sampling error, simple and multiple correlation, analysis of variance, and tests of significance.
Specialized experience for this position includes all of the following:
Experience applying project management principles on a data science project
Experience planning and executing a variety of data science and/or analytics projects.
Experience using data mining process models (such as CRISP-DM, SEMMA, etc.,) to design and execute data science project.
Experience preparing and analyzing structured and unstructured datasets to explorations and evaluating data science centric models.
Experience working with multiple data types and formats as a part of a data science project.
Experience applying a range of analytic approaches, including (but not limited to) machine learning, text analytics, and natural language processing; graph theory, link analysis and optimization models; complex adaptive systems; and/or deep learning neural networks that are part of the exploration.
Experience coding in various programming languages (such as R, Python, SQL, or JAVA) to conduct various phases of data science projects.
Experience creating and querying different datastores and architectures (such as Sybase, Oracle, and open-source databases) to work with various types of data as part of the data science project.
Experience using tools for data visualization (graphs, tables, charts, etc.,) and end-user business intelligence.
One year of experience refers to full-time work; part-time work is considered on a prorated basis.
-To ensure full credit for your work experience, please indicate dates of employment by month/year, and indicate number of hours worked per week, on your resume.
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'natural language processing', 'neural network', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'correl', 'analyz', 'statist', 'deep learning', 'text analytics', 'machine learning', 'data', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment', 'clean', 'graph', 'optim', 'research', 'econom', 'data mining', 'nlp', 'nn', 'busi', 'anomali', 'recommend']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Interact with client data science teams to explore promising areas for quantum
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Contribute best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Support practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
2+ years of data engineering and data science experience
1+ year of consulting experience within specific industries
Familiarity with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Business Analyst/Data Scientist Manager
Will be filled as a senior analyst or manager dependent on skills and experience of the selected candidate.
CORE JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Use analytic data techniques and statistical methods related to business analysis, data mining, design of experiments, and modeling, etc.
to understand the business and recommend actions for improvements.
Collaborate with Analytics, Marketing, Sales, Marketing Research, Finance, and Contract Operations to identify and evaluate opportunities to utilize data analytics to maximize marketing and sales success.
Analyze monthly and quarterly sales, explain variance to market, sales and share forecasts, and present performance update to leadership
Develop and gain alignment on best visualization content that is in line with industry best practices and ease of user adoption to convey the story inside the data
Build dashboards and reports for business stakeholders and to support analytic tools
Complete ad-hoc requests to support tactical and strategic business needs
Communicate analysis and findings clearly to senior leaders and non-technical audiences
Manage monthly Institutional data stream and third-party relationships with vendors
Periodically work evenings and weekends to complete time-sensitive assignments
Basic Qualifications
2 to 10 years experience in data mining, forecasting, or other analytics
Experience with data visualization tools such as PowerBI or Tableau
Experience with statistical tools such as Excel Stat, SAS, R or Python
Excellent communication skills, both oral and written, and the ability to communicate technical analysis and findings clearly to senior leaders and non-technical audiences
BS in Business Analytics, Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or related field
Preferred Qualifications
MS degree in Business Analytics, Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or related field
Experience using SAS Enterprise Guide
Experience in time series and regression forecasting
Experience in Institutional Healthcare analytics
Experience with retail analytics, Nielsen, and IRI
Columbus OH
","['excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'sa']","['regress', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'sa', 'regress', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'time series', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This position is located in Columbus, OH.
JOB SUMMARY
Someone in this role is expected to:
Work as part of a cross-disciplinary team to solve research problems using advanced machine learning and statistical techniques
Lead sophisticated modeling and analysis efforts in order to answer specific research questions
Determine appropriate methods, fill in technical details, identify problems and implement solutions, and develop new methods if necessary
Advanced Analytics supports government, academic and private industry clients in the areas of healthcare, national defense, environmental, transportation, and energy.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Participate in multiple, assigned research projects with minimal supervision and within time and budget constraints
Critically evaluate data for quality measures such as completeness, accuracy, and applicability, applying understanding of relevant research area nomenclature
Solve unusual problems using a combination of appropriate statistics, machine learning, and computational methods
Lead or assist in producing publications, technical reports and presentations, describing results with tables, graphs, and software tools in a manner that the client can understand
Work as part of a cross-disciplinary team to develop research hypotheses and develop funding proposals around these ideas
Build relationships with internal and external clients
Support business development efforts led by others
Plan and carry out appropriate professional self-development activities
Perform other duties as assigned
May present research results to clients and in public forums.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
PhD in Statistics, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Neuroscience or Biomedical Engineering with a data analysis / machine learning focus
Experience applying machine learning methods to real-world datasets
Expertise in manipulating and analyzing data (e.g., regression, classification, deep learning, machine learning methods, mixed and generalized linear models, time series analysis, longitudinal methods, Bayesian methods)
Deep Programming experience in at least one of Python, R and/or Matlab
Strong analytical, multi-tasking, problem solving, organizational, and planning skills
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Attention to detail and adaptability
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Experience modeling physiological datasets (e.g.
Brain-computer interface, Electromyography etc.)
Publication record in machine learning, AI or neurotechnology
Experience writing grants or other funding proposals
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members.
BENEFITS
Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.
","['r', 'excel', 'matlab', 'python']","['regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'healthcar']",3.0,"['r', 'excel', 'matlab', 'python', 'regress', 'deep learning', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'statist', 'bayesian', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"This individual will also be responsible for customer analytics and modeling to accelerate personalization for DSWs loyalty customers.
The role will synthesize business data into powerful models and insights to drive decisions which propel the business forward.
to drive recommended content and channel communications to the customer* Develops deep-dive analytics to uncover key insights of customers; unlocks competitive advantages for the business* Collaborates directly with key business partners and leaders to solve business problems or knowledge gaps and identify analytical opportunities to drive innovative decision making* Extracts key insights from analytical projects into a format easily understood by business partners and leaders, both technical and non-technical; presents insights and recommendations to senior leadership* Accesses, combines, aggregates, and cleans data sets from multiple key sources (RDBMS, Big Data Storage, Web, etc.)
using a variety of programming languages, for use in analytical projects* Researches current and emerging techniques in analytics (machine learning, deep learning, AI) and applies them to solve day to day business challenges (daily demand forecast, pattern of redemption, propensity modeling, etc.
)* Understands the broader Marketing and Retail landscapes to proactively identify analytical opportunities to impact the business* Applies the Scientific Method (design of experiments) to all analytical projects* Participates in peer review process to ensure accuracy and data integrity are present at levels of analytical projects Required Skills and Competencies:* Excellent verbal communication skills for all audiences, both technical and non-technical* Ability to create visualizations, summaries, and present complex analytical techniques, data, and recommendations in simple business speak* Ability to effectively prioritize and manage multiple projects simultaneously* Ability to determine problem statements, requirements, and project plans from non-technical business partners* Detail-oriented with strong organizational and project management skills* Comfortable working with cross-functional teams of varying level (peers & superiors) and subject areas Experience:* Experience developing machine learning and statistical models from end to end as a full stack developer* Experience with R or Python for statistical modeling and other machine learning applications* Experience with SQL and NoSQL database environments and is adept at aggregating and combining large, complex data sets* Proven track record of various machine learning techniques to create models that drive significant business results, with deep expertise in at least three leading methods* Experience with relevant analytical metrics to evaluate modeling projects using historical test sets and live in-market tests* Experience using command line to interact with operating systems Education:* Degree in Analytics or other STEM field (Data Analytics, Data Science, Computer Science, Data Engineering, Applied Mathematics)* Masters Degree with 4 years of experience* PhD with 2 years of experience preferred Preferred Qualifications:* High degree of intellectual curiosity and desire to learn new techniques* Experience with advanced state of the art techniques like deep learning, text mining, and image recognition (TensorFlow, Keras, SciKitLearn, etc.
)* Experience with Google Cloud Platform (BigQuery, Compute Engine, DataLab, ML Engine, etc)* Knowledge of any current public cloud offering (Azure, Google, AWS, etc.
)* Experience with dashboard design and data visualization tools (MicroStrategy, Tableau, R Shiny, etc.
)* Experience with at least one scripting language (Python, R, Java, etc.)
","['nosql', 'kera', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'shini', 'scikitlearn', 'cloud', 'python', 'azur', 'java']","['deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['nosql', 'kera', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'tensorflow', 'shini', 'scikitlearn', 'cloud', 'python', 'azur', 'java', 'deep learning', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"Healthcare Data Analytics PhD / Sr. Data Scientist
PhD candidates with specific healthcare experience or a Masters with 5 years healthcare experienced folks only please.
This is a Direct Hire/Full Time Employee salaried opportunity in Columbus, Ohio.
NO third parties and NO corp-to-corp please.
EAD/OPT and H1B candidates eligible!
Do you consider yourself a Data Scientist?
Do you have a PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Bio-stats, Computer Science, or something comparable?
Do you love statistics and the manipulation of data?
Are you interested in true Big Data environments?
Do you have a solid experience with ""R"" or Python development background?
Are you experienced with enterprise level process and procedures?
This opportunity with one of Columbus, Ohio best known enterprises may be a great option for you to consider.
A recent expansion in their practice has caused a need for ""A"" players.
Is this you?
You will be working on a truly collaborative team.
Extremely friendly and employee-centric atmosphere
Lots of room for growth, development, educational opportunities
New development
SAS/SPSS, etc.)
Must have Clinical/Research/Academic -centric current experience Not interested in business (financial services/retail/manufacturing minded analysts) focused professionals.
Ph.D or Masters only.
Heavy research, clinical, or academia projects will be considered.
Heavy on statistical modeling, R, python and statistical software package (ex.SAS/SPSS, etc.)
experience
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in statistical modeling (the more the better!)
PhD degrees highly preferred but experience trumps all!
(Statistics and/or Computer Science areas are best)
SQL and pl/sql
R , python, and something similar to MATLAB, SAS experience
Machine Learning exposure
Object oriented programming language knowledge/experience (Java/Python)
Ability to work independently
Strong problem-solving skills
Willingness to work with new technologies
Next steps: Call me to discuss your background and more importantly, your future goals!
Oh, and by the way....
Please send your resumes to:
Tom Gaebelein
(614) 246-8512 *OR* (440) 627-6925 x125
tom@emeraldresourcegroup.com
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"PhD or Senior Data Scientist - - Healthcare Data Analytics
PhD candidates with specific healthcare experience or a Masters
with 5 years healthcare experienced folks only please.
This is a Direct Hire/Full Time Employee salaried opportunity in
Columbus, Ohio.
NO third parties and NO corp-to-corp please.
EAD/OPT and H1B candidates eligible!
Do you consider yourself a Data Scientist?
Do you have a PhD in
Statistics, Mathematics, Bio-stats, Computer Science, or
something comparable?
Do you love statistics and the manipulation
of data?
Are you interested in true Big Data environments?
Do you
have a solid experience with ""R"" or Python development
background?
Are you experienced with enterprise level process and
procedures?
This opportunity with one of Columbus, Ohio best
known enterprises may be a great option for you to consider.
A
recent expansion in their practice has caused a need for ""A""
players.
Is this you?
You will be working on a truly collaborative team.
Extremely friendly and employee-centric atmosphere
Lots of room for growth, development, educational
opportunities
New development
Always use the latest / emerging technologies "" Work/Life balance
Vision insurance "" Paid Time Off "" Paid holidays Primary Role:
statistical and machine learning methods applied to predictive
analytics problems in the healthcare space ""R"", SQL, and
statistical software experience (ex.
SAS/SPSS, etc.)
Must have
Clinical/Research/Academic -centric current experience Not
interested in business (financial services/retail/manufacturing
minded analysts) focused professionals.
Ph.D or Masters only.
Heavy research, clinical, or academia projects will be
considered.
Heavy on statistical modeling, R, python and statistical software
package (ex.SAS/SPSS, etc.)
experience
Requirements:
5+ years of experience in statistical modeling (the more the
better!)
PhD degrees highly preferred but experience trumps all!
(Statistics and/or Computer Science areas are best)
SQL and pl/sql
R , python, and something similar to MATLAB, SAS experience
Machine Learning exposure
Object oriented programming language knowledge/experience
(Java/Python)
Ability to work independently
Strong problem-solving skills
Willingness to work with new technologies
Next steps: Call me to discuss your background and more
importantly, your future goals!
Oh, and by the way....
Please send your resumes to:
Tom Gaebelein
(614) 246-8512 *OR* (440) 627-6925 x125
tom@emeraldresourcegroup.com
","['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"*Data Scientist Sr.
Customers can choose how and where they want to bank: 5,200 branches, 16,000 ATMs, mobile, online and by phone.
For more information, go to Chase.com.
The team encompasses a variety of Data & Analytics disciplines, from data governance and data strategy/partnerships to reporting, data science and machine learning, and are actively engaged in ensuring impact at the front-line and the customer through Sales and Marketing transformation.
The MLAI Garage team, part of CCB Data and Analytics team, builds best in class ML and AI solutions for CCB Operations in an Agile environment.
**Position Overview**The role is a unique opportunity for an experienced practitioner in data science and analytics.
The team is responsible for data analysis supporting the MLAI garages, and is fully embedded with product teams following an Agile delivery methodology.
",[None],"['machine learning', 'data']",999.0,"['machine learning', 'data']"
DS,"NLP Data Scientist, PhD.
entirety.
Please call if you have questions regarding the
qualifications!
NLP (Natural Language Processing) Data Scientist in Healthcare
This is a Direct Hire/FTE salaried opportunity in Columbus, Ohio.
PhD candidates with specific healthcare experience /
projects OR a Masters (senior level DS) with 3 years healthcare
experience ONLY
Degree should be in Computer Science, Statistics, Biostatistics,
or something similar.
EAD/OPT and H1B candidates eligible!
Do you consider yourself a Data Scientist?
Do you have a PhD in
Statistics, Mathematics, Biostats, Computer Science, or
something comparable?
If you have a Master's degree with 3 years
current Data Science experience focused on NLP, you can also be
considered.
Do you have current or recent experience working in
NLP (Natural Language Processing)?
Do you love statistics and
the manipulation of data?
Are you interested in true Big Data
environments?
Do you have a solid experience with ""R"" or Python
development background?
Are you experienced with enterprise level
process and procedures?
This opportunity with one of Columbus,
Ohio best known enterprises may be a great option for you to
consider.
A recent expansion in their practice has caused a need
for ""A"" players.
Is this you?
You will be working on a truly collaborative team with other Data
Scientists that have different levels of experience and
specialization.
Mentorship, ownership, and visibility are all
attributes that can be yours to experience!!!
-Extremely friendly and employee-centric atmosphere
-Lots of room for growth, development and educational
opportunities
-New development
-Always use the latest / emerging technologies
-Work/Life balance (work from home at least 2 days per week)
-Company paid Pension / Health insurance / Dental insurance /
Vision insurance /Paid Time Off /Paid holidays
Primary Role:
-Data Science focused on NLP (Natural Language Processing)
projects
-Developing and administering statistical and machine learning
methods applied to predictive analytics problems in the
healthcare space.
-""R"", SQL, and statistical software development (ex.
SAS/SPSS,
etc.)
-Must have Clinical/Research/Academic -centric current experience
-Ph.D or Masters ONLY (heavy research, clinical, or academia
projects will be considered)
-Heavy on statistical modeling, R, python and statistical
software package (ex.SAS/SPSS, etc.)
experience
Requirements for the Data Scientist:
-3+ years of experience in statistical modeling (the more the
better!)
-
-PhD candidates with specific healthcare experience /
projects OR a Masters (senior level DS) with 3 years healthcare
experience ONLY (Statistics and/or Computer Science areas are
best)
-SQL and/or pl/sql
-R, python,
-NLP (Natural Language Processing) and Machine Learning algorithm
development
-Object oriented programming language knowledge/experience
(Java/Python)
Next steps: Call me to discuss your background and more
importantly, your future goals!
Oh, and by the way....
Please send your resume and call me (the
best candidates always do both).
Tom Gaebelein
440.627.6925 / tom@emeraldresourcegroup.com
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'biostatist', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'nlp', 'biostatist', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within public sector industries, including government, life sciences and healthcare.
Responsibilities include:
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
2+ years of experience in the pharma or healthcare industry, with knowledge of industry trends, R&D areas, and computationally intensive processes (e.g.
drug design)
Familiarity with Qiskit
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['r', 'excel']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['r', 'excel', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"New Challenge: New Team, New Office!
Have you ever thought about pipelines and integrity?
Why should pipelines need machine learning?
The answer is simple: Pipeline inspections generate a lot of sensor data (e.g.
from ultrasonic sensors) which have to be analyzed using state of the art computer vision techniques.
Think of it like doing healthcare just for pipelines.
Interested?
Then learn more about industrial machine learning applications and data analysis for pipeline data in a start-up environment.
Be part of a new team.
Shape the team and your future.
Enjoy working in a multi-cultural and multi-national team.
Data Engineers for Industrial Image Data
Data Scientists for Industrial Image Processing
Software Developers / C++/PyThon
Linux Administrators / DevOps
You will be working in an extremely creative environment with a lot of freedom, focused on a joint target with great opportunities to grow internationally.
Responsibilities:
Designing and applying (machine learning) algorithms for extraction of information from image data
Deriving technical parameters and specifications from measured data
Performance estimation and definition of algorithm test procedures
Deployment of algorithms as minimum viable products focusing on early customer feedback
Creation and maintenance of related technical documentation
Researching, rating and implementing development tools
Using open source software libraries from the field of signal processing, computer vision and data science
Professional guidance of Junior level Data Scientists
Visit of national and international conferences on a regular basis
Requirements
Requirements
Moreover, you should bring with you:
Deep understanding of Computer Vision and Machine Learning methods applied in an industrial context
Hands-on experience with gathering of image data and image data cleaning
Solid knowledge of applied mathematics (linear algebra, optimization, probability theory)
Basic knowledge of physics
Experience with at least one object oriented programming language (e.g.
Python, C++)
Basic understanding of professional software development
Education and Experience
University degree in physics, electrical engineering, computer science or similar fields
5+ years relevant work experience in industry in the field of Computer Vision
About Rosen-Group:
","['linux', 'python']","['probabl', 'computer vision', 'data', 'analyz', 'pipelin', 'optim', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['linux', 'python', 'probabl', 'computer vision', 'data', 'analyz', 'pipelin', 'optim', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within process sector industries, including chemicals, oil and gas, industrial products and continuous manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM-related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches to machine learning and linear algebra, including Support Vector Machine (SVM) for linear categorization and Singular Value Decomposition (SVD) to reduce dimensionality of data
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'support vector machine', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'svm', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'svd', 'healthcar']"
DS,"PhD.
NLP Data Scientist
Please call if you have questions regarding the qualifications!
NLP (Natural Language Processing) Data Scientist in Healthcare
This is a Direct Hire/FTE salaried opportunity in Columbus, Ohio.
PhD candidates with specific healthcare experience / projects OR a Masters (senior level DS) with 3 years healthcare experience ONLY
Degree should be in Computer Science, Statistics, Biostatistics, or something similar.
EAD/OPT and H1B candidates eligible!
Do you consider yourself a Data Scientist?
Do you have a PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Biostats, Computer Science, or something comparable?
If you have a Master's degree with 3 years current Data Science experience focused on NLP, you can also be considered.
Do you have current or recent experience working in NLP (Natural Language Processing)?
Do you love statistics and the manipulation of data?
Are you interested in true Big Data environments?
Do you have a solid experience with ""R"" or Python development background?
Are you experienced with enterprise level process and procedures?
This opportunity with one of Columbus, Ohio best known enterprises may be a great option for you to consider.
A recent expansion in their practice has caused a need for ""A"" players.
Is this you?
You will be working on a truly collaborative team with other Data Scientists that have different levels of experience and specialization.
Mentorship, ownership, and visibility are all attributes that can be yours to experience!!!
-Extremely friendly and employee-centric atmosphere
-Lots of room for growth, development and educational opportunities
-New development
-Always use the latest / emerging technologies
-Work/Life balance (work from home at least 2 days per week)
-Company paid Pension / Health insurance / Dental insurance / Vision insurance /Paid Time Off /Paid holidays
Primary Role:
-Data Science focused on NLP (Natural Language Processing) projects
-Developing and administering statistical and machine learning methods applied to predictive analytics problems in the healthcare space.
-""R"", SQL, and statistical software development (ex.
SAS/SPSS, etc.)
-Must have Clinical/Research/Academic -centric current experience
-Ph.D or Masters ONLY (heavy research, clinical, or academia projects will be considered)
-Heavy on statistical modeling, R, python and statistical software package (ex.SAS/SPSS, etc.)
experience
Requirements for the Data Scientist:
-3+ years of experience in statistical modeling (the more the better!)
-
-PhD candidates with specific healthcare experience / projects OR a Masters (senior level DS) with 3 years healthcare experience ONLY (Statistics and/or Computer Science areas are best)
-SQL and/or pl/sql
-R, python,
-NLP (Natural Language Processing) and Machine Learning algorithm development
-Object oriented programming language knowledge/experience (Java/Python)
Next steps: Call me to discuss your background and more importantly, your future goals!
Oh, and by the way....
Please send your resume and call me (the best candidates always do both).
Tom Gaebelein
440.627.6925 / tom@emeraldresourcegroup.com
","['sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'natural language processing', 'biostatist', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['sql', 'r', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'nlp', 'biostatist', 'research', 'nlp', 'statist', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"· Working closely with the technology and learning teams, the DataScientist will be responsible for the following:
· Creating infrastructure for thedelivery team; Maintain a working knowledge of data mining and visualizationbest practices; Work in coordination with the team for better and quickresults;
· Being able to develop or program databases; Having theability to query databases and perform statistical analysis; Analyze the dataavailable and provide the relevant output;
· Collaborate with engineering colleagues to define the datamodeling goals for designated project areas;
· Having a good understanding of design and architectureprinciples; Understand the importance of the system development and help ingetting it implemented;
· Have good time management skills and should be able to meetthe expected deliverables;
· Being able to create examples, prototypes, demonstrations tohelp management better understand the work;
· Capacity to motivate and train junior scientists and offercounsel to peers.
Being able to work autonomously;
Basic Qualifications:
Passion, commitment, resourcefulness, and a drive to continuelearning are essential prerequisites.
For this role, were also looking forsomeone who meets the following criteria:
· Ph.D./ Master's Degree in Statistics,Mathematics, Computer Science, or equivalent; 5+ years of data science/miningexperience;
· Excellent knowledge of at least twocoding languages, e.g.
Python, Java, Scala, R Language, SQL, ETL Tools, Perland Pig;
· Should have worked on different toolslike Java, SQL, Python, etc.
; Good experience with SQL, Linux shell scripts,Perl, and AWK;
· Domain knowledge in at least twoindustries; Minimum five years of experience in customer-facing activities;
· Overall knowledge of BusinessIntelligence; in particular, data modeling, ETL, and reporting tools;
· Extensive hands-on experience workingwith very large data sets, including statistical analyses, data visualization,data mining, and data cleansing/transformation;
","['python', 'linux', 'scala', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'perl', 'java']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'visual', 'statist', 'data modeling']",2.0,"['python', 'linux', 'scala', 'pig', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'perl', 'java', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'visual', 'statist', 'data modeling']"
DS,"Introduction
Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options.
Your Role and Responsibilities
Quantum computers are incredibly powerful machines that take a new approach to processing information.
Built on the principles of quantum mechanics, they exploit complex and fascinating laws of nature that are always there, but usually remain hidden from view.
By harnessing such natural behavior, quantum computers can run new types of algorithms to process information more holistically.
They may one day lead to revolutionary breakthroughs in materials and drug discovery, the optimization of complex manmade systems, and artificial intelligence.
What youll be doing:
Working with quantum industry experts, you will be a key member of a multi-discipline squad focused on building quantum capabilities and researching quantum application development for clients within discrete manufacturing industries, including aerospace & defense, automotive and electronics manufacturing.
Engage and educate client data science teams to define promising areas for quantum exploration
Implement quantum approaches, which includes data pre-/post-processing, running numerics and visualizing data
Collaborate with industry and solutioning experts to design and shape experiments to demonstrate quantum-enabled advantage
Define best practices related to information architecture, including collection, integration, organization, analysis and visualization of data for quantum-enabled impact
Engage in practice development initiatives focused on building employee knowledge and skills in specific areas of expertise through coaching and development of training course material
Career Growth
Diversity of people: Commitment to creating a diverse and inclusive culture
Benefits
• Parental Bonding/Maternity Leave
• Paid Care Leave
• Healthcare, Dental and Vision
• Flexible Work Hours
• Adoption and Surrogacy Assistance Program
• Employee Discounts
• Worldwide Diversity & Inclusion and Business Resource Groups
• Employee Stock Purchase Plan
• Retirement Plan
http://www-01.ibm.com/employment/us/benefits
Recognitions
Fortune Most Admired Companies
DiversityInc.
Top 10 Companies for Global Diversity
National Association of Female Executives Top 50 Companies for Female Executives
Working Mother 100 Best Companies
2016 Climate Leadership Award
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
PhD/Masters in STEM related fields with knowledge in quantum computing.
5+ years of data engineering and data science experience
2+ years of consulting experience within specific industries with strong domain expertise and business acumen
Proficiency with classical approaches for optimization, machine learning and linear algebra, including linear and combinatorial optimization, routing heuristics, classification and clustering technics, numerical simulation, statistics analysis, real time processing
Familiar with Qiskit software, including Qiskit Aqua for domain applications and Qiskit Terra for quantum circuit design and optimization
Excellent ideation, facilitation and communications skills
Detail-oriented team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
English: Fluent
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Experience with linear programming and/or general mathematical programming
Proficiency in Python with good knowledge of Jupyter, Tensor, Numpy
Deep knowledge and application expertise in ML/DL
Familiarity with Qiskit and quantum concepts and principles, able to model classical ML/DL algorithms within quantum principles
Experience with some aspect of high-performance computing use within an industry context
About Business Unit
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['tensor', 'excel', 'jupyt', 'python', 'numpi', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
DS,"New Challenge: New Team, New Office!
Have you ever thought about pipelines and integrity?
Why should pipelines need machine learning?
The answer is simple: Pipeline inspections generate a lot of sensor data (e.g.
from ultrasonic sensors) which have to be analyzed using state of the art computer vision techniques.
Think of it like doing healthcare just for pipelines.
Interested?
Then learn more about industrial machine learning applications and data analysis for pipeline data in a start-up environment.
Be part of a new team.
Shape the team and your future.
Enjoy working in a multi-cultural and multi-national team.
Data Engineers for Industrial Image Data
Data Scientists for Industrial Image Processing
Software Developers / C++/PyThon
Linux Administrators / DevOps
You will be working in an extremely creative environment with a lot of freedom, focused on a joint target with great opportunities to grow internationally.
Responsibilities:
Designing and applying (machine learning) algorithms for extraction of information from image data
Deriving technical parameters and specifications from measured data
Performance estimation and definition of algorithm test procedures
Deployment of algorithms as minimum viable products focusing on early customer feedback
Creation and maintenance of related technical documentation
Researching, rating and implementing development tools
Using open source software libraries from the field of signal processing, computer vision and data science
Professional guidance of Junior level Data Scientists
Visit of national and international conferences on a regular basis
Requirements:
Moreover, you should bring with you:
Deep understanding of Computer Vision and Machine Learning methods applied in an industrial context
Hands-on experience with gathering of image data and image data cleaning
Solid knowledge of applied mathematics (linear algebra, optimization, probability theory)
Basic knowledge of physics
Experience with at least one object oriented programming language (e.g.
Python, C++)
Basic understanding of professional software development
Education and Experience
University degree in physics, electrical engineering, computer science or similar fields
5+ years relevant work experience in industry in the field of Computer Vision
About Rosen-Group:
","['linux', 'python']","['probabl', 'computer vision', 'data', 'analyz', 'pipelin', 'optim', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['linux', 'python', 'probabl', 'computer vision', 'data', 'analyz', 'pipelin', 'optim', 'machine learning', 'healthcar']"
DS,"There is no shortage of computational and statistical challenges to tackle.
In addition to telematics risk-scoring, the Data Science team works on core problems in pricing model development, reserving methodology, marketing, and strategic business forecasts.
This includes taking high-level business challenges, translating them into a concrete, quantitative framework, and shepherding solutions from R&D into production.
A Senior Data Scientist is expected to join the team with years of industry or academic experience in directly relevant topics.
Responsibilities
Strong individual contributor with interest in growing a team of data scientists.
Learning the required tools to get the job done, e.g.
Python, R, Spark, SQL, etc.
Building data processing pipelines to quickly iterate on research ideas and put them into production.
Effectively communicating insights from complex analyses.
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions.
Minimum Qualifications
Masters or PhD in a quantitative discipline with 5+ years of applying advanced quantitative techniques.
Exceptional communicator and storyteller.
Strong programming skills with experience using modern packages in R and Python.
Demonstrated experience building, validating, and applying statistical machine learning methods.
Strong programming skills in R or Python
Knowledge of data science technical stacks
If you are the kind of person that loves tackling big problems with a collaborative group of people until you find solutions, you belong here.
Fair.
Affordable.
Personal.
Easy.
Accessible.
Beyond.
","['r', 'sql', 'spark', 'python']","['risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",2.0,"['r', 'sql', 'spark', 'python', 'risk', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
DS,"Good understanding of machine learning and data modeling concepts Proven Expertise in Analyzing Structured and Unstructured Data Experience in Statistical analysis and predictive modeling Expertise in Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing techniques Proficiency in one or more modern programming languages (Python, R etc.)
Good experience with SQL Understanding of software skills such as business analysis, development, maintenance and software improvement.
Experience working on AWS Cloud Excellent communication and people interaction skills Data visualization skills (nice to have) 5+ years experience Work with business partners to understand challenges and problem statements Work with business partners to elaborate use cases Perform data analysis and data mining Evaluate various AIML modelsalgorithm for the given use case and recommend approach Design and implement an AIML solutions Establish and document ML standards within the team Create examples, prototypes, demonstrations to senior management Train junior scientists and offer counsel to peers.
Experience in Insurance, Banking, Financial Services Industry Excellent analytical and research skills Strong communication and organizational skills Ability to multi-task, prioritize and execute on assigned deliverables Ability to quickly learn new systems and business processes Knowledge of Agile
","['python', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud']","['data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['python', 'excel', 'sql', 'r', 'aw', 'cloud', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
DS,"You will collaborate with cross-functional teams and business partners to define the technical problem statement and hypotheses to test.
You will develop efficient and accurate analytical models which mimic business decisions and incorporate those models into analytical data products and tools.
You will have the opportunity to drive current and future strategy by leveraging your analytical skills as you ensure business value and communicate the results.
Multiple positions open.
Key Responsibilities
Collaborate with business partners to develop innovative solutions to meet objectives utilizing cutting edge techniques and tools.
Advocate and educate on the value of data-driven decision making; focus on the “how and why” of solutioning.
Lead analytic approaches; integrate solutions collaboratively into applications and tools with data engineers, business leads, analysts and developers.
Create repeatable, interpretable, dynamic and scalable models that are seamlessly incorporated into analytic data products.
Engineer features by using your business acumen to find new ways to combine disparate internal and external data sources.
Share your passion for Data Science with the broader enterprise community; identify and develop long-term processes, frameworks, tools, methods and standards.
Collaborate, coach, and learn with a growing team of experienced Data Scientists.
Stay connected with external sources of ideas through conferences and community engagements.Multipl
Requirements
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics and 5+ years of Data Science experience required
Proficiency in Python or R and in writing complex SQL queries
Proficiency with Machine Learning concepts and modeling techniques to solve problems such as clustering, classification, regression, anomaly detection, simulation and optimization problems on large scale data sets.
Ability to implement ML best practices for the entire Data Science lifecycle
Exceptional communication and collaboration skills to understand business partner needs and deliver solutions
Bias for action, with the ability to deliver outstanding results through task prioritization and time management
Experience with data visualization tools — Tableau, R Shiny etc preferred
Benefits
This position offers an excellent opportunity for significant career development in a fast-growing and challenging entrepreneurial environment with a high degree of individual responsibility.
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python']","['regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'shini', 'python', 'regress', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
DS,"The Business Planning and Analysis (BP&A) team is a part of Consumer and Community Banking Finance and Operations.
The Quantitative Workforce Optimization (QWO) team is tasked with delivering quantitatively driven solutions to support the core BP&A functions (demand forecasting, capacity planning, resource scheduling, and business analysis & support).
Projects engaged by the QWO team can be complex, data intensive, and of a high level of difficulty, each having significant impact on the business.
Typically these problems will be of an unstructured nature, whereby the employee will be expected to quickly assess and comprehend the situation then develop a practical problem solving strategy.
You will be expected to analyze the topic in question, develop solution proposals and review their results and next steps with management for prioritization and delivery.
The QWO team has four core functions:
Data Infrastructure & Controls
Run-the-Bank Quant
Change-the-Bank Quant
Operations
The Run-the-Bank Quant team is tasked with ensuring the day-to-day analytics and reporting activities are delivered quickly and to stakeholder satisfaction.
Particular focus is paid to ad-hoc and executive questions surrounding:
Scenario analyses in support of CAO, marketing, National Sales, site strategy, call center, etc.
troubleshooting
Exploratory data analysis for root-cause explanations to answer the pre/post ""why"" questions (e.g.
Non-operational but informational reporting / visualization and executive presentations
Responsibilities
The RTB Quant Vice President will be charged with delivering on the RTB functional priorities listed prior.
Qualifications
Educational Background
Bachelor's Degree with 5+ years or Master's+ with 3+ years of experience operating as an analytics professional (e.g.
data scientist, statistician, or related professions) in a quantitative field: Statistics, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Economics, Mathematics, Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Computer Science, Information Science, and related disciplines.
Technical Skills
Hands on experience delivering descriptive statistics, inference, and visualizations to communicate with partners and stakeholders.
Experience with big-data technologies such as Hadoop, Spark, SparkML, etc.
Familiarity with basic data table operations (SQL, Hive, etc.)
Excellent analytical skills with a track record in defining customer strategies through the use of data
Problem Solving & Leadership Skills
Must have strong interpersonal skills and ability to deliver and defend your analytics insights under executive scrutiny
Developing and communicating business recommendations and insights in easy-to-understand-way leveraging data to tell a story
Demonstrated relationship building skills, with a superior ability to make things happen through the use of positive influence.
History of making an impact, developing and executing on strategies and delivering superior results in both the short and long term
Develop and maintain working relationship with other businesses, functional groups and vendor organizations.
Ability to work effectively and gain credibility and respect of others.
Lead and persuade others while positively influencing the outcome of team efforts.
Preferred Skills
Advanced expertise with Time Series and Operations Research techniques.
Experience with Spark, Trifacta, HiveQL, Alteryx, and SAS
Experience with Tableau or Qlik
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'qlik', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa']","['machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['spark', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'qlik', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'sa', 'machine learning', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'optim', 'exploratori', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'time series', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
DS,"The ideal candidate will have experience in Private Passenger Auto, with expertise in the research process, evaluation protocols, and post-deployment analyses.
Responsibilities:
Technical and thought leadership on the Pricing R&D team
Development of a rigorous pre- and post-deployment frameworks
Constantly search for new predictive rating elements
Maintain and enhance the quantitative pipeline required for quickly moving proof-of-concepts into production
Minimum Qualifications
Strong, demonstrated experience building, validating, and applying statistical machine learning methods.
Strong programming skills with experience using SQL and modern packages in R.
Experience with large-scale analytics on AWS platforms
Exceptional communicator and storyteller.
Data science maturity
","['r', 'sql', 'aw']","['machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['r', 'sql', 'aw', 'machine learning', 'data', 'predict', 'research', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
